Carmakers not ready for Brexit, says SMMT as UK sales fall  
British MPs call for debate on post-Brexit immigration  
No-deal Brexit fears spark warning of UK car crash  
Images have power, but so do you. Help us represent beauty as it really is — unretouched. Show your support. Share your  selfie. 
I voted No because I wanted to remain in the EU. Never truly thought Brexit campaign would win. Obviously feel like a tool. Would definitely vote Yes in an IndyRef now 
Contingency plans for a "no deal" Brexit aimed to reassure Britons that the government is in control. Instead they have spread alarm.  
Maybe because no Brexiters wanted to raise the prospect of no deal sooner. It would have warned the public of the Brexit dangers sooner. And hiding reality from the public has been a primary objective of the Brexit Taliban 
Brexit has been the product of the most bankrupt idea system that western civilization has come up with. It is totally and utterly retrograde and self-defeating. 
The appalling consequence of #Brexit  
The hard of thought remain in denial; unable and unwilling to comprehend that their referendum result was delivered through the cheating, criminal and illegal activities of the Leave campaigns, an irrefutable FACT confirmed by the Electoral Commission and the ICO. #gettofuck 
So you’d think @UKLabour would be more forceful in their condemnation of Brexit then eh  
Good to know that the Irish plan to infiltrate the British Sandwich Association is working , we will replace all the #walkers crisps with #tayto on the side of every plate of sandwiches in the UK. #brexit  
I am so sick of the politicians who support Brexit pretending that all Brexit voters are as extremist and reckless as they are. #TuesdayThoughts 
Britain invaded 90% of countries in the world!! I actually think Tim doesnt realise that this type of arrogant comment is why you have to confirm that youre Scottish when abroad! #indyref2 #Brexit #DissolveTheUnion 
Some cry baby remoaners will seek not opportunity but solace in a new #Brexit national drink turnip gin  
Breaking News! EXPOSED! Mark Littlewood Head of the IEA speaking to an undercover reporter exposes and contradicts Shanker Singham's claim on #Newsnight that the IEA does not influence the Brexit process, as a lie - Disgusted RT 
There’s a concerted effort on British left to shut out free marketeers & non-EEA Brexit ideas from public debate. They’re being facilitated by soft-left media but Corbyn wd implement real restrictions. If you care about liberties and free exchange of ideas, donate to IEA, ASI etc 
It was jaw-dropping. The man is actually expecting a lorry, stuck in a queue in Calais, trying to get across the channel to "respect the will of the people". Perhaps post-Brexit instead of having EU/non-EU queues, we'll have a "Will Of The People" queue at Customs control? 
Could @SteveBakerHW or @Jacob_Rees_Mogg point to a single member state of EU27 that is contemplating the stockpiling of food, fuel or medicine & using their military for distribution because of the damage Brexit will do to themAnd if they can't, then why are we considering it ?  
No My Lord. I voted for Brexit. I am not a nationalist and I don't hate foreigners. But you. You are an EU nationalist. You seem to love every country except your own. #Brexit  
I'm just going to leave this here....think about it!!!Westminster doesn't work for ScotlandSo why should Scotland work for Westminster???Scotland has been the Westminster CASH-COW for too longIt's time to break the chains#YouYesYet#indyref2#Referendum#Independence 
This #thread below on #Brexit from one of the hard Brexiteers, and disgrace to #Scotland - Ross Thomson - proves everything that @IanDunt piece says.If you voted Leave & Tory & work in the food/agri-sector, you've a lot of waking up to do 
Indeed. The Brexit bashing Lord doesn’t declare his financial interests. The EU pays £500,000pa+ in pensions to 30 former HoL MEPs/officials, including Peter Mandelson who swore an EU oath of loyalty. That means they risk losing their pension if they speak out against the EU. 
#GreatAwakening #FreeTommy  People need to wake up to whats really happening in the world we live in Do some research don't just follow MSM Propaganda. Ask what they're Not telling you why?  #WeThePeople #WWG1WGA #Freedom #Brexit #TPRP #WalkAway #QAnon #FreeIran #ControlledMSM 
Because changing nothing can change everything. Look for our Beauty Mark on photos of models that have not been thinned, smoothed or digitally altered.    
Four out of five doctors 'believe NHS may collapse after Brexit' - Lucy Thornton 
Why a Referendum NOW when there was 4 years of study & consultation to decide that 47 Wards were needed?FOUR YEARS are now meaningless but a Referendum asking the uninformed will be the solution?FFS, think! 
I’ve lived with #Diabetes for 18 years. I’ve never had to worry about getting the #insulin I need via the #NHS, which literally allows me to stay alive. The possibility that, following #Brexit, I’ll not have access to medication is utterly terrifying. 
Theresa May's failure to set out immigration rules after Brexit will allow fears to be 'exploited' again, MPs warn  
Brexit is over, the government just need time to tell us.  
#Toronto city council wants referendum in wake of #DougFord cuts #onpoli #topoli  
We voted to leave the #EUDid you back #BrexitIf you did please sign and retweet this petition@UKfollowgain @CllrBSilvester @ActivePatriots 
Lord Hall the man behind all the BBC’s Brexit coverage, the guidelines, the bias, the non stop parade of Brexiteers, the censorship of positive EU stories. The man trying to use the immense power of the BBC to pull us out of the EU. Thanks Radio Times for the truth. #FBPE 
Happy 18th birthday to the most pro Brexit member of the best GC Twitter has ever had! Mad that this gimp is actually an adult now! Have a good one brother  xxx  
Some European friends did hope that Brexit would "save" Europe in sense that Commission/Brussels/political classes in members might get that things needed to change. But if anything the reverse seems to have happened. The penny hasn't dropped. They've double down on more Europe 
Whichever Cabinet minister stupidly claimed that a no deal #Brexit would spark “a sharp recession at least as bad as 2008” needs to resign ASAP! Project Fear has no place in our @Conservatives Government! Let's focus on our bright free-trading future!  
Exactly,  it wasn’t a “problem” because systems people assessed the issues, made plans and then executed the plans.  Brexit.... not so much  
Good report on immigration policy after Brexit from @CommonsHomeAffs, including detailed discussion of possible modifications to free movement within Single Market framework. 
Earlier, this pro-Brexit MP told the Director of the British Sandwich Association that he didn’t believe his worries about fresh food supplies in a no deal Brexit scenario (clip in tweet below).Now he is implying it is a “project fear” plot orchestrated by the Irish government.  
We have just published our 8th Report, which looks at the Future for devolution after Brexit. Read it here  
'BBC policy on Brexit is not impartial' @RadioTimes. Lord Hall should be removed from the BBC. He is the Brexit guideline writer and enforcer. He has brought the corporation into total disrepute. Stop Lord Hall’s Brexit propaganda. #FBPE 
Brexit: Deutsche Bank moves half of euro clearing business from London to Frankfurt  
Others however grasped the opportunities of #brexit and rediscovered traditional food sources one such well loved tale is the Pied Rat Rustler  
I regularly step into the minefields of Brexit, Israel-Palestine, and Trumpism but no other twitter fury compares with the twitter fury of NUFC fans in the days before a transfer window closes. 
Let me get this straight. MPs have swanned off on holiday without having made reqd preparations for full BREXIT? They've had over 2 YEARS to organise all this. Parliament recess now coinciding with scare stories about how Brexit's too difficult to do properly? Give. Me. Strength. 
Project Fear is a joke; a hysterical conspiracy of the entitled. It’s actually excellent that people like Blair and Campbell and Soubry and Clegg are falling apart over Brexit.It’s proof of the seismic change it represents. 
Get it into your Thick Head Mandelson .Every one of your umpteen amendments in the HOL was defeated in the HOC .There Will Be NO Second Referendum  
How much Emily Maitlis gets out of her pram when @MarcusFysh refutes this total nonsense from Sandwich industry. Fancy going on telly & claiming you can’t provide a sandwich if we leave the EU! These ppl call themselves businessmen?  #Newsnight #Brexit  
US: Trump-Bannon (Breitbart)-Mercer (Cambridge Analytica)-Murdoch (Fox News)UK:Brexit-Bannon (Breitbart)-Mercer (Cambridge Analytica)-Murdoch (The Sun) 
No ones interested in how many Nobel winners you’ve published we’re interested in why you promised an ex-Oklahoma farmer investor meetings with UK Brexit ministers? 
MAITLIS: "What would be in those sandwiches? What do sandwiches look like, to you, after a no deal Brexit?" SANDWICH EXPERT: "There'll be shortages of ingredients like tomato, lettuce... avocados will be difficult to come by..."#sandwichoggeddon #noonevotedforthis #brexit  
Not silly, you were shown to be extremely stupid. Saying that people should get behind Brexit does not change what is going to happen. Also why don't you tell #Newsnight not to bring on experts if you are there, it must be terrible being totally out of your depth 
Macedonia to hold September 30 referendum on name change  
Finally the British Sandwich Association (BSA) are speaking out... #brexit  
If we need evidence that Brexit has nothing to do with *the will of the people* & everything to do with an opportunistic grab of a tainted ref result, here it is. An unholy alliance between disaster capitalists & deluded Marxists, each thinking they'll end up with the spoils.  
Politicians will offer miraculous promises to solve the #brexit food problem because after all it worked in 2016 here Theresa may offers the magic Gruel Potn  
PLEASE RETWEET THIS IF YOU AGREEEmily Maitliss was hysterical, shouty, bullying & rude when she attacked all things Brexit tonight.Do you agree that BBC bias against Brexit is 100% & Newsnight should be banned from covering Brexit as they are unable to do so professionally? 
This Brexit isn’t looking like what we were promised.  
UK @Conservatives Government Set to Take €1 Billion Funds from Scottish Control after Brexit #Brexit #DissolveTheUnion #indyref2 
London pretty much pays for the rest of the UK. When its income goes, how will Britain pay its way in the world? London traders are frogs boiling in a brexit soup  
The Referendum itself was 'self weighting' because it didn't allow 3m Brits abroad to vote, not 16-17 year olds! 
Fysh's eyes glazed over when he responded to a food industry guy pointing out the risk of no-deal border controls to the just-in-time nature of food transport. Then he simply said "You need to get behind Brexit, which people voted for". It was quite weird.  
Feel totally disillusioned at present with @UKLabour and it’s prevarication on #Brexit and the appalling, apparently wilful, blindness in the failure to tackle the ingrained antisemitism of many on the hard left @tom_watson @YvetteCooperMP @hilarybennmp et al please stand up... 
So given that we will not have freedom of movement after #Brexit, is the next series of Love Island planned for Anglesey? #newsnight 
Wear more clothes than you own. Borrow a box of fashion to wear all month long. Plans start at $79/month. Introducing the new way to shop. 
#Newsnight. No sandwiches after brexit. Never laughter so much. Yes there will be shortages because the EU don't want us to leave. They need our money. If they slow up the delivery of tomatoes. Who will it hurt . Yes the Spanish economy. No tomatoes  is price worth paying 
The slogan 'Break up Amazon!' (or Google or Facebook) reminds me of 'Brexit' - it sounds simple until you ask, well, 'into what?' 
The leave campaign needs relaunching.I suggest,Brexiteers need to follow each other on social media.Brexit Parties must form an alliance or come to an understanding for elections.Brexiteers need to join a Brexit Party.Leave need an official You tube channel for news & info. 
New Sky Data poll:Remain - 48%No Deal - 27%Govt deal - 13%Remain - 59%No Deal - 41%Referendum on deal: Yes - 50%, No - 40%RT if you also agree...  
I spoke to @BBCNewsnight's @nicholaswatt about No Deal. I think Theresa May needs to set out the difficult choices to be made in the next stages of Brexit, explain why she is prepared potentially to leave without a deal, and detail steps to minimise the damage that would cause  
Are you kidding me? It would be a loss of face for May and British democracy in general. No matter whether you supported remain or leave I don't care. You can't just throw the same referendum again and again until you like the result.  
Newsnight's sustained attack on Brexit has been perhaps the most transparently biased television I have EVER Seen. I've worked in both TV and Newspapers and I am truly shocked by this utter garbage. If I were a Brexiteer I would decline future interviews with Newsnight. 
Theresa May offers a MAGIC GRUEL POT. Part if the ladybird revised #brexit promises series  
Sir Tony Robinson: Tipping point in the Brexit debate. The crunch point is rapidly approaching when the PM will bring back her botched Brexit deal, or possibly no deal, and put it to Parliament. Join us in Bristol on August 11th to make your voice heard. Details to follow.  
Watching @BBCNewsnight Emily Maitlis doing a brilliant job tonight holding corrupt #Brexit bastards to account. Hello #BBC can we have more of this....long time coming. 
“From my point of view, a hard Brexit WTO would be the worst deal… I want people to face up to the options,” says Jonathan Djanogly MP.@maitlis | @JDjanogly  | #newsnight 
New TV reality show idea: -66 million contestants-trapped on Brexit island -£350 million-The winner is the one who works out that there is no viable solution to the EU negotiations and convinces everyone else to stop Brexit, in 8 weeks 
“I think silly season has obviously started a bit early this year … I don’t believe there would be a blockade of imports from the EU” - Conservative Marcus Fysh on warnings of a no-deal #brexit@maitlis | @MarcusFysh | #newsnight 
My Goodness !Just tuned into #newsnight & heard Marcus Fish Tory MP having his feet held to the fire on a "no deal #Brexit "His ignorance & arrogance beggars belief !Plus -he takes *stupid *to a whole new level !! 
On the one hand that's very reassuring, Tom. Genuinely. On the other, what the hell is @UKLabour doing burying itself in a self-inflicted row about antisemitism when there's the monumental screw up of Brexit out there which needs fighting? Or is the party not bothered?  
@MarcusFysh classic Brexiter empty noises. Not a single practical suggestion other than “respect the referendum”. Perfect example of what’s gone wrong with the political class. 
The UK imports over 50% of our food from other countries... saying "we need Brexit first and foremost" is mad. It is meaningless drivel. Borders are not "our choice" under WTO rules @MarcusFysh 
Is this actually fucking happening? #Newsnight #Brexit #prayforsandwiches  pic.twitter.com/Ri350ahtAp 
I guess.. I guess I just feel like this man on Newsnight is a lunatic and there will still be sandwiches after Brexit. 
Marcus Fysh is still a fully paid up member of the #Brexit Unicorn Society then. The food industry operates on the same just in time system that the car industry does. If there are hold ups at customs then produce will go off. It's not rocket science #Newsnight 
For people who have screeched about listening to the wisdom of business for the last 40 years, Tories seem intriguingly reluctant to listen to business warnings about Brexit effects #newsnight 
Irrespective of the effects of a 'no deal' Brexit this is utterly ridiculous 
Marcus Fysh - what a cretin! Why are Brexit politicians so obnoxious when challenged by an expert? #newsnight 
#BBCNewsnight seriously comparing no deal Brexit ramifications with the Millennium Bug? The latter ended up to be no problem because 1000s of specialists and experts around the world worked for years to ensure the computers would work. Unlike Brexit really - they don't do experts 
Marcus Fysh responds to an expert saying that fresh food won't get through from the continent by saying it's "project fear" and "we must respect the referendum" unbelievable #newsnight@MarcusFysh 
Tuesday's Express: "How dare he insult 17m #Brexit voters" (via @AllieHBNews) #bbcpapers #tomorrowspaperstoday 
Kate Hoey and Frank Field's local Labour parties knew what their views were and how they would vote, and still campaigned to re-elect them in 2017. De-selecting them now won't change that. If their votes propping up the government lead to a Brexit disaster, this is on you. 
Newsnight is now having a discussion on how Brexit might lead to a shortage of sandwiches. Honestly people, we really do need to stop this madness....#peoplesvote #eggandcressshortage 
“What does no deal mean for you in the sandwich industry?” Oh, boy. We really have reached the peak haven’t we? No ‘fresh sandwiches’ post-Brexit. #bbcnewsnight 
Newsnight Project Fear Special!Item 1) How horrifying will a No Deal Brexit be?Item 2) Is the army being drafted in?Item 3) Why won't we have sandwiches?Oh joy. FUBBC 
This "debate" in Labour about tackling anti-Semitism has turned into a collosal shit-show.The party should be hammering Tories on Brexit but once again the leadership are stabbing themselves. Depressing. 
The current likelihood of various Brexit outcomesToday's post at Jack of Kent7.5k hits and many excellent comments. 
mate i was actually gettin nervous about that. imagine they jack n dani didn't win would've been like brexit all over again 
If you’re an MP and you’ve seen the recent Brexit polling, and you can’t work out that the only way to save your sorry arse is to have a #PeoplesVote , then, with all due respect, you’re probably not cut out for politics.  
It's insane that there IS an EU Naval Force! This is yet another reason why we need to break free from EU rule: 'EU Naval Force To Move Headquarters Due To Brexit'  
If Laura and Paul win this will be the biggest scam since brexit happened #LoveIsland 
If Brexit wasn’t enough to prove the British public can’t be trusted with big votes then Laura and Paul coming second should be enough #LoveIsland 
Hm... Sounds like yet another manipulation with a referendum. Quite disappointing.  @Dimitrov_Nikola 
It’s hard to overstate how wrong eurosceptics’ predictions of the impact of Brexit on the EU have been so far.  
Excl: Cabinet minster deepens Tory Brexit war by warning no deal would spark “a sharp recession at least as bad as 2008” 
The IMF was wrong on ALL its Brexit predictions and issued grovelling apologies and corrections (articles).Yet they STILL churn out laughable politicised doom-mongering and it’s lapped up by the BBC and Sky (graph).  
People that voted for Paul/Laura definitely voted Brexit. #LoveIsland 
I read something suggesting we should have a second EU referendum. I'll tell you why that won't work. It'll look like Theresa May, a Remain voter, has deliberately done a bad job in order to make Remain more favourable. It'll look like a conspiracy and there will be CIVIL WAR! 
British public can’t be trusted to vote, first brexit and now Laura and Paul in the final 2. That man has said a total of 17 words since entering the villa #LoveIsland 
Can’t believe all the Scots have voted for Laura, out here thinking it was another referendum to leave the U.K. #LoveIsland 
Feel like this is gonna be brexit 2.0 when people voted leave or didn’t vote because they thought remain would win anyway  #LoveIsland 
Project Fear is Out of Hand…and It’s Working: @jackbuckby —  | #Brexit #UK #politics 
You’d think Jack and Dani are nailed on. But then again, it’s a public vote. Brexit and Trump both happened. #LoveIsland 
Lord Mandelson: Brexiteers are nationalists who hate foreigners, not patriots like me - You grubby arrogant man, we know your history and its not pretty, Brexit was won by 17.4 m Brits who have no need to shout their patriotic credentials  via @Telegraph 
men during the repeal referendum  
The country who brought you Brexit and Theresa May. Don’t trust anything we have to vote for anymore.#LoveIsland 
this feels like brexit all over again 
ah Brexit once again. The Fiat 500 Nation defeated us. #loveisland 
No policy shift.Unity debate underway. Chaotic/crash Brexit not best mood music 4 referendum. But referendum will happen one way or another  
WHAT IN THE FUCKING BREXIT #LoveIsland 
do we trust this ridiculous country with a second referendum though, the options will be yes or no and we'll still somehow manage to vote to set Ipswich on fire 
British farmers say they are facing the "soul-destroying" prospect of leaving crops to rot in the fields unless a post-Brexit visa scheme for seasonal workers is announced soon  
The Sky poll shows the public - 1) have lost faith in May's ability to deliver #Brexit2) realise the #ChequersPlan is both a #BrexitBetrayal and would leave us as a colony of the EU This is a wake up call to the Tories to ditch Theresa May before it is too late #MayMustGo 
Heaver: May as the face of Brexit is a dream for Remainers – Brexiteers must act now  
Brexit:Like being promised the best blow job EVER! Then finding out it's just you and Farage, alone on Fantasy Island. 
It's very simple.There's no majority in parliament for either aNo Deal Brexit,Hard Brexit,Soft Brexit,Unicorn Brexit,Corbyn Brexit,Cakeist Brexit,Chequers Brexit,Scooby Doo BrexitOr WTF Brexit.Faced with such a stalemate, we REALLY need to ask the people again !!!  
1/ They have attacked the Electoral Commission & the Civil Service & from Theresa May downwards they attacked the Article 50 case courts and those taking the case to court - The Tory right has been attacking the institutions which underpin our democracy.#Brexit #PeoplesVote 
Right: I’m on holiday for the next two weeks  I might pop in sometimes if Brexit goes too batshit, but that’ll be it until I return to the United Kingdom of Brexit Unicorns and Cake. Keep pushing, everyone: the moment is ours! pic.twitter.com/m6mRzecz6j 
This nonsense about a 2nd #Brexit referendum.Tosh!Literature (which backed remain!) sent to all homes said:The Government would implement the outcomeIt was a once in a generation decisionI didn't hear remain asking for a 2nd referendum before the vote.   
New Italian deputy prime minister, Matteo Salvini wants Brexit Britain to succeed and hopes it serves as an example of the people fighting back against the EU elite.Let's hope Britain paves the way for others to follow!   
I have been allowed out to cover #Brexit in the REAL WORLD. Find out where I am on @BBCNews during the day tomorrow. 
I wonder if a single person has ever changed their mind (either way) about Brexit because of a tweet? 
Femi stands up for reasonable Brexit voters, when UKIP spokesperson tries to say they're just like him.  
Why are some at City Hall suggesting we hold a time wasting, expensive referendum, unlikely to be held, even less likely to have significant voting turnout, whose result would in any case not be binding with the provincial government to any action. #disgusted #topoli 
[This time with correct link!]Yet more controversy over the cheating by the #VoteLeave campaign in #Brexit #Referendum: 
I'm worried about these contestants in the Love Island final. They're going to be so disturbed when they leave the villa and find out how bad Brexit is going. 
One of the points I did not get to make on Sky News this evening was that their poll is flawed. It was a poll of 1,466 Sky viewers, & they are more likely to have a preponderance to be ant-Brexit anyway, since Sky is an anti-Brexit channel. 
I totally agree @timfarron . @frankfieldteam is one of the most hard working & compassionate MPs I know. He is my friend and should not be hounded like this. We have opposite views on Brexit, but Parliament needs all voices to truly represent our country  
Jacob Rees-Mogg slams PM for failing to prepare for No Brexit deal  via @MailOnline 
'Brexit means Brexit, but Theresa May has decided the people mustn't know what it really means'  
Lord Owen: ‘Parliament has let down the country and Theresa's May's bespoke Brexit plan will end badly’  
There is nothing about #Brexit that we can be proud of.If it goes ahead we will look back in future decades and feel thoroughly ashamed of this catastrophic and selfish decision.  
Theresa May is two years behind the public on Brexit"  
Killer thread by Tory Leave MP. How May is totally betraying Brexit.  
“@BBC policy on Brexit is not impartial.”And when even the Radio Times is pointing that out, you know there is a problem.“It is late, but not too late, for Lord Hall to withdraw his Brexit ‘guidelines’ - or history will judge him and @BBCNews harshly.” 
Brexit will transfer huge wealth from the middle class to the wealthy.Why is Jeremy Corbyn and his Labour Party willing to forgo 16,000,000 potential voters and make some real change, thus rendering the Tories defunct for decades?Answer: They are the same Establishment! 
This is an incredible statistic; how do 10% of people think the government is doing a good job negotiating Brexit?!  
Enjoyed discussing Brexit and Corbynomics on @novaramedia with @graceblakeley and @michaeljswalker. Full hour here. #tyskysour 
BBC reporting shock news that after Brexit, UK will no longer host centre for EU naval ops. Good, that's why we voted Leave isn't it? What it doesn't report is what a blow this is to any idea of credible, EU lead, naval power. Also good. 
Remarkable poll findings from SkyNews. The majority of the UK now think Brexit will be bad for the country and 50 per cent want a public vote on the final deal.   “Britain has changed its mind about Brexit” by @SkyNews 
If Jack and Dani dont win love island. It will be the stupidest vote result since Brexit. #LoveIsland⁠ ⁠ 
Just a quick reminder that if you’re not allowed to change your mind, it’s not democracy. Let’s have a #PeoplesVote on the final #Brexit deal. 
Hard to disagree with #Brexiteer Peter Bone's conclusion about the government's plan to spread panic and fear over a No Deal (i.e. WTO) #Brexit"This is as stupid as the Project Fear stuff in the referendum campaign" 
‘We face the biggest peacetime decision in a generation – the public must have the final say on Brexit’  
As we approach #Brexit you may notice soldiers in the countryside outside your town, do not approach them or ask them questions. Farmers if they ask you to use your land or barns you must comply with their requests.#NoDealBrexit #NoDealSurvival 
This new poll shows a massive swing against #Brexit Is this a game changer?  
Martin Rowson on ministers selling Brexit – cartoon  
This is an astonishing display by @SkyNews of which Goebbels would be proud. Truly astonishing, brazen abuse of reality. #BREXIT 
It seems so weird that #LoveIsland ends tonight tbh - it only feels like yesterday that Hayley was warning us about Brexit's impact on Trees 
Do you want you really really want to piss off?Boris JohnsonMicheal GoveIan Duncan SmithLiam FoxDominic RabbJeremy HuntAndDonald TrumpWrite to your MP to demand a peoples vote on brexitThe Trump baby will have an epic public meltdown of biblical proportions 
If Jack and Dani don’t win tonight it will be the worst decision the UK public have made since brexit Think it may actually be worse than brexit.. #LoveIslandfinal #LoveIsland 
If Trump and Brexit have taught us anything, it’s that we can’t take Jack and Dani’s triumph for granted. We all have to vote. #LoveIslandFinal 
New images of Civil Guard using gas against public during Catalan referendum 
Reading a fairly damning report from MPs on state of relations between UK and devolved governments in context of Brexit. Will have details on #BBCGMS in the morning  
If you're a fan of #LoveIslandfinal make the most of it this year folks. Next year, after the Tories have ballsed up Brexit, the UK is going to be Hunger Games Island. 
Used to find it horrible when the cat brought dead birds and mice in, but with Brexit looming it could be the difference between survival and starvation 
Seriously impressed with your calm, factual & intelligent analysis. All delivered in respectful way to Mr Farage. His complete inability to engage on same level echoes all those who ardently support Brexit. Sensible discussion? Nah. Wish you worked in Parliament. Or the media. 
Why the “Brexit Dividend” is Brexcrement  
This government is complicit in the covering up of illegal activity. The referendum was won illegally. Cabinet Ministers knew about it and Westminster is rife with foreign interference. There are only two sides now, those that believe in British democracy and those that do not. 
“Parliament has let down the nation..they are a miserable lot,gripped by a religion, can’t stop believing in it.They've managed to convince themselves they are entitled in a strange way to thwart #Brexit."- the formerly very pro-EU Lord Owen.Hits the nail on the head?  
‘Fretful, Weak, Incompetent’: Rees-Mogg Blasts Gov For Failing to Prepare ‘No Deal’ Brexit  
This is how EU trade negotiations are done-full transparency. If we Brexit ours will be done in secret by ministers reporting only to cabinet. Taking back control, but by whom?  
When #ProjectFear decide that their fear tactics need to be more realistic #Brexit  
Remainers are gripped by a religion: Lord Owen blasts 'sourpuss' Soubry bid to stop Brexit  
Deutsche Bank moves half of its Euro clearing from London to Frankfurt. Only a few hundred jobs will be lost, but if London loses its Euro clearing status it could loose up to 100k jobs which would be an economic disaster. #Brexit #PeoplesVote #StopBrexit 
Ben Bradshaw - The Sky #Brexit poll is further confirmation of growing support for a #PeoplesVote... the poll also shows a clear majority would now vote to stay in the EU given the reality we are now facing as brexit looms.#StopBrexit #FBPE @BenPBradshaw 
Because it's a vote on the final deal  Mr Morgan @piersmorgan you halfwit. A chance for everyone, even you, to tell the government whether you agree with the deal or not. Do you deny the people the right to respond to the inadequate way the government is handling #Brexit ?  
Yes let’s crash the country because the people who lied to win the referendum now say it would really be bad if the will of the people was different. 
Only when you say Republic of Macedonia Mr. Hahn, you will have the credibility to call upon the citizens of this country to meke use of their democratic right: to vote for, against or to to boycott the referendum! 
Councillor Gord Perks: “We’re not a creature of the province, we’re the voice of Torontonians. And our job is not to toddle up to Queen’s Park and ask them ‘please sir, can I have a referendum?’ … My permission doesn’t come from them. My permission comes from Torontonians.” 
Can anyone recommend a good quality Leaver to debate Brexit with?I've tried so many but they keep disappearing at the first mention of a fact. 
A vet calls in to LBC about Brexit and leaves Nigel Farage speechless.By @samwoolfe 
‘God, help us’: British Army on standby in case of no-deal #Brexit supply issues  
Walkers crisps-employ 1,100  people in their main U.K. crisp factory, use potatoes from U.K. farmers, British tomatoes, salt from Cheshire + real British chicken in the Chicken crisps. UKIP say stop buying them because they don’t like Gary Lineker. Typical Brexit voting idiots. 
As a member of the public with no ambitions to be promoted nor elected I enjoy giving my view of the world on Twitter. My part of town is in the highest 10% of the most multiply depived areas in all of the UK. Threats of post-Brexit scarcities to come ring rather hollow here. 
This Scot living through Brexit says thank God for the internet, Twitter and the Irish media. 
Really hard to keep up with SF's position on a border poll. They've been calling for 1 every 5 minutes for the last 2 years now they want to see what Brexit will bring. Sensible change - we've been saying exactly that for 2 years. 
Sabotaging Brexit could do untold damage to social unity of the UK. The country is split 50-50. If it wont change to 60-40 any talk of 'meaningless advisory vote' etc. will fuel radicalisation - will be viewed as anti-democratic. 
Imagine when all the EU migrants go home after #Brexit. No more baguettes or pizza. People in the UK will be reduced to just eating traditional UK foods. Like chicken Balti.  
May's strategy? 1: "You can't have no deal because, as you can see, as soon as we start telling public what no deal means, they say they'd prefer no Brexit at all"2: "Its my deal or no Brexit at all, because Labour will stop no deal happening" (& public will back them - see 1)  
There are 36 states and U.S. territories holding gubernatorial elections this year and these races could be the biggest referendum of all on Donald Trump’s presidency.These 2018 gubernatorial races could provide 2020 snapshots:  #18for18 
Latest on Brexit “No Deal” preparations  
“I have been concerned at the continued attempts to refight the referendum and put the Leave campaigns in the dock,” writes @GregHands Well I’m far more concerned that politicians should wish criminal actions to be ignored... for political expediency. 
Gary Lineker was an outstanding footballer who is now an accomplished broadcaster. Duncan Smith is a serial failure ,responsible for the epic and still unfolding disaster of Welfare Reform now pontificating pompously on Brexit. Who would you rather have on your screens? 
1.In between all the #BrexitShambles it's interesting to note that Brexit never really took off as a "New-Brit" cultural trend. It didn't ignite any sense of excitement in the population. It left music, fashion and the art world cold.> 
James O'Brien visited Margate this weekend and it made him realise why so many seaside towns voted for Brexit  
"I think for @BorisJohnson the only viable strategy is to do the opposite of whatever @theresa_may does on Brexit" says @georgeeaton This mess isn't going anywhere 
#SkyNews. Wow. Best piece on Brexit I've seen for two years. Going in hard for a second vote now. @sajidjavid with terror in his eyes, saying 'the people have spoken!' Now an item on fields full of rotting fruit as workers leave. They are *going for it*. 
Just reading how Mussolini sought to neutralise & absorb Greece. He used propaganda to sow discord in Greek society & money to buy off politicians etc. The actors change but the play is the same #Putin #Brexit Time for us to stop the #Leave traitors #FBPE #PeoplesVote 
Jacob Rees-Mogg - "The PM has said for a long time that no deal is better than a bad deal. "If the Government cannot now show that it can deliver a workable deal based on WTO terms then it is not competent." #Brexit  
Brextremists are small men with no power who because of the advisory referendum are small men who now smell power. They will always be small. 
I don’t know about you but I don’t believe A WORD Sky News says about #Brexit. 
Yes, as an ex-BBC journalist, I am appalled by the ineptitude of BBC journalists, who every day fail to tear apart the lies of Brexiters, including the hypocrisy of @Theresa_May, who told the nation that Brexit would not be in the country's best interests. 
BRITAIN'S SECRET BREXIT WEAPON: UK can secure 10-year TARIFF-FREE trade if no EU deal  
Oh p*ss off. The referendum hasn’t even been enacted yet. You’re merely trying to repeat the vote until you win. Now go and become something useful, like a door stop. x  
Brexit has nothing to do with the left - it's a project of the right. We need to expose this - to challenge the people who voted leave. People have been left behind. But the answer is not to leave the EU. We need radical economic policies. @Manuel_TSSA at #LeftAgainstBrexit 
Lord Owen blasts 'sourpuss' Soubry's bid to stop #Brexit He also highlights the hypocrisy of Remainers in Parliament who voted for the EU referendum but now who feel they "are entitled in a strange way to thwart Brexit." 
Today's @News_Letter column: collapse of Conservatives; a second referendum; and nasty, nasty politics.  
Tory MP Bridgen“The revolt in the party in the country over May’s #Brexit betrayal is now reaching boiling point. Local Conservative associations are in uproar. Our grassroots activists want May to abandon her disastrous proposals or fall on her sword” 
We all know where this is going...subtle as a turd on a vicar's lawn. 
Mary Lou McDonald accused the British government and the DUP of prolonging Stormont's power-sharing crisis to allow an unreflective view of Northern Ireland to be presented in the Brexit debate  
The #PeoplesVote is the antithesis of democracy. Its entire outlook is based on the betrayal of the voters. We have already had a People’s Vote on the EU and it was by far the greatest democratic exercise in our modern political history. #Brexit  
Nobody should fear a second EU referendum.If Brexit is so great and going well, make that case, Brexit will be a huge success so WIN.Or if you see Brexit as a massive mistake, make the case for that.No democratic decision is being overturned if people have changed their view 
Quick Poll. Two years on from the Brexit decision are you; 
The far right won't go quiet if we leave the EU, they won't be appeased, they won't stop.Spot on from Zoe Williams, Brexit is the doorway for the far right, not the destination.#LeftAgainstBrexit#StopBrexit 
Give me a 2nd referendum you shit pic.twitter.com/GNZYEyeCBW 
UKIP wants people to boycott Walkers over Gary Lineker’s 2nd referendum support – our favourite 11 responses 
Excellent point!   Vote for 'Change'  on your mail-in referendum ballot this fall.          #pr4bc #bcpoli More info here:  …Sign the pledge here:  … 
These tongue-in-cheek posters about post-Brexit shortages provide food for thought h/t @HopelessSurfer 
All the man hours (or person hours) that organisations like the #NHS are having to spend preparing for a possible No Deal that could more usefully spent on something else. The utter madness of #Brexit. #C4News 
Listening to Neil Dickson on #C4news re. contingency planning that needs to be undertaken for a No Deal Brexit. Such an utter waste of resources in an already under-resourced health service. And so farcically unnecessary. 
Distinguishing between people who told lies & people who merely believed them, and treating both accordingly, is the next big Brexit challenge. 
What's going to change, exactly, according to the Conservative Government? EU nationals without criminal records will still be able to seek jobs in the UK post-Brexit unimpeded. Still have preferential treatment over non-EU nationals. Still undercut the UK workforce on pay. 
If you're in #Cornwall enjoying our beautiful beaches over the summer, spare a thought for how things were in the 60s and 70s, and remember why our water is so much cleaner & safer now.#Brexit #StopBrexit #PeoplesVote 
Lord Owen - "Parliamentarians are a miserable lot, frankly. I think they were gripped by a religion and they can't stop believing in it.“And, they have really managed to convince themselves that they are entitled in a strange way to thwart #Brexit."  
Organicco easiPAYER blockchain platform will integrate with legislation, customs duty and tax handling for cross-border trade; making it transparent, easy and low cost for SME. A soltuion to trading issues after #BREXITInvest in the future at #airdrop 
Whenever I see Brexit is trending, I hope it’s dead. 
Mueller likely getting Ready to release his report within months Brexit in turmoil and now this.  The world may survive after all... 
For those worn down by Brexit rage or troll fatigue, here is 15 seconds of peace:  
I am a Remainer, by the way, but I accept the outcome because I believe in democracy. Brexit will open up massive opportunities for the UK - if only people could see that. 
No-deal Brexit task force revealed  
This is blatant anti-Brexit propaganda & unworthy of a mainstream news organization.  
Macedonia sets Sept. 30 for referendum on name deal with Greece  
3 politicians who met with Steve Bannon2 Politicians who fronted Vote Leave1 politician who features on an altright fascist websiteWAKE UP UK!This is not words on the side of a bus, it is fascism happening in plain sight#VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw #brexitmachtfrei #tories #brexit  
How a messy Brexit could lead to food shortages and soaring prices in the UK  
If Brexit is short for British Exit, is Bromance a British Romance? 
Boycott the referendum... #Macedonia #Бојкотирам #Македонија 
SNP & Labour elected members, Scottish Govt, COSLA & Scottish 3rd Sector all come together to oppose UK Govt's inhumane policy towards asylum seekers. Ruth's Scottish Tories...? Nah don't be silly. They'll never oppose Theresa May, except to push for a harder brexit. 
Lord Mandelson has backed calls for a referendum on the final Brexit deal, while Downing Street said one will not be held "in any circumstances" Watch below  
Downing Street has rejected holding a second Brexit referendum under "any circumstances", after a Sky Data poll showed that more people now back another vote. @clivebull asks: Do you think the public really is changing it's mind? 
Yes if only we could... Turn back time! ...and cancel that bloody referendumI'll get me coat 
Brexit is tekkin the piss now. Just sod off the deal and LEAVE. Theres only one man for this job now and we need to use him. GO GET THAT NO DEAL NOEL X cheers x  
Jacob Rees-Mogg blasts the Government for trying to frighten voters into accepting further compromises on Brexit and claims failure to prepare for No Deal makes Britain look "fretful, weak and incompetent". Bang on. Support us at  
Looks like May is pulling the carpet from beneath brexit. Not surprising but the fact is if you want to leave the EU now you'd better be prepared to fight for it. That or join May throwing your arms in the air. How could the people of this country have become so frightened? 
Here is #RemainerNow Loz with a very good question to @BBCNews about their #brexit coverage in light of Sky's poll out today.Maybe @bbclaurak @nickeardleybbc @JPonpolitics can help? @argyleloz 
#Leave people who are upset with #GaryLineker Walkers have produced some crisps just for you #Brexit #FBPE #PeoplesVote 
The more I scratch the surface of how trade & regulation work, the more I realise how little I know, and lack answers to the long-term questions beyond Brexit. Which makes the cast iron certainty of both Continuity Remainers and Hard Brexit Ultras perplexing and terrifying. 
It was my sons 23rd birthday yesterday. Love him so much & want a better Scotland than a Brexit Scotland for him. According to JRM, he will be 73 before seeing the benefits. We cannot allow a generation or two to suffer over an illegally obtained bought & paid fot vote#Indyref2 
'Brexit means Brexit, but Theresa May has decided the people mustn't know what it really means'  
Increasingly obv Leave campaign used lies, illegal funding & foreign aid to swing EU #Brexit vote. When will Gove, Johnson, Patel, Grayling & others condemn their friends in Vote Leave who made this happen? New vote, new rules, new result and new govt needed, & soon! #PeoplesVote 
Petition for a public debate on Brexit between Cher and Theresa May  
In 2016 the WTO boss also vowed he and the WTO secretariat will be available to make the #Brexit transition as smooth as possibleIn 2017 Theresa May said no deal was better than a bad dealIn 2018 May plans to warn No Deal Brexit would cause both economic and social collapse  
How about a range of Brexit crisps but the flavour of crisps in the bag bears no resemblance to what’s written in the outside of the packet so you don’t know WTF you’re getting?Or why not start labelling bleach as eye drops. That’s pretty Brexity too.  
In an interview with @PA Sinn Fein president @MaryLouMcDonald says border poll should not be triggered in context of hard or crash Brexit. Insists that would be wrong climate for debate. Argues “uncertainties/dangers” of Brexit need navigated before substantive debate on unity.  
This loathsome man continues to fight the referendum campaign with the same outrageous slurs and condescension he used then. These people, from the Blair years, the ones whose actions showed a deep distaste for Britain, have no shame  via @MailOnline 
In the Westminster calculations, both May and Corbyn have decided they’re more scared of losing UKIP votes than Remainers.We’re being taken for granted, so here’s my pledge:“I will never again vote for a Party that supports or otherwise enables Brexit.”Retweet if you agree. 
‘Fretful, Weak, Incompetent’: Rees-Mogg Blasts Gov For Failing to Prepare ‘No Deal’ Brexit  
Every sensible Remainer advocates that stopping Brexit is only step one and the very next MUST be addressing the valid concerns that led many to believe a Leave vote was their only salvation.Not the crazed xenophobes but those on the lowest rung ignored by Westminster. 
6. What else do we know? We know that Theresa May was looking to get Cambridge Analytica involved in the Tories' campaigning as long ago as Dec 2016 - you remember them? The ones caught up in the Brexit shenanigans? (See @carolecadwalla for details)  
Bear in mind other Brexiters, if we do Brexit you can never moan about anything again. However bad it is. Cos it will be your doing. Do you really want to live in that world? Or stay in this works and keep moaning? 
The Thatcher-Blair consensus has been consumed by the twin fires of the financial crisis and the Brexit vote   
The fake-Conservative party is now raging against freedom of speech like a bunch of Soviet Communists. Vote @UKIP for freedom in the UK - for Brexit and beyond.  
I am due to be on Sky News at 7.30pm talking about Sky’s latest Brexit poll. I will have to concede that Mrs May is doing an excellent job - for the EU. 
Great Britain has NOT changed it's mind about the 23rd June 2016 Referendum result.@SkyNews is FAKE NEWS 
No it hasn’t.. the media want u to think that , especially the BBC !We’d win another referendum tomorrow, but that’s not how it works !#OnWeGo #RuleBritannia  
US is UK's biggest trading partner. Not a massive annual payment in sight.  Nor free movement.  Nor accepting supremacy of US laws.  Nor having all our industry working to US rules & regs.  All done on WTO terms.Distinctive #Brexit research & news daily:  
You have had two years to come up with a #Brexit plan.You have failed.You can have as many reruns as you want, you still need a plan to put to the country, without that you will look even more ridiculous than you do now.No plan.No clue.#PeoplesVote 
More negative Brexit impact as it’s reported that Operational Headquarters will be transferred from Northwood, London, to Rota in Spain.‘Foolish and shortsighted Brexit’.  
UKIP Leader @GerardBattenMEP will be on Sky News with Dermot Murnaghan at around 7:30 tonight, discussing the latest Sky Brexit poll and @GaryLineker's support for a second referendum.#ForTheNation 
I went on a Brexit tour of England last year, driving the length and breadth of the country. One thing all places I visited had in common was ‘decline’. Successive governments, over decades, failed to address their issues, then shyster politicians - who were to blame - blamed EU. 
**VOTE & RETWEET POLL**Do you think there should be a #PeoplesVote #FInalSayForAll? #Brexit 
The Guardian's plans to sink Brexit have become so, so low. They just can't fathom that the Brits actually voted Leave with their brains switched on, and their optimism high, let alone that these are the people they like to speak for. This is what happens when you only eat quinoa 
Shopping in Morrisons today has got me excited for Brexit.  
It seems only logical that the people are given a final say on any Brexit deal and an opportunity to #ExitFromBrexit -- especially when the Govt is so internally divided that they cannot really be trusted to deliver a Brexit that maintains the interests of the country. 
I don’t think it is a 2nd referendum. A 2nd referendum would ask the same question as the first. This would be to say if you want to accept the FinalDeal. I think that’s a different thing. 
Lord Owen blasts 'Sourpuss' Soubry gripped by EU devotionParliament has let down the country - a miserable lot, frankly!They are gripped by a religion & can't stop believing in it.They forget they voted FOR the referendum - over 500 of them!#Brexit #EU 
The IEA, a charity, secretly taking money from US agri-business, to pay for access and influence of UK Govt ministers, who want help pushing a no-deal Brexit, which leads to a UK-US trade deal, where currently illegal US food is imported into the UK. Nope, nothing to see here.  
Brexit will be remembered in history has the first major vote that has been hacked with microtargeting  
Nickleback is better than Brexit. 
What nobody can tell me is why, if a 2nd referendum happens & Brexit is reversed, the Brexiteers would not then be entitled to  demand a 3rd referendum?  
Brexit no deal threats getting dafter by the day. Apparently we’re now going to run out of sandwiches when we leave. You know....those things we were eating in the 1800s. Ffs  
No wonder May backed David Davis into a corner his Brexit plan would have satisfied voters, his paper offered the best bits from other deals with Canada, Switzerland & Japan, as the EU have rejected the PMs plan she should now back this alternative. 
Oh, ok. That settles it. Cancel Brexit. I've changed my mind.  
Leave wound up their campaign 2 years ago.Remain have been in an absolute storm of desperate, frantic & relentless campaigning for about 3 years.Yet Leavers have held steadfast in their decision and support of #BrexitImagine if the Leave campaign had carried on.  
UKIP Leader: Govt ‘Manufacturing a National Emergency’ with Project Fear 2.0 to Crush Brexit  
This is backed by Bloomberg publicity now so gaining traction.You all know what to do.  Then double it! The next 8 months will mean gathering ourselves up and PUSHING to stop the Brexit baby.  
This is so true. No wonder Steve Bannon met the hard Brexit cheer leader @BorisJohnson 
Anti Brexit groupthink now so entrenched among the opinion forming / pundit class, it’s more than clouded their judgement. Many outlets, such as Sky, aren’t even bothering to hide their partisan commentary. I suspect they’ll overreach themselves, like all self serving cartels 
The UK Government are at the Supreme Court to try and undermine the Scottish Parliament's power after Brexit.Sign our open letter to tell them to keep their #HandsOffHolyrood 
Do you know, I'm starting to get an ever-so-slight, incy wincy feeling #Brexit might not be all it's cracked up to be. Anyone else starting to get the feeling too?  
Well, I know a little bit Andy, with my family being involved in the Sugar industry for almost a century. The scrapping of beet quotas last year and the maintaining of tariffs on cane is good news for the UK but bad for 'Big Sugar' and ASR...but keep flying that false flag  
 “Britain has changed its mind about Brexit” by @SkyNews 
As someone with chronic heart disease and proud to have voted leave, I am more than happy to literally bet my life that the 5 medicines I take daily will still be available after #Brexit The British gov is being totally irresponsible with all this scaremongering. 
THE PIED RAT RUSTLER OF KIPVILLE the story of #brexit Britians greatest food Robbery  
Hi @BBCNews, i and many other people have noticed that not one of your #bbcnews outlets has mentioned the massive #Brexit poll commissioned by @SkyData, the one that shows a massive swing to remain and a #PeoplesVote, ppl now see the disaster of no deal, when will you? #SkyNews 
One day I may hear you utter the forbidden word,  Brexit is a national disaster. All your plans and ambitions will come to nothing if we leave the EU.  Wake up Jeremy.  Your country needs you. 
Food shortages? Grounded flights? These could be the consequences of a messy Brexit  
The retrospective lionisation of Weimar-era art has extra resonance these days. If something similar were to appear now, there’d be a queue of supposedly Leftist commentators pointing out how ‘alienating’ it is to flyover country or the Brexit heartlands.  
.@NickyMorgan01 tells @ConHome : "If we fatally undermine our economy or turn a blind eye to its fate during the Brexit process, then the Conservative party will write itself out of the history of the UK." I agree. 
How Gina Miller continues to draw strength from the death threats that followed her Brexit interv...  via @YahooFinanceUK 
In 1947, there was a referendum in Assam and only one region (Sylhet) voted for East Pakistan. Coincidentally, that was the only Muslim majority region of Assam. After splitting Assam, 40 lakh illegal Bangladeshis are back there.  Assam continues to shrink and Bangladesh expand 
It’s #InternationalFriendshipDay! It would be wrong to call it a Brexit benefit: there is no benefit to it at all. But Brexit has certainly forged many new friendships and connections that I am very grateful for. This is by no means an exhaustive list, but here are some.  1/ pic.twitter.com/QjKnSM1zZ0 
I won't touch Walkers Crisps ever again until this Jug Head is sacked.Gary Lineker under fire over Brexit: ‘We need a second referendum on Lineker’  
Predicting the immediate fallout from Britain's vote to the leave the European Union in June 2016 was "probably the easiest call I’ve seen in macro in 25 yrs," :- Bank of England Governor Mark Carney.As Hintze & Odey,Hedge-fund Brexit-backers, could see  
We do produce some insulin in the UK, although it's less than 1% of our needs and comes from pigs and cows rather than humans. That said, industry sources told @FactCheck today that they don't expect significant problems if there's a no-deal Brexit.  
Millions of patients could be affected by 'no-deal' Brexit medicines shortages, says MHRA chiefSo basically Theresa May is lying again  
I don't think there will be a shortage of medicine post-brexitThat means I "don't care", apparently.The FBPE lot are so far gone it's ridiculous. They are utterly incapable of thought or discussion without painting the other side as morally inferior 
“They just cannot get over the result of the first referendum!” @IainDale hits back at Lord Mandelson after he described "Brextremists” as “nationalists” who “hate foreigners" 
Brexit Dept would like us to believe that but It's NOT TOO LATE Article 50 can be cancelled or extended (EU have confirmed this) #StopBrexit #PeoplesVote @Labour4EU @OFOCBrexit 
WATCH: The gov has talked a lot about delivering 'the will of the People'. But today a Sky New poll reveals a majority of the public now back a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal. Please RT:  
Brexit will abolish bees in Britain. No longer will the fruit be rotting in the fields. There won't even be any fruit to pick, due to a lack of pollination. You see, you didn't know what you were voting for. 
Ex-EU peace negotiator urges PM not to betray Brexit vote result  via @MailOnline 
‘No deal’ preferable to Brexit extension, says Liam Fox   
Brexit means Brexit  
I see . @SkyNews are still conning people on a poll of 1466 Sky viewers that 2/3 of Brits have changed their minds about #brexit ........ trying to con the and scare the less savvy ..... its getting ridiculous now ..... maybe . @Ofcom should step in ..... 
BREXIT: Fresh blow for Theresa May as Tory activists doubt party can win general election /#EU #Brexit #PeoplesVote 
Brexit will not cause UK trade 'disruption' - WTO boss  
I'm reminded of how post the Brexit referendum and up to now, those for Brexit were saying "We need to put our differences aside and pull together" without actually making any effort to appease the other side, and in fact down right standing in the way of any appeasement. 
We must stop treating #Brexit as normal politics. It is not. It is a massive violation of normal politics, and for that reason the remedies, deterrents and sanctions of normal politics cannot suffice for Brexit. The normal detterent of electoral defeat is not enough.#PeoplesVote 
As disastrous consequences of no deal Brexit become obvious to all but followers of Jacob Rees Mogg, support for a #PopularVote keeps on rising! 
thank you. I feel vindicated in everything I have predicted is coming true about the lies and false promises about Brexit but I don't underestimate the feral opposition by Brextremists to a #PeoplesVote 
Is this about Brexit?#MetaphorsEverywhere 
Remainers' preferred three-way referendum is an entirely cynical tactic aimed at rigging the result. Deliberately designed to split the Leave vote in half and stoke Leave-on-Leave attacks, while duping those Leavers who would simply take any opportunity to vote Chequers down  
It's disgraceful that the @jeremycorbyn is pushing forward with Brexit.He's been warned time and again that it will disproportionately impact the most marginalised in society.  
WE OFFICIALLY THINK BREXIT'S A TERRIBLE IDEA would be a start. Try it.  
Rees-Mogg: If Govt cannot show it can deliver workable deal based on WTO terms then it is NOT competent!It's not a good look for Govt to appear fretful, weak & incompetent but this seems to be way it's approaching idea of leaving on WTO terms.#Brexit #EU 
I'll say this again -Theresa May is not a moderate trying to restrain the Brextremists. She is an extremist pretending to be a moderate in order  to quell dissent among moderate Tory MPs. #PeoplesVote #Brexit #StopBrexit 
Boycott of the #Macedonia name referendum is a democratic choice - a choice that we will not tolerate anyone's propaganda & a change to our name - democracy will win! This does not make me pro-Russian - proud to be an American of #Macedonian heritage! 
“Remoaners’ fearmongering over No Deal is the worst thing they have done to date. They hate the democratic vote for Brexit so much that they’re willing to spread dread and panic to try to kill it. It is the lowest form of politics”, says Brendan O’Neill.  
Lord Owen: ‘Parliament has let down the country and Theresa's May's bespoke Brexit plan will end badly’  
#BREAKING Macedonia to hold referendum on North Macedonia name change on September 30: parliament  
I did a thread on IEA, hard Brexit to ministers and incredible lack of transparency in UK government right now. Could almost understand all this if IEA et al were world beating genuises. But they’re not. They’re just v good at accessing media and political elites  
Remainers who blame Brexit on English nationalism are making a big mistake @JYDenham 
These two would have #Brexit sorted before the lunchtime piss-up. #MAGA #MBGA #InternationalFriendshipDay 
There’s something in the air. The mood in Britain is changing. Here's how to support The New European in the fight against Brexit.  
Republic of Macedonia schedules referendum to complete deal to rename the country  
Does anyone in the uk actually still want #Brexit to happen?! Everyone I speak with, seems to want to stay  
Retweet if youse hink that me and ma pals wid make a better Brexit negotiating team than the current erses  
Just wondering - could there be any connection between IEA / Shanker Singham's privileged access to UK Government and 'unique' insight on trade, and the fact UK side of Brexit negotiations are in such a mess? 
But if 52% is not enough for a leave win in the first referendum then 50% is surely not enough to call for a 2nd referendum? 
It is with deep regret & sadness, that I announce my official reasons for accepting the posting of becoming Angela Merkels Cat.Sad to leave my colleagues behind, but excited about the future ahead.#Brexit #EU #BrexitDeal 
9th September 2014 - @martin_compston absolutely nails what would occur two years later regarding #Brexit.(I won't be uploading this to my YouTube channel btw, as it would probably only take the Beeb five minutes to censor it with a DMCA notice...)  
Britons see Brexit turning sour, half want chance to vote again - poll  
Nigeria binned Aburi Accord.Nigeria binned  Confab Report.To restructure #Nigeria is an old song of deception by #FantasticallyCorrupt Nigerian politicians.Demand for #referendum.@Amaka_Ekwo @ckorie17 @NGRWailers @AgorasBlog 
The Nebraska legislature overrode @GovRicketts’s veto and abolished the death penalty in 2015. Gov. Pete then funneled over $300,000 into a referendum to restart executions and financed primary campaigns against legislators who voted to override. #PetesVendetta #DontKillForNE 
#Remoaners using the same old economic fearmongering to scare us away from #NoDeal have failed to learn the fundamental lesson of the 2016 referendum.  #Brexit is about sovereignty; #Britain's ability to determine its own future & to tread its own path. No prize is greater!  
What elements of #EU law is the UK keeping after #Brexit? Who can change this law in the future and how? Watch our Constitutional Law Researcher, Graeme Cowie, explain what you need to know and read our brand new briefing for more detail  
But IEA isn’t alone. There is a whole ‘think tank’ world that publishes research that wouldn’t pass academic standards, then circulates it through lobby groups (TPA) and faux news outlets (Brexit central). Then MPs cite this stuff as evidence that everything is ‘project fear’ 
There seems to be scant evidence that IEA has expertise in Brexit. Singham wrote a paper advocating a ‘buffer zone’ as answer to the Irish border. But he’s listened to because he tells Brexiter ministers what they want to hear. 
Take Shanker Singham. Heads up ‘trade unit’ at Legatum w/ ‘unparalleled access’ to ministers. Huge questions about his expertise - he was a *very* marginal figure before Brexit - but post June 2016 has ear of Johnson, Davis et al. Why? 
Jonathan Isaby tells Owen Jones: "Any attempt to reverse Brexit would create a cataclysmic constitutional crisis"@isaby | @OwenJones84 
For the many Remainers having trouble with basic mental arithmetic today, this poll does not show that a "clear majority" of people believe Brexit will be bad for them personally - it shows that 49% either think it will be good or have no effect, and only 42% think it will be bad  
A vet calls in to LBC about Brexit and leaves Nigel Farage speechless.By @samwoolfe 
Sometimes I think I would like hard brexit for a week. Cos that's about how long it would take to convince the brexiteer brigade just how deluded they are. 
As I've been tweeting for weeks now, the idea of some sort of second referendum is gaining in popularity (tho I'm still not sure it will happen).  
Dutch guy at beach bar: we saw the Ref result, thought, wow - is it real?Me: that was my reaction. I cried!  Dutch guy: and now your politicians are just arguing, soft, hard Brexit   Me: we’re not leaving, seriously - but, will you have us back?          DG:we never left you   
Hope to be on @Channel4News & @SkyNewsBreak this evening to discuss the Government's "plans" to stockpile vital medicines for a no-deal #Brexit (impossible) & poll showing big shift in favour of #PeoplesVote & staying in EU. Don't think @BBCNews has mentioned either story. Hmmm. 
Today I find myself wondering what, exactly, do you need to do in this country to lose your majority? Because Grenfell, Windrush,  underfunding schools, privatising the NHS (to your mates) & pushing us off the Brexit cliff doesn't seem to be enough. #nomoralcompass 
Re election hacking debate. In the Irish Referendum a couple of months ago, both Google & to a lesser extent Facebook, sabotaged the final 2 weeks 'No vote' campaign hours before launch by cancelling online ad campaigns. They knew the impact it'd have. It was naked interference 
James O'Brien visited Margate this weekend and it opened his eyes to the reason that so many seaside towns voted for Brexit.  
‘We are acting as if we have no choice but we do. We don’t have to do this..... There is always an alternative: that’s what politics means.’Painful but acute examination by @chrisgreybrexit of the national breakdown that is Brexit. 
For the first time, YouGov finds more voters think there SHOULD be a referendum on the terms of Brexit than not Remainers 66% "should"Labour 58% "should"More middle-class say "should"Leavers 66% "should not"Conservatives 67% "should not"More working-class say "should not"  
To Remoaners, the largest democratic referendum in British history was an unreliable sham, yet today’s Sky News poll of public opinion is the gospel truth. Someone please explain to these people how democracy works. 
TODAY'S DEBATE: How can we bring all the men out of their shells to contribute to the debate on Brexit? 
A tiny minority is ready to push the British people off the economic cliff in order to get a #BrexitTaxHaven. This is absolutely not normal politics. It is a grotesque violation of the government's duty to the British people The @BBC should reflect that.#PeoplesVote #Brexit  
It's a bit to soon to be talking about yet another EU referendum, we had over 40+ years of membership with no say and we've not even implemented the results of the initial referendum.#Brexit  
How do you know someone is a whiny cunt about Trump being elected, Brexit winning or Astralis being the best team?Oh, don't worry, they'll never let a fucking day go by without reminding you. 
PROJECT FEAR AND LIES: The NHS has of course confirmed there is ZERO risk to prescriptions post Brexit. All irrelevant to the Remain liars continuing to spin it of course. No wonder they lost !  
Brexit: "could (mean) a lowering of standards in terms of what we eat and it could be bad news for British farmers."An actual quote there from Nigel Farage... #ProjectFear 
JPMorgan Chase CEO Jamie Dimon tells CNN that, in the event of a hard Brexit, companies will be forced to move operations out of the country  
Are the 2018 mid-term elections a referendum on President @realDonaldTrump? You’re damn right they are! So remember 1 thing Conservatives, Republicans & especially YOU RINO’s... Our votes are 4 POTUS not YOU who continuously let us down#KAG#RedWaveRising#MondayMotivation 
The Sky poll records a big change in attitudes towards Brexit, May, the government's performance  and the #PeoplesVote - against a background of pro-Brexit press and feckless BBC insisting that Brexit is a done deal. The public knows it isn't. 
“No one should imagine that reversing Brexit will be an easy path – there are no easy paths now – but, unlike Brexit, it will at least give us a chance of getting to a better place.”Wise as ever!  
Remoaners using the same old economic fearmongering to scare us away from 'No Deal' have failed to learn the fundamental lesson of the 2016 referendum.Brexit is about sovereignty; Britain's ability to determine its own future and to tread its own path. No prize is greater!   
Oh wow. I've been arguing that hard-right austerity dogma caused Brexit for ages (without the suffering, public service destruction, and wage repression policies there wouldn't have been a big enough wave of public anger). Now someone has backed it up with a research paper.  
The BBC has slashed political programming in Scotland - @BBCRadioScot dropped its only dedicated radio politics show 'The Big Debate' soon after the Brexit vote. No more difficult questions from Gordon Brewer and the public, thank you.  
Brexit is never going back in the tube, because any ordinary Briton thinks privileging a Belgian over an Australian is profoundly wrong. 
.When we've seen off Brexit, there's one man whose efforts to save his country should definitely be remembered - ideally with a statue in Parliament Square & a seat in the House of Lords..  
My new article on the role of Brexit in the 2017 General Election now out.  
Are you fed up with remoaners labelling anyone with a different opinion to them as xenophobic or racist. Well did you know Godfrey Bloom is married to a Pole. Gerrard Batten is married to a Philipino, Nigel Farage to. German, Aron Banks to a Russian #BREXIT pic.twitter.com/L4BtUoQHyt 
We don't have to do this. With signs of opinions shifting amid talk of emergency planning a reminder that Brexit is a self-inflicted crisis and we still have choices, tho' none is easy. My latest (and probably last of the summer) Brexit Blog post just up:  
The mid-term elections is a referendum on Pres. Trump. MAGA Patriots are going to have to do what the Tea Party movement did in 2010-12. Organize and Campaign publically for Trump, help get people registered to vote and even go door to door. Its going to take a grassroots effort. 
Creeping European federalism has been a prominent feature of Britain's EU membership and there's no reason that will change with this shower that's negotiating #Brexit Join UKIP >> 
Excellent interview. Lord Owen perfectly encapsulates my own view of this Brexit farce. I urge all those seeking to reverse the Referendum decision to read it.  
On tonight's #tyskysour @graceblakeley and @georgeeaton will be joining @michaeljswalker to discuss new polling on Brexit, Tory and Labour splits, and whether Corbyn's economics is really "Trumpian". Tune in live at 8pm!  
The best way to learn about this (apart from asking @PeteNorth303) is to browse the EC's Brexit Preparedness Notices.They list, in horrifying detail, which licences/certifications required for training will cease to be valid on Day 1 of Brexit. 
5. TrucksTo operate professionally in the EU as a road transport operator or transport manager, you need a certificate of professional competence from an EU Member authority. As of Brexit, those issued by the UK cease to count. 
3. 'Competent Authorities' Many EU technical regulations on goods require certification of compliance. The EC put out a notification saying that as of Brexit, certificates from the UK don't count. All covered products will need EU-27 certification. Not fun. 
Proof?NHS: EU citizens make up more doctors-per-person than Brits. Brexit ends their Free Movement RightsLiving standard: Higher trade costs with our closest/biggest trade partnerControl: Government is seeking a deal that makes us copy the EU's rules but with zero influence. 
Pro-independence parties accuse Spanish king of creating "wounds" in Catalan society for not condemning police violence during October 1 referendum   . 
Staying tied to the EU after #Brexit is like the United States having Jim Crow laws after the abolition of slaveryNO to slavery under another nameYES to #nodeal Brexit 
.@PeterBoneUK: "This is as stupid as the Project Fear stuff in the referendum campaign and it's all being done for the same reason: to scare people about Brexit in the hope we will either agree to a Brexit-in-name only, or stay in."  
These are truly extraordinary figures. 78% of people think the UK Government is doing a bad job of the Brexit negotiations. 74% are dissatisfied with May as PM. 65% think she’ll bring home a bad deal. Crisis numbers.   
I’m old enough to remember (approx a fortnight ago) when corbynites were telling us that normal people didn’t care about Brexit and it was exclusive concern of the bourgeoisie middle classes.  
Kamikaze May on a Brexit suicide mission, SPAMageddon, Comrade May leader of the democracy threatening Tories at the heart of political corruption Vote Leave IEA Think Tanking Fake News Fake Studies, they’ll gonna Kill us all?!?!?!!!!  
British public opinion has shifted sharply against Brexit, according to a new Sky Data poll. Two-thirds of the public - including a majority of Leave voters - now think the outcome of Brexit negotiations will be bad for Britain 
Cardiff don't miss out on joining us to rally for a #PeoplesVote on the final #brexit deal on 8th September:  
Janice Atkinson, MEP: The EU Is Killing Itself  from the Inside As All Dictatorships do It won’t be Brexit that brings it down, it will be an invasion &  a migrant crime wave as you reap what you sow  #InMyFeelingsChallenge  via @gatewaypundit 
Theresa May dismisses calls for second Brexit referendum in wake of Sky Data poll. It would seem that the will of the people is how it was 2 years ago, not how it is now. 
It is now absolutely clear that there is a large majority against #Brexit, and in favour of a #PeoplesVote. If Brexit is pushed through against majority opinion there could be some very harsh retribution against Brexit politicians#StopBrexit 
"As an NHS doctor, I voted for Brexit – but now I see how it could destroy the health service, I want a vote on the final deal" @PeoplesVote_UK 
Brexit "beginning to wither on the vine of reality"  
Every day more people demand the final say on Brexit with the option to stay in the EU rather than stomach a botched - or no-deal - Brexit.Add your name if you want the final say on Brexit:  
Is this how you feel ? This is how I feel.Please Retweet and tag anyone that you think might need to hear the message.#Brexit #Brexiteers 
Wait a minute. How do illegal immigrants get citizenship!Also quite ironic for a country that quit EU over immigration!#BREXIT 
#skynewsJohn Redwood being utterly ridicolous.Majority don't want a second refPppl want Brexit etcAll while the headlines bar shows the results of poll that says exactly the opposite.Sounded like Tariq Aziz talking of Iraq winning, while American tanks were in the background 
‘We face the biggest peacetime decision in a generation – the public must have the final say on Brexit’  
Government is now paying the price for the cowardice of its Brexit strategy, repeated concessions have only led to arrogance & more demands, “you can’t buy love” Theresa the appeaser has belittled herself & undermined a great nation, I foresee massive dissent from voters. 
My own view - balance is too hard for the @BBC at the moment. To be honest I’d be happy for now to settle for accuracy and an end to censorship of brexit bad news. Let “balance” take care of itself. 
Blue Monday? Record low number of Tory members think they'll will retain power after next gen elxn, ex minister warns Conservative party cd 'write itself out of history' if it backs hard Brexit. 
Did austerity cause Brexit? This v fascinating paper from @fetzert suggests the answer is yes:  
DISGRACEFUL: Theresa May dismisses calls for second Brexit referendum in wake of Sky Data poll /#Brexit #PeoplesVote  
May is making Britain look weak and incompetent by refusing to prepare properly for a no-deal Brexit, says Jacob Rees-Mogg  
Nobody can predict the outcome of a 2-year negotiation that's never been done before.If the outcome is crap, there MUST be a #PeoplesVote on the Brexit deal. 
May's fake Brexit nailed. Perhaps had she been honest from the start that this was her intention people would feel somewhat less betrayed. But she pretended she was going to deliver the real deal.  
Liam Fox says people warning NHS will be sold off in Brexit trade deal with Trump are 'anti-trade.’ Has the penny dropped yet?  
Do you agree with Trump ? Are you fed up with the constant anti Brexit , anti Trump liberal media ? pic.twitter.com/gm221YS5ji 
Tories & Labour are competing to push the nastiest, most intolerant, anti-foreign, sectarian, anti immigrant policies. Business is treated as an enemy. Brexit has already changed Britain, for the worse. 
More than half of poll respondents think Brexit will hurt U.K. economy, survey finds. 
This report is by David Goodhart of the far right wing Policy Exchange which has £3,553,565 founding from undisclosed sources. The BBC, of course, does not mention this. BBC News - Call for UK citizen ID system after Brexit  
Our politicians are bought, our press is not free, votes are undermined by cheating & law-breaking, we live in a faux democracy & those in positions of power are either in it up to their necks or frozen to the spot, unable to stand up for those who get shafted every day.#Brexit 
Imagine voting in an advisory referendum, to bloody the nose of a hated PM and then finding that your vote is taken literally.That the govnt hadn't done any preparation or due diligence and was going to crash on regardless of the damage being done. You'd have no faith in politics 
If anyone still believes the NHS can survive Brexit, these figures are devastating. After the referendum, the number of EU nurses coming to UK divebombed - and hasn’t recovered We’re short of 40 thousand NHS nurses. #Brexit is destroying the #NHS 
Brexit is not the project of those who lived through the war but of those who grew up on the war films afterwards. 
Jo Cox was murdered on the 17th June 2016. The referendum campaigns were halted for three days out of respect. All campaigns were told to stop.The time stamp on this message. 7.46pm on 17.06.16.#EURef #Brexit #VoteLeave #LeaveEU #BeLeave #FinalSay #FinalSayForAll #PeoplesVote 
But you you know where to stop. Right here: Stop Brexit. You, Labour, can save this country from Brexit, or you can help the Tories push it over the cliff. As you have been doing so far, alas & alas.  
Hunt doesn’t know zhong from his dong, his Zhongguo from his Riben, his tunbu from his wantou, his Brexit from catastrophe. 
Lack of confidence suggests a #PeoplesVote on the final #brexit deal is the only way forward. Clear the public need to be given control of the final deal  
As usual, your comments are based on sound common sense, Dr Lee. Inconceivable that the govt would continue to pursue this mad, wreckless Brexit. So why do most Tory MPs not join you in opposing it? Unless more find the courage to stand up & be counted, our prospects are bleak. 
Theresa May dismisses calls for second Brexit referendum in wake of Sky Data poll  
.@ABridgen goes door knocking with Westmonster, this constituent is not happy with a second referendum:"Conservatives won but I voted for Labour,  I can't stand up and say right we'll have another one because it's not the one I wanted"FULL VIDEO:  
And those investigations uncovered exactly how #LeaveEU and #VoteLeave won "unexpectedly". They broke the law, pumped £600,000 illegally into illegal social media adverts, even ignoring the 3 day moratorium due to the murder of Jo Cox. That's how they won "unexpectedly". #Brexit  
Aside from the IEA's contempt for charity law, Gove's Green Brexit is revealed as anything but. The IEA's report will advocate introducing GM plants & animals, supporting intensive chemical-driven farming, abandoning renewable energy; and introducing biodiversity offsetting.  
That's easy -- I've never said publicly or privately if pro or anti Brexit, down to never revealing how I voted -- even my wife does know. Next question.  
When Brexit finally goes tits up you’ll be hard pressed to find anybody who admits to having voted Leave. 
1/ This is great work by @UE. The IEA told them that Michael Gove has asked his mate Matt Ridley, to write a report (for the IEA0 defining what Gove's Green Brexit actually means. Gove will then use the report to mould Defra's position on agriculture, in advance of a new policy.  
The transition deal is a trap by Theresa May & other remainers not only to keep EU control but to give themselves another 2 years to overturn the Brexit vote. It should not be allowed & May's deal has to be rejected.  Replace May now & leave in March 2019 under WTO rules..  
Former EU Commissioner, Peter Mandelson backs a second referendum in the least surprising news of the century. He can start claiming his hefty EU pension later this year (providing he doesn't have a bad word to say about Brussels)... Support us at  
I voted in an ADVISORY referendum unjustifiably treated by government legally binding.People were unfairly denied a vote in the referendumSome campaigning  materials used in the  referendum have been proved to have been lies.The campaign to Leave the EU broke the law. 
No fellow head of government supports Theresa May’s #Brexit plan. The best she can muster is Italy’s Matteo Salvini. With friends like him, who needs enemies? @DenisMacShane writes. 
This shell company scam with the NRA reminds me of the Brexit spending and coordination scandal. Republicans and Leavers setting up shams to subvert election laws. Flirting with the Kremlin the whole damn time.  
Mandelson: "Brextremists aren't patriots, who love their country, they're nationalists who hate foreigners" And populists, like Farage, confuse and conflate these ideas to turn people against the EU. Brexit is simply a vehicle to deliver nationalism.  
For decades, Europhile leaders have allowed the erosion of #British sovereignty without seeking the people's permission. #Brexit was a vote for radical change. That will never come whilst the country remains in the hands of an establishment which has profited from the status quo!  
Viktor Orban: EU elite has failed & failure’s symbol is EU Commission.The good news is Commission’s days are numbered!EU decision making is like “last movements of frogs’ leg in school experiments!We need a New Commission with a New approach#Brexit #EU 
Excellent thread Ross. Unless TM is replaced by a leader who will challenge the EU for #Brexit & not the chequers paper which is #brino the Tories will lose at the next GE & be out of power for decades 
The #SingleMarket and the #CustomsUnion are highly complex architectures that have been improved and back tested over many years. No FTA anywhere in the world comes close. We need to make Brexit voters understand this  and time is short. 
18. The short of it is these people don't give a toss about Brexit or democracy. Brexit is just a vehicle to exploit and a window of opportunity to make a lot of money. It's a cosy living and it carries prestige within the bubble. 
The easiest call in 25 years': Mark Carney says the Bank of England got everything about Brexit right — and warns that no deal will be bad  
"They say history repeats itself-the first as tragedy, second as farce ", KM.Changed times indeed.....UUnionist council poster c1953. @wackyj67 #Lemmings @AlexKane221b #Brexit  
In fact, some of these think-tanks that appear on the BBC more often than Nick Knowles should just be honest. IFHBWYFWLION does sound very Welsh, but the Institute for a Hard Brexit Whether You Fucking Well Like It Or Not, is at least honest. 
PM rules out #PeoplesVote under any circumstances...ME: I ruled you out ages ago. You ruled out a GE before trying out the 'Strong & Stable' line...that went well.#Brexit is FUBAR. Poorer, Weaker with Less Control & Fewer Rights. A #FinalSay is the Democratic way out.#Remain 
Hey @AndrewScheer how about releasing your financing any day now? And why you met with the Brexit folks, and what you talked about?  #cdnpoli 
Will NEVER buy walker's crisps because of Gary Linekers lefty views and his betrayal of Brexit vote he said he would abide by  
Simple, clear and to the point. A no deal brexit looks disastrous because it is disastrous. In political slogan terms, no-deal brexit means no-deal brexit.  
The grassroots group Labour Against Brexit @Labour4EU has contacted all the @UKLabour NEC candidates to determine their stance on #Brexit. We shall soon start to publish their responses. My feeling is that Labour members might want to look beyond the Momentum and Progress slates. 
WATCH: @theresa_may is keeping an open mind on #Brexit. If she can, we can to. We need a #PeoplesVote on the final #Brexit deal to give the public control  
Can someone please explain in detail why a Clean ('no-deal') Brexit would lead to UK diabetics not being able to get insulin?What are the things that would stop the supplies?And would make the UK the only country (whether in or out of the EU) where they couldn't be obtained? 
Fun Ireland, slightly Brexit-related fact.Ireland has a population of 4.5 million people. It produces enough food to feed 36 million people. 
Heard a lady on the news saying we've gone so far (re #Brexit)...it may seem a bit silly but we made our bed & have to lie in it...ME: I put the bullets in the gun & put the gun to my head, guess I have to pull the trigger.I'd advise take the bullets out & put the gun down? 
.@ShankerASingham voted to remain in the EU. Now that the UK is leaving, he wants the best Brexit we can get. That means opportunities to get forge trade deals around the world. He and his team shouldn’t apologize for turning out research that is so impressive, it has influence. 
Lord Mandelson: We are light years away from what people were promised at the referendum.. the negotiations are an absolute shambles & people are disillusioned. The country is divided more than ever.. so the only way forward is to hold a #PeoplesVote on the final deal. #FBPE 
I wonder how long it's going to take before the Brexiteers wake up to the fact that whilst they're been running around screaming "May's Brexit is a disaster!!!" all people have been hearing is "Brexit is a disaster!!!!!". 
The Govt should at least be honest: a #Brexit deal + domestic preparations that address all the ways in which we’ve become interdependent over the last 43 years can’t be done - not in 2 years or in 4. Yet another reason for a #PeoplesVote - but between viable options this time 
9/ And to summarise why my position is changed: collapse of Chequers deal leaves Tory hard Brexiteers in position of: "We tried, we failed". Electorate can see that, hence Sky poll finds moral authority of May. and positivity about Brexit, collapsing 
8/ ...hence No Deal cannot be on the 2nd Referendum ballot paper unless it is called by Tories themselves. Ponder that! 
Huge shift in views on #Brexit in #Wales - time for @peoplesvote_uk 
“Why are they doing this? Why don’t they just put their hands up and say ‘we made a mistake’”. An Operations Director for a just-in-time construction business tells it like it is to @mrjamesob #Brexit. Worth a listen  
7/ Once Tories fall, there will be no constitutional possibility of a No Deal Brexit unless their subsequent manifesto offers it, but that will have been why they fell in the first place, so they won't. Snap election places No Deal off the agenda 
For decades, Europhile leaders have allowed the erosion of British sovereignty without seeking the people's permission.Brexit was a vote for radical change. That will never come whilst the country remains in the hands of an establishment which has profited from the status quo!  
This would be true if it were the EU forcing Britain to leave. But they’ve told us we can cancel brexit with no penalties.   
.@PatrickChristys slams Theresa May on Sky News.  'We need pro-Brexit PM to push positive Brexit vision'FULL VIDEO:  
6/ To be clear as I wrote here  the sequence is: defeat May deal in Commons; force election & campaign on promise (not leaving open) a 2nd vote; negotiate Norway+ deal and put that deal vs Remain to a 2nd Referendum 
Always though 60:40% poll if sustainable will kill Brexit & UK is now nearing that tipping point if this poll is replicated. I've stuck rigidly to my Remain &Brexit sceptic position & looks like it is coming my way! There will be a massive 'extinction burst' by Brextremists first  
Brexit deal, no deal, or Remain in the EU?A simple question.Please vote and retweet for a larger sample size.At this stage allow a proper vote to compare terms of membership with opportunity for electorate to refuse a deal that is not in the UK’s interests. 
Imagine being given numerous appearances on @BBCNews and other @BBC current affairs programnes knowing that viewers and listeners have no idea where your organisation gets its funding from or who pays your salary and expenses?Who are you a mouthpiece for Chloe? @the_tpa #Brexit 
Theresa May should listen to top aide Crawford Falconer, who has 25 years of experience in international trade negotiationsHe is optimistic about #Brexit‘The opportunities are enormous. There are so many, where do I start?' via @MailOnline 
UK’s largest Dairy producer Arla warns of #Brexit. Higher prices, food shortages and 7 minute hold up at customs creating a 10 hour delay getting food to the stores. This isn't project fear. It's harsh reality. #FBPE 
‘@Michael_Heaver: To save Brexit, May must be ousted.“May wants her legacy to be as the Prime Minister who secured a deal. Any deal, at any cost. “That capitulation mentality is about as far away from the spirit of June 23rd 2016 as you can get.” 
Britons see Brexit turning sour, half want chance to vote again - poll  
Media is full of respected commentators, public figures and cross party MPs, supporting a second referendum on the withdrawal agreement with an option to exit from #Brexit.You'd think May would have taken the hint by now & if she doesn't, MPs need to force one or force her out 
England and Wales ( and it’s a welcome change of heart.) Scotland was always against #Brexit #BrexitChaos 
Your daily @DealBook Briefing:• Accusations against CBS’s CEO could spur a Viacom deal. • The Bank of England governor is worried about Brexit.• China is eager to talk trade. 
'BBC policy on Brexit is not impartial' - surprising to see this in the Radio Times of all places  
Project Fear Latest: Brexit to Ground Planes, End Sandwich Trade, Cause ‘Super-Gonorrhoea’ Epidemic  
Hi @Theresa_May I know you want to keep @Jacob_Rees_Mogg happy bc that keeps you in No 10 but you need to put your country before your career. We need a #PeoplesVote bc Sky data polling shows that with a similar turnout in an informed EU referendum Remain would get 19.8m votes.  
In a three-way referendum on the Brexit deal, 48% would give their first preference to Remain. #LeaveWatch 
The way Brexit has shone a torch on the grubbiness of the Tory right is one of the best things about #Brexit so far. These IEA shitehawks have been stalking politics for years and it's about time it was all dragged into the open. #IEAtapes 
A 73% remain vote in Wales. A huge shift as people see the consequences for us as a nation. #Brexit @peoplesvote_uk 
We will remain a global power after Brexit. 
I have no idea whether the UK would run out of food and medicines in a no-deal Brexit, but I do know that it would do irreparable damage to the UK's reputation - already knocked - as a stable and predictable place to do business, with huge long term economic cost 
This is Meg Marshall she owns a Fruit farm she is a Tory/Brexit voter she is moaning she doesn't have anyone to pick her fruit she doesn't want young Scottish people because she doesn't want to pay them a fair wage. Here's an idea pick your own fruit or pay a decent wage...  
.@vincecable “In overwhelming numbers, people are concerned about the negative consequences of Brexit. However, the Tories are just not listening. They are instead consumed by chaos and confusion." #FinalSay #ExitFromBrexit 
‘We face the biggest peacetime decision in a generation – the public must have the final say on Brexit.’Following his discussion with @mrjamesob today, Lord Mandelson comprehensively presents the argument for a People’s Vote. 
Britons see Brexit turning sour, half want chance to vote again: poll  
Today's Brexit news:- Barnier shoots down May's Brexit plan- Ministers reportedly preparing 'plan b' for if the EU kills Chequers - Project fear latest (Army & super-gonorrhoea)- Tory grassroots openly revolt against May's plan  
One thing I've often considered but never really countenanced was Brexit 'blackmail'. Have a read of this (via the Irish Chartered Institute of Logistics and Transport)  
Mayor Tory now focusing on saying proposed provincial plan should be paused and referendum held. Said he’s always supported exploring legal challenges, but we’ve only heard that from him in last 24 hrs. Both @nenshi and @iamdavidmiller have spoken more clearly against Ford’s plan 
'BBC policy on Brexit is not impartial' says .@RadioTimes article  by .@RaymondSnoddy Do you think The @BBC Licence Fee should be abolished? Rt 
"Littlewood told an audience of businessmen and libertarian campaigners that Brexit offered the opportunity to “shred” EU regulations and appealed for their help"  
Anyone that thinks people in Britain were happy about living in wartime conditions on the home front is seriously misguided. Stop reading Brexit propaganda and get a bloody history book. 
Extremely clear analysis of no deal Brexit as “a kamikaze approach” to escaping the excellent situation.of EU membership.  
While we’re on the subject - perhaps you can tell me how I continue to get my daughter’s asthma medicine - made in France and Ireland - in the event of a no- deal Brexit? 
MCKINSTRYThe Government is paying the price for the incoherence and cowardice of its #Brexit strategy The People’s Vote is the antithesis of democracy. Its entire outlook is based on the betrayal of the voters. We already had a People’s Vote on the EU' 
We're talking about TRILLIONS of pounds hereLet that sink in TRILLIONS And #Brexit hasn't even happened yet....#BrexitShambles#Brexitchaos 
Lord Owen: ‘Parliament has let down the country and Theresa's May's bespoke Brexit plan will end badly’ 
We’ve found out that IEA trade expert Shanker Singham arranged for an American think tank and US hormone beef seller to be the guests of honour at a meeting of Jacob Rees-Mogg’s European Research Group  #IEAtapes #Brexit  
Democracy is when Brexit is carried out as the will of the majority.  If you don’t abide by democracy we leave ourselves open to challenge every future vote or referendum.  The country would be in chaos FFS ! 
Brexit is actually going to kill loads of people, isn’t it?  
James McGrory from Open Britain and Hugh Bennett of Brexit Central debate whether the British public should be given the chance to vote on a final #Brexit dealRead more:  
Current @PrivateEyeNews reveals that the Tory Brexit department has had more meetings with dodgy hard-right think tank IEA than the entire UK car industry! Now the IEA have been exposed peddling access to UK government ministers in return for donations.Some coincidence eh? 
China has offered talks with Britain on post-Brexit trade deal, says new Foreign Sec Jeremy Hunt.Any UK-China FTA will be feasible only if we chuck #Chequers and go with #SuperCanada or #WTOBrexit. Is the govt making preparations for this? 
Brexit bus, latest update: “Let’s take the NHS and sell it for £350m”  
New Italian deputy prime minister, @matteosalvinimi wants Brexit Britain to succeed and hopes it serves as an example of the people fighting back against the EU elite.Let's hope Britain paves the way for others to follow!  Support us at  
The banks won't do this for free so small businesses you're going to be worse off with #Brexit far better a #PeoplesVote @Labour4EU @EK_EuropeanMove 
4/ As I said after the Chequers deal collapsed, Labour should now embrace Norway+ and offer a second referendum on the deal done: deal or Remain only on ballot paper 
Things you won’t learn from BBC News #78 78% think the government is doing a bad job on Brexit@bbcnews - why don’t you ever commission polls any more? 
3/ 00ks of liberal-minded Conservatives have about 6 weeks to prevent their party becoming the no-deal Brexit party representing 27% (and falling) of the electorate ... 
WATCH: For Theresa May's final Brexit deal to have any kind of democratic legitimacy, the public need to have their say through a #PeoplesVote, says Lord Mandelson. Please RT: 
Deutsche Bank moves clearing ops out of London as Brexit looms  
Fury as UK officials plan on giving EU judges the FINAL say on vital Brexit decisions . For God's sake kick her out.  
#Brexit is not the "will of the people", still less a "revolt against the global elite".It's the will of shady, unscrupulous hard-right ideologues like Mark Littlewood of the Institute of Economic affairs, and their anonymous ultra-weathy backers.#StopBrexit #PeoplesVote 
#InternationalFriendshipDay is a great moment to be thankful that good can come from dark times. Brexit has brought together the most wonderful, strong, open-minded & progressive individuals. Campaigners from all backgrounds & parties united. Friends for life. #StopBrexit 
MEMBER OF FACEBOOK runs poll on Brexit that gets over a quarter of a million replies.   Result a massive win for LEAVE.   @borisjohnson #borisjohnson #boris johnson   #Brexit  
Brexit will not cause UK trade 'disruption' - WTO boss Roberto Azevedo  
How long are we to put up with fake polls from Sky, BBC and other media. We saw the same at the referendum where they were predicting a massive win but lost. Now they are spouting more bullshit in an attempt to rattle and frighten the people. Boycott Sky it's pretty evil. 
WATCH: @JamesMcGrory discusses the @SkyData poll released today that shows a majority of people now back a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal.The Government's Chequers proposal satisfies nobody. That's why more & more people are demanding a #PeoplesVote. Please RT: 
The people of Britain can see how badly Brexit is going, they know it'll be damaging for our jobs our public services and our futures and they want to take the power back from politicians. #takebackcontrol 
Rees-Mogg launches blistering attack on WEAK May for FAILURE to prepare for no deal Brexit  
Andy Burnham @SkyNews asked if there shld be a 2nd Ref...clearly states we have to respect the 1st i.e. NO.ME: Enough evidence to question the 1st. #Labour are on the wrong side of #Brexit & they'll be on the wrong side of history.A #PeoplesVote is the only Democratic option 
It’s tragically hilarious that  Remainers are getting high on prospect of 2nd referendum, based on a poll. When did we start believing polls, as precisely none predicted Brexit, nor Trump? It’s almost as if polls aren’t reality   
Support for Brexit is disappearing like snow off a dyke! This @SkyNews poll shows public attitudes are changing:  Of course, it's not too late to change course and the sooner we do, the better. #ScotlandforEurope #Brexit #BrexitShambles 
So Turkey ‘is joining the EU.’ And Turks & Iraqis are about to flood over! More Brexit lies on Facebook from Vote Leave  
Hugh Bennett: A referendum isn't a constitutional plaything, you should respect them for a generation  
.@jeremycorbyn is completely absent as an Opposition Leader and is laying the path for the Tories' chaotic Brexit. He is doing nothing to prevent an anarchic #Brexit that will put the country at risk. 
Sky Data poll reveals:  Most people now want to stay in the EUMost think Brexit would harm the UK,  andPeople want a referendum on staying (most popular), no deal #FlounceOutBrexit (not popular) and May's deal (not popular) 
Can’t believe acting like arrogant British bastards wasn’t enough to make Brexit work. Thought having a wank into a Union Jack would’ve made it an overnight success. Turns out it required things like “intelligence” and “factutal information”. Fuck sake. WHO KNEW? 
The WM govt has put itself in such a hopeless lose-lose position re Brexit, that I am reminded of Macbeth's despairing conclusion about his fate..."I am in blood stepped in so far, that should I wade no more, returning were as tedious as go o'er." 
China has said it is open to discussions about a possible free trade deal with the UK after Brexit, the UK's new foreign minister said on his first overseas trip  
“Just 16% of Conservative voters feel that this vision of #Brexit would be ‘good for Britain’The risk for the Tories is that unless there is a change of course, they will face a full-blown backlash or, just as bad, an outbreak of mass apathy” 
As the Brexit reality becomes clear  
What I am not understanding about the Europe-hating Tories is they demand to leave allies and friends in France, Ireland and Spain and suck up to Washington to be ruled as part of a US with Nicaragua, Grenada, Puertorico and others, using Brexit now as an excuse. 
Former Foreign Secretary Lord Owen:'They [parliamentarians] have really managed to convince themselves they are entitled in a strange way to thwart #BrexitParliament has to accept it's gone out of their hands.But they can't accept it!'#EU @MailOnline 
DISASTER: Only 10% of Brits think Theresa May’s government are doing a good job of negotiating Brexit. Time for her to go!  
I haven't and no-one else I know who voted Brexit have changed their minds either.In fact, quite the opposite.  
There is still time to ditch Chequers and take a different approach to deliver the Brexit articulated so well by the PM at Lancaster House. It’s right that colleagues have voiced concern and I’ll work with them to constructively engage with the government for it to change course. 
 We’re told to back Chequers or we’ll get Corbyn. That’s ridiculous. In reality if we don’t deliver Brexit fully we will lose seats like Mansfield, Middlesbrough, Banff and Buchan and much more. To fail on Brexit will usher in the chaos of Corbyn #ChequersMeansCorbyn 
 The voters are unhappy with the Chequers Plan and their confidence in the government’s ability to deliver Brexit has plummeted. The people by 17.4m voted for the U.K. to leave the EU. If Brexit is not delivered properly there will be consequences at the ballot box. 
The good news just keeps coming for @theresa_may - Just 10% think they’re doing a good job with the Brexit negotiations.  
James McGrory - The British people can now see they've been sold a pup when it comes to #brexit & they want their say. The futures of our children & grandchildren are on the line.. so continuing with the brexit car crash would be a huge dereliction of duty.#StopBrexit #FBPE 
I want every British child to one day have the chance to vote for those who govern us and make our laws. So resign and let someone who isn't a weak, duplicitous liar handle Brexit, before it's too late. 
A stark warning from @GoodwinMJ. Theresa May's Tory party is totally dependent on Brexit voters - the very people she's choosing to stab in the back. If Tory MPs don't wake up soon, she'll put Corbyn in Number 10!Support us at  
Imagine being a UK citizen in the EU, starting a career & family with guaranteed rights & then being told by your own country that you are not worthy to vote in a referendum that threatens those rights. Then, when the result removes those rights, your smug country says, "tough".  
Caught myself gazing out at the sea & wondering, “Would they cancel Brexit if there was a kaiju attack?” So everything’s going great with me, thanks for asking 
New Sky poll: 59% wd support remain to 41% leave in 3 choice referendum of remain, no deal or accept the deal. Huge lead: which politicians will stand up & lead demand to halt Brexit & have another vote?  
PM spokesman reiterates that there will "be no second referendum in any circumstance" 
The path we are heading down is a BETRAYAL of Brexit! 
'Prepare for the worst' in case of a no-deal Brexit says former WTO chief  
Happy birthday to the wonderful #Beano on turning 80! Still funny & subversive. Have just issues a cease and desist order to Tory #Brexit supporter Jacob Rees-Mogg for "modelling himself on the character Walter the Softy." #Beano80 #Dundeehumour 
Perhaps worth an RT as in the ten days since the conundrum has become clear and, by and large, it seems that the response is to decry it as Project Fear Mk2. Ironic, as it was mainly Brexiters calling for it. Ironic, too, if it shifts opinion on Brexit:  
Sky Data poll: 78% think the government is doing a bad job on Brexit  
May has capitulated on #Brexit@LeaveEUOfficial it is time #Conservatives Eurosceptics grew a backbone and ousted her.I have had enough. The country has had enough.Have you?Please RT if you have had enough of #Brexit capitulation by @theresa_may#MayMustGoNow #Conservatives 
To Tories thinking a Corbyn govt would be worse than them putting up with Brexit betrayal, can I point out that Brexit betrayal is the one thing most likely to lead to a Corbyn govt? Duh. 
#WTO boss Roberto Azevedo confirmed #Brexit would not cause UK trade "disruption" - in October 2016.  
Gary Lineker under fire over Brexit: ‘We need a second referendum on Brexit’No Gary instead rerunning the biggest democratic exercise in British history, let’s respect it and maybe give more power to the British public and give them a referendum on abolishing BBCTV licence fee. pic.twitter.com/27BS5yCpKd 
I support People's Vote but it's 2nd best option. What I really, really, is our elected representatives in Parliament to get us out of this terrible mess & own up that ANY kind of Brexit will make UK worse off! Just end Brexit now & get on with important things: NHS, education...  
Wise words of @davidallengreen on the likelihood of Brexit outcomes. 
Sky Data Poll claims that two-thirds of Britons are shifting sharply against Brexit when Sky themselves  admit they only sampled 1,466 Sky customers online between 20-23 July 2018. That's hardly representative or conclusive, is it? 
Offering second Brexit referendum would strengthen PM against Tory Brexiters, says Mandelson - Politics live  
New Sky Data pollRemain - 48%No Deal - 27%Govt deal - 13%Remain - 59%No Deal - 41%Referendum on deal: Yes - 50%, No - 40% 
I will be performing ‘Brexit Breath’[Curtain]Centre stage: a pile of miscellaneous Brexit-related ideas, all scattered and lying.The sound of a birth-cry.Pause.An exasperated sigh.Pause.Another exasperated sigh.[Curtain].@ArtsOverBorders 
Imagine having no faith in politics for years, voting in the EU Referendum because you thought that vote would mean something, and then being told by smug MPs and pundits in London that the notion of living in a democratic country is extreme and undeliverable. 
May is carrying out Brexit as she carried out her 2017 general election campaign; dithering, weak, uncommunicative, deceitful, even cowardly no-showing. Result is the same: a huge loss of political opportunity. Imposed by the Tory machine. Totally unfit to lead our country. 
Poll: Half of Britons Want Chance to Vote on Brexit Again  
Nigel Farage finally left speechless as listener demolishes his Brexit argument  
Here is the feedback from Saturday. People in #Slough back a #PeoplesVote on #Brexit . @TanDhesi are you going to represent the views of your constituents in parliament? cc @Labour4EU @labour4europe 
1/2 This idea of inundating @NicolaSturgeon with tweets saying we are ready for another referendum misses a crucial point. It’s not us Indy supporters who need to be ready, it’s those we want to convince to vote yes. And on that note, if everyone that’s ‘ready’ wants to help get 
I can't believe 14% of people think Brexit negotiations are going well  
What I am not understanding about the English-hating SNP is they demand independence from allies and friends in England, N.Ireland and Wales and suck up to Brussels to be ruled as part of a Union with Rumania, Germany, France, Bulgaria and others, using Brexit now as an excuse. 
Only 10% of Brits think Theresa May is doing a good job negotiating BrexitOnly 14% think we’ll get a good dealSo how come 40% think Brexit will be good for Britain?  
Labour peer Lord Mandelson says the government's #Brexit negotiations are "a shambles" - and the only way to give legitimacy to the final deal is to put it to a public vote  
The Sky poll shows a concern over the Brexit negotiations.Spike Milligan, in one of his books, was given a punishment in the army of peeling spuds. He peeled them to the size of peas because he didn't want to do it.Teresa May is using the same strategy for the same reason  
At our hotel in Belfast @susanmcolton  asked for a Map of Ireland. This is what she was given. ‘Have you not got the whole thing?’ asks she. ‘Oh no!’ says he. #hardbrexit #brexit  
Brexit is madnessBrexit is not working, it’s costing us all money.  It can and must be stopped.Demand a @peoplesvote_uk 
In what way did the British public change its mind over #Brexit?Head of @SkyData @HarrydCarr says we've seen a "big change" in how people perceive the way the government is negotiating an exit from the EU.Read the full story here:  
The IEA told our undercover reporter about its plans for a Brexit trade deal with the US: a model trade deal signed by Liam Fox, a plan to target MPs, and Jacob Rees-Mogg eating chlorinated chicken  #IEAtapes 
Britain no longer wants Brexit.The majority say it is going badly, will be bad for the country, and leave them worse off.Most now want a new #PeoplesVote referendum. And a 59-41% majority would now vote to #Remain. It’s time to end this shambles. #StopBrexit. 
There's still time to apply for a grant from our Stakeholder Engagement Fund! The fund will support local community based organisations across Scotland to help ensure that a range of voices are heard to inform @ScotGov's position on #Brexit.  More info:  
Like the storms that broke the heat wave, I think public opinion is turning against #Brexit for three reasons1/ Brexiteers have no plans for the future2/ Russia Bots, Cambridge Analytica etc all muted3/ The volume of criminality and corruption around the vote is being exposed 
Britain has changed its mind on #Brexit - but what are the implications for @Theresa_May?Head of @SkyData @HarrydCarr says they are "quite profound".Read the full story here:  
There have been three huge stories the BBC has covered with only the most perfunctory reports: the Facebook/Cambridge Analytica data leak, the #Brexit campaign funding scandal, and the exposure of Russian interference in British politics  
No one cares what you think @George_Osborne. You were one of the architects of Project Fear. You lied to the British Public about an emergency budget. You have no legitimacy to comment on Brexit. 
'Early morning, West Hartlepool' 1963 by Don McCullin. Brexit is rooted in nostalgia and a yearning for a mythical past.  
I'm pretty sure we don't have enough helicopters for the Brexit food runs? 
I think a second Brexit referendum, with a newly released Tommy Robinson, for some reason on a white horse, and Steve Bannon, for some reason carrying a wizard's staff, rallying a populace weakened by a lack of food and insulin, might be a kind of racist Ragnarok 
“People voted for independence from the EU. And this means we have to leave the EU and all its institutions.”@Tom_Slater_  debating the meaning of Brexit on Sky  
Public opinion is shifting sharply against Brexit, Sky Data poll reveals.78% think the government is doing a bad job on Brexit.65% say we’ll get a bad deal.And the public would now vote to #Remain in the EU - 59% to 41%.Help #StopBrexit. Please RT. 
That's my sky subscription cancelled in November. Your constant anti-brexit bias is too much. I don't know anyone who has changed their mind apart from remainers who believed the original scare stories. 
I’ve just finished reading this brilliant book about online/offline behaviour, relationships, nationalism, privacy,  Brexit, race, politics, the media, property development and gamification. It’s hilarious and horrifying all at once. Read it.  
The impact of Brexit on the veterinary profession is big. I can already feel it in private practice. The impact it will have on food hygiene, animal welfare, tuberculosis testing has been completely ignored. The Royal Vet College has undertaken a recent survey but no report yet. 
A new Sky Data poll has shown that 78% of the UK public think the government is doing a bad job negotiating a #Brexit deal  
RT : Off-brand brexit  
Momentum’s move to deselect the four Brexit Labour MPs who broke the whip on the Customs Union, is essentially a tactic to legitimise deselection as a process. A Trojan horse. 
Momentum building for a #PeoplesVote: it's clear that people don't trust @theresa_may's botched Brexit  
This is the real FOREIGN INTERFERENCE in our democratic process. When leaders & elected representatives of major UK parties such as @GerardBattenMEP are “shadow banned” & have their account/voice restricted by US Corporates such as Twitter?Time to chose #NWO or #BRexit & freedom 
Oh do shut up ! I didn’t vote at all because I was unsure at the time ... all of this fake reporting and nonsense polls trying to get a 2nd referendum has made me a 100% LEAVER !!!! 
I'm curious what, if anything, it would take for this government, to call off Brexit Not electoral fraudNot the liesNot the projected doom of no deal Not firms relocating to EU27Not danger to GFANot collusion of Leave with Russia/white supremacistsSo, what would it take? 
1. Time 4 those MPs who've sat on their supine arses or backed this farce to get off them.#Brexit's failed before it's happened. A majority no longer want it...only a #PeoplesVote can validate the end game.We must have the #FinalSay with a #Remain option. 
78% of the public think the govt is making a mess of Brexit.Only 14% still think we're heading for a good deal.As a result, 50% now say there should be a vote on the final deal, vs 40% who don't.Can you hear the 'will of the people', @theresa_may? 
How Britain turned against Brexit 
Billions of cat-sized rats will infest Britain post Brexit because the bins will only be collected every other month. These flatulent rodents will generate a gas cloud over Britain which will obscure the sun's rays & lead to crop failures, plague the black death and starvation. 
I love Sky Data PollsFirst it takes them four days to conduct their pollSecond they don’t mention on TV that they onlyPolled 1466 ppl on line.Third they ask the questions in such a way to angleOpinion against Brexit.In Referendum 33.6m ppl gave their opinionMSM bias again.  
.@AdamBoultonSky @FaisalIslam It's time for broadcasters to change their language from "when we Brexit" to "if we Brexit" 
On BBC R4 this morning, Frankfurt expecting 10000 high paid (and therefore high tax paying) financial jobs to move there as result of hard Brexit, and that’s just Frankfurt. So less available for NHS. But as Tory Brexiteers probably have private health insurance, not a problem. 
Fake news channel @SkyNews claim in their latest poll that the nation is against a #NoDeal and want a 2nd referendum! Please keep in mind how they have constantly aired Anti Brexit rhetoric over tha last 2 years. They have no idea about fair & balanced reporting, it’s all one way 
Keep thinking of what NHS doctor @ch323 said ‘you can have Brexit or NHS but you can’t have both.’  
Don’t hand Britain over to Trump, Putin, Rees-Mogg & Farage. Will Hutton & I explain what Brexit’s really about - & how it can & must be stopped.   
New polling shows: Most people would like to see a referendum  between the deal suggested by the government, no deal, and remaining in the EU.  
"Over 370,000" back @Independent call for a second referendum. For perspective, that's 1.1% of the 33,551,983 who voted first time. So, the people have spoken, then: no second vote. Good stuff  
There will be no rest until Brexit is dead and buried. Apart from a few cowardly MPs sitting on sun loungers. Don't forget to send them a postcard from Brexitland. Beautiful country but terrible atmosphere, spoilt by crooks. In need of a makeover. #PeoplesVote #StopBrexit 
Increasingly clear that if U.K. can somehow reverse Brexit, it would be hammer blow to western populist-nationalism in general. Not just Britain’s future at stake. 
Tighter supplies and significant price hikes for dairy staples such as butter, cheese and yoghurt have been forecast in the event of a 'no deal' Brexit  
More proof that Brexit is going well... 'Euro Clearing' is basically the biggest financial service that the EU relies (relied) on us for. And Deutsche Bank is one of the biggest banks in Europe. 
Opinion shifting decisively towards a people's vote. Bring it on! (from today's @SkyNews #Brexit poll)  
The most exciting thing about a post-brexit Britain is going to be seeing how everyone re-packages their Fuggles DIPA into a new beer every fortnight. 
Jacob Rees-Mogg slams the PM for failing to prepare for No Brexit deal. He said the Government is using scare tactics to get support on deal...#MoggMentum 
This morning's Guardian goes undercover with the IEA thinktank claiming to be in the "Brexit-influencing game": Private Eye revealed last week that the Department for Exiting the European Union has held more meetings with them than it has with reps for the UK's car industry. 
Boycott them?I've been stockpiling them as part of my post Brexit survival strategy....well to be honest it's more of a working white paper 
University fresher still believes in Corbyn’s Brexit ‘long game’  
Latest figures from @YouGov suggest three-quarters of the public - a record high - think the Brexit negotiations are going badly.  
'The tyrant grinds down his slaves and they don't turn against him, they crush those beneath them.'- Emily Bronte (on Brexit) 
England suddenly realising Brexit is a terrible idea two years after the rest of the world.  
Public mood continues to shift against #Brexit& #Remain has clear lead.The numbers are now reaching point where supporting a #peoplesvote should be considered as a career saver by May or Corbyn.It vindicates @vincecable 's call for an #ExitFromBrexit 
Kamikaze May on a Brexit suicide mission, SPAMageddon, Comrade May leader of the democracy threatening Tories at the heart of political corruption Vote Leave IEA Think Tanking Fake News Fake Studies, they’ll Kill Us All!!!!!!!!  
Brexit can be stopped. It is a choice to take the country along this path. All those responsible should be held accountable. 
I know i dont need to say it, but the Scotsman ran this healdine;49% of Scots OPPOSE Sturgeons second referendum plans.Why didnt they run this headline:51% of Scots SUPPORT Sturgeons second referendum plans. 
Italy's PM has publicly accused the EU of "swindling" Britain out of its Brexit. The EU has already inflicted a terrible cost on the people of Britain.It can only be a matter of time until the EU and the MSM are in the dock charged with the greatest fraud ever perpetrated.  
Weird isn’t it, how we’ve gone from “James your Brexit no deal worst case scenario is never going to happen and Russia did nothing here or in the US” to “you were right about all of it, but let’s just pretend we all found this out just now on our own and it’s a big surprise.” 
I take it all back. There is a Brexit dividend. For all those planning to make money from the removal of food and environmental standards and workers' rights the pesky EU imposed. Bring on the meat washed in swimming pools! Here, have an NHS! 
UK, Sky Data poll:European Membership Referendum / Scenario: No DealRemain Vote in...Wales: 73%Scotland : 68%London: 67%North England: 57%South England: 55%Midlands (England): 52%Sample Size: 1,446Field Work: 20/07/19-23/07/18#Brexit #PeoplesVote 
UK, Sky Data poll:European Membership Referendum / Scenario: No DealRemain Vote in Age Groups18-24: 73%25-34: 75%35-44: 66%45-54: 60%55-64: 43%65-74: 40%75+: 46%(Excluding don't know/abstain)Sample Size: 1,446Field Work: 20/07/19-23/07/18#Brexit #PeoplesVote 
I'm sick of putting any @BBCNews output on and being confronted by shadowy figures from right wing think tanks, if it's not taxpayers alliance its the IEA, they get a free pass day in day out to promote #Brexit and austerity again unchallenged, it's nauseous #r4today 
14% of people think we will get a good deal?  14%!Time to call a halt on this appalling episode and get back to sorting out the country's real problems.  Time to bring Brexit to an end.  
Walked 150 metres to Boots. Passed three people sleeping on the street. This is the centre of London, one of richest cities in world. How much worse will it be when Brexit happens? And the rich like Rees-Mogg and their mates will be able to escape the consequences of their lies. 
UK, Sky Data poll:European Membership ReferendumRemain: 58%Leave EU with no deal: 32%Leave EU with deal suggested by government: 10%(Excluding don't know/abstain)Sample Size: 1,446Field Work: 20/07/19-23/07/18#Brexit 
Here is the @BBCPolitics tweet count for the last seven days:BREXIT CRISIS - 17LABOUR ANTISEMITISM - 10FAKE NEWS - 2CRIME CRISIS - 2HOUSING CRISIS - 1RIGHT-WING THINKTANK DONOR SCANDAL - 0TORY ISLAMAPHOBIA - 0TRANSPORT CRISIS - 0NHS CRISIS - 0#JustSaying 
British public opinion has shifted sharply against #BrexitCheck out our thread  and read the full story here:  
The PM has us hurtling towards a no-deal Brexit. The people did not vote for this chaos in 2016 - Brexit is taking longer, more complicated and more expensive than they were told. Demand the final say on the deal: 
Brexit hysteria continues. Today we will run out of fruit. It makes you wonder: how did we ever pick fruit before the EU?   
Can I make a request which goes beyond Getting Ready Together for our own homes?Between now and Brexit could we all commit an extra amount a week/month to making sure our foodbanks are overstocked on long date tinned fish?From personal experience, it’s lifesaving.Thank you. 
- 2/3s of public - including majority of Leave voters - think Brexit outcome will be bad for Britain- Significant increase in proportion who think Brexit will negatively affect them, economy & country- Most people want a #PeoplesVote on final deal 
RT if you agree: It's time Labour dropped their support for a job-destroying Brexit and backed staying in the Single Market. Share the facts:  
Exclusive: Liam Fox accuses those warning NHS will be sold off as part of any post-Brexit trade deal with Trump of being "anti-trade".  
They will ask you - your children and grandchildren - what you did in the Brexit war. What effort you made to protect their future from the onrushing madness. Make sure here and now no personal effort is spared. That the question doesn't arise. 
Nigel Farage FINALLY left speechless as listener calls in and demolishes his Brexit argument 
More than three-quarters of the UK now think that the Tory government is doing a 'bad job' negotiating Brexit. Only 10% think they are doing a good job! (Who are those 10% & what is their criteria?) - Brexit is broken - we need a #PeoplesVote 
If the majority vote counts for nothing then our social contract is voided too. There is anarchy in the air. Hold the line for #BREXIT  
Hard Brexit has never been about sovereignty - it’s about creating a legislative bonfire to decimate protections enshrined in law, and hold the UK hostage to corrupt corporate interests.   
Things I could never be persuaded of:that Brexit is a ‘good idea’that a morning in bed is ever a ‘waste of time’that camping is a ‘holiday’ 
Of course this country is going to turn against Brexit when the prospect of food shortages becomes clear. This country lost its shit when a Toblerone got smaller and called the police when KFC shut for a day. 
Alastair Campbell: "I don't want to leave the Labour party, but the way Jeremy Corbyn has spoken about Brexit and the way they've failed to deal with anti-Semitism makes it very difficult." Watch again ▼@JuliaHB1 | @campbellclaret 
Just look at this, only 10% think the Tories are doing a good job managing #Brexit. The inevitable disaster if the Tories carry on is obvious to pretty much everyone now. May’s choices are carry on towards disaster or reset with a General Election.#ge2018 
Another Brexit gift: ‘Language courses at risk amid staff shortageHead teachers may have to cut language courses in schools as a staffing shortage worsens’ @thetimes 
That’s not the view of the EU27. French Europe Minister said that UK can still change its mind only last week, and noises from Brussels are that an extension (which would certainly be needed) would be granted for a referendum or other democratic processes.  
Remain has an 18 POINT lead in a three way referendum on the Brexit deal. Brexit is not inevitable.  
The Main stream media are nothing more than an establishment tool. Don't trust their opinion polls. They got it so wrong prior to the referendum. Sky never asked my opinion. Where was the poll done, South of Watford, I bet? The real poll was in 2016. That's the poll that counts. 
A great statesman talks some sense on Brexit. Lord Owen: ‘Parliament has let down the country and Theresa's May's bespoke Brexit plan will end badly’  via @Telegraph 
Peter Schrank on ads during the Brexit campaign - Political Cartoon Gallery in Putney  
If you want to join the ever-increasing calls for a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal, here are 3 things you can do right now: Sign our petition Sign up to our (free) Morning Briefings RT this  
Having lost the argument on Brexit, the Remain campaign is targeting to smear Brexit supporters with evil lies now, moving to sack Brexit supporting Labour MP's like Frank Field and Kate Hoey in addition to Nigel Farage, Aaron Banks, Julia HB, Boris Johnson etc. Remainers LIE. 
Breaking: Shock poll by @SkyNews this morningThe British regret Brexit 2/3 think it's a bad idea 78% that negotiations are going badly50/40 for a new referendum with a clear majority to stay in the EU  
This is it - the tide has finally turned on Brexit. A  majority believe it is bad for the country and much decisive one demands a people vote.  
My top 5 Projects Fear Brexit stories of the week:> A British epidemic of "super gonorrhea"> British women to lose their rights> Sandwiches to go> No medicine with immediate effect> There will be no foodShame on the MSM for publishing the lies   
Did Silly Season begin today with the Guardian’s exclusive on a think tank seeking to influence public policy or was it the weekend’s “Brexit will hasten the spread of super-gonorrhoea”? 
Will #Brexit be good or bad for you personally? 31% say it will be good, up from 29% in March.42% say it will be bad, up from 36% in March.18% say neither, down from 26% in March.Read more: Source: @SkyData 
Italy Backs Brexit: Salvini Accuses EU Of "Swindling" The UK  
56% of public think there should be a people's vote between May's deal, crashing out with no deal or no Brexit - when you strip out don’t knows. No Brexit would win such a contest. Momentum is building.  
Lord Owen is spot onThere would be dire consequences across the country if elitist politicians were seen to be ignoring the will of the people.'The mood in the #Brexit cities and towns will start getting ugly,' he said. via @MailOnline 
The world's biggest economies by 2030:1 China  2 United States  3 India  4 Japan  5 Indonesia  6 Russia  7 Germany  8 Brazil  9 Mexico  10 UK @wef #MondayMotivation #tech #innovation #Brexit 
Positive news countering the renewed Project Fear campaign “Close to a third of SMEs have already felt a positive impact...within the group of firms which export, 43% have felt a positive impact. The same number expect this to continue post-Brexit”  
Voters got it right the first time. So did John Major when he promised "there won't be another referendum on Europe. This is it."  
Here’s a thought - you could start actually doing the job of opposing the government & work to put a stop to this utter travesty that will destroy our country. You could fight for democracy, call the referendum for what it is, undemocratic due to the actions of vote leave. 
BIG swing in public opinion as they see the consequences of #Brexit. MAJORITY now want a final say on whether to proceed or not #PeoplesVote We don’t have to accept the Government’s approach - tell your MP now! 
‘No 10 to end Brexit scare stories’ (Times)Impossible 
In 2003 polls showed around 53% of the UK population backed the invasion of Iraq. You'd be hard pushed to find those people now - but they exist. A decade on from Brexit how many people will admit voting for this catastrophe? 
The Telegraph reports that the big banks are preparing to rally in support of businesses if the UK exits the EU without a deal with Brussels. They plan to lend billions and extend vital lines of credit to mitigate any delays to cross-border shipments and payments following Brexit 
When is someone in the Government going to take a break from arguing about Brexit & sort this out? Country isn’t functioning at the moment.  
78% now think Brexit negotiations going badly, just 10% well; 50% want a referendum on the outcome, 40% do not; 51% vs 40% think Brexit will be bad overall for UK. Latest in a number of polls suggesting public opinion is finally turning  
The IEA, influencing many...-offering potential US donors access to govt ministers - trade expert knows Boris Johnson, Michael Gove, David Davis well-org in “the Brexit influencing game”-US donors could fund & shape “substantial content” of research 
Secretly filmed: a leading hard Brexit think tank offering our undercover reporter the chance to influence a report on “green Brexit” for Michael Gove  
Brexit, China's rising power, boosting trade, important consular cases & human rights on the agenda for my meeting with Chinese Foreign Minister Wang Yi in Beijing today  
Will #Brexit be good or bad for the country? 40% say it will be good, down from 44% in March.51% say it will be bad, up from 46% in March.5% say neither, up from 4% in March.Source: @SkyData 
Sums up the EU’s Brexit dynamic pretty well, strong externally vis a vie the UK, but the need for internal cohesion means it cannot be nimble (short thread with relevant quotes):  “The UK’s dilemma comes from the fact that the EU is both strong and weak”  
Exclusive: Mark Carney says Brexit is taking up 50% of his time. He also tells us how he's preparing for the next crisis  
On @talkRADIO with @JuliaHB1 after 8 to discuss Brexit. I wonder if she is among the 14percent who think negotiations going well. Or the new majority asking for a @peoplesvote_uk ? 
So this has gone a little mad, but for those of you that want the honest facts as to how Brexit is going to impact on my profession, here it is. This is not scaremongering, it’s the truth. #animalwelfare @LBC @mrjamesob  
UK farmers face prospect of letting crops rot in fields unless post-Brexit visa scheme for seasonal workers agreed soon  
So. Will the government get a good deal on #Brexit?Our new @SkyData poll finds 14% say yes, down from 26% in March.65% say it will be a bad deal, up from 50% in March. 
when life gives you lemons sign this if you want to make brexit less s**t for all of us  
Wow! A damming conclusion on #Brexit. Not ONE answer in favour of it. Poll after poll after poll, support for a final say & remaining in the #EU grows. Pls like & RT to show @theresa_may & @jeremycorbyn that the country wants & needs a #PeoplesVote 
78% think the government is doing a bad job on Brexit  
SHARE: A second poll in a week shows a clear majority in favour of a People’s Vote on the Brexit deal!  
Brexit  emigration  of financial services .  Deutsche Bank shifts half its euro clearing from London to Frankfurt  is this the beginning of the end  for London financial services . 
"THE EU: FRIEND OR FOE?" - Brexit Facts4EU takes the lid off the EU's malevolence towards the UK, as they try to thwart a successful #Brexit and damage the UK.  Read:  
NEW: How the IEA teamed up with US donors to push for environmental deregulation post-Brexit  #IEAtapes 
IEA brokered access to ministers for US donors looking to influence BrexitCheck out more about the IEA, its US funding, its cabinet minister supporters and its links to other members of the #BrexitSyndicate#R4today 
The UK public has shifted sharply against brexit... Will we get a #PeoplesVote?   
A quick note to any lexiteers still stupid enough to follow me.There's no such thing as a Tony Benn/Dennis Skinner Brexit.It costs less to fly to most to Europe than it does to get a train from Edinburgh to London.We're a connected world. Grow up, you fucking morons. 
A majority of people want a referendum on the final Brexit deal, our new @SkyData poll reveals.50% say there should be a vote on accepting the government's deal, quitting without one and staying in the EU. 40% say there shouldn't be. 
Are you in favour of Brexit? 
Big shift in public opinion against #Brexit & in favour of #PeoplesVote on any deal  #brexitshambles #peoplesvote 
BREAKING: Confidence in the government's negotiating of #Brexit has plummeted, new polls from @SkyData find. 10% say @theresa_may's administration is doing a good job, compared to 23% in March.78% say it is doing a bad job, compared to 55% in March. 
The UK submitted its schedule of duties to the WTO on July 24th, however, the US, Australia and Canada all rejected the terms, so what the UK ends up with remains very unclear and subject to up to six years of negotiation.Brexit will be easy & the gift that just keeps giving 
50% of voters are backing a #peoplesvote on the final Brexit deal, while a majority of Leave voters now believe the outcome of negotiations will be bad for Britain.Brexit is not inevitable, there's still time to save jobs & living standards. Please RT   
Sky Data poll reveals 78% of British public think government is doing a bad job negotiating #Brexit  
Fresh from being found out over electoral fraud & setting up a crowdfunder to challenge the ruling - BeLeave founder Darren Grimes finds himself close to another Brexit scandal. He's the Digital Manager at controversial rightwing thinktank Institute for Economic Affairs! #r4today 
According to the Sky poll a clear majority think Brexit is a catastrophe, the government is a catastrophe and that the only way out of the catastrophe is a second referendum.  
British farmers say they will have to leave crops to rot in the fields unless a post-Brexit visa scheme for seasonal workers is announced soon.  
THREAD: We are now well & truly past the stage of Brexit where satire has any meaning. There’s nothing we can do to make Brexiters’ words & ideas more ridiculous than they already are. You simply need to quote them as they are presented in supposedly pro-Brexit newspapers. (1/x)  
Apparently the Erg controlled Government have put their NoDeal preparation information sharing on hold.The reason for this is allegedly because they are worried that the public will “shit themselves”and turn against Brexit.Too... late!#peoplesVote#FinalSayForAll 
Jacob Rees-Mogg slams the PM for failing to prepare for No Brexit deal. He said the Government is using scare tactics to get support on deal... 
Farmers fear crops will rot in fields unless government releases details of how seasonal workers will be able to work in UK post #Brexit. Just 0.6% of 86,000 seasonal workers are British. 
Why doesn’t Downing St disclose damage to EU from No Deal Brexit rather than highlighting only  negative effects for GB 
Kamikaze May on a Brexit suicide mission, SPAMageddon, Comrade May leader of the democracy threatening Tories at the heart of political corruption Vote Leave IEA Think Tanking Fake News Fake Studies, they’ll Kill Us All!!!!!!  
By 52% to 35% those sampled in SkyData poll think Brexit will be bad for the economy  
We are watching a tale of two disasters unfold: Brexit & Trump. Dig into their origins & you find the same dirty tricks, the same villains: Mercer Bannon Farage Putin. Democracy has been hijacked. The answer is not 'learn lessons'. The answer is press the reset button #StopBrexit 
When closing down pro-Indy Youtube accounts and headlining opposition FOI requests become a bigger priority for the BBC in Scotland than questioning Ruth Davidson on frigates, Brexit chaos and Dark Money then there is a serious problem. 
SkyData poll find backing for second referendum by 10% margin  
The Institute of Economic Affairs has been a poison in the UK political bloodstream for far too long. IEA is a rightwing thinktank enjoying huge tax breaks. Offering donors access to minsters so they can influence Brexit is a massive scandal that needs to be dealt with! #r4today 
Dear Continuity Remainers,I am proud to have voted Leave to take back control of our laws, border & money.Overwhelming majority of  backs the democratic mandate for Brexit.If  attacking my turban is the best you can come up with, you have truly lost the argument...  
If there were a referendum, would you vote...After second preferences:Do not leave the EU 59%Leave EU with no deal 41% 
Should there be a referendum asking between Brexit with the deal the government suggests, no deal Brexit or not leaving the EU?Should 50%Should not 40%Don't know 10% 
Well recalling Parliament would be a start. Stopping Brexit a good second step. Over to you.#FBPE #FinalSay #PeoplesVote #StopBrexit #stay 
"Take a good look Phillip, we won't be able to come here again without a visa in a few months thanks to ruddy #Brexit"Theresa May on holiday in Italy#MondayMotivation 
BREAKING: Public opinion has shifted sharply against Brexit, says a new Sky pollTwo-thirds, including a majority of Leave voters, now think the outcome of negotiations will be bad for BritainThis is why we need a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal 
Remain supporter Theresa May’s plan all along has been to bore and/or anger people over Brexit...   
#Skynews: REMAIN REMAIN REMAIN REMAIN YOU MUST REMAIN OBEY OBEY OBEY REMAIN.......#BREXIT IS BAD IF YOU VOTED LEAVE YOU ARE BAD, YOU MUST REMAIN.... 24 hours a day 7 days a week....All this makes me do is become more determined to resist this state sponsored brainwashing. 
My letter to Mrs May on the precarious state of Northern Ireland, in the grip of the DUP with no Assembly. I suggest she appoints a mediator, ask Parliament to legalise abortion & same sex marriage, & reconsider Brexit & its threat of a new Irish border pic.twitter.com/iuKH0yqa8C 
There will be no "blitz spirit" as Brexit bites, for two simple reasons.1. The actual blitz was caused by an unavoidable war against an authoritarian, right-wing, populist cult.2. Today's issue is being caused by an entirely avoidable authoritarian, right-wing, populist cult. 
Bravery creep sets in, I’ve seen it so often during commercial negotiations, as the deadline approaches the tough talk stops and reality takes over.Public opinion is shifting sharply against Brexit, Sky Data poll reveals  
If there was a referendum called on the final #Brexit deal, this would be the result on first preferences:  Stay in the EU - 48% No deal Brexit - 27% Government deal Brexit - 13%Source: @SkyData 
#skydata poll reveals majority of us think #Brexit will be bad for Britain...4 out of 5 people think the Government is doing a bad job at the negotiating table.@harrydcarr joins us @SkyNews #Sunrise to tell us more 6am 
#PeoplesVote: More than 1.4m additional young people could now vote in a new #Brexit referendum  
Public opinion is shifting sharply against Brexit, Sky Data poll reveals  
Brexit day is being referred to as B-Day = isnt that some sort of basin for washing arseholes and fannies 
Referendum coming up Oct 22. Your big chance to modernize our antiquated voting system. Vote #PR4BC. #ProRep #bcpoli 
Imagine living in a country with the 6th largest economy in the entire world.Now, imagine that same country threatening to employ the fucking army to oversee rationing.That's where Brexit has got us.We are living in an absolute fucking joke of a country. 
Another example of UK's unfair illegal referendum  
“I’ve lost count of the number of MPs, including senior ministers, who have approached me to tell me that I was right to call for a second referendum. There’s more support in parliament than people think” Justine Greening. PS Our job is to persuade family/friends #PeoplesVote 
Can Britain exit Brexit?  via @MotherJones 
I'll tell everyone there's only one good thing about this british Brexit.It has Polarised the good Scottish People into realising something,WHAT THE HECK ARE WE DOING IN THIS SO CALLED UNION 
Mathias Cormann before Super Saturday, "The byelections will be a referendum on who has the better plan for a stronger economy and more jobs." #auspol #qldpol 
The country is desperate for leadership to take it out of this crisis. Not with tests, or a carefully calibrated but equally unworkable plan for Brexit (there’ll be no renegotiation, BTW), or by offering to try to mop up the awful damage afterwards 5/ 
My timeline is chock-full of Labour people tearing strips off one another. I’m a member of another party, but I ask as a Citizen, please stop. Now is not the time. Get your shit together and oppose Brexit, which you know will, in any form, disproportionately harm the poorest.1/ 
Call for UK citizen ID system after Brexit  
Kerr ching! Dodgy cash for Tory Brexit secret deals to undermine UK environment&food standards. Tip of a massive iceberg in Westminster. Mind boggles at what Taxpayer Alliance up to with their secret donors, what are they promising? @carolecadwalla #Brexit  
We voted for #Brexit not a #Brexit betrayal#ChequersPlan is not #BrexitPlease support this petition by signing and RT as widely as possibleWe voted to take back our independence and sovereignty #EU #Conservatives #ForTheNation#ukip 
In the absence of cross-party support necessary to achieve constitutional change Labor has promised in government to legislate for a voice to honour the aspirations held in the Uluru statement. We will work to build support for a referendum. 
I was not aware Remain was taking money from Russia, perhaps you could show me a link to their corruption? #Brexit  
Brexit: panic is the right thing to do - no amount of planning or organisation could begin to `compensate for the incompetence of the May government. Thus, whatever the logic might tell one, there are times when panic is the right thing to do..  #Brexinfo. 
As I have been saying ever since the 2016 referendum - our democracy has been hijacked - Brexit is a fascist takeover. Lexiteers need to wake up to the real dangers facing our world #StopBrexit Work with us for @Another_Europe 
Good article but a correction...17.4m was in fact only 37% of voters & represented c. 26.5% of the People...& the Referendum was also Non-Binding...so #Brexit is based on the advisory opinion of a minority of the People.  
Let me get this straight. REMOAN MPs and a REMAIN PM fuck up BrExit and it's "LEAVE getting found out"? Well, LEAVE aren't in charge. How about you let Boris have a go and all REMOAN Tories stand for re-election then judge us. What do you have to fear? Being found out?  
#SteveBaker, former #Brexit minister: I am deeply concerned that the  communications strategy is discrediting #nodeal in order to force #Chequers through. It would  be inexcusable to panic the public and markets to simply deliver an undesirable deal! #BBC #SKY @LBC #LBC @ConHome 
DID YOU VOTE FOR BREXIT?IF YES PLEASE, RETWEET AND LIKE THIS TWEET CONNECT WITH YOUR FELLOW BREXITEERS BY FOLLOWING EVERYONE WHO RETWEETED OR LIKED THIS TWEET. pic.twitter.com/ziXzuhcfjO 
It makes you wonder what @AndrewScheer went to England to talk to the Brexit folks about. 
As expected: China's interference in East Asia Youth Games boosts referendum petition for Taiwan running under its own name at Tokyo 2020 (but petition still far from target).  
Brexit: Farmers fear more crops will rot in fields as EU workers move abroad  
In that time we have helped to remind both Remain voters and Brexit voters that they have EVERY RIGHT to take back control of this whole process if they can see it's not delivering on its promises or narrowing the horizons of young Brits. 
In December, I launched a crowdfunder that basically said: "I'm quitting my job to deal with Brexit for a year. Please help me to not starve." It raised £12K. I gave half to the main OFOC crowdfunder, and the rest fed & transported me for 7 months.THANK-U 
I’ve just ditched my perfectly working Dyson for a GTech AirRam. Can’t bear touching the damn thing anymore. Will never touch a Brexit supporting company that doesn’t have our interests at heart again.... #stopbrexit #fbpe 
#GinaMiller is now claiming that dark forces manipulated the #Brexit vote and there must now be a #secondreferendum to solve the crisis in democracy. The only crisis is among #Remainers. They lost. And they won’t accept it. Miller is an #antidemocrat and #archhypocrite! #BBC #LBC 
Brexit was borne from an attempt to 'unite' the Tory party, but has only succeeded in tearing them further apart. Brexit WILL destroy them, but we don't HAVE to let them take us with them. They're done, WE'RE not, and while we're not, neither is the UK. #StopBrexitSaveBritain 
There is no room in the UK for a Conservative Party who foists the Brexit disaster on us. 
"Brexit was a golden opportunity to reconnect with a genuine movement..Instead what we got was a Macbethian piece of theatre in place of a leadership election, after which..by default..another..Remain-supporting leader,and a 75% Remain-supporting cabinet." 
These two are musical comedy class act. The Tom Lehrers of Brexit!  
Every day in every way, Brexit becomes a little more farcical. Has a major nation ever embarrassed itself so comprehensively before without actually starting and losing a war?  
Never underestimate the stupidity of #Brexit or its capacity to fool the deluded. 
This is my #FBSIParty I support Scottish Independence & am calling for a second referendum. I am looking to connect with others who agree. Please:  1 Like 2 Retweet 3 Follow I will follow back Copy this tweet to your own. #ScotRef #IndyRef #IndyRef2 
#Brexit is a reflection of the UK's economic & industrial decline.  It's a need for someone to blame for countries like Germany outperforming us in all those things we used to be good at. Yet the guilty ones are right here. It's the Tory & Labour parties who failed us not the EU 
Start with crushing Brexit. That is their Totemic victory. Lose that and they are back to square 1Allow it and they move to square 2There won't be a permanent Labour Government to stop them doing that. Occasionally Torys will be in power to facilitate them like they did so far 
The FT #Brexit story about #DeutscheBank shifting half it's Euro clearing to Frankfurt is a prime example of "over-egging the pudding".@wallaceme explains there are no jobs lost, merely a shift in functionality.#SkyPapers 
Brexit irony: since Withdrawal Agreement will inevitably lead to high profile cases, ECJ may have *more* influence/prominence in UK politics/policy after Brexit... 
Mrs Gove is either on drugs or a comedian is operating a parody; 'power to account'  
The Brexit own goals keep coming...Deutsche Bank shifts half clearing from London to Frankfurt -  via @FT 
Dear Peeps!FORGET @DNC-Media POLLING!Polling is BROKEN.Only 10% of those called pick up the phone, and those that do sometimes lie about their political leanings.#Brexit and Trump in 2016 proved the silent majority exists, and polling is neither scientific nor accurate. 
Newspaper headlines: 'Brexit food crisis fury' and 'Welsh wonder'  
I said this 9 months ago, but worth repeating again. There are those who know a lot about Mercer/Putin and the dark foreign money behind #Brexit. Some have come forward and their lives are better. It's not too late to do the right thing. But you're running out of time. 
The BBC's idea of balance on newsnight or #BBCqt is to have one Tory &.one Blairite with the debate narrowed to issues like Brexit or immigration.And of course when they have a real socialist on then to compensate, they'll have 3/4 extra Tories on during the next few shows 
The Hawks have confirmed that there is an ongoing investigation involving British businessman and Brexit financier Arron Banks and his former business associate, Chris Kimber; and has escalated the investigation to its head office.  
Good thread on WTO and post-Brexit tariff-rate quotas kerfuffle.My take: lots of noise from countries also entering into bilateral negotiations with the EU/UK. Can be bought off there. (Which is, I think, a reason the noise is being made in the first place.)  
In NINE days (on 8/7), Missouri has a labor-organized veto referendum over the new "Right to Work" law. This is a big one.If you can canvas or phone bank, AFLCIO lists dozens of events: SEIU also invites sign ups to phone bank:  
A systematic debunking of the scaremongering over Northern Ireland & #Brexit.Clip 1/3: Mark makes the point that the faux threat over NI's place in the UK actually breaches the Good Friday Agreement#SkyPapers 
Final Say: More top-level support for a Brexit deal referendum as @JustineGreening MP backs a #PeoplesVote.'The difficult truth is that the prime minister’s Chequers deal is already dead. It’s time we stopped pretending otherwise.' 
Just how much damage to the UK economy are @theresa_may and @jeremycorbyn prepared to watch happen before they let the people decide if they want to pull the plug on #Brexit? #PeoplesVote 
Seriously, bro, STAY DOWN!Poll methodology is BROKEN!Only 10% of the public answers poll callers, and it's been proven that many don't answer correctly.Poll credibility was LOST with #Brexit and Trump in 2016. It will never recover.GIVE IT UP!  
This is a MUST VIEW.  IEA “think tank” offering companies access to ministers to pursue corporate interests, &reduce environmental standards post Brexit.  
Yep Mark Wallace the wild economic forecasts were by the 'Economist for Brexit' as this FT analysis shows. The Remain forecasts are coming true. #SkyPapers 
When I worked as a pharmacist we always had medicine shortages, Post Brexit there are many non EU countries with high standards that we can buy from.  
Dear @theresa_may This is a message from the common- sense citizens of the UK. The law has declared the Brexit Ref. Illegal. Regardless of whether Leave or Remain broke the law our country must not enter into the most crucial decision since the War based on fraud. 
In the beginning when the brexit vote went against the government it was believed that the population being thick f*ckers it would be easy to con them out of Brexit.  Two years later the people are now more switched on than government and are not going to be conned. 
Nobody has taken responsibility for any of it: blatant lies, blatant law-breaking. Remember: no-one will take responsibility for Brexit either. No-one will ever be held to account. ENDS  
#Brexit dominated tonight, but @wallaceme sees the leaked #NoDeal contingency 'planning' as Project Fear 2.0.Has Downing St gone back on their "No Deal is better than a Bad Deal" policy?#SkyPapers Clip 1/2. 
Breaking - Undercover filming by @UE shows who Brexit supporting think tank the IEA are working for. Clue: it isn’t you. Please RT  
Rightwing UK pro-Brexit think tank, the Institute of Economic Affairs has been offering ministerial access to potential US donors. IEA Director General Mark Littlewood was filmed in a sting offering Brexit influence via Michael Gove, Boris Johnson & David Davis #BrexitScandal 
SNP MP calling for UK-wide bid for MOD support ship, which is ONLY possible outside of EU rules.At present, Theresa May’s plans would keep the UK in these EU rules even after Brexit and any implementation phase.  
Theresa May accused of taking 'kamikaze' approach to no deal Brexit to force through her Chequers plan  
If there’s a “no deal” Brexit, millions of Britains will quickly  starve to death as supplies of Camembert & Champagne are disrupted. Meanwhile millions more will walk the streets carrying untreatable plague while huge swarms of locusts darken the skies. (Source: HM Treasury). 
This is another excellent piece from ⁦@IanDunt⁩ Not one Brexit commentator writes stuff like this. It’s like they have no grasp of the subject at all. You would think there would be one..  
Hey @WallaceMe this was "Project Fear" during the EU ref campaign... Whereas the UK economy is really tanking, over 2% smaller than it would be had we not voted for the Brexit catastrophe. #SkyPapers@FleetStreetFox @SkyNewsSarah 
Reminder for those who think Ireland needs to pipe down about Brexit: we’re having to stockpile drugs too, so thanks.  
Apart from her backer, the main 'dark force manipulating Brexit', or trying to, is Gina Miller herself.When the people voted for it, she demanded Parliament overrule them.When Parliament voted for it, she demanded the people overrule it.Anti-democratic malignancy on steroids.  
More Brexit unravelling as plans are reportedly prepared for the Army to deliver emergency food, fuel & medicines should we crash out of the EU without a deal. Has there ever been such disaster planning, moving towards implementation in peacetime?  
#skypapers Mark Wallace being true to type & being economical with the truth. Ireland is not part of Schengen, so incorrect to say there is no control over people entering the country from the EU (and, by implication, Northern Ireland). Why can’t Brexit supporters be honest? 
Can we call in with questions about brexit Andrew ? If so I’ll be on the phone with a series of questions for you to answer ( I trust you’ll be up to speed with replies to my concerns )  
Rightwing thinktank the Institute of Economic Affairs has a new digital manager.And guess what?It's Darren Grimes of BeLeave/Vote Leave, who committed serious breaches of electoral law during the #Brexit campaign.Small world, the #BrexitSyndicate. 
Taoiseach admits Ireland is stockpiling drugs & making “contingency plans” to ensure access to medicines in event of ‘no deal’ #brexit  
The Conservative government either have no plan for a no deal Brexit OR they have a plan and do not want to tell us.Either one is a disaster for British democracy.A no deal Brexit would ruin our economy and cause instability in Ireland. It’s *worse* than a bad deal.  
Posted for the millionth time because Karl Wallinger, 30 fucking years ago said every fucking thing I feel about this stupid catastrophuck cliff that we’re ambling over like deranged lemmings. I don’t want to sail with this ship of fools. #brexit 
Every supermarket trolley will have two dodgy wheels post Brexit. 
Every so often I think “well, at least the more serious Brexiters are thinking properly about how to make Brexit work”, and then they reveal their plans and it’s like when Herb Powell unveiled Homer Simpson’s design for a car. 
Do you ever get the feeling that Tories are only interested in selling absolutely everything & everyone’s future in one giant Brexit scam, to hell with being a government, it’s all about personal profit? I do.  
Another devastating #Brexit concession disclosed on the front of tomorrow’s @thetimes UK citizens living in the EU will have to abide by ECJ rulings on their rights, but EU citizens will avoid UK courtsThis breaks a key component of May’s manifesto & Lancaster House speech 
Sensible points being made by @halfon4harlowMP on @BBCWestminHour - one sided attacks on Leave campaign by @ElectoralCommUK and @CommsCMS looks like Remain establishment attempting to undermine the referendum result. 
Theresa May accused of trying to panic MPs, the public and businesses about the consequences of "no deal" in order to force through her soft Brexit Chequers plan:  #BrexitBetrayal 
All this talk of rationing post hard-brexit; the only things I would be happy to see rationed are fbpe zealots who gratefully accepted the challenge to damage Labour enough to enable a hard brexit, and Tories in positions to effect people’s lives. Can happily do with less of both 
If the French suggested putting up billboards in Britain warning against the consequences of Brexit, Steve Baker would go apoplectic. So why does he think the UK should be putting up billboards across the Continent warning of the consequences of no deal? 
I am embarrassed to my core to be in any way associated with this pitiful nonsense. Literally everything we have seen since June 2016 shows that if any side is actually preparing for Brexit it’s EU27. And yet here we are with our sodding patronising bloody billboards. 
Frank Field is a man of principle - unsurprisingly there is no place for such a man in the Corbyn led Labour Party @frankfieldteam @labour #Brexit  
- 8 in 9 people reject the PM's Brexit deal- The EU have rejected it- She softens it to get a Brexit deal and she's toast- She goes for 'no deal' and the country will revolt- She's stuck- Soon, a #PeoplesVote will be the way out- We must use every ounce of energy to win it 
Another Brexit triumph  
Institute of Economic Affairs offered a potential US agribusiness donor the chance to influence a report on Michael Gove's "green #Brexit" - and maybe dinner with Gove.Thus is our democracy & our environment bought, sold & trashed. 
I know there are some people in the EU who would find it "funny" if brexit leads to chaos or just don't care what happens to the UK. But there is nothing worse that can happen to us than a proud and important neighbour being devastated and looking for any way to survive. #brexit 
If #Brexit is overturned, then people will be angry.Block #Brexit - Block #democracy  We elect politicians to deliver what we voted for.You ignore the electorate at your peril.#Brexit #Conservatives #BrexitBetrayal 
A No Deal Brexit should not be considered by the UK, anymore than the amputation of a leg should be considered to treat a cold, says @GuitarMoog, former UK negotiator in the European Union. 
First Brextremists demanded Government made clear it was prepared for no deal. Now it’s all part of Project Fear 2. They want billboards erected across EU instead (PS: the EU calculated the impact of a no deal Brexit being 10 times greater in UK long ago)  
If the people decide to dump Brexit, then that *is* democracy.If this government force through a Brexit that does not have public support- then that is *not* democracy.You cannot conflate Brexit with democracy. That is to misunderstand the essence of democracy. 
After Brexit, will there be rationing?- Yes: 13%- No: 7%- I’m trying to escape the UK: 80%Via Opinium (Jul 29) 
The 6 steps of a Brexit coup, happening right before your eyes#StopBrexit#PeoplesVote 
There is the PeopleThere are the the PoliticiansThe divide is obvious and devastating over BrexitIf they won't respect OUR will we need to force change.  
Brexit disaster porn is getting pretty extreme. The plague, four horsemen and biblical floods are all about to visit upon the dumb voters of (Ex)Great Britain if you read the newspapers. 
PLEASE RT. It makes me boiling mad to hear BBC and Channel4 News talking about "Fake News" when they have displayed so much bias themselves recently. Their coverage on Trump and the Referendum has been truly shocking. #Liberty #TheirNewsNotMine 
Tonight in the @FT - Deutsche Bank moves half its clearing from London to Frankfurt “ahead of Brexit” @peoplesvote_uk #FBPE 
I love this guy. Talking about a referendum on the final deal: "I don't see what's undemocratic about having a vote". At the end of the day, for all the complex arguments, that's what it boils down to. 
The Telegraph reports that Theresa May is stoking fears about a clean Brexit to push through her pathetic Chequers plan. Totally irresponsible, but the good news is that nobody with any common sense is falling for it!Support us at  
Farage ACCEPTS that Brexit could lower food standards and be bad for British farmers.  
First we had 'no, not that kind of Brexit', now we've got 'no, not that kind of no deal'. Won't deny there has been degree of grim satisfaction watching the penny drop  
Ruth Dudley Edwards, whose friends include the UFF-supporting Lionel Shriver & disgraced criminal Conrad Black, beats a drum here for little englander nationalism while getting her facts wrong on the Irish border & post brexit UK flights. Top class "journalist"  
If your voting for anyone else tonight apart from jack and dani ‘Because everyone’s voting for them’ your the reason brexit happened #LoveIsland 
Sick to death of disingenuous twats complaining that anyone highlighting the dire implications of no-deal Brexit is being negative or weakening our 'leverage'. It's clear as fucking day it would be a disaster. Everyone involved knows that. It's important the British public do too  
Defeating Brexit is the only way to save Britain.  Appeasement is not an option any longer. The evidence against Brexit is now too strong.  #StopBrexitSaveBritain 
Former director general of the WTO on Brexit, frictionless trade and borders  
BREAKING: BRITISH ARMY SUGGESTS UK RESIDENTS WATCH 2013 DOCUMENTARY 'WORLD WAR Z' TO PREPARE FOR POSSIBLE HARD BREXIT  
YAAAAAAAAAASSSSSSSSSS Black Twitter, Fiat 500 Twitter and Far East Twitter we did it!!!! Alex is out!!!! A more successful negotiation than Brexit #LoveIsland 
Remember when the government kept all the brexit plans under wraps because they "didn't want to show their hand" rather than because "people will shit themselves" if they actually found out what they voted for? Halcyon days 
Project Fear Latest: #Brexit to Ground Planes, End Sandwich Trade, Cause ‘Super-Gonorrhoea’ Epidemic  
"Alarm Bells" should be ringing throughout the U.K. the Tories intend to force through a "No Deal Hard Brexit" The Stock Piling of Food and Medicine and the Army On Standby? They have taken over full control of the U.K. and will soon call a "State Of Emergency" 
I'm the guy who's always banging on about Nazis just waiting to spring out of the linen cupboard.I'm now also the bloke telling you to put that aside for a minute & see the more pressing danger in a government leading us towards possible civil unrest during Brexit. 
And I'll repeat for the billionth time ... That's "American Sugar Refining" backing Brexit... not "British" Tate and Lyle sugars... which is essentially just a brand name 
So let's see...The EU will collapse if we vote leaveNOGerman car manufacturers wiil save us.NOWe'll get a great deal from the USANOOur Commonwealth will back us.NOWTO will be fineNO#Brexit will be easy peasy & we'll all be better offNO#FinalSay #Remain anyone? 
Brexit is hardly short of idiots, cheats, liars, incompetents, malice, foolhardiness, deceit, greed, spite and selfishness.But right at the pinnacle of the idiocy there is a large seat occupied by the enormous arse that is Digby Jones.  
London loses half of Deutsche Bank’s clearing operation.Brexit keeps on producing dividends for Britain, from the lowest growth rate in Europe to the potential decimation of the City of London. Take a bow @DanielJHannan @BorisJohnson @KateHoeyMP @DavidDavisMP @LiamFox 
Steve Baker, former Brexit minister: ‘I am deeply concerned that the communications strategy is discrediting no-deal in order to force Chequers through. It would  be inexcusable to panic the public and markets to simply deliver an undesirable deal.’ 
Telegraph splash:* PM accused of taking a ‘kamikaze’ approach to no deal Brexit by deliberately highlighting the negative consequences for UK*  Cabinet ministers push to include the consequences of a no deal Brexit for EU in official papers 
Theresa May had a strong hand to play against the EU when we voted for Brexit but has chosen not to.  May doesn't really want to leave the EU and is determined to tie us in so we have no benefits from leaving.  She is siding with the EU to stop a real Brexit happening. #SackMay 
UK buys 55% of its sugar from UK beet producers. American Sugar Refining (which owns Tate & Lyle sugars brand) backed Brexit and wants foreign grown cane sugar imported into the UK without tariffs. That benefits American big sugar and some overseas interests. But not UK farmers.  
NZ Beef/Lamb producers register “absolute opposition” to last week’s published UK/EU WTO schedules/ carve up of tariff quotas - will NZ Government go with its farmers on this and block progress on UK’s post-Brexit position at WTO?  
Tomorrow's front page: Edinburgh festivals are advised to urgently start work on “Plan B” in case of hard Brexit  
Every single article I read makes me fear for the future of democracy in the UK, banning reporting of stockpiling, talk of introducing army after Brexit, never mind the Dark Money and attempt to weaken the powers of the devolved parliamentary system. We need to get out of there 
*Puts down drink**Stands up**Takes off jacket**Removes earrings*“You think you can tell me you voted for Brexit and I’m just going to laugh? You and me. Outside. Now.” 
US cash for access to #Brexit #Tory ministers - yes of course, that’d be Gove, Fox, Johnson, Davies er al. Brilliant work by @UE Perhaps the #BBC may think again about platforming right wing think tanks such as the #IEA 
"I’ve lost count of the number of MPs, including senior ministers, who have approached me to say I was right to call for a second referendum. There’s more support in parliament than people think."- @JustineGreening MPKeep campaigning for a #PeoplesVote: 
Finally a Brexiter who can present a true, concise account of Brexit.  
spread this like wildfire. danny dyer is a #RemainerNow; any other Leave voters brave enough to speak out against Brexit?  
BBC News - Blue badge parking permits to cover 'hidden disabilities' in England . What the BBC doesn’t mention is that the scheme is a European initiative and U.K. permits will no longer be valid in the EU should we leave. Stop Brexit. #FBPE 
If the village idiots at the Institute of Economic Affairs are truly influencing Brexit, we're lost: once the sick man of Europe, now officially led by the thick men of Europe  
I've just heard Liberals on the media say we're all a product of our own environment.My question is. Why did 17.4 million from all areas of UK & different environments come together as 1 & vote for Brexit? Because we all love our Country & want it to be free & independent again. 
After #Brexit motorways will be closed to civilian traffic. To facilitate movement of troops, food, fuel, ammunition, weapons and essential supplies.#NoDealBrexit #NoDealSurvival 
People aren't born racists, they learn it and in Britain the best teachers of xenophobia are the Daily Mail, Sun and Tory Party. #Brexit  
A caller who voted leave believes a second referendum would keep Britain within the European Union - and he'd vote to remain. 
Escaping EU rights and regulations to sell off influence to the highest US bidder. This is what Brexit has always really been about. This grubby band of charlatans should be stripped of its charitable status tomorrow. 
1: Jacob Rees-Mogg's father's notion of the 'Sovereign Individual'. 2: Charles Tannock MEP reporting on the extreme ambitions of the Tory Brextremists. It would seem that the Brextremists are seeking to carry out the program outlined by William Rees-Mogg.#Brexit #StopBrexit 
You want access to ministers?You want a deal post #Brexit?-A UK Think-Tank at work Tomorrow’s Guardian  
No Deal Brexit will lead to draughts, floods, the return of the plague, locust invasions, your inability to remember first names, a volcano on Ben Nevis, the disappearance of written language, the resumption of The War of the Roses, unsatisfactory sex and your face will melt away 
This undercover investigation is a MUST READ. American business interests plan to use Brexit to lower British standards and protections, and right-wing ministers are fully signed up.  Spread the word. 
This doesn't say much for you as a politician Eddie, stick to what you do best. Your statement: "We had a referendum where the right wing said yes we should quit" shows how little you understand about the British public. Not all who want to Leave are right-wing. Wise up mate.  
We’re 100 days from the 2018 midterm elections in the US. The vote will be a referendum on Donald Trump and the Republican majority in Congress. Here’s where the race stands now.Follow the latest from now to election day with our campaign tracker:  
Guys just getting last minute advice before the week starts (for a friend).So this whole #Brexit #Stockpiling thing:What are the essentials I’m gonna need and can I get them @sainsburys ?I know the government says they’ve got this and to trust them butWell...You know... 
If you believe there is going to be food shortages because of Brexit your brain damage is so severe you cannot be saved. 
For anyone still thinking a no deal is an ok #Brexit outcome, some sobering reading  via @prospect_uk 
We should have demolished all the #Brexit lies by now, says @Jon_Danzig in his wake-up call to the #Remain movement. We’ve squandered two years since the #EUReferendum by not tackling head-on the lies that led to Brexit winning. Please share his blog.  
You can't stop Brexit through a referendum, you must address the problems that caused it or else Britain will be at perpetual war with itself.  
BREAKING NEWS: There is no such thing as 'liberal elite'. It's a bullsh*t term made up by those who want to turn #Brexit into a class war.Don't let them.#PeoplesVote 
Gary Lineker under fire over Brexit: ‘We need a second referendum on Lineker’  
“I’ve lost count of the number of MPs... who have approached me to tell me that I was right to call for a second referendum. There’s more support in parliament than people think” This bodes well for a #PeoplesVote. Let’s keep up the campaign. It’s working 
* Brexit Means Brexit* Red, White & Blue Brexit* Adequate Food Brexit* Don’t Tell Anybody What Brexit Means Because It’ll Make Them Shit Themselves & Change Their Minds Brexit 
Letters: "With the 'Tory leadership challenge Brexit' in play for the last two years, Scotland now has the only functional parliament left in the UK, and should prepare for a significant increase in migration from England"  
This piece seems to me to set out in a fair and balanced way the risks to insulin supply in the U.K. post Brexit. In sum: though firefighting may work it’s all rather risky. FAO @bernardjenkin and others airily dismissing the issue or blaming it on the EU 
Into the pub I go with treaty friends and there's article 50 at the bar, "just leave him they all whisper," I agree.Article 50 drunk of course, then swings for me misses hits @DowningStDeclar and shouts "@treaty1921 isn't your real Da!" Then falls off his stool. Typical Brexit 
Vote Leave facebook ad in referendum, it being a well known fact that the European Union invented Spanish matadors  
We apologise to all those who think Brexit food shortages have affected Lidls in Inverness by the empty shelves....It was us wot done it...  #StockingUpOnSkye 
My favourite food writer on why Brexit provides the perfect ingredients for a national food crisis 
"Never in over 50 years of working life have I seen the U.K. facing such an abject future," former Lloyd's of London chairman says of Brexit  
Who is this gobshite? #brexit  
This summer we will be holding rallies across the UK to show why we need a #PeoplesVote on the final #Brexit deal.Catch us over the coming weeks in #Bristol, #Edinburgh, #Newcastle, #Cambridge, #Cardiff, #Liverpool, and #Birmingham. Then a huge march in #London on October 20th. 
Breaking:Prof. Brian Cox discusses Clean Brexit:'Of course, without a proper deal with EU, the future of Gravity across the UK cannot be certain. It might just disappear. Wales might just float up and away on 30/3/19. And that's a big worry'Prof Cox is sponsored by EU.  
So many of those don’t-call-me-racist Brexiters who maintained fervently they voted #Brexit to redress some perceived democratic deficit and fight for the integrity of the democratic process, are suddenly so very relaxed about electoral law being broken and outside interference. 
Scotland can be so much better than UK Brexit Scotland in a better Union #indyref2 #DissolveTheUnion #AUOB #SNP 
This idea of food and medicine rationing post Brexit enforced by the army on behalf of the government? Two words-Grenfell Tower.The government handling (or lack thereof) of that should tell you EXACTLY who will get priority in a UK wide crisis. 
Clever Momentum strategy to target Brexit supporting non-core group positive MPs first, getting naive Blairites cheering along and setting a precedent.Those same Blairites won’t be cheering so much when they realise what they’ve done is set the course for their own dismissal. 
Hold a referendum #AwfullyBritishWaysToBreakUp 
"If UK voters had been similarly informed about the importance of the EU, as is now happening, it is likely they would have voted to reject Brexit"  
Now we are being threatened with starvation if we leave without a deal  with the military being put on standby, ready to feed the elderly when the food runs out. (brexit to blame obviously). If the EU is prepared to starve us then bollocks to them, we're better off out. 
The Institute of Economic Affairs is working with US business interests – including agribusiness donors - to push for a US-UK trade deal that scraps environment and food standards post-Brexit  #IEAtapes 
Sadly, Paul Dacre will be remembered as a man who was wrong about the internet, and wrong about Brexit. Ultimately, too, an Establishment journalist - and that is the worst thing that can be said about a journalist.  
THIS!! was talking to a Brexiter today who was complaining that the Brexit deal we're looking at getting with the EU is 'worse than Remaining.' OF COURSE IT IS, what did you expect, that's why we're still campaigning to REMAIN!!  
If Remainers really want to stop #Brexit then don't demand a 2nd ref, but a real investigation into Arron Banks, Nigel Farage, Boris Johnson and others as well as Russian involvement in the ref with the possibility of criminal trials at the end with real jail time for the guilty. 
Breaking:David Attenborough announces perpetual winter if no Brexit Deal.'Nature will protest ' he said 'Winter will not end, plants will not flower, locusts will eat the land, leaves will not sprout Birds will not fly.  The end of the World'Sir David is sponsored by EU  
Final results are in for the @royalwelshshow #Brexitometer and the views of the Welsh #farming community are clear. It's not going well and we need a #PeoplesVote@WelshLibDems #Brexit #FBPE 
A no-deal Brexit would ground British lorries trying to enter Europe to a halt, said freight chief James Hookham—“The thing that really upsets our members is when these concerns are just dismissed by politicians as trivial or insignificant” 
EU sends Theresa May back to the drawing board on trade, with just 12 weeks until a Brexit deal is meant to be signed  
If you want real #BrexitEmail your mp & chairmanTell them how you feel about #BrexitBetrayalInsist on updates on how they’re representing you Tell your friends & family to do the sameDON’T GIVE UPFind your MP:  
Labour MPs in favour of Brexit are being removed. Labour MPs who are Jewish are being intimidated and bullied.Mention rape gangs and you get sacked and your life threatened. You are just getting a taste of the future under a Labour government. Careful how you vote! 
Deutsche Bank has moved almost half its euro clearing activities from London to Frankfurt, in the latest sign of European cities winning financial business from the UK ahead of Brexit.Taking Back Control works both ways.  
Some might say a committee entirely composed of Remain MPs might have a vested interest in discrediting anything to do with Brexit ?  
So there's good news and there's bad news for those worried about Brexit. The good news is that Digby Jones disagrees with Jacob Rees-Mogg that the benefits of Brexit will be 50 years in the making. The bad news is that he thinks it will be 100 years.  
Am I boring all my friends and family about Brexit? Yes, definitely. But, it has to be done.Many who voted Remain regard Brexit as inevitable. It isn’t inevitable, it doesn’t have to happen.The 2016 Referendum was just one chapter in our democracy’s story, not the end of it. 
Former WTO Chief: Ireland should "prepare for the worst" and may need emergency aid from the EU if there is a 'no-deal' Brexit...And he said in the event of no-deal Brexit the idea that there would be no border on the island of Ireland is "pie in the sky".  
Ah so this is why IEA/Littlewood published long rebuttal blog the other week. IEA boss saying they are influencing Brexit and that take money from industries who know their ‘research’ will chime w/expectations. Oh, and IEA is still a charity btw  
#FrankField hits back after being lambasted by his #CLP for backing #Brexit, pointing out he's always voted against further EU integration & "for most, if not all, of those votes I did so alongside #JeremyCorbyn & #JohnMcDonnell."  Presumably #Corbyn will be next for deselection? 
2016: "Tell the people we shall guide them to the sunlit uplands of Brexit."2018: “Tell the people nothing otherwise they’ll lose their shit”  
Rightwing UK thinktank 'offered ministerial access' to potential US donorsSaid they were in ‘the #Brexit game’Shocking By @Robert_Booth 
It's difficult to conceive a more inept and irresponsible government prepared to allow this to happen..."Army 'on standby to deliver food and medicine' if no Brexit deal is reached". #politics 
There are 36 states and U.S. territories holding gubernatorial elections this year and these races could be the biggest referendum of all on Pres. Trump’s presidency.Some of the key races to watch:  #18for18 
I went back in my time machine to reverse Brexit, but the closest I got was this. Sorry.  
Theresa May  has been accused of Brexit “abandonment” by a top QC who says her Chequers deal means that UK courts will still be ruled by the European Union. #MayMustGo 
Frank Field (pictured here coming under attack by his Labour colleagues for supporting Brexit) has been a lifelong campaigner against poverty and is one of the few MPs who speaks the language of the working-class. Unbelievable that local activists should wish to deselect him.  
All Conservative & other MP’s/ Parliament need to stop it in that case. If this is known, then there needs to be action. To not act is to be complicit in what happens to this country & it’s people. It is time for a vote of no confidence. #VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw #Brexit  
If UK where to hold another referendum then the two questions should be true. UK must be honest on the ballot paper.Vote A. If you want UK to a small State within the Federal EU Rebublic. Vote B. If you want UK to be a free independent country. 
Ben Jennings on ads during the Brexit campaign - Political Cartoon Gallery in Putney  
Theresa May is ‘abandoning Brexit’ with latest plan as EU will rule the UK – warns expert  
Surely we should be able to agree that if the government is considering civil contingency plans as a result of their policy then they need to change their policy? An EEA Efta #Brexit would avoid the chaos and nobody need be put at risk. 
The IEA’s director told an undercover @UE reporter that it’s in “the Brexit influencing game”.Oh dear. Could and should have big implications for the thinktank world – time for donor transparency?  
BREAKING: A leading think tank brokered access to ministers for US donors looking to influence Brexit #IEAtapes 
Educational charity and think tank, the Institute of Economic Affairs arranged access to Brexit minister for would be US agri-donor and told investigator posing as lobbyist for US farm investor it has "absolutely no problem" facilitating business interests 
Brexit is like when you lose your phone and you accuse everyone around you of stealing it before you discover that it was actually in the bottom of your bag but you’re too proud to say anything so you alienate your friends with your false accusations. 
'The IEA chief was recorded suggesting potential US donors could fund and shape substantial content of research commissioned by the thinktank and that its findings would always support the argument for free-trade deals.' 
Brilliant from @LeaveEUOfficial No food, no medicine, “super-gonorrhoea”, and the army on the streets... Brexit Derangement Syndrome is going into overdrive!   
While some leading Brexiteers will still have a chance to grab EU citizenship after Brexit, this might be our only hope...  
When are sneering, arrogant, smug, self-satisfied lefties who have nothing but contempt for working class Brexit voters going to check their own privilege?  
Of course this election is largely a referendum on the failures and lawlessness of your former boss — the real question is who has the guts to tell the truth about what is actually going on in America.  
Gary Lineker under fire over Brexit: ‘We need a second referendum on Lineker’  
WATCH: Farage BRILLIANTLY ridicules plan to deploy the army under no deal Brexit chaos  
Remain and our conspiring government are really thick. They are now claiming that because May cannot deliver on her brexit promises (fingers down throat) there will have to be another referendum. Why if they vote leave again she still won´t be able to deliver. Kick her out. 
NO TO ANY BREXIT EXTENSION.We MUST leave on March 29th, deal or no deal.  
You wait for ages for a #Brexit bus then about a hundred turn up at once.  
Labour has started the purge of the #BrexiteersLabour now has ZERO credibility whenever party apparatchiks claim to respect the result of the EU referendum 
Final Say: More than 1.4m additional young people could vote in new Brexit referendum. Demographic shift could tip the scales to #StopBrexit in a fresh #PeoplesVote poll, MPs say. 
Well it's like this see. Nothing is more dear to me than my insulin dependent nephew, so either I believe the EU notices to stakeholders or take the word of a pack of cousin marrying Toryboy mouthbreathers who six months ago didn't even know what a non tariff barrier was.#Brexit 
Spot on. See also my recent blogposts on the same topic: 'What will the impact of no deal planning be?'  and 'Could no deal preparations shift opinions on Brexit?'  
RAF Red Arrows at #BrayAirShowSee em now while they’re still allowed in Irish Air Space#Brexit  
And that's the problem. It's so big people can't process it. It's so big it sounds like hyperbole."Of course they'd never let that happen."Oh, mate. When this started, our own Brexit secretary hadn't a clue how EU trade works.They DO NOT KNOW HOW TO DRIVE THIS THING. 
One of the best things about the EU was knowing that if ever anything really bad happened you could up sticks and move to another EU country.  It was like an insurance policy.The irony of Brexit is that as we  the UK up we also imprison ourselves! #StopBrexit NOW! 
Any single Brexit issue, in isolation, would be headline news for weeks.I mean, remember when New Labour put a few pence of extra tax on fuel? Lorries blockaded the roads.Remember foot and mouth disease? It was semi-apocalyptic.Brexit is those to the power of a hundred. 
1. The people vote for Brexit2. Gina Miller: The decision must be made by Parliament3. Parliament accepts the vote4. Gina Miller: The decision must be returned to the people#NotDesperate #NotABadLoser 
The thing with Brexit is, there are SO MANY catastrofuck issues involved - trade, food supply, medicines, aircraft, farm workers, subsidies, customs checks, Ireland, Euratom, Galileo, citizens' rights, roaming - that people tune out.Just ONE of those should cause outrage. 
Not telling me is going to make me not panic? Fuck that, we are at Brexcon 3 and I see no reason why we will not be at Brexcon 2 by October. You have a duty to tell the electorate the way it is Mrs May @theresa_may, what we are getting for your Brexit means Brexit, warts and all. 
Indonesia, with the largest economy in south east Asia and the 16th largest in the world, wants a bilateral free trade agreement with the UK when we leave the EU.So does Thailand. And the Philippines, Malaysia, Vietnam, Singapore, and Cambodia. We must have a clean Brexit. 
Of course, next year Geraint Thomas won't be able to compete in the Tour de France because of Brexit, as he will lose his freedom of movement. 
I don’t “dis” anybody my friend. The voters have been fed bad info (possibly by Russia, NY Times) which half the pols who supported it have now admitted. BREXIT IS A DISASTER. For the UK, for Ireland, for the entire Western World. A 2nd Referendum will yield a different result.  
NEXT LEVEL: Years and years of unwavering Brexit support by the Daily Mail has brought us here; where any story outlining the negative aspects of leaving the EU is met with ridicule, disbelief and a pathological belief that any outcome which doesn’t deliver unicorns is fake news.  
Andy Davey on preparing for a no deal Brexit - Political Cartoon Gallery in Putney  
Of course in reality #Brexit gruel shortages will wholly  the fault of immigrants because everything always is  
It will also mean learning to cook a whole new  #Brexit cuisine as set out by Mrs May's #BREXIT COOK BOOK which sets out recipes for the lucky few like chicken Chlorivine and  lots of gammon recipes  
I think Sarah Vine ought to look at the paper she works for, which is undoubtedly the biggest source of fake news, as well as fascist hate and bile, in the UK. She might also want to enlighten us about her husband's chat with Steve Bannon.#brexit #PeoplesVote #StopBrexit 
I'll just leave this here for you to think about....In indyref2 Scotland votes no, our country will cease to exist, it will be a county of England named north Britain, and we WILL become 2nd class citizens in our own country!!!#YouYesYet#indyref2#Referendum#Independence 
Some thoughts. 1) FB undermined our democracy by allowing illegal Brexit/Trump ads. 2) FB will do nothing unless we force them. 3) USA should look to UK to see how we can hold tech to account. 4) Elephant in room is allowing Brexit when Vote Leave cheated  
Fascinating finding of U.K. parliamentary study of Social media and Brexit: RT and Sputnik’s 261 pro-Leave articles got more action on Twitter “than content produced by the two 2 main campaigns for Brexit” @ddknyt 
Gina Miller is now claiming that dark forces manipulated the Brexit vote and there must now be a second referendum to solve the crisis in democracy. The only crisis is among Remainers. They lost. And they won’t accept it. Miller is an anti-democrat and arch hypocrite. 
How the BBC stole the Referendum 
It is not Brexit, Remain, or the EU that has brought us to this point. It is rather what increasingly looks like the most inept Government in modern UK history.A UK government planning for food shortages. Seriously? What have we come to? 
All of the people saying that Brexit will be OK because the Millennium Bug didn't affect anything have actually paid for WinRAR. 
Arron Banks accused an EU citizen of making up the story of a mutual friend leaving Britain. The Brexit vote, of which we know he is a great supporter, is hugely impacting on the lives of 3.6m citizens living in the UK @InLimboBrexit, but he dismisses it as lies  
40 years Brextremists have plotted and schemed. Their dream of 'No Deal' has crumbled before it saw daylight:“People will shit themselves and think they want a new referendum or an election or think the Tory party shouldn’t govern again”#PeoplesVote 
‘Brexit could lead to spread of super-gonorrhoea and other diseases' Dragons will also rule the skies — since there will be no planes in the air. 
The list of crimes and sins committed in this referendum just gets longer and longer, and most MPs still continue to honour it as the "will of the people". Shame on them. 
Arron Banks lying about Soros, who was 13 when the Nazis invaded Hungary. Many people pick up on the antisemitic aspect of this, but what is really important is that Putin fears and loathes Soros for his work promoting democracy in Eastern Europe.#StopBrexit #Brexit #PeoplesVote 
Who’s approach to #brexit to you support the most? #bbcnews 
Lots of recent scaremongering re insulin supplies drying up on a #Brexit no deal. So it's somewhat reassuring that 8 out of 12 products approved by NICE, are from co's OUTSIDE the EU + a spokeswoman from Danish Novo Nordisk (1 more) has assured no change. 
Do Channel 4 @Factcheck do checks on @Channel4?Here's @Channel4News' @OliverJamesKing scaring diabetics for their lives, saying a No Deal Brexit could result in their deaths.Except erm... Insulin is made in the UK, as given away by the name of Wockhardt UK.  
2016: “No downside to Brexit, only considerable upside”2017: “Mad Mad Brexit is Project Fear”2018: “Army on standby for no-deal Brexit emergency”Nobody voted for this shambles. #StopBrexit. 
Thanks to @UKExitBrexit for tweeting this. It's pretty clear evidence that Farage is a Putin tool.Now what was Campbell Bannerman saying about updating the Treason laws :)#StopBrexit #Brexit #PeoplesVote 
You forgot to mention that she lives with a man @michaelgove who helped run a criminal campaign and has been at the forefront of fake news about Brexit for years as @rupertmurdoch spokesman. Must have rubbed off a bit 
On another Forum I asked a Polish guy what they thought about brexit.  This is the reply.  All the polish I know and ones that worked for me were really nice hard working people.  Our engineers were abused a few times when out of town working. I think this is our loss and shame.  
Amazing how pre referendum they told us the EU had hardly any control over the UK, yet now we have voted to leave, they tell us if we actually leave we will run out of food, medicine and planes won’t take off ...... bullshitters then, bullshitters now !!! 
We won't tell you how bad it's going to be. Ignore rumours of stockpiling food & medicine. We don't want to panic you so we'll keep you in the dark. If you knew how bad it'll be you'd want to call off #Brexit, & we can't have that. Keep believing No Deal is better than a Bad Deal 
Possible second referendum is gaining more ground with the latest polls showing a healthy lead to remain in the EU !!...This government has lost all credibility to decide any future for the UK they are a total disaster  !!#FBPE #StopBrexit #StopTories 
The Sunday Times: “Army on standby for Tory No Deal Brexit emergency"Stop voting Tory!! Armageddon is gonna be shit!!! pic.twitter.com/zHkhtGNOm2 
Oh god. There are now 3500+ comments beneath my food Brexit piece. It’s like staring into a chasm of rats eating each other. I’m not getting involved. 
.@oliverjamesking gets called out spreading fake news for #Brexit #ProjectFear. He is shown up, and this is his response.  
Watching Le Tour today and over the last few weeks, the tragedy of Brexit for me personally has been agonising. I have spent my entire adult life enjoying the great gifts of modern European citizenship: education, work, travel, solidarity, peace. I weep for what I am losing. 
If anyone still believes the NHS can survive Brexit, these figs are devastating. After the referendum, no. of EU nurses coming to UK divebombed - and hasn’t recovered. We’re short of 40k NHS nurses. Beds are closed everywhere due to rota gaps. Brexit is devastating patients.  
Britain truly has some of the best in the world.If we can't do well outside the iron grip of EU, its laws, its customs rules, its courts;if Britain can't succeed as an independent nation, who can?#Brexit  
The Brexit Bill bears an uncanny similarity to the 1933 Enabling Act which is what allowed the Nazis to take control with only 28% of the vote in the previous election.This is not scaremongering. Check it yourselves.  
Message to hitherto Unionist Scots: Answer your country's call, have faith in an independent Scotland flourishing within the EU and help us avoid this Brexit apocalypse we didn't vote for. #indyref2 #SNP #Brexit  
.@BorisJohnson said #Brexit would mean we could have our cake and eat it. He didn't say the cake would have to be stockpiled and delivered by the army. Let's have a #PeoplesVote on the final deal. 
British trucks would be blocked from entering Europe under no-deal Brexit, industry leader warns "The thing that really upsets our members is when these concerns are just dismissed by politicians as trivial or insignificant,"#Brexit #PeoplesVote 
My friend @VetDannii brilliantly taking @Nigel_Farage to task for his absolute nonsense. He wasn't aware that the veterinary profession is reliant on EU Nationals, especially in food production and public health roles. This affects food security. He is left speechless. #Brexit  
Martin Howe QC, the Tory pro-Brexit barrister who leads Lawyers for Britain, says May’s claim that the Chequers Plan upholds her Brexit red lines is ‘sophistry at best’; what is worse than her wholesale abandonment of her promises is her denial she has done so. In short,she lies. 
As it's reported the British Army is on standby for a 'no-deal' Brexit, @clivebull asks, what's your reaction to this? 
Just 1 in every 9 people support the Govt's Brexit plan, and now they've decided that 'No Deal' is too terrifying to tell us about.These options cannot be the only things on the table, we support a #PeoplesVote including the option to Remain. 
Will Piers Morgan, Rees-Mogg, Farage and the rest of them actually be handing out the corned beef and insulin rations in the event of a Hard Brexit or will they be insulated from it all in millionaires row somewhere? 
thats 1.4million people who can now vote for or against Brexit  how  can any sane and sensible person deny and disenfranchise these young people so easily, when its their futures hanging on a thread....  - -  
GOOD NEWS: the government is finally prepared for Brexit. BAD NEWS: start stockpiling spam.By @hourlyterrier 
#Remember the referendum when we were told #Brexit was 'going to be wonderful', with 'no downside' because 'we hold all the cards'.Now we're talking about stockpiling #food.If Brexit was a #new make of #car it would feature on Watchdog every week. #PeoplesVote #StopBrexit 
“Brexit provides the perfect ingredients for a national food crisis.When it comes to the UK’s supply chain, preparations for a no-deal scenario are non-existent”  
Happy now hard Brexiteers? Please let public know in plain English @theresa_may @DominicRaab how you plan to deal with all the serious health & care issues identified by @CommonsHealth in the event of no deal, the cost & how this is in any way a ‘Brexit Dividend’  
>Feminists for Islam>Gays for Islam>Women’s March for rights we already have>March for (Give up your guns to the same government we call Hitler) Our Lives>Anarchists against BREXIT#OddThingsToProtest 
If someone had nominated Frank Field for leader of the Labour Party and he'd won the leadership contest, I believe he would have been honest, and campaigned for Brexit. Historically,  Corbyn and Field's voting records on the EU are exactly the same. 
Why does this matter? Cos ultimately it isn’t true to claim that the audience that matters as far as the content of Chequers go is among people who voted Tory in 2017 or Leave in 2016. It is Johnson, Farage and the Brexit press. 
New Blog Post - Demanding Supplies - Supplying DemandThe economic, logistic and social impacts of "stockpiling" for a "no deal" Brexit  
Why aren't all the Brexit fans who have been shouting about "subverting democracy" for 2 years not demanding the EU ref result is annulled? 
I spent 25 years of my adult life listening to Today.I've now decided after their awful Brexit coverage, failure to confront lies with facts, inability to prove about basic Brexit consequences and general partial journalism that I will now boycott them.Will you join me? 
Euro referendum not part of Italian government plans: deputy PM  
I would beg people not to call a no-deal #Brexit 'economic suicide'. Far from being suicide it is much more a case of a criminal gang threatening to push the hostages off the cliff unless its financial demands are met. #StopBrexit #PeoplesVote 
For my buddies on the other side of the  Big Blue Pond, Are you aware of this going on?This link will make the graphic even larger if you need it too:#QAnon #Brexit  
Absurd to keep pretending Brexit is voice of down-trodden.C2+DE youth (18-34) voted Remain by a big margin. A1 over 55s voted Leave.The ‘elites’ story -peddled even by Rees-Mogg is a joke.North England is now more anti-Brexit than south England.Labour is anti-Brexit. 
Campbell, Chukka, Branson, Blair, Major, Lineaker, Soubry, Starmer, Miller, Heseltine, Clark, Osbourne, O’Leary, Oilly Robbins, DRUNKARD, SOROS & EDDIE BLIDDY IZZARD, all want UK 2 remain in EU, if that doesn’t tell U why we should leave, nothing ever will!! #Brexit #WTOBrexit 
I'm pondering a theory. Britons (innate make-doers) were never happier than during WWII and crave the need to Keep Calm And Carry On. Is hurtling towards a beans-hoarding, mustn't-grumble, darn-yer-socks sort of a no deal Brexit some sort of nation-level wish fulfillment? 
"My experience in the EU parliament tells me you either impose yourself or they swindle you. [There is] no objectivity or good faith from the EU side"- Matteo Salvini of Italy on #Brexit talks.Some people say it as it is? When will our politicians learn to speak straight?  
UK’s 3 options: ‘soft’ Brexit; Hard Brexit; No Brexit. “Whichever option UK stumbles into, final outcome now clear: British humiliation.” 
‘No deal’ preferable to Brexit extension, says Liam Fox   
Did the Russians try to swing the #Brexit referendum with illicit, illegal funding? I’ll be asking @DamianCollins MP, chair of the House of @CommonsCMS Select Committee. Next on my @talkRADIO show at 4pm. Join me if you can. 
Theresa May's holiday snaps are even more boring than talking about the mutual recognition of goods standards post-Brexit 
Of course, this is in no way the reason Dyson wants UK to leave the EU. Nor would Dyson be influenced by the fact his business wouldn’t be damaged by a Hard Brexit because he manufactures in the Far East - patriot that he is. #PeoplesVote 
BlimeyMore financial shenanigans in the Referendum!Perhaps we should declare all the Remain votes void?Just saying... 
Asking Ford for permission to hold a "referendum" after he sets your house on fire shows no proof of a political backbone. Where is our "strong mayor" when we need one?  
Somehow I doubt the PM is worried about her insulin suppliesMillions of diabetes patients, including @theresa_may, could be “seriously disadvantaged” by a no-deal Brexit. 'We make no insulin in the UK. We import every drop of it,’ says MHRA chairman 
From the newly formed 'Northern Umbrella: Uniting the North Against #Brexit': "When arguing for Remain, we should not be arguing for going back to the way things were for the #North in 2016.  We should be arguing that we can make the North a better place." 
:Cardiff for EU out and about today engaging people about brexit..... Respect  
UKGov: Let’s get support for the deal we’ll have to backpedal into by scaring the absolute shit out of people over no deal.Population: Holy shit! How could the bastards even talk about allowing this to happen? They’re nuts! Brexit is nuts! Stop it!UKGov: We’ve been rumbled.  
In your view what is in the best interests of the #UK? #Brexit #EUPlease RETWEET POLL after you vote for a larger sample. 
What we are being diverted from:WindrushGrenfellBrexit sagaSteve BannonEsther McVeyBoris Johnson and GoveHomelessnessFood bank shortagesTrumpGaza Gaza GazaTory RacismNHS sell offEverything positive re: the Labour PartyWe mustn't! Its business as usual for JC  
#WILLOFTHEPEOPLE is NO LONGER a legitimate argument in defence of #Brexit.I am still waiting to hear any other argument, that justify the economic, social, political, cultural and environmental damage #Brexit is set to cause.BREXIT - #IsItWorthIt?NO IT BLOODY ISN'T! 
the summary of Brexit is that two dozen rich ideologues have endangered the wealth, health and freedom of 60 million people, to the point where Britain might ration food for the first time since WW2. This is not a sane action. Even if Brexit brought “gains” in 50 years’ time  
A SECOND Brexit referendum is looming, Keep on signing and sharing the #PeopllesVotePetition. 
As someone who 'writes' for the Daily Mail I really don't think you should be mentioning #FakeNews , talking of which, what's your back stabbing Husband planning to do next? Perhaps you could ask him why he lied so much about #Brexit. #potkettleblack 
One very philosophical side effect of Brexit is that it’s raised the question of what is “democracy” more that at any time since Ancient Greece. Can an advisory ref, using psychological warfare techniques on 300,000 swing voters, hijack a nation of 60 million and be democratic? 
I watch Brexit unfold from Germany and can't help but thinking WTF ?!!!  
Our petition to have a #FinalSay on the Brexit deal has reached 360,000. Sign to help us get to 400,000  
"God Help Us" - British Army Readied In Case Of Hard Brexit  
When this is over - I will be ashamed to look back & see the level of divisiveness caused by their desperation - that could've all been avoided by listening to the public in the first place before the referendum. 
Put my piece today together with this from @ShippersUnbound in today’s S Times, re the army being brought in to distribute food if there’s a no deal Brexit and you have the makings of an utter national disgrace.  
We would like to reassure the public that there is absolutely no reason to panic, and that Brexit is in safe hands.We really would. 
Oh for the days when it was all Brussels’ fault! | David Mitchell“When we chose to leave, the EU’s duty of care over our country came to an end. It isn’t supposed to look out for our interests any more”#Brexit  
Why Labour & SNP will face decision-time on supporting a 'people's vote' this autumn, if May brings home a Brexit deal - and why the SNP may find it harder than some expect to fudge any 2nd indy ref call; my latest blog  
“Yes, Leave campaigners were wrong to rush out adverts following the murder of Jo Cox. But if anyone exploited that killing, it was Remainers. They openly used this awful crime to demonise Brexit and Brexit voters.”@Tom_Slater_ on Sky 
'It fails the sniff test!' Anger as Remainer civil servant granted TOTAL CONTROL of Brexit  
The Army is on standby to handle civil emergencies caused by food and medicines shortages in the event of a 'no deal' #Brexit, according to @SkyNews.This madness can't continue. We MUST be given a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal. Please RT! 
Danny Dyer on #Brexit: Why I changed my mind after voting Leave.“What have we voted for, we still don’t know. It’s a f****** travesty" says EastEnders star.The public must have a final say, with an option to stay.#StopBrexit #PeoplesVote #RemainerNow 
The EU has no intention of making any brexit deal because it knows losing its 2nd largest economy spells the end of the EU. They are conspiring with British remainers by means of propaganda to get the democratic vote reversed at any cost. Together they won't let us leave the EU. 
Nobody cares about UK internal politics, or May, but this is what happened; at the back of the British Constitution is a big door, with "Do NOT Open" engraved in large unfriendly letters on it. Brexit has opened that door without making any provision for what would emerge. 
Look around your home for things to barter in event of Brexit. Let's hope you've got something the supermarket wants! And the doctor. #Brexit  
Are you saying, I didn't campaign properly b/c I travelled to 22 cities and towns in 30 days to speak for Remain at the age of 93. What did you do again? #Brexit  
fuck brexit for making me care about trade deals 
I notice that the only people left supporting Brexit are elites, racists & bigots. This is worrying as it is extremely difficult to get those people to change their views. They are unreachable to us now, but thankfully theyre in low numbers. Get on with stopping it!#indyref2 
The army is on standby to help deliver food, medicines and fuels if there are shortages in the wake of a "no deal" #Brexit.A tiny minority wanting to slash their taxes and liberate themselves from regulations are driving us towards this disaster.#FBPE 
Thousands of Brexiteers will not be voting conservative or Labour in the next election already, imagine what will happen if we are cheated out of Brexit!!!  
‘Plucky little panel’ that found the truth about fake news, Facebook and Brexit  
By deciding not to publish information about plans for a no-deal #Brexit the government is once again attacking our democracy. How can people make democratic decisions if they are denied access to such vital information? We are ruled by enemies of democracy.#StopBrexit #FBPE 
We could just, you know, not do #Brexit#JustSaying 
The only reason there is no deal on the table for EU-British trade arrangements is because there has not been a Brexiteer at the helm and a Brexit Cabinet to drive through the process, removing Remaniac civil servant: Total Brexit needs total access to all the levers of power.  
Join us in Edinburgh on 18th August for a rally to demand a #PeoplesVote on the final #Brexit deal. Don't miss out:  
So Farage's reaction to rising racism in America was push the immigration issue harder. Wigmore went along with it; the murder of Jo Cox didn't make them question the morality of spreading hatred and division only made them question if it would still work. 
A few folk pointed out that even the "revert to WTO" Brexit was going to be tricky.Here it begins. Think negotiating with the EU27 was complicated?Try adding in everyone else too.  
Great video offer - thanks! The banner man of Brexit gets owned! Superb structured argument by that lady - and you could see how he physically wilted when proven to be wrong!  Well done 
The British Army is on standby for a 'no-deal' Brexit emergency. @AndrewCastle63 asks: can we classify Brexit as a crisis?  
Must read thread on the weakening civility in the U.K. as a result of  Brexit  
Corporation was terrified during 2014 referendum and many London BBC bosses instinctively  believed that their job was to keep the UK together.  One Nation as their advertising strapline put it. 
Great! No-one will panic now, now that we know the details of Brexit are too scary to disclose to the public.  
Brexit reality...  
The army is on standby to help deliver food, medicines and fuels if there are shortages in the wake of a "no deal" Brexit  
Italy: Five Star Movement Founder Grillo Makes Fresh Push for Euro Referendum  
Just saying like..... and the pound will devalue because of Brexit.  
Govt now forcing non-disclosure agreements on companies assisting with emergency Brexit planningBut this is a democracy and we have a right to know the truth about the #BrexitShitshow no matter how disturbingAnd we have the right to change our minds#PeoplesVote 
A friend tell me he was at an MP's public meeting on Brexit recently where 5 young students made exactly the same point. Were Remain, now firm Leavers.It takes guts to do that, coming from the 'mindless Remainers' demographic with huge peer pressure to conform.  
Clear risks of a botched #Brexit. We need a #PeoplesVote on the final #Brexit deal to let the public decide their future  
EU trying to cheat UK out of Brexit, May should walk away with no deal – Salvini   
Conservative supporters in OPEN REVOLT over Theresa May’s Brexit White Paper  
“We don’t trust all the business experts who say Brexit would hurt the UK, because business experts have been wrong before.”“So who are you relying on to get the country through Brexit?”“Business experts, of course. Duh!” 
Sorry to say Brits, but you have an evil government.It looks like they’re punishing you for #Brexit, by giving you what you don’t want, and don’t need.  
This report, from today, is referring to the Brexit phone app, but it's the same company (uCampaign) behind the Trump app. 
This is a disgrace. The Government is now actively conspiring to withhold from the public the truth about #Brexit #Brexitshambles for fear it will encourage people to change their minds. 
The long knives were out for Jeremy Corbyn  long before Brexit which to set the record straight wasn't lost by him but a Remain campaign run by centrists that were ok with regions hollowed out by de-industrialisation.  
BBC still can't get over the fact that it is in a small out-of-touch bubble which opposes Brexit and Trump.  
Many people are not so fortunate to be able to chose to leave. Many may wish they could but can't, and others don't want to leave their homes. But #Brexit has affected our lives in one way or another making us rethink our life plans. 
The truth is we're leaving with a heavy heart but we're not being chased away. We decided it was best for us to leave. It's not a decision we took lightly though and, yes, it was related to Brexit in so many ways. 
For the past 24 hours myself and @cliodiaspora have been subjected to the most virulent abuse on twitter. All because Tanja tweeted she was sad I was leaving the UK and that my departure was Brexit-related. 
Important to remember. Talk about a 'Brexit food crisis' cannot ignore reality that there's already an epidemic of UK food poverty. The government has already created a society without 'adequate food'.  
Two main parties represent over 80% of the electorate. One cultivates Anti Semitism & changes #Brexit views to suit opinion.The other couldn’t lead her way out of a paper bag & manipulates the electorate to suit her true anti #Brexit views.No wonder people dislike politics  
You wouldn't think it was rocket science but my left brain tells me that logically if any brexit scenario is so grim that HMG can't bring thrmselves to publish it, then #StopBrexit by withdrawing #article50 on the grounds that it's demonstrably in the nation's best interests. 
Ahead of 30 July constitutional referendum in Comoros, @antonioguterres urges respect for rule of law, human rights 
Hey @BBC - Looks like you are now giving high-profile coverage to cheating claims...There was quite a big referendum in the UK with a Leave campaign that might be worth @BBCNews investigating too... It looks like a big story. #StopBrexit 
There seems to a lot of “we built an empire before we joined the EEC and can be great again.” All we need is a bit of ethnic cleansing, suppression, theft and the reintroduction of slavery, and we can look forward to a bright Brexit future! 
I have some advice for you: Travel the country, break bred with people who don't share your viewpoints or fanaticism and try to convince them #Brexit is wrong by fixing their dog eat dog lives with real solutions rather than trolling me.  
All this daft talk about #Brexit giving you the clap, then I just remembered this... #WeGotItCovered  
Q: Why do UK MP's fight so hard to overturn the #Brexit result?A: Because they will actually have to do some work, deliver on manifesto promises, actually be accountable to their electorate, once they no longer have the EU to blame for everything they screw up.#DrainTheSwamp 
The Sunday Times is reporting that the tories have abandoned their weekly updates on what a no deal #Brexit means, they know its going to be a disaster, so they are going to hide the facts from us, @Conservatives are duplicitous bastards, we need #PeoplesVote, come on folks. 
The scientific guide to stockpiling food for a ‘no deal’ Brexit  
I got chatting when the guy got off.They were discussing the advert and talking about the big Gaelic school and how this wasn’t the first time someone heard them speak Gaelic and had a pop at them ! Fuck you brexit and racism 
Tory grassroots in open revolt over Theresa May’s Brexit plan 
Wake up Scotland. Putting your fingers into your ears and watching Love Island doesn’t make the Brexit reality go away. Launch the  lifeboat #Indyref2 
Brexit will allow us to have lower taxes  
Labour's manifesto pledge broken on Brexit no longer is for the many - is now only for the few MP's.  
That's one of the reasons that I voted for Brexit.  
At this time we have 650 Councillors & a Council leader sitting at Westminster. Central Government & the real power lies in Brussels, (unelected) & Westminster pays homage to this power daily. Only Brexit will ensure MPs are actually MPs once more. That's what's at stake here. 
Amelia is an incredible voice against Brexit, against austerity, for migrants rights, environmental rights and all our rights. I urge all Green Party member friends to vote for her to continue her fantastic work as deputy leader!  
The charter of BBC is that it should be politically neutral. For one of it's key presenters and highest paid staff (paid by me & you) to lead a prominent campaign to reverse brexit  should ask serious questions about his part on the pay roll that the public fund.@GaryLineker 
I’m not sure how much clearer the message could be All moves for a second referendum or #Brexit in name only are anti democratic, as clear as dayWe must deliver on Lancaster House & our manifestoAny betrayal will lead to a crisis of democracy  
Jersey was under German rule for 5 years, it’s not surprising the island had no inclination to join the EU! Theresa May is ‘abandoning Brexit’   
Theresa May's Brexit blueprint means Britain will “still be ruled by EU courts”, says European law QC.  
Even Farage acknowledges we probably cannot feed ourselves just like when we needed convoys in the first & second world wars. To have food from outside the UK we will have to have a trade deal in place won't we? Remind me how long does a trade deal take?No #Brexit#PeoplesVote 
Army 'on standby' to handle food and medicines shortages in event of 'no deal' Brexit  
How David Cameron, the then Prime Minister, said how the EU Referendum would work  
Join the Brexit resistance this summer.We need your help to reach people up and down this country to let them know we CAN #ExitfromBrexit.Find out more here: 
1. Suddenly there's talk about disaster socialism. To me this is an equivalence thing from the #leave campaign. And to be clear, if #brexit happens and the capitalist fundamentalists takeover there will be no future socialism, because there will be no elections, no democracy... 
The Irish are sick & tired of the English opining on its rights & obligations as an EU member state. Brexit created this mess so please ⁦stop playing to the English gallery.   
On Broadcasting House, MP Damian Collins - Chair of the House of Commons Culture, Media and Sport committee - explained how disinformation distorted the Brexit referendum. A clear and concise 10-minute summary begins at 5 minutes in....  
No one in the British media denounces the idiocy of Brexit as well as @mrjamesob. “Throbbers, fraudsters, charlatans, spivs and shysters.” 
Quite incredible! Plans to publish No Deal contingency plans have been cancelled because "people will shit themselves & think they want a new referendum or an election or think the Tory Party shouldn’t govern again." Thread with a link to the original Times article.  
I would much rather the referendum was annulled. Quicker, easier, cheaper and safer than voting again.So many wrongs to choose from, only TM chooses to plough towards the cliff.  
#brexit didn't happen over night it took 30 years of neoliberalism, de-industrialisation, the erosion of the welfare state, political indifference by the working class and a rabid consumerism that has replaced individual spiritual purpose.  
British government claims to be concerned about fake news on the internet. What gross hypocrisy from a government which censors more than any other western world Government. As for their handling of the truth, never forget, brexit means brexit.. . .Fake news. . .How funny. 
Friday in @TheScotsman: the BBC is going crazy for the 50th anniversary of Dad's Army. But after a week of talk of Brexit stockpiling & rationing, it's clear that Britain's inability to move on from a defining moment 78 years ago is wrecking our future..  
Pre Brexit google search history:Best champagne to have with caviar.Prada size conversion chart.Best European weekend breaks.Post Brexit google search history:Can you eat hedgehogs?How to skin a hedgehog.How to roast a hedgehog.Can you make penicillin from mould? 
Call me a Remoaner if you like but I don't fancy living off baked beans bc of Brexit. 
Opinion: Why 'Mamma Mia! Here We Go Again' is our antidote to Brexit  
Theresa May faces Tory Brexit revolt as her own local party demands she cut ties with EU 
BREAKING NEWS: If you want to argue with me about #Brexit please call 0344 499 1000 after 10am tomorrow @talkRADIO where I get paid to do it. Thanks #FBPE 
Our petition for a #FinalSay on the Brexit deal has reached 350,000. You can sign here to have your voice heard  
If you want deeper background on the state of Britain's food supply chain, in the context of Brexit, there's this which I sent to @michaelgove a year ago. It explains in detail why just buying stuff in from outside the EU is not as simple as it sounds.  
I work on the railway with many nationalities, EU nations and non EU.There has never been one negative mention of Brexit, one instance of "Brexit hate" In fact the only time it's mentioned is Poles, Germans, etc wishing they could have a bloody referendum. 
Until Britain understands that it wasn't Russia that compromised our democracy but Murdoch, over decades, and the politicians that courted his favour; we will never escape #Brexit 
Project Fear comes in a variety of different flavours and forms.Limited shelf life left on this particular flavour.#Brexit  
Petition: UK MUST Leave #EU Single Market & Customs Union23rd June 2016 UK voted by majority to Leave EU.2017 General Election, 2 main parties promised to Leave SM & CU with 80% vote.Govt MUST Honour manifesto promise.Sign if you agree: 79,149+#Brexit 
Thanks for your input, but that’s not what Workhardt, a huge manufacturer of insulin in the UK, and a major supplier to the NHS, says about its European hub in Wrexham. Find another #Brexit story to scare people with, #ProjectFear! 
Welcome aboard Danny!Former Leaver now Remainer Danny Dyer - a direct descendant of William the Conqueror, Edward III and Thomas Cromwell - has announced, "I fucking hate Cameron as well as that other prick Nigel Farage”.   
UK Friends, why does the @UKLabour account have no mention of brexit despite its being a world wide trend & front page news? 
A third of voters in the EU referendum made up their mind about whether to back leave or remain on the week of the vote. There just isn’t the level of ideological commitment to Brexit among most leave voters to stomach the consequences of leaving without a deal 
You made a claim on Twitter about your friends being hounded out of this country because of Brexit hate, I asked, politely for details of what happened to make them feel that way. You suggest I buy a book.Therefore I can only logically conclude you made it up.  
If PM May & the Tories settle for a Brexit in name only, Brexiteers like myself will never stop fighting & campaigning for a free & independent UK. I support @UKIP but would work & unite with Brexiteers of all Parties seeking real freedom for our Country.United we will prevail. 
ANO example of Brexit scare story exaggeration. 10,000 lorries is the total volume per day at Dover. Checks will apply to 1-4% only. Most of the checks are paperwork, which can be done on crossing the channel.   
Of course we mustn't panic the Ppl into realising that this #BrexitShambles is a total disaster & that politicians & charlatans deceived them, lied & cheated; mean to say they might start wanting a #FinalSay which might mean their #Brexit coup will fail.#PeoplesVote #Remain. 
I've written this - about Franz Reichelt - the man who jumped off the Eiffel tower - an almost perfect Brexit parable. Enjoy.  
1/ Millions of Germans continued to support Hitler even as his 1000 year Reich crumbled into ruins. Once the disease of rabid nationalism has seized control of a mind it is very hard to cure.#StopBrexit #Brexit #PeoplesVote 
Face reality Brexit is madness and collapses under its own contradictions.  There are no unicorns. There is no brexit cake #StopBrexit British trucks would be blocked from entering Europe under no-deal Brexit, industry leader warns  via @BIUK_Politics 
It's nearing a key milestone which could help change Jeremy Corbyn's mind on Brexit.  
 A ‘no deal’ Brexit is not going to be pretty & now the Tories are trying to prevent you even knowing just how bad it will be. It’s all about trying to save their skins as they cause an unmitigated disaster for UK economy, & attempt to drag Scotland with them.  
A vital group of those who are #remainernow are all those that turned 18 in the last two years, who will have to live with #brexit ramifications for far longer than most.#PeoplesVote 
It's clear the government have locked down the BBC. They have control of most of the press.Post #Brexit just what will happen. Will we see fair and free elections again?Will our politicians be held to account for lying?This is bad, very bad. #FBPE 
2016 : Brexit will give us an extra £350 million for the NHS.2018 : We will have the army standing by incase we have riots cos we have no food.2020 : You are in the 13th district. May the odds be ever in your favour. 
Many of us see that link, what we need is many more to see it too. Brexit is tearing Britain and european unity apart. The only people who could possibly be pleased about that are our enemies #StopBrexit 
The mess will be eternal unless you are prepared to make fundamental changes to society b/c we are now a nation too divided to plod on. #Brexit  
Please read the linked Scotsman article. Until now I had not fully understood the shear sleekitness of U.K. Gov in getting Lords amendment to Scotland Act Schedule 4 to prevent Scot Parl modifying Brexit bill , having first delayed Continuity bill’s royal assent by legal action  
I love the, "Army 'on standby to deliver food and medicine' if no Brexit deal is reached", in the papers. The problem with Brexit isn't distributing food in the UK, it's getting it through the ports. They can't deliver what isn't here. 
And here was I, thinking they wished to turn people against Brexit.It's clear to me now that this thing can end in one of only two ways: 1. Cancel Brexit, in the light of its obvious stupidity.2. Impose martial law, which was the plan all along.So which is it, .@theresa_may ? 
Who's behind Brexit and what do they really want? Brilliantly concise account by @MollyMEP: Money, racism, dismantling of laws that protect the public. Absolutely nothing to do with wellbeing of British people. 
you're really gonna try and tell us this is what you voted for, #Brexit fans? really? 
Apparently #brexit is so great the govt are forcing companies to sign non-disclosure agreements in order to not alarm the public.In other news stockpiling plans to be kept secret & the Times reports army to mobilize to keep order post Brexit.Still, we all voted for this right?  
I'm an American. I have no say in British affairs or Brexit. I will say this though to my British followers & friends. Vladimir Putin and Donald Trump WANT Brexit. Just think about that for a minute. Speak up, speak out, speak often! 
Dynamite stuff. Now govt shelves plans to publicise No-Deal preparations - because they know the public will demand Brexit is stopped if details are made public.  
'Your supply of insulin could be at risk' in event of WTO Brexit, PM May told.DO NOT give in to #ProjectFear 2.1, Prime MinisterThe world's largest, cheapest & most innovative pharmaceutical producer  has got Britain's backAnd it's not even in the EU...#BigWorldBeyondEU 
* Scratches head *How could having a vote on the final deal, when more facts are know, be any worse than this #BrexitShambles #BrexitChaos and the prospect of a #BrexitNoDeal Seriously, time to admit Brexit is  because it was built on lies & now it’s #BrexitReality . 
Fishing has played a big part in pro-#Brexit propaganda, in #Cornwall & elsewhere.But it's misleading to blame the EU for the problems of fishermen - and Brexit will make life much more difficult for an industry that exports most of its catch to the EU. 
This has always been my take on what the top Brexit-pushing echelon like JRM and chums want. It's an opportunity to cheapen everything for everyone so they can swoop in when it's a buyer's market and the impoverished country is desperate for someone's (conveniently overseas) cash  
Rules mean rules, we reject them at our peril. My latest Brexit Blog post on last week's developments, talk of treason and punishment, and what we can learn about the rule of law from A Man for All Seasons:  
Does your household currently pay the BBC License Fee? With controversy over its coverage of independence + Brexit & changing viewing patterns, interested to hear if folk still pay for it. 
An indication how relevant the TFA is to #Brexit - there is not one single mention of it in either of the UK Government's papers on potential future customs arrangements with the EU. Ends.   
Hey folks, today let's talk briefly about brexit. 'cos this is something I've been saying for a while now, a hard brexit that will devastate the country is the entire plan. Then, monied interests can buy up the country's assets on the cheap. 
Gary Lineker needs to get his facts right. He says " you can have a referendum like we did on joining the eu in 1975"But Gary we didn't have a referendum on joining the eu in 1975 we had a referendum on staying in the common market. Oh dear...awkward 
David Davis: “There will be no downside to Brexit. Only a considerable upside.” What a difference 2 years of the Tories negotiating Brexit can make  
I'm an American.  I have no say in British affairs or Brexit.  I will say this though to my British followers & friends.Vladimir Putin and Donald Trump WANT Brexit.Just think about that for a minute.Speak up, speak out, speak often! 
From Sunday Times on why Brexit preparedness notices are not being released as planned. DExEU source : ‘people will shit themselves and want a new referendum or an election or think the Tory party should never govern again’ 
I've always wanted to use the phrase "but this is ridiculous" un-ironically. I know people wanted to return to the 1940s but this is ridiculous. Thank you, Brexit, for giving me the opportunity.  
"Army on standby for Brexit emergency". Scotland is being put in serious peril because of Tory xenophobia. We really need to call #indyref & soon! 
Brexiters wail that the EU is pushing us towards a no-deal. They said we held all the cards. They boasted that an independent Britain would sail away from a sinking EU. We warned them this was drivel. They yelled "Project Fear!". They lied to the British people.#Brexit #FBPE 
‘The government is asking companies to sign non-disclosure agreements about preparations for no-deal Brexit’Do they think we won’t notice the soldiers in the streets, guarding the supermarkets with no food? 
Shall we just look at this one statement that encapsulates everything that is wrong with Brexit... a policy of managed ignorance to protect the Tory party from its own incompetence and criminal dishonesty.  
It’s very clear that the electorate were manipulated. Why then are we going ahead with #Brexit? Who stands to gain? As usual its the elite, it’s about power and money, and as usual the poorest people lose  
This should be enough to bring down the government and stop Brexit and yet Corbyn, hours later, STILL hasn't asked a single question in PMQs about it. Absolutely useless  
The EU is only 15% of the World economy. The UK will still trade with the EU post Brexit, but trading with the World & emerging markets, free from the protectionist shackles of the EU, may see a boom in UK economic growth, the like we haven't seen since the industrial revolution. 
“It doesn’t matter what you think of Matteo Salvini, the fact is he is right about Brexit. He is right that the British public is being denied the thing that we voted for: independence from the EU.”@Tom_Slater_ on Sky 
PROPAGANDA 101: This morning, Murdoch's Sunday morning flagship loo roll, The Deep State Times, drifted this shaving present onto UK news stands, 'Army on Standby for #Brexit Shortages' ... they wonder why #MSM has no credibility.... 
I am very Anti-Brexit because Putin is so Pro-Brexit.  Whatever is good for Putin is usually bad for the United States.  Brexit in the UK is like Trump in America.Both were Russian hoaxes! 
Euro referendum not part of Italian government plans: deputy PM  
Army 'on standby to deliver food and medicine' if no Brexit deal is reached  
We know now both Vote Leave and Leave .EU broke electoral law. Parliament has said it’s not convinced £8m+ Arron Banks spent on Brexit wasn’t (illegal) foreign donations. We know now scale of dark ads in final days of Vote. And response from most Uk politicians? Silence  
Watch chief Brexit negotiator Guy Verhofstadt brand Nigel Farage the EU's "biggest waste of money".  
Now we know that the Tory dominated Brexit campaign was ‘rivers of blood’ all over againBy @Undercoverinfo1 
So the latest story is that the UK Gov have decided not to publish any notices about preparations for a no deal brexit. This is utter nonsense. Health boards, local authorities, other public agencies all need to know what to prepare for. This cannot be kept secret. 
Remember the coming of the millennium? The media was full of stories for months on the coming of the doomsday... ... remind you of anything?*coughs* #Brexit 
This one's called Brexit Remorse.  
Explosive new claims about Brexit campaign. MPs call Facebook ‘dark ads’ targeted at voters on day after Jo Cox’s murder ‘despicable’ & demand explanation from @BorisJohnson & @michaelgove 
Wow. Today Parliament releases report detailing huge questions about illegal and dodgy Brexit referendum campaigning. How does ex DEeXU minister Greg Hands respond? By penning piece saying *investigations* undermine British democracy. Couldn’t make this up  
Of course the Brexiters will blame everyone else but themselves when Brexit goes to shit; “blaming everyone else but themselves” was one of the main reasons they voted Leave in the first place. 
Scott Clissold on Theresa May and her Brexit holiday - Political Cartoon Gallery in Putney  
2016: Brexit will mean an extra £350m a week for the NHS.2019: *tank crashes through living room wall to deliver emergency bread and calpol*  
Those who don’t read Private Eye might like to be aware that in the first quarter of 2018 ministers from the Brexit department had more meetings (5) with the Institute for Economic Affairs than with car industry bosses (3). 
Tim Shipman in Sunday Times. Shows utter bankruptcy of Brexit. In the inevitable public enquiry after it has collapsed, Mrs May & others will have big questions to answer  
Two-thirds of students support a #PeoplesVote - hardly surprising, given 77% think gvt is making a mess of Brexit@jeremycorbyn, listen up! 
IKEA to shut down and Vikings will come and pillage UK homes to disassemble your flat pack furniture and steal all the allen keys#GuessProjectFear #ProjectFear #BREXIT  
This perfectly elaborates on what I said yesterday; there’s gonna be mass anger and schism if we back out of Brexit AND if we don’t, but at least if we back out we’ll have mass anger and schism AND a functioning society and economy...  
The EU has never seen a referendum result it didn't like that it hasn't tried to overturn. The Danes, the French, the Irish, the Dutch, and the Greeks all voted against the EU and then were forced to vote again or were ignored because apparently the voters were 'misinformed'. /1 
It’s striking that brexiteers who accuse me of scaremongering never have details: how a border will function in the event of a no deal Brexit; why a just in time system will function. They’re like a Peter Pan audience shouting ‘I do believe in fairies’ to keep tinkerbell alive. 
Lord Kerr, who drafted Article 50, calls for a #PeoplesVote and says the EU would gladly provide the extra time needed. (Perhaps the place for a reminder that Liz Truss blatantly lied by claiming A50 was irrevocable). #Brexit #StopBrexit 
The British people voted to leave and now the EU waves a big stick at us, it appears we are leaving in name only.We need to leave under the terms we voted on; to take back control of our borders, waters, finances and laws. #Brexit  
Army on standby for Brexit emergency Articles like this pure propaganda - Times should be shamed of themselves 
Matteo Salvini says the EU is not negotiating Brexit in good faith. This would be a major change of line from the Italian government. Who is in charge of Italy’s foreign policy? #Brexit  
In Greece, Italy, France & others, anti-EU politicans are dropping calls to leave EU. Support for membership grows.Only in UK, do the anti-EU elite pursue their #Brexit fantasyThey don't want a #PeoplesVoteThey fear #Remain will win  via @financialtimes 
“If called on to vote in an entirely inappropriate second referendum, I would vote #Brexit to preserve some semblance of democracy in this country.”  
Yes, and abortion is legal across the rest of the UK. Polls show a big majority of North Ireland voters wish this too, but cannot express themselves because of the DUP. Parliament needs to act urgently to protect basic rights in NI. The same on Brexit, where 70%+ opposed in NI.  
The EU cannot do a Brexit deal as any quarter they give will compromise their absolutely rigid EU doctrine. UK cannot do a deal either for Brexit as any deal would require UK staying under some or all EU control. Only viable solution is to repeal the '72 Act and have No Deal 
Project Fear now available in a bag for a limited time only.Linekers Sour Grape.#Brexit  
If people say the Gospel is not relevant to modern life, point them to today's reading. Feeding 5000 with 5 barley loaves and 2 fishes will be a key skill in the event of a no-deal Brexit. 
Blueprints reminiscent of war time Britain and more usually reserved for civil emergencies, appear to have been included as part of the “no deal” planning.This shambles wouldn’t be tolerated in a third world country but that’s now Brexit Island reality.  
Jacob Rees-Mogg's financial investment firm has set up investment funds in Ireland, the EU zone. The hypocrite is driving to push the UK off a cliff while ensuring he is insulated from the effects of a Hard Brexit! Do not trust this man! #StopBrexit 
Independent MEP: 'We’ve Got to Be Big and Bold and Not Fear a No Deal Brexit':  via @SputnikInt 
RT so we can make sure the 1.4M people get a say on #Brexit & their voice is heard. #FInalSayForAll #PeoplesVote. 
Italy's hardline deputy PM accuses EU of trying to 'swindle' Britain over Brexit as he calls for @theresa_may to adopt a tougher approach in her negotiations   @Conservatives 
Reckon the UK is gonna be under martial law a few days after Brexit.  
May is attacked for ‘abandoning Brexit’  
Lord Digby fuming about the establishment elite. Look in the mirror Digby. You are the fucking elite, and you are trying to harm the rest of us!#Brexit #PeoplesVote #StopBrexit 
The Tory media (in that I include @BBC) obsessing over Jeremy Corbyn while the country is faced with existential threats as a result of Brexit will be remembered as completely negligent. They are playing tiddlywinks as Rome burns, knowing full well that the poor will burn 
From the cheating to the lies to the accusations of interference from Russia. 10 reasons why claims Brexit is the 'will of the people' is crazy.  
The Independent has launched its #FinalSay campaign to demand that voters are given a voice on the final Brexit deal. Sign our petition here -  
The Non Disclosure Agreement (NDA) industry is out of control.  Widely used to suppress sexual harassment settlements in Hollywood, now a tool to stop public discussion of #Brexit contingency plans. Gotta stop!  
Whence this morning's Brexit scare stories? With the WTO Trade Facilitation Agreement, the WCO Standards Framework, the EU's Single Administrative Document/Authorised Economic Operators schemes, there is no reason for supply chain or any other interruption in trade post-Brexit. 
The UK’s no-deal #Brexit contingency plans are so alarming the govt has scrapped plans to publish them over the Summer, @ShippersUnbound reports. 
We're in one hell of a pickle when the Mail on Sunday is more accurate and focused on important Brexit coverage than the BBC  
Suggestion to @Channel4 @FactCheck - check your facts before accepting untreated anti-Brexit propaganda from the bitter people still running #ProjectFear. Worckhardt makes its insulin in the UK @GuidoFawkes @P_G_Thompson  
Horrified to hear Gavin Westwing MP is under investigation for smearing the words “What about Brexit Jeremy” in human shit on the walls of his constituency office. What has it come to, when the Labour Party won’t tolerate these principled objections. 
Tory grassroots in open revolt over Theresa May’s Brexit plan  
We see Andy Wigmore made a impression on the @CommonsCMS at his appearance; this from the report - "Mr Wigmore is a self-confessed liar and, as a result, little significance can be attached to anything that he says."  Here he is on the 'far-right' with 3 like-minded individuals 
As Tory government prepares to unleash food shortages on the British people, and warns of military on streets in case of No Deal Brexit, this movie is set to hit cinemas...   
So far: asset strip our wealth and land, denigrate our people, castrate Scottish Parliament, use the Supreme Court to enforce their rule, disregard legitimate majority votes in our parliament, #PowerGrab Enforce an unsafe Brexit result, talk about treason, censorship of indy case 
Labour and Tory attack lines over the years against Wales has been that independence would lead to stockpiling or essentials. Today the lead story in the Sunday Times is that the army will be brought in to deliver food, medicines and fuel following Brexit. 
Well said @jayrayner1 in The Observer...This government simply cannot, *must not* be trusted on Brexit any more.  
No food, no medicine, “super-gonorrhoea”, and the army on the streets... Brexit Derangement Syndrome is going into overdrive! Support us at  
Armed forces ready to deliver essentials and NHS on winter readiness if Government fails to negotiate an orderly Brexit  all going so well part 93. 
Has nobody told Theresa that the majority of our country voted Brexit in the referendum even people like myself who voted Remain now support Brexit, and BREXIT WITH NO DEAL.It's the EU negotiators that made people realise what fools they've been, but now we've all woken up.  
Very powerful piece from @GregHands. “Enough is enough. It’s time to move on. The referendum has happened: the result is in and won’t be changed; let’s now move to dealing successfully with the result.”  
Sunday Times reporting that plans to publish weekly briefings on no deal Brexit plans have been abandoned because will panic population. That’s the same no deal HMG’s manifesto said ‘was better than a bad deal’. Scale of duplicity in British public life right now is incredible 
Britain plans to stockpile food, drugs and blood so they don't run out after Brexit  
When undermining the voting for a football tournament makes your front page, but undermining the voting for Brexit is viewed with skepticism and barely mentioned..... Thanks, ⁦@BBCNews⁩. 
Was having a chat with the criminally handsome @Bazzybazbazbaz today and he asked me which I would choose if I could only have one.  No more Trump or no more Brexit?I’m genuinely stumped! 
I’ll waive my fee & give Turnbull some free advice:1. Axe the corporate tax cuts2. Reverse the ABC cuts & guarantee its funding3. Address the nation - ‘Our diversity is our strength’4. Declare a republican referendum & an indigenous voice5. Retire happy with the grandkids! 
Here’s one good thing to have come out of the 2016 referendum:The remain campaign really does transcend all political, social, religious, gender, sexual, geographical, generational lines (apologies if I’ve missed any!)In a strange way, we are building a new future together. 
Brexit directly affects the livelihood and #citizensrights of more than a million UK citizens and their families and dependants in the EU27.It will also limit the future rights of all UK citizens to live, work, study and retire in the EU27.#EUcitizensChampion #KeepFOM 
Brutal, and entirely accurate, from ⁦@euanmccolm⁩ on brexit, brexiters and a broken UK. The good news is we can still stop it.  
Theresa May has been left with some unpalatable Brexit options  
The referendum of 2016:- advisory - narrow - flawed And now a bloody crime scene. 
'Brussels MUST negotiate seriously' Economist fires Brexit warning to EU over May's plans  
If you want to know how badly brexit is going, this is why the government aren’t going to tell you about their preparations: “People will shit themselves and think they want a new referendum or a new election or that the Tory party should never govern again.”  
‘Our food supply chains are extremely fragile’ admits the #britishRetailConsortium who have aided and abetted a supermarket system that created this fragility in name of profit. That scares the bejesus out of me with or without Brexit. #Ninemealsfromchaos 
UKIPpers 'lent' their votes to the Tory party as they were promised a clean Brexit. Can the Tory party be prosecuted under the Trades Description Act for telling porkies to get elected? 
I think you would agree @michaelwhite the news is delivered via the prism of the political views of those that deliver it. Brexit has sent otherwise sane individuals to the edge of insanity. @lionelbarber 
EU trying to cheat UK out of #Brexit, May should walk away with no deal – Salvini  
The misinformation that was told about Brexit during and after the referendum #FinalSay 
Ok everyone I don’t normally do this but it’s now pretty much an open secret in UK media that Arron Banks received in excess of £8million to fund #brexit through Foreign donors.The story is being hinted at to avoid political issues but can’t see this lasting too much longer. 
I agree - I can’t believe we are sleepwalking towards the Brexit abyss. It’s the one area I wish Corbyn would be more outspoken. Respecting the ref’ result is one thing - but when it was sold on blatant lies and backed with dodgy money ...??? 
Endless digging into referendum spending is a threat to our democracy. Says ex-Remain campaigner  ⁦@GregHands⁩ MP 
Do you mean lies like @George_Osborne's infamous post #Brexit £30billion 'punishment' budget put together by the Treasury and (#EU funded) IMF during the #EURef Sarah?@afneil takes @edvaizey to task on this now totally discredited #ProjectFear threat. 
This initially Leave-supporting Conservative MP has the integrity to speak out with candour.It's perfectly clear Vote Leave's cheating, lying and law-breaking have nullified the referendum result. The public has the right to a *fair* #PeoplesVote. 
Stand by for the official Day Of Panicking then (from the Sunday Times "army on standby for no deal Brexit" splash)  
If you're telling me that ripping up thirty years worth of technical and legislative integration and trade/customs governance systems has no impact on supply chains then I simply don't believe you. #Brexit 
Why would the hard-line Brexit politicians be meeting with Fascist Steve Bannon who wants to see an ultra-right wing Fascist revolution in Britain? I'm sorry. The answer to that is too obvious to bother stating. 
What do remain cause expect Brexiteers do if the referendum result was overturned. Nothing, just sit on our hands & accept it?Brexiteers will never give up. There would be a movement for freedom never seen before, no matter how ever long it took to win our freedom & independence 
This is my #FBSIParty I support Scottish Independence & am calling for a second referendum. I am looking to connect with others who agree.Please:  1 Like 2 Retweet 3 Follow I will follow backCopy this tweet to your own.#ScotRef #IndyRef #IndyRef2 
Liam Fox says no deal better than a 'betrayal' of voters by prolonging negotiations with EU Fox would prefer to inflict massive suffering on the British people so some very rich people can get even richer. This is not politics, this is crime!#Brexit 
#brexit is dead. The #brexit as preached by the Leave campaign is a fantasy. The brexit that people thought they voted for does not exist. All that remains is a criminal conspiracy to usurp democracy & takeover the country. That isn't a brexit, that's a coup. #brexitisdead #FBPE 
2016: Brexit will improve your lives2018: Your adequate food will be delivered to you at gunpoint  
We need a plain English guide to the real world consequences of a hard, no-deal Brexit alongside the actual costs of contingency planning & implementation. Put that on the side of the bus as well as who will be paying for it. 
Brilliant summary of smear campaign around Vote Leave“Enough is enough. It’s time to move on. The referendum has happened: the result is in & won’t be changed; let’s now move to dealing successfully with the result” @GregHandsFull article in thread 
She's right. All i ever hear in Brexit Britain is people cheering for immigrants and exulting in the benefits of immigration. It's a plague of toleration.To think she used to advise IDS on welfare policy. Now that is "exactly the problem".  
I might be willing to accept Brexit if it was being managed competently. However, saying that "our team" couldn't organise a piss up in a brewery flatters them. Irrespective of the original arguments Brexit now must be abandoned because it is becoming a complete pig's breakfast. 
“It would be better if MPs spoke up about the folly of leaving.But if none of them will,a second referendum is required “. I”m appalled leadership of ⁦@UKLabour⁩ are continuing to let the country sleepwalk into this nightmare. We need a #PeoplesVote 
A devastating no-deal #Brexit is only on the cards because a bunch of lying rich bastards want massive cuts in taxation & in the regulations and workplace rights which eat into their profits. This is not normal politics, it is crime against the British people.#StopBrexit #FBPE 
Some of these liars are marching us briskly to the edge of the cliff. It’s time to look over the edge at the reality of a hard, no-deal, no-transition Brexit & refuse to jump 
UK government, 2017:"It's not going to be a Mad Max dystopia."UK government, 2018:"Actually, it's going to be a Mad Max dystopia. Good luck everyone!"#Brexit #NoDeal 
If you continue to “respect” the result of the criminally compromised referendum, you essentially collude with the attack on democracy 
350,000 people have now signed our #FinalSay petition for a referendum on the final Brexit deal! Join the campaign to have your voice heard -  
In ANY club/company say you took a vote and your members/staff voted for something to change, then 18 months later you were seeing huge negative consequences of following through, there’s NO WAY you’d just blindly keep following the mandate. #justsaying #brexit 
The Brexit vote should be annulled. It was based on lies, cheating, micro-targeted dark advertising & electoral law being broken. 
David is absolutely correct. We are experiencing a concerted assault on the Brexit decision and it is showing a schism in our democracy between the will of the people and the will of a political elite with their fealty to Brussels.  
This country is your country. Please tell your child that the vast majority of us do not have this kind of mindless hate in our bellies. #brexit is a disaster on so many levels. 
SAVAGED: Theresa May's version of Brexit is absolutely slated by Tory Associations across the country.'Practically everybody was against the Chequers deal.' 
READ: Lord Kerr says car crash #Brexit isn't inevitable. We can give the public a #PeoplesVote on the final deal: 
Fortunately my flat has lots of high vantage points, so it will make an excellent sniper turret for me to defend my hoarded rations when the Brexit End Times approach 
Sign our petition calling for a referendum on the Brexit deal #FinalSay 
Steve Bannon: Former advisor to Donald Trump Former exec chairman Breitbart NewsFormer VP of Cambridge Analytica Liaising with British politicians Calling for people to “rise up”  & “fight to take your country back”Why?#Brexit #VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw 
In blunt and public remarks, Michel Barnier says he'll never accept Theresa May's plan for customs after Brexit  
Theresa May’s Brexit blueprint means Britain will still be ruled by EU law, lawyer warns:  #BrexitBetrayal 
#Brexit Project Fear everyday bloody boring. 17 million voted leave all do it again. Get out crumbling hopeless EU. Stop putting same Remoaner bores on TV & Radio all the time. No one gives  monkey’s, what they are saying  Vote Leave won get some brexiteers on make a change FFS.  
The strategy of hardcore Remoaners: 1.) create policy chaos using MPs, EU and civil servants 2.) undermine validity of referendum via fake reports 3.) force 2nd Referendum and seek to overturn result. Thank God for reasonable democratic MPs like @GregHands 
We all know the EU and the Remain campaigners are lying and cheating to swindle Britain out of Brexit, it's their life's work.  
Italy’s hardman: EU is ‘swindling’ the UK on Brexit 
The Brexit referendum happened due to Tory party in-fighting,not in the national interest. Jacob Rees-Mogg is pushing for extreme policy to protect Tories & their vested interests in power not for the benefit of the UK. The UK as we know it is being crushed!We need to #StopBrexit 
Wisdom from Italian Deputy PM @matteosalvinimi, telling us to stay strong and fight for Brexit. “There is no objectivity or good faith from the European side... I remember the referendum stage as an example of participation & freedom” Support us at  
When they said 'Take Back Control' - they missed the point about the army controlling the streets...#Brexit in any form is a disaster. No Deal is a catastrophe. It must not be an option in a #PeoplesVote. It must be ruled out. 
Lots of talk about controlling 'Fake New' & Facebook by the dominant Establishment that itself has made mainstream news a farce. Why talk about Cambridge Analytica and not Channel4 or the BBC, both of which seem to have tried to distort our democracy with their anti Brexit line. 
The Culture committee report led by @DamianCollins is yet another disgrace. This is all about trying to undermine validity of the Referendum result with unproven allegations. It is they who are a danger to our democracy, and must be held to account. Hope @Arron_banks sues them 
Absurd larky isn’t-this-all-a-laugh tone to the Broadcasting House report on @BBCRadio4 on the fraudulent win of Leave in the EU Referendum. 
The 2016 EU referendum is a crime scene. 
"The main reason Trump wishes to break up the EU is so that he can weaken teh bargaining power of the EU in trade negotiations".  Reality check for those propagating pie in the sky post Brexit free trade agreements   
Dear Tory grassroots,Your No Deal Brexit will destroy British industry, NHS & more.When PM looks to the future she can't bring herself to do it.You won't be around to see it but you're selling out your grandkids.Get real, back off. #PeoplesVote 
Then logic suggests No Brexit is Better Than a Bad Brexit  
BBC News gives more prominence to possible cheating in Football World Cup award to Qatar than Leave fraud and cheating in 2016 referendum 
Frank Field is in some ways today’s Edmund Burke. He is fearless in standing up in Parliament for what he believes is right, particularly the disadvantaged. He is a brilliant MP. I disagree with him on Brexit, but unlike Kate Hoey he is not Tory/DUP. Utterly wrong to deselect him 
With the Tories in disarray over Brexit, surely time for all sides of @UKLabour to unite against the real enemy: people who complain about anti-Semitism. 
The Independent has launched its #FinalSay campaign to demand that voters are given a voice on the final Brexit deal. Sign our petition here -  
Remember when Fox said a post-Brexit deal with the EU would be “the easiest in human history"?  
Did Gary Lineker miss the first ‘people’s vote’ on Brexit?  
Theresa May’s Brexit plan is terrible. It disempowers the UK.No-deal Brexit is worse. It shreds frameworks of collaboration without replacements. This Govt had their chance - and failed.Brexit’s had its chance - and failed.It’s time to dump Brexit. 
ALLY: Italy's @matteosalvinimi says the EU is trying to swindle Theresa May on Brexit, but he hopes the UK comes out on top.If only May had his dynamism and charisma. 
The EU's claims and threats about 'no deal' are designed to force the UK to accept a bad deal from Brussels. We can't let them push us into accepting a 'Punishment Brexit'. RETWEET if you agree  
Any Leaver who thinks Brexit is the end of things is in for a rude fucking awakening.  Whatever side of the political spectrum you’re on, expect your parties to get caved out as those of us who support a Britain that’s part of Europe to find a new political home that values that. 
"It is widely insisted upon that no one could possibly have voted against their own economic interests ... But what if people did think that there was something about Brexit that was more important than GDP? That some things are more important than money?" 
Am I going crazy or are #Tories really planning on getting the army ready to get on our streets in the event of a no  deal #Brexit ?So a bunch of arseholes are prepared to curtail our freedom rather give us #PeoplesVote This country is so fucked. 
Tesco preparing for a no-deal Brexit I see  
UK government shelves plan to publicise no deal preparations in case it turns public against Brexit (via ⁦@ShippersUnbound⁩) 
So much evidence undermining the validity of the #Brexit result. Has anyone yet heard #TheresaMay or #JeremyCorbyn draw attention to this? Or for that matter most Tory & Labour MPs. Wondering why that might be.#PeoplesVoteThis won't go away; time now for a #FinalSay.#Remain 
Very sensible article today by former Remain supporter @GregHands, who says he is “concerned at the continued attempts to refight the referendum and put the Leave campaigns in the dock” & says “we should all unite around getting the best deal for Britain”  
Every which way you look at it, the 2016 referendum is void. It has no legitimacy. Undemocratic, corrupt, illegal, dishonest - 
Why we need to be concerned about Steve Bannon being given airtime on @LBC with his mate Farage & his liaisons with Johnson, Rees-Mogg & Gove. #CambridgeAnalytica #Brexit #VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw #marr 
But we know they’re telling porkies. There IS an alternative Brexit plan, and it’s in David Davis’ briefcase. It’s called a free trade agreement.   
If Brexit is forced through, past what is now provably a majority wanting a 2nd ref, i hope the very first things that happens is a political party commits to reversing Brexit & negotiating a return to the EU under exactly the same agreements we have now.  
Italy’s deputy prime minister today accuses the European Union of trying to “swindle” Britain out of the Brexit that the public voted for.  
Plan for peace but prepare for all out war.This is how we should be approaching Brexit. Over 2 years and we are looking like a rabbit in the headlights. Pathetic weasel politicians turning our country upside down. Lay down the terms the ppl voted for or walk away. 
Dear @BorisJohnson, @michaelgove, @LiamFox,An anti-Brexit MP - mother-of-two Jo Cox RIP - was literally assassinated for campaigning against #Brexit. Now we discover your campaign continued spreading fake news even in the moratorium after her death.Have you no shame?Tom 
Brexit poses an existential threat to our country. There is no scenario which does not lose jobs, opportunities & rights. Government & Parliament should stop it. But at very least there should be a #PeoplesVote now that the people have information & can see the realities. 
Italy’s hardman: EU is ‘swindling’ the UK on BrexitWe know that May is weak, she doesn’t really want Brexit! 
Bit Sun politics fun.Prime Minister we deserve/should have.. Take your pick or comment who if not an option there #Brexit #Britain #NHS #Marr 
Sturgeons seperatist march brings weekend travel chaos to another Scottish city. As Inverness grinds to a halt, and retailers tills go silent, Today @BBCScotlandNews we ask, is @RuthDavidsonMSP correct, “Time to back #brexit and ditch #Indyref2”#AUOBInverness 
Funny how many of those currently criticising the BBC's coverage of #Brexit and #VoteLeave were happy to mock Corbynites when we had similar complaints about the BBC's coverage of Corbyn. 
Sign our petition calling for a referendum on the Brexit deal #FinalSay 
The world is in a strange place indeed. Indian / Western media criticizing Pakistanis for voting for Imran Khan mustn't forget that they also voted the likes of Modi, Yogi, Trump & events like Brexit in the last few years. 
‘Dark Brexit forces have led us to crisis’  
The UK opted out of Schengen and the Euro, gets a huge rebate and we've enjoyed all the benefits of being in the EU for 40 years. Our children and grand-children will be denied the rights to study, work and settle anywhere in the EU. What are the benefits of #Brexit for them? 
Churchill saved Europe & inspired the European Union. He would have had as little time for Brexit as for appeasement  
If our leaders won’t lead, we must vote again on Brexit  
Despite only managing 4 hours of talks with the EU, Tory David Davis amassed a £100,000 bill for RAF jets to ferry him around on 22 occasions in the last 12 months. That’s about £4,500 per flight. British Airways offer flights to Brussels from £100.The Brexit con continues. 
New images of Civil Guard using gas against public during Catalan referendum  
So given all the external threats facing U.K. the army spending time planning for a food emergency we’ve 100% brought on ourselves. No wonder world thinks we’ve gone mad.Army on standby for Brexit emergency  
45% of Vote Leave Facebook ads were on immigration. Since the referendum, some pro-Leave supporters have claimed that immigration played a minor role in the leave campaign and was not a significant influence on the result  
I'm ashamed of what the Labour Party has become. Frank Field is one of the great politicians in British politics, he is dedicated, hard working and, because he votes for #Brexit, he is persecuted by the party he has served for 40 yrs. @UKLabourShame 
So, news this morning: we’re killing the planet; Bannon creates new Nazi party; Putin assets in Europe get involved in Brexit; the Telegraph tells us we need Oligarch money; the Sun tells us rationing & martial food distribution is exactly what everyone voted for. Happy Sunday. 
In its manifesto Labour said it "accepts the referendum result", but those few Labour MPs that actually support Brexit are getting kicked out of the Party. Can someone explain?  
'I talk to students up and down the country about Brexit. They are firm supporters of a second referendum' #FinalSay 
Nine out of ten of the poorest areas in the EU are in the UK. Only one out of the top ten richest areas is in the UK. We're already in a mess and Brexit is going to make it much, much worse... #ToryShambles #EndAusterity 
Brexit: Sunday Times front page news this morning. If the #Remain side said it was a possibility during the referendum it would have been described as ‘Project Fear’ Sadly it is project reality. There’s still time to think again. #PeoplesVote 
Why am I still in Britain?Nothing has changed for EU citizens, Brexiters claim.True legally, but this will change and could change drastically if there is a no deal Brexit.Also the referendum was fought and decided in no small part against migration. 
If two years ago, I had told Leavers that Brexit would see us stockpiling food, medicines and blood plasma, they would have (rightly) called me an "unhinged Project Fear peddler". Today that is the official Government policy. This is NOT a normal way to live. 
@WendySiegelman Is one of the TOP reporters to follow. She’s been killing it for 2 years now on TrumpRussia and Brexit. 
Sorry #Brexit supporters but after 7 years campaigning with @hackinginquiry for press reform I totally agree with @mrjamesob - they’ve thrown a grenade into our political system & most of them will retreat to sunny tax havens with gold plated pensions when the damage hits us! 
MPs doing a proper job in their withering report on Zuckerberg, Russia and Cambridge AnalyticaA useful summary into the anti-democratic sewer that was the EU referendum and a useful catch-up if you haven't been following the detail#Brexitgate 
The Independent has launched its #FinalSay campaign to demand that voters are given a voice on the final Brexit deal. Sign our petition here -  
"Just think for a moment what a prospect that is. A single market without barrier, giving you direct and unhindered access to the purchasing power of over 300 million of the world's wealthiest and most prosperous people." M. Thatcher, 1988  #Brexit  
Matteo Salvini has accused the European Union of trying to cheat Britain out of the Brexit it voted for. We know that, Sig Salvini, thank you, but not Mrs May and Co.   
‘We need a second referendum on Lineker’  
Steve Bannon on 2018 Midterms: This is Going to be Donald Trump's First Re-elect - A Referendum on the Trump Presidency (VIDEO)  via @gatewaypundit 
There are millions of good people who are angry, frightened, disenfranchised and confused. But tragically, they end up making self harming choices because they are mislead by politicians and media who should be looking after them instead.And that’s how Brexit happened.  
Successful day at the Leek Show. Remain vote outnumbered No Deal by a sufficient margin on our Show Poll. Enough to discredit any notion re Brexit being 'the will of the people". Also 100 signatures for the People's Vote Petition from a so-called Brexit supporting constituency.  
Brexit is like the UK took a motorway exit, then found the road turning into a rutted grassy track, and now the car's stuck in a muddy field, there's no help in sight, it's getting dark, everyone's shouting at the driver, and the passengers are beginning to worry about food. 
PM leadership under fireTory MPs plot to oust PM before OctRival Tory camps primed for showdown after PM's Brexit proposals were met with icy response in EUSource told The Times that an autumn leadership election was “nailed on”PM would “be out by Oct” 
There aren’t any. It’s like asking, ‘can’t we, for once, just hear from some sensible vandals?’ Brexit is an inherently nonsensical, fraudulent project  
Would be the Death Knell for UK’s trade strategy for the time after Brexit ...New Zealand Opposes U.K.'s @wto quota plan: 
"Brexit will give you the clap!" Gideon out-Sunday Sports the Sunday Sport. 
Brexit: “Cameron rolled the referendum dice. It is the most egregious example of putting party before country in British history and he also screwed it up. It was cynical and it was stupid, the work of a second-rate chancer” @RealDMitchell 
Final Say: The misinformation that was told about Brexit during and after the referendum | The Independent  
As a British EU negotiator, I can tell you that Brexit is going to be far worse than anyone could have guessed  
A sobering read on the frightening reality of a no deal Brexit by @IanDunt. 
Fairly damning piece on Boris Johnson & Brexit in New York Times  
The Army on Standby for Brexit The frickin armyDo we even need a #PeoplesVote to figure this one out? Let's just remain 
As @MalcolmNance & others have argued, #BREXIT was the dry run for the 2016 (& still ongoing) campaign of #subversion directed against the US elections. @chucktodd #unmeddling 
YES! The "Campaign" for a second referendum is a #ScareTactic. A second Ref would trash #Remain even more. Forget The #Fake #Deal. #BREXIT NOW! #EU needs #UK more than UK needs EU! #TheGlobalWarmingHoaxMustBeDestroyed, Destroy #EUETS EU-#deindustriliazation tool. #SaveOurFish 
Worse thing imo is that it’s likely the Dems pick up seats this November (since it would be an anomaly if they didn’t) and these people will think that this is what did it and the media will spin it as a referendum on russiagate instead of the predictable outcome it would be. 
Looking for the guy with glasses. 
Brexit Twitter  
Theresa May has occupied 10 Downing Street for two years by promising a Brexit without tradeoffs, but as the deadline for agreement approaches, she has had to choose.  
16/ The criticism of Brexit bad boys @Arron_banks and "self-confessed liar" @andywigmore pulls no punches. What were these two knuckleheads up to? Sounds like UK law enforcement will find out. 
May is attacked for ‘abandoning Brexit’  
PoliticsPresident of Tynwald Hopes His Official Visit to Iceland Will Help The Isle of Man Forge New Links Post-Brexit#iom 
Bannon's strategy for Europe: destroy EU. Same key words, "remove elite" & "populist movement". So, Brexit was only the first step, what RW wants is Europe in pieces. Fascists like Ukip are becoming more active, since he gives them a rallying point.  
Theresa May's attempt to bypass Brussels in Brexit talks fails as member states line up to back official EU position || Via; Independent  
My 2 week old bruise on my left knee just asked why we haven’t yet considered the future of a post brexit Britain as were so contained in the short term debate @dod_nffc everyone clapped and cheered 
The staggering bias of BBC output during the Scottish independence referendum in 2014 opened a lot of Scottish people's eyes to the intensity of BBC political propaganda.  
If you think my timeline is bad because of Shaqiri, I made the mistake of retweeting something about Brexit yesterday and *still* it rumbles on. Shaqiri mild relief. 
I'm sorry but YOU said it is a Referendum on YOUR and Bill Shortens Leadership. 
Yeah. Brexit, huh ? 
Whatever else happens over Brexit it's a pleasure to read the FBPE timelines. Just read one where the army has to be mobilised to supply the north east and we'll be living on Pot Noodles  
Remember when @TurnbullMalcolm said #SuperSaturday was a referendum on leadership?Remember when @LyleShelton said the #MarriageEquality postal survey was a referendum on #SafeSchools? I remember but how quickly they seem to forget. 
But, but, but last week you said it was a "question of leadership" and Cormann said it was a referendum on your policies... So what's changed..? Oh, that's right... YOU LOST..!!   #auspol #insiders #SuperSaturday 
Brexit: split down the middle - one can only surmise on this: there might be a new coalition in the making. But, until then, the defining character of Brexit is fragmentation - Booker territory, where we are split down the middle...  #Brexinfo. 
Indy is a risk to 63% of Scottish Exports compared with Brexit risk of 16% to Scottish Exports yet YOU want the first on TOP of the second one ? SNP Scot Gov website show that itself  
The EC evidence has clear implications. If you "respect" the 2016 referendum result then you ALSO "respect": - Corruption- Fraud - Illegality- Cheating- Vote-Rigging- Buying political results- Lying in adverts ...but NOT democracy. No. Not democracy. #StopBrexit 
I'm certain that George O'Neill and possibly his daughter Catharine were related to Rohrabacher's ongoing contact with Nekrasov and Akhmetshin. Yuri Vanetik joined that restaurant meeting in Berlin as well. There are a couple of unidentifieds: clasped hands guy & glasses guy. 
BreatheSG:”FSB broke the law. CA/SCL broke the law.VoteLeave/LeaveEU broke the law.Brexit & Trump both won via laws broken.FSB facilitated & covered it up.”Butina is just the tip of the RU iceberg45 has no central strategy for election security &  no one's in charge pic.twitter.com/RM3qD54OmT 
#peterArif is a #Facebook profile of a person seemingly in/around #Darlington. The profile has reprehensible #AntiSemetic posts AND pro #Brexit, pro #Trump, 9-11 “truther”, and anti #irish posts but no where does it show he is a #labour member! 
‘Plucky little panel’ that found the truth about fake news, Facebook and Brexit  
#RichardBranson Anti Brexit Funder, TAX evader! & Sleazeball!  
Conversation with Leave elderly woman today about PV:She said: If we don't go ahead with Brexit, I am never voting again!!Let that sink in......Why was she thinking the threat would dissuade me from campaigning?Sounds like a deal to me! 
He lives on a private island in the Caribbean, private boats, jets, healthcare, so what does he know about it, doesn't matter how much money he has or how important he believes himself to be, he had one vote just like the rest of us. Time to leave. 
The Sunday Times report the Army have been placed on standby in case of a Brexit emergency. @MatthewStadlen asks: How far are you prepared to go to see Brexit delivered?  
My suspicion is that Boris will make his bid in the autumn backed by JRM and ERG. We need to be ready to back those committed to deliver a genuine Brexit whatever we think of the individuals. If it doesn’t happen and nor does true Brexit I’ll burn my membership. 
I am struggling for ideas here, beyond the need to grasp the scale of the problem.But I would again put forward what I suggested immediately post-referendum. A *UK Citizens’ Convention*, with facilitated discussion and expert guidance, is surely worth a try?10/10 
#Peru's President Martin Vizcarra challenged Congress to call a referendum on judicial and political reforms aimed at uprooting systemic #corruption. 
No confrontation of Britain’s imperial past. In that denial lie the roots of Brexit, the xenophobia and nativism, and the imperial delusions on the right AND left.  
For those in the UK who don't get the significance of this: @DanaRohrabacher, the US Congressman cited as a major contact of the Russian spy Maria Butina, is a good friend of both @Nigel_Farage and Arron Banks' brother John.The net tightens on #Trump #Russia #Brexit  
The BBC has had lousy judgement all the way through this Brexit mess. It failed to inform the public with key information during the Referendum, failed to challenge blatant lies / distortions in a timely fashion and has since failed to listen when people complain. 
The self-styled ‘bad boy of Brexit’ may have improperly used foreign money to bankroll the Leave campaign, according to MPs.  
Hey, NZ, let’s talk about #marijuana coz there’s a referendum coming up about whether and how to decriminalize. Forum next weekend @thepumphouse Akl. Come along! #hightimes #cannabis #medicalmarijuana 
The army is reportedly on standby for a Brexit emergency involving shortages of food, fuel and medicines in the event of the UK crashing out without a deal. What price should this country pay to honour the result of the referendum? Join me from 1 on @LBC 
I am convinced that the reason May called the last disaster of a general election was in the hope of gaining more MP's so as to defeat the MP patriots in her party who demand brexit be honoured. 
From NYT: “Every earnest warning from the other side — about how any Brexit would damage trade, business and jobs — was dismissed airily by the Brexiteers. There were no costs or downsides in this vision of the future. This casual dishonesty has had devastating consequences.” 
The UK is being held ransom by a Tory "grassroots" of at most 70,000 people & declining, uber-middle class & on average aged 72. No wonder #Brexit is a disaster.  
During the referendum we were told that legalising abortion was necessary 2 save women from dying. This investigation by USA Today shows that country with a massive abortion rate, more women are dying & MMR is climbing steadily. #westandforlife 
My latest@annmarlowe @carolecadwalla @ZarinaZabrisky @profcarroll @RVAwonk @leahmcelrath @Delavegalaw @Billbrowder @NicoHines @chrisinsilico @lrozen @MollyMcKew @dcpoll @peterjukes @grantstern @funder @traciemac_Bmore @brexit_sham @WriteSmitty @NatashaBertrand @submergingmkt 
BREXIT = CHEESE DICK.....@CountDankulaTV?? -   
It doesn’t have to affect the minds of 17.4m people, just enough to win the vote. They referendum was won by a 2% swing, the overspend was 10% and the Facebook ads/collision far more damaging. People need to realise what’s actually being talked about.  
Matteo Salvini, leader of Italy’s right, warns EU is ‘swindling’ Britain out of #Brexit 
I’m begging you.  Tell me this is not True.Theresa May is losing the plot beyond all my imaginings.Matthew Elliot.TPA.Business for Britain (Brexit Central).Has she lost her tiny mind entirely?  All the choice in the world and she chooses a crook.  
Equally sinister is why were ballot boxes taken to England to be counted in the 2014 referendum. No MSM in this poisonous isle will ever let folk know what’s really been going on. Isn’t it great being free   
1) Jeremy Corbyn rebelled over 500 times since 1997. 2) Jeremy Corbyn apparently marched with rival parties against Labour and called for an uprising against British troops.3) Jeremy Corbyn would have been voting with Field and Hoey if he wasn't the leader.#Brexit  
I see the Spirit of The Blitz that will see us through any Brexit hardship is much in evidence again, as British holidaymakers whose flight to Alicante was delayed for a few hours definitely didn't lose their shit not at all. 
Corbyn's new-found nuance on 'a' customs union is of no consequence. He's 'an' opposition leader. ANY brexit will harm the poor and the disenfranchised, yet he still supports it. His sanctimony is just theatre. 
Labour MP and Brexit campaigner Frank Field is a kind and decent man - when just a handful of people stood up for the many victims of the RSPCA, he was one of us  
Does anyone think it is acceptable for @BBCNewsPR to pop up with a defensive misleading tweet and then retreat back into its shell?We need a venue for a proper debate about the BBC’s role in covering not just Brexit, but principally Brexit. 
Italian minister Matteo Salvini tells us what we'd already worked out for ourselves: the EU is swindling Britain out of Brexit  
So Tory Party members are in open revolt about Brexit. So bloody what. So ancient they make me (possessor of a Senior Railcard) look like a spring chicken, so unrepresentative of the population in general, & so few of them the Tory Party won't even publish the number. 
Raab is a disgrace. I thought he was future leadership material but he's put his career before his principles. I don't see how the Tories  will recover if they betray brexit. On the bright side, 5 years of Corbyn might see off socialism once and for all. 
Politics break.From the forthcoming Brexit Colouring and Activity Book.  
Chapeau @CommonsCMS Decent people on the right side of history. - 'A cross-party group of 12 MPs: random amateurs with no expert training who stepped up and led an inquiry that has been public, open and asking more and more difficult questions.' 
#quote"It is deeply ironic that Remainers justify their objections to Brexit as being a threat to prosperity + peace when the very act of disregarding the precedent of majority rule is in fact, a far greater threat to this nation than any breakdown in trade relations with the EU"  
Remainer civil service timidity is undermining this country’s potential for success.Brexit cannot be delivered by people who view it as a damage limitation exercise. It can only be successfully delivered with willingness to take big bold risks.Who dares wins. 
The papers are reporting that the Army is on standby for BREXIT, I fear they may be somewhat disappointed  
Newspaper headlines: Brexit 'grassroots revolt' and 'a star is born'  
Anger over use of Brexit ads in aftermath of Jo Cox murder  
Funny that, @Arron_banks: I agree! Because when I write The History of Brexit, ensuring - as every good historian always will - that it’s based on facts and all the primary evidence there is ... yes: then some might well require help from God.  
Over 340k. Get moving and it will be 1M by MondauTheresa May MP: Give People a Final Say on Brexit Deal - Sign the Petition!  via @UKChange 
If you want to understand Brexit in political terms - how Theresa May got there, and how screwed up the political side is - this @NewYorker piece by @samknightwrites is where to find it.  
They knew, they all knew everything. 
No deal Brexit could mean Food, medical and fuel shortages Damage to our economy not seen since the global financial crisis A hard border in Ireland - increasing tensions“No deal is better than a bad deal” is nonsense.No deal *is* a bad deal - it’s the WORST deal.  
YouGov now shows the majority want a new Brexit referendum, joining other pollsters who have reported this for a while.Check out how much public opinion has shifted towards a #PeoplesVote. Brexit is not the will of the people. #StopBrexit. 
Italy's far-right leader Matteo Salvini accuses EU of trying to "swindle" Britain out of #Brexit,This from a man whose party is steeped in fraud and which recently signed a deal with Putin's ruling party in Russia.Salvini clearly has a lot in common with the Brexit crooks.  
Hey @labourleave and anyone in #Labour who voted for #Brexit. @eddieizzard reckons you are right wing for doing so. I wondered how that sat with you? 
Tory grassroots in open revolt over Theresa May’s Brexit plan  
30 years ago today @TheForks started the controversial transformation of a rail yard into one of Western Canada’s most visited public spaces.It may not have happened had it gone to a city-wide referendum, like #PortageAndMain. Progress requires embracing change. #TeamOpen 
Massive news. Heard it covered on Radio Éireann. If it wasn't for longwave radio & social media, I'd be none the wiser. Message from European Parliament; repartition Ireland and off the cliff you go Britain! #Brexit  
'Army on standby for #Brexit emergency'. Let's hope they havn't all caught the clap or run out of sandwiches. #ProjectFear 
Former Lloyd's boss says the UK can't organise a piss up in a brewery so there might be food and medicine shortages after Brexit.He says his big business friends & politicians are reluctant to spell it out. Nuff said, more Remain manipulation. 
Sunday Times:  "Army on standby for Brexit emergency"  
And this is being orchestrated by our own PM? Politics was in a mess before this but a brexit betrayal will push legitimate concerns and frustrations to the political extremes. 
The number of Brexiters who think that if there are food or medicine supply problems after Brexit, it will be because the EU is blockading the UK... Clueless. 
Final Say: More than 1.4m additional young people could now vote in a new Brexit referendum  
Sunday Times - Army on standby for brexit.Why is a modern western democracy putting itself in this absurd position?#indyref2 #brexit 
On Sky Papers some blonde woman says we won’t be able to eat meat after Brexit because our farmers can’t sell it to Europe and we can’t buy it from Europe...I know!  Let’s buy and eat the meat we can’t sell to Europe! #leavesolutions  
@erichmcelroy Great set tonight:"I met someone who voted Brexit and they told me they did it just to see what would happen... Such a pleasure meeting Boris Johnson". (I'll see you at the door to show you this tweet in a couple minutes) 
Remainers in government have wilfully neglected to consider an alternative Brexit vision  
The scale of the grassroots backlash against Theresa May and her Cabinet over her #Brexit plans has been revealedCabinet ministers have faced an angry response from their Conservative associations#BinChequers#MayMustGo via @Telegraph 
No one else wants a Brexit car crash, but only Britain can steer itself to safety | John Kerr  
‘Army on standby for Brexit emergency’. We are entering the theatre of the absurd.  
Team Turnbull now wants us to believe that they never expected to win any of yesterday’s by-elections. Like hell.Turnbull’s hubris and confidence was such that he framed #SuperSaturday as a referendum on himself.#BringBackAbbott #MayoVotes #BraddonVotes #LongmanVotes 
On where liberals post-2016 have been going wrong..."Don’t bet on bad news. Why? Because it creates a toxic perception that Trump [/Brexit] critics would rather see things go wrong, for the sake of their own vindication, than right, for the common good" 
Great article by @DanielJHannan. This is exactly how the situation is currently. #Brexit  
Wow. 340k signatures already. Public demand for a #PeoplesVote to give us a #FinalSay on the #Brexit deal is really starting to take off. Keep up the good work!  
Tory grassroots in open revolt over Theresa May’s Brexit plan   via @Telegraph 
Tomorrow’s Observer package: Splash: anger over Brexit ads used in aftermath of Jo Cox’s murder. Plus Spike Lee interview (New Review), Tour de France final day preview (Sport), and summer fashion special in the mag. Please buy a copy and support our journalism...  
This is the kinda country the right wing UKgov has for our futureA terrifying vision of a Little England from John O Groats to Lands end. We should get as far as possible away from this Post Brexit apocalypse Scotland!  
Will be on @talkradio this evening about 1035/1040pm talking about #Brexit and the rise of #UKIP 
A reminder that this government will not allow a 'disruptive' public sector strike without at least 40% of union members voting in favour, but is fanatically pursuing a #Brexit backed by only 37% of a rigged electorate. #StopBrexit #PeoplesVote 
The lunatic proponents of shard Brexit at Telegraph are desperately worried that Mrs May is moving in the direction of sanity.Hence, the “grassroots” in “open revolt”. The only people in open revolt are the privileged set of fundamentalists driving the bus towards the cliff.  
Good news of this week is the shift towards a will for a second referendum. Now the public mood is moving, it is likely to swing fast. Time for May and Corbyn to think again before they are left isolated 
A reminder that one of Cameron's advisers made it clear that the main reason for excluding 16-17 year olds from the #Brexit referendum was to appease the Tory Right. The referendum franchise was gerrymandered in favour of Leave.#StopBrexit #PeoplesVote 
Heidi @heidiallen75 Lots of Twitter noise creating panic over insulin and No Deal Brexit . Many shamefully scaremongering .Having worked in pharma for 30 yrs  this is a balanced article on subject imo ,whether your are a Remainer or Leaver.Please share 
This is my #FBSIParty I support Scottish Independence & am calling for a second referendum. I am looking to connect with others who agree.Please:  1 Like 2 Retweet 3 Follow I will follow backCopy this tweet to your own.#ScotRef #IndyRef #IndyRef2 
But Corbyn could miraculously come up with a great Brexit? As an atheist I have more confidence that Jesus could turn water into wine than this.  
A reminder of the grotesque injustice that Commonwealth citizens were allowed to vote in the #Brexit referendum but EU 27 nationality did not qualify people to vote. Had justice been done and they had been given the vote Remain would have won. #StopBrexit #PeoplesVote 
Well if Bannon is calling the upcoming midterms criticalit’s Trump‘s “first reelect” & “referendum” on his presidency? The let's get out there & Win one for the Gipper!  
The Government are moaning about fake news, whilst simultaneously pushing out #Brexit lies on the #ChequersPlan.*Shakes head* 
Gary Lineker helps put an end to the Brexit disaster#PeoplesVote 
Frank Field hits back after being lambasted by his CLP for backing Brexit, pointing out he's always voted against further EU integration and "for most, if not all, of those votes I did so alongside Jeremy Corbyn & John McDonnell."Presumably Corbyn will be next for deselection?  
Er... surely the bigger splash should be ‘army on standby for Brexit emergency’.... ‘helicopters and army trucks would be used to ferry supplies (medicines) to vulnerable people outside the south east’.... *is this what people voted for?!*  
Wow. That struck a nerve. Thanks for all your replies. Our hearts are breaking to see the UK leaving the EU, let’s make our future relation seamless as possible #Brexit  
6/Stephenson said: "Keep it simple - I think by the end of the referendum people were talking about our simple messages like the £350m a week figure and Turkey joining the EU; we used language people could use in the street or in the pub."Read more at  
In an exclusive interview with The Sunday Times, Matteo Salvini urges Theresa May to adopt a tougher stance in her Brexit negotiations with the EU, saying: “My experience in the European parliament tells me you either impose yourself or they swindle you.” 
Plain common sense from @DanielJHannan #Brexit  
EU tariff on Argentinian beef.. its 43% and South American beef is five times cheaper than Irish beef..And it's better..EU Tariffs block cheaper food imports.The Remain lies that there will be food shortages = Moronic..Viva #Brexit EU tax on beef blocked biggest FTA  
Tory grassroots in open revolt over Theresa May’s Brexit plan   
I wonder why ANYONE is surprised that @theresa_may wants us to Brexit in name only?  
No one else wants a Brexit car crash, but only Britain can steer itself to safety | John Kerr  
I see that @KTHopkins is lecturing the world about the meaning of democracy tonight.  That either indicates the end of times or she realises that the dishonest, damaging farce of #Brexit, illegally bought by her mates by cynical exploitation of genuine fears , has been rumbled… 
Sign our petition calling for a referendum on the Brexit deal #FinalSay 
Peru will hold a referendum to "legitimize" judicial reforms, including the creation of an anti-corruption office and sanctions on corrupt judges and lawyers  
It's fantastic that The  campaign for a #PeoplesVote is  steaming ahead!Thanks to the #Libdems who first proposed this -  and kept the flame alive through the dark months after The Referendum.Please Sign!  
INDEPENDENT DIGITAL: The 1.4m who have not had a say on Brexit #tomorrowspaperstoday 
Anger over use of Brexit ads in aftermath of Jo Cox murder - by @carolecadwalla and @tobyhelm 
Brexit might be a farce run by clowns, but it's no joke.  
My 2 year old agrees and went to bed in tears about the no deal Brexit ‘fiasco’ - his words, let alone his thoughts on Trump 
Senior ex-diplomat backs The Independent's campaign for a referendum on final Brexit deal  
Thank you @mrjamesob for saying it how it is. For having the decency to stand up for those who Brexit will affect the most. For speaking out when many others remain silent & thus complicit. #VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw #marr 
Theresa May should finally stop ignoring her Brexit negotiating partners' red lines  (via @bopinion) 
EU Council President Donald Tusk has told Britain that Brexit can be stopped. He said all t takes is an email.  
Leo Varadkar's Ireland is happy to bully Britain to appease their EU masters. I'll be happy to avoid Irish productions and services like the plague post Brexit. 
If what was missing in your life was more reason to worry about the future of the international order, we've got you covered! @benjaminwittes discusses Brexit with me, @A_Sloat and @thomaswright08 from the jungle studio @lawfareblog. FINALLY we talk #brexit on the @lawfarepodcast 
Tony Blair backs Independent's #FinalSay Brexit campaign  
Frank Field has criticised local Labour party members after he became the latest party MP to lose a confidence vote for siding with the government in key Brexit votes.  
Branson saying Brexit the sadest thing to happen to Britain & the damage it’s going to do to the economy  
If we don’t sort out the Northern Ireland border issue, does that mean they will stop airing Mrs Brown’s Boys? If so, I have found a benefit of brexit 
Nationalists, who are fighting desperately to overturn the democratic will of the people in relation to Brexit, cling to the nonsense spouted by Peter Robinson. Would it be ok for unionists to simply ask for 2nd referendum if a first one delivered a majority for a United Ireland? 
Dear #FBPE, one of the fears of the #brexit campaign is that we get organized and act as one. That is why this troll is attacking the #FBPE group.  We wouldn't get this unless they saw it as a threat to them. That means we have something. Let's use it. 
THE OBSERVER: Anger over use of Brexit ads in aftermath of MPs murder #tomorrowspaperstoday 
Fair warning. Brexit & Scottish independence are very different arguments. I immediately & without warning block anyone who thinks they are the same. 
Before everyone gets carried away with the latest “typo” United Sates - beware: There is a lot of other *very* interesting stuff going on across the pond & here in relation to Brexit & Russia & ....Keep focused. #cofefe 
What a day! Final greeting from our national meeting today. Thrilled to be working on new strategies after the tremendous referendum win.  The next few months are going to be crucial, so stay with us to ensure that we WILL have accessible abortion care in Ireland. #FreeSafeLegal 
Crikey! 30,000 followers. Many thanks to all of you, particularly the ones who are actual people, and thanks for all the RTs and likes.It’s always been my view that if you actually understand Brexit it’s almost impossible to be in favour of it, so I hope I’ve helped a little. 
If I were Lord Hall - the BBC D-G - and I’d some sense of the public mood,I’d put the word out to staff it’s time to be honest about Brexit. 
What on Earth has happened to the once great Labour Party? Whatever your view or position on Brexit, Frank Field is still a fantastic MP. Clever, caring and able. He’s never been a yes man - T Blair appointed him to think the unthinkable then sacked him when he did.  
Here is an insulin drug manufacturer confirming there will be no insulin shortages at #Brexit.Whereas #ProjectFear said there would be.No.10 and Project Fear should be utterly ashamed for telling lies on health. We shouldn't be scared into accepting the horrific #ChequersPlan 
You refuse to see the real reasons why people voted for brexit. 
#Labour MP Frank Field - “It would have been a betrayal of the principles I have held for my entire political life, had I voted against the #Brexit legislation two weeks ago.”  
A wise thread by Ali here. Less than a year ago, those like me who talked seriously about stopping Brexit or a #FinalSayForAll we’re generally still dismissed as cranks, fantasists, or worse, experts. We’ve got a hell of a long way to go, but those ideas are now mainstream. 
99.9% of Brexitons:• did not campaign for Brexit• did no research before voting for Brexit• did not march for Brexit• even now do little more than tweet other people's memes and slogans.Where will they suddenly find the energy to riot if they do not get Brexit? 
If this guy could have found the voting booth, he would have voted Brexit. Thanks Theresa and Jezza for listening to the likes of him, rather than us, on the future of our nation.#NoDealBrexit 
We don't want another referendum or #PeoplesVoteWe voted to leave the #EUPlease sign and RT petition as widely as possible #Brexit #bbcqt #conservative #UKIP @V_of_Europe @DVATW 
This is what happens when you disagree with the #EUWe do not need another referendum or #PeoplesVoteWe have already decided.#Brexit #Conservatives #Marr 
Brexit is "the saddest thing that's happened" to Britain and many people were misled, Richard Branson says  
I don’t see sufficient evidence the referendum result was ‘bought.’ We lost it & if we fail to recognise this we won’t make big political & policy changes essential to stay in Europe. But dodgy & illegal practices took place which must be rooted out & banned for people’s vote  
The headline we're waiting for. It's like the 'Murderers' Daily Mail front page over the Stephen Lawrence killersPUTIN BOUGHT BREXIT. I'm still waiting for a paper to join the dots, and dare the headline @J_amesp 
‘Plucky little panel’ that found the truth about fake news, Facebook and Brexit  
"The Lawfare Podcast: Talking Brexit," the latest from Jen Patja Howell:  
Join us in Newcastle on August 25th for a rally to demand a #PeoplesVote on the final #Brexit deal  
EU Referendum is now looking like a serious crime scene   
A referendum to amend the constitution in the Comoros has put the island state on edge  
DUP Brexit ads: "Better for borders" and the utter lie, "Better for our security" Brexit means we lose the European Arrest Warrant, access to SIS2 and Prüm which are vital to our security services. And the majority of these ads were seen in GB, not NI. Lot of questions  
I understand a lot of people don't like trump but having a president with some backbone to take the shit and still push his country forward is great I wish we had a stronger leader for #Brexit 
Too bloody true. BBC has taken a life long fan and defender and turned me into an advocate of abolition. Simply as a result of their ridiculous brexit coverage. 
My guess here is that @BBCNews won't admit that #VoteLeave broke the law until people are physically arrested, charged and found guilty in Court. So, just now they're only prepared to use the word 'allegations'. I'm in no way defending them because #VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw#Brexit 
IAIN DUNCAN SMITH: Brexit proposal a betrayal of 17.5 million voters  via @MailOnline 
It's not just pro-independence people in Scotland who should be worried about these intimidation tactics from the BBC.It's very easy to imagine how the same tactics could be used to shut down and silence other dissident political voices (pro-Corbyn &/or anti-Brexit for example)  
This is why Brexit is so scary: a minority of zealot Brexiteers don’t care what damage it will cause - they see it as a badge of honour. And when the economy tanks, Farage and co will be ready to shout “Brexit betrayal!” as they and their rich mates watch the poor get poorer.  
Through the dark clouds of the EU a WTO #BREXIT is brewing. The future's bright, the future's #WTO 
Jinty the Brexit Wummin is getting ready to sell stuff like real Irn Bru, paracetamol and insulin  
Thank you for your voice @DJJY  #BREXIT 
#Brexiteer hero Labour MP Frank Field hits out at his local party after losing no-confidence vote over #Brexit He has put principle above career, unlike Leavers in CabinetYet more evidence that Labour have abandoned the working classes outside London 
Saw #MammaMia #HereWeGoAgain for a second time tonight and honestly shrieked when @cher started to sing, after 2 days of Brexit nonsense threads it's the absolute greatest heartsoaring big gay glittery tonic my heart needs right now. Gonna go again yes I am 
Melissa promised she would move back to the US if 'yes' lost the 2014 referendum. Why is she still here spouting her idiotic nationalist bile? 
Fine @benjaminwittes, I'm guilty enough now to recommend the @lawfareblog Podcast, but only because you talked about my beautiful wee island for the majority of a great conversation on Brexit  
Thank you very much. And to all my former haters, now supporters. Welcome all. We #standstrong together x  #brexit 
The list of every MP that has backed a referendum on the final Brexit deal  
Starving, syphilitic & sugared into a deep vegetative state, they crawled towards their deaths with bleeding fingernails and shredded nipples all. #BREXIT  
The deselection campaign begins in earnest, I know many will disagree with Mr Field's record on Brexit, but that is being used as an excuse by the hard-Left to replace him with one of their candidates.Mr Field though has taken them on before & won. 
€1bn Fund managed by ScotGov to address poverty, improve infrastructure & the environment is now to be run by Westminster after Brexit  
Another Brexiteer already blaming the EU for the fallout of Brexit. These people are unbelievable.  
"A second #Brexit referendum is back in play": The Economist  
Brexit, according to ardent remainers, will be responsible for the following:-obesity-tanking economy -shortage of dairy -scarcity of wine-insulin shortages -loss of science/medicineAnd now: 
Ok, Brexiters, put this under your pillow and think about whether #Brexit is worth it.Good night!  
1975 First referendum2016 Second referendum.Remainers can wait till 2057 for a third referendum. That's only fair & balanced. I'll make a prediction. They won't want one. UK PLC will be booming by that time, free, independent & trading with the whole World. 
Brexit is going to end up killing people.  
The brilliance of Brexit is the daily evidence that our elected politicians know more about industry and business than those who do it or regulate it. Now the Member for Harwich understands the pharma industry better than the UK Medicines Regulator. We truly live in blessed times  
I support Scottish Independence & am calling for a second referendum. I am looking to connect with others who agree.Please:  1 Like 2 Retweet 3 Follow I will follow backCopy this tweet to your own #DissolveTheUnion 
So the Referendum was bought, but nobody quite knows by whom. This alone should be enough for Theresa May to concede a new Referendum. The ending of a few political careers will be a small price to pay for safeguarding our democracy. #FBPE #StopBrexit 
Nick Clegg backs Independent's campaign for a referendum on final Brexit deal #FinalSay 
my dad came through to show me a piece in Private Eye pointing out that the price of gold spiked 10% after the EU referendum and is expected to make further gains in the event of a hard Brexit. potential benefactors include hard Brexiter Daniel Kawczynski MP, and Arron Banks.  
Tell us something we don’t know at least there is one European leader who is trying to speak up for 17.4million people who voted for #Brexit @matteosalvinimi thank you. 
The #VoteLeave #Brexit campaign been evidenced to have been a criminal conspiracy backed by dark money and the #AltRight....orchestrated by a lot of posh boys...backed by the Daily Mail...notice the similarity. 
Important to read this twitter thread - from lots of different business owners who are screwed and sinking because of Brexit.  
2016. 2ND REFERENDUM1975. 1ST REFERENDUM2007. Labour signed Lisbon locking us into EU unless we triggered Article 50. No Referendum.1992. Tories signed Maastricht leading to development of the EU. No Referendum.1972. Tories led us into (what became) the EU. No Referendum. 
I've been saying for a while now that advocates of a United Ireland can't simply rely on #brexit and #demographics to lead to change. That's why I'm looking forward to engaging here to create more compelling, positive arguments too...  
We've not just been had on Brexit. We we had on austerity removing our safety net. We've been had since the 1970s when wages decoupled from productivity. We've been had on housing. Had, had, had. 
#Ireland's Deputy #PM: #Article50 could be extended... @simoncoveney YOU can F*CK right OFF! #Brexit delayed even further. This will NOT happen - the #British people have waited long enough!  #BBC #SKY @LBC #LBC @ConHome @CCHQPress @Conservative #Tory 
NewsLens is an interesting way to visualize and see the evolution of a long-running news story. Check out Brexit:  - academic paper here:  
BBC News - Royal Welsh Show: Brexit 'seismic shock' farming warning  
#REMAINER #ProjectFear is reaching boiling point. Brace yourselves, their #scaremongering is getting more and more ridiculous by the day! ! #BBC #SKY @LBC #LBC @ConHome @CCHQPress @Conservative #Tory @andreajenkyns #Tories @BrexitStewart @DCBMEP #Brexit #UK #EU 
#Brexit #Britain and the #EU have filed for divorce at the #WTO, paving the way for #Britain to regain her independent seat at the top table of #worldtrade.   #MayMustGo #BBC #SKY @LBC #LBC @ConHome @CCHQPress @Conservative #Tory @andreajenkyns 
Give a person “Brexit” and they’ll be fed up for ever. 
She has had two years to prove herself as a British leader. She has failed on many levels. The manifesto, the election, the people’s referendum result and now Brexit. Tory MPs plot to oust Prime Minister before October  
Correct @BBCNewsnight but @carolecadwalla Codswallop and her bitch @DamianCollins and the @ElectoralCommUK desperate to say that leave side acted illegally so than can overturn the referendum. They didn’t - the EC did not take any evidence from Leave campaign so clearly biased.  
. There are two level-headed and relentless leaders re: #Brexit --> @Nigel_Farage (the epitome) and this young man, @DanJukes17 Thank You God for these men. 
Thank you for the emails. If you are a member of the British forces or police & are attending training for Civil Unrest I would love to hear from you. In confidence khpl@protonmail.com #BREXIT 
335,000 people have signed this Independent endorsed petition in 3 days for a People’s Vote Referendum on The Deal.Can we get it to 500,000 by Sunday evening?Sign now if you care about our wonderful country #Brexit #Brexitshambles #PeoplesVotePetition 
Children already traumatized from being kidnapped by this Administration are also being sexually assaulted while in custody. Kirstjen Nielsen needs to be fired immediately. Let the midterms be a referendum on every last one of these bigoted, backwards thugs. #Resist #thedailydon 
Post referendum, the choice is not Leave versus Remain. It is Brexit or the collapse of democracy. There is anarchy in the air #BREXIT  
BREXIT Does Not Require A Trade Deal. Since 1949, Britain has been a fully-paid up founder member of GATT, the General Agreement on Trade & Tarifss - renamed as the 'World Trade Organisation'. Britain does not NEED a deal with the EU to continue economic activity around the world 
Labour get pro Brexit members deselected, whereas Conservatives won't even comprehend deselecting their most troublesome anti Brexit Torys.The Brexit stitchup continues... Bit by bit.  
Quite; I've always thought this. A brexit gone wrong will result in large numbers of brexiters even more angry than they are now as well as angry remainers. At least we'd only have angry brexiters if brexit were cancelled. 
Are you a miller and a twit? Are you for real that it was accepted that there would be a financial hit? The whole "Project Fear" was that there would be no impact. Now the only question is how much will it be? And when will you deliver on the promises you made for #Brexit?  
Britain is considering a controversial Brexit plan for the Irish border that could enrage the DUP  
You know when someone does something that's just so unbelievably cringy lame you can't look?That's every politician who says "people's vote". What a bunch of idiots.It's a second referendum because you lost. Have the balls to call it what it is."people's vote"  
#Brexiteer @JWhittingdale confronts #OllyRobbins about his scheme to usurp #Brexit. Look at the big, nasty grin on his face - with #TheresaMay in his corner, this massive #Europhile knows he has total freedom to sell us down the river!  #MayMustGo #BBC #SKY 
The Remain campaign was led by Tories, like Cameron, who were ambivalent about Europe. Remainers need committed, passionate, pro-EU leadership if Brexit is to be overturned. 
Looks like UK population will be increased by 300 million if US immigrants forced to go home! #Stopbrexit #FBPE #Brexit #GuyVerhofstadt #WATON #Barnier 
Every time a Brexiter says the EU is forcing us into a no-deal, remind them that they said we held all the cards in the negotiations, and that German car manufacturers would force the EU to compromise, and that they dismissed our warnings as 'project fear'.#Brexit #PeoplesVote 
No wonder Brexit got the vote.Why is the UK Press so f*cking awful? If we were in the top 3-5, we would be utterly damning of a country in 33rd place.  
John Nelson, former Chairman of Lloyds of London nails the present #Brexit situation in his letter to the @FinancialTimes 
Jeremy Corbyn voted with Bill Cash against the EU almost every single time. No confidence vote. The truth is, if he wasn’t the leader he’d be backing the Government on Brexit now.  
brexit is such a disaster, it's like as a nation we've tried to return a football to some kids but whacked it straight at the fence and the shame oh god the shame 
US therapists have described an Anxiety Disorder caused by the Trump Presidency. They've dubbed it 'Trump Anxiety Disorder'. or TAD.Here in Britain, I'Ve noticed a similar disorder caused by Brexit. We can refer to it as Brexit Anxiety Disorder, or BAD.  
Sign our petition calling for a referendum on the Brexit deal #FinalSay 
It's not a 2nd referendum, 'cos a 2nd referendum would mean it'd be the exact same question with the exact same knowledge we had in 2016.We have more detail now; we're more informed & aware of the consequences.So it's a final say, or #PeoplesVote. But you knew that. 
It's right to draw attention to targeted dark advertising on social media, but by far the largest effect on voting was surely the blatant campaign of anti-EU hate and lies poured out by the #Brexit billionaire press. And that this could happen is a scandal.#StopBrexit 
Project fear underway again .....   Brexit: Millions of diabetes patients could be 'seriously disadvantaged' by insulin shortages if no deal reached  
Exclusive: Liam Fox warns Theresa May that extending Brexit talks would be a 'complete betrayal'  
The attempt by Labour to deselect Kate Hoey and others for voting in favour of the referendum result and Labour’s own manifesto must never be forgotten nor forgiven. Labour must be eternally damned for betraying Brexit. 
People shouting abuse at anti-Brexit campaigners because of the EU's grotesque policies on refugees: you are right about the EU's policies but wrong about Brexit. The UK on its own is even worse: we need to be inside the EU fighting for a better Europe 
More than 330,000 people back The Independent's campaign for a vote on government's Brexit dealCome on #Remain...RT & RT again....let's get it over the million...then set the next target...#FinalSay #PeoplesVote #StopBrexit & #Remain 
It is a special sort of irony when the right wing eurosceptic Austrian Chancellor is advising the PM to avoid a #HardBrexit. Goes to show that #Brexit is far from the paradise we were told it would be. An #exitfrombrexit is the only sensible option now. 
That British voters are increasingly unhappy with PM May and her government should come as no surprise at all. Her conviction on Brexit is underwhelming and her prevarication is unbecoming for a British prime minister.   
Be honest.You know it.And I know it.Sybil Fawlty would kick some Brussels arse and have our Brexit deal in 5 minutes flat.She wouldn't be making a pig's ear of it like that useless article Theresa bleedin' May's doing.#FawltyTowers 
Well, no need to panic, Britnats. According to ITV and STV News, absolutely nothing happened in Inverness today. There's no appetite for independence or another "divisive" referendum. Just carry on believing that, guys! 
The clue is in the picture.I believed her #Brexit means Brexit lies.The truth is: She is a remainer.  Olly Robbins is a remainer. She asked Olly Robbins to draw up the #ChequersPlan behind the Brexit departments back She does not believe in Brexit#MAYMUSTGO 
Channel 4 news & Sky news never seem to have this much trouble. @BBCPolitics is just inept on the Russia story & on Brexit. It's got to be editorial as I'm sure @KirstyWark must know better. 
@UKParliament    Agreed - Parliament itself should now move to annul the A 50 notification immediately,  and all MPs who support "brexit" should now be appropriately sanctioned. 
A second referendum.  
Leader of Italy’s right warns EU ‘swindling’ Britain out of Brexit 
#Brexit#UnityReferendumAn agreed, united Ireland...the big idea whose time has come! 
How YouGov's 2nd referendum tracker has moved  
‘Dear’ ##BBC,Watch the below, before collectively hanging your heads in SHAME:This is as much your #BrexitScam as it is the despicable and dangerous  ‘hecklers and clowns’ you’ve given free reign too.... 
Back in #Britain after driving 2219 miles crossing four countries and five borders. That’s one very long jam on the approach road to Dover Port. @theresa_may will, with the will of the government, surely have this sorted before #Brexit adds visa and customs checks? Maybe.  
The comedy writer, James Felton, put it aptly when he tweeted: Is there any other way to spin this other than “millionaire protects his millions from Brexit whilst telling the poor to wait 50 years to see if they *might* be better off”? #StopBrexit #FBPE 
On the contrary, WTO rules are a perfectly good and workable deal. Moreover the EU, which has been stonewalling on a bespoke UK/EU deal, will be under huge pressure from EU industries to do a UK trade deal after a WTO Brexit.  
About 40 Tory MPs including Leavers and Remainers are reported to have formed a Brexit Delivery Group dedicated to stopping a Tory Civil War and any Brexiteer coup. Party unity should come first? But what kind of Brexit do they want to deliver? Sounds like another Tory sellout. 
Da iawn i chi gyd! Well done to you all!Fantastic turnout today in Llanelli for the launch of #CarmarthenshireForEurope #Brexit #FBPE 
Italy’s deputy prime minister today accuses the European Union of trying to “swindle” Britain out of the Brexit that the public voted for  
honestly i feel pretty down and poorly today but we bumped into my mum's friend in town & she thought i was seventeen so i feel chirpier now  my BA in digital art may not stand up to the PhDs & law degrees among the other anti-Brexit women but at least i look like a child lmao 
There's more than 12,651 EU-mandated tariffs Britain can revoke the day after a #WTOBrexit.Even if we repeal only those for which there's no domestic industry/supply, how much cheaper will imports become for ordinary Britons after a clean and clear WTO Brexit?  
This petition by The @Independent for a referendum on any Brexit deal has clocked over 300,000 signatures in 3 days! Add yours —>  
Whilst it’s true not everyone in The UK who voted for Brexit was racist, maybe even a majority weren’t. You can b sure that everyone who IS racist in the UK voted for Brexit and has been emboldened by the vote; they see it as a legitimisation, that most people agree with them  
Millions of diabetes patients could be 'seriously disadvantaged' by insulin shortages after no-deal Brexit #FinalSay 
A referendum  
#Lies, Damned Lies and @Channel4News..... making it up as they report it! the #Remain #News channel! #FakeNews #FakeNewsMedia #channel4news #Channel4 #SKY @LBC #LBC @ConHome @CCHQPress #ConservativeParty #Tory #Tories #Brexit #BrexitArmageddon #Remain 
Bannon is calling the upcoming midterms criticalit’s Trump‘s “first reelect” & “referendum” on his presidency.To hold onto Congress:Go door-to-doorVoter registration drivesVOTE 4 the Rhinos Days to get the job done  
Awrite hen wit ye think of this brexit thing? YAAAS!  
Fiona it isn't his memories he has lost.Just his sense of right from wrong.#brexit_is_a_crime_scene 
Bannon's interference here is proof that Brexit is part of a wider neo-fascist plan. He's a white supremacist, a liar and should be treated like any other hate-preacher. Why did he get a visa? Why doesn't the hostile environment extend to slugs like him?#BanBannon#FightFascism 
Our #FinalSay petition for a referendum on the final Brexit deal has cleared 330,000 signatures! Join the campaign and let your voice be heard -  
Ah Frank, it’s called consequences! And I wonder if other Labour MPs have clocked that Labour voters don’t appreciate their MPs supporting Brexit? Nor should they it will shaft them. #Corbyn? Is there any point bothering. He’s a Brexiteer to the end. 
 The curse of Brexit strikes again   
That’s why he’s still lying about the benefits of Brexit when every reasonable observer knows there are no benefits only incredible damage to people’s lives & the economy. That’s a man who wants to capitalise on Brexit not stop it. A man who voted for it in 2011, with Kate Hoey  
Might go to a club tonight, get mad wae it, and ask youngsters "What d'you make of this Brexit then?"Right in the middle of the dance floor. While dancing. Me with my 43 year old face and hairline. 
In Lidl today I overheard "we forgot the Brexit tins. Better go back down that aisle ". 
Breaking:The Prime Minister, Oliver 'Smuggo' Robbins says that without a Brexit deal, he's worried that the EU27 will repeal the UK's Law of Gravity on 29/3/19.'It would be illegal for objects to be attracted to Earth' he said. 'An appalling prospect. We must surrender'  
Activists say the turnout proves that there is still an appetite for independence four years from the referendum  
I'm actually coming round to having a second referendum. 'Leave' would win again. Not a single leave voter I know has changed their mind since the 2016 referendum. And seeing how the EU & Remoaners have behaved since. There is no doubt in my mind 'Leave' would win again. #Brexit 
Labour MP Frank Field loses confidence vote after backing government over Brexit 
Frederick Forsyth on May & BREXIT: How come  politicians and civil servants, wholly living off our taxes, dependent for every mouthful of food and the roofs over their heads on our money, are allowed to work night and day to deprive us of what we want? 
We in the legal profession have a word for such sophistry BBC - bullshit. When the Brexit inquiry comes, someone in the BBC is going to be fingered hard. In the meantime, onetime journalists such as @KirstyWark must look to their consciences. 
Senior ex-diplomat backs The Independent's campaign for a referendum on final Brexit deal #FinalSay 
If a bank allows a client to launder money they're equally guilty, the BBC are offering a duplicitous explanation here. Their facilitating Matthew Elliott in his attempt to rebut being found guilty, prior to the publication of the Electoral Commission report, was the final straw. 
Bannon: 2018 midterm is a referendum on the Trump presidency. Why it’s IMPERATIVE that we energize and repeat our performance of the Presidential election. Same as #Trump re-elect. #VoteRed2018 #RedWaveRising2018 
As public indignation in #Peru over corruption reaches breaking point, Pres. Martín Vizcarra uses his independence day speech to announce a sweeping reform of the judiciary & a referendum on the reelection of lawmakers in the country's hugely unpopular congress #MensajeALaNación 
Given the way the BBC are misusing copyright claims to shout down Scottish independence folk on social media, surely it's only a matter of time before they begin using the same tactics to shut down anti-Brexit sites like this one for using short 'fair use' clips of BBC programmes  
The Cornish fisherman have concluded they have been shafted by false brexit promises. The UK has never had a law they proposed rejected by Brussels. Had Brussels not strengthened the banking rules the 2008 crash would have cost the UK much more. 
Brexit is a con. RT. 
Before the #EU #referendum, #JohnMajor said it's "not politically credible" to hold another referendum after a #vote to #Leave. Couldn't agree more... #RightTheFirstTime!  #SKY @LBC #LBC @ConHome @CCHQPress #ConservativeParty #Tory @andreajenkyns #Tories 
Without revision of the Election rules to outlaw dark ads (all ads paper or digital should be logged with @ElectoralCommUK), make people accountable for the outright lies they tell, & jail time for electoral cheating, a second referendum would be a very dangerous exercise indeed.  
Other British cities "are more exposed than London" to the effects of a bad deal for financial services after Brexit  
Do you know I’m getting bloody sick and tired of being insulted for my choice that I made after lots of thought and consideration! I’m sick to death of having my intellect questioned! I’m sick to death of being accused of being xenophobic! My vote counts #Brexit  
Small country, big heart. Recognition from @CLAtweets president Tim Breitmeyer of the strength of Wales' approach to post-Brexit land policy. #ourlandourfuture 
No one expected the Tories to be quite as inept or deluded as they have been, there was no #Stopbrexit campaign to begin with. Just some angry people on twitter asking for “That one Brexit benefit” 4/ 
Those people, were headed up by,Conservative Leaders/Mps who either resigned,Or are now frantically trying to be hypocritical to themselves and push for hard Brexit.Others were opposition MPs. Who are also pushing for Brexit. 2/ 
I want to make something clear.The Remain campaign comes in for a lot of criticism from amongst others,  Remainers.Whilst there is some justification maybe, there is something worth remembering.The official 2016 Remain campaign disappeared after the referendum. 1/ 
Everything these days is just entertaining to people until it hits them square in the face, including Brexit.  And when it does it will be someone else's fault.  Watch Brexit ruin the UK and the right wing press place the blame on the EU.  The numpties will parrot it en masse. 
It's becoming more and and more apparent that the UK's suicidal Brexit vote was based in large part on lies promoted by people, including foreign adversaries, who wanted the country to harm itself. Sound familiar?  
Ive been posting this for 12 to 18 months. Bannon as and the Mercers bankrolled brexit to use us for tax haven. The Mp's in your post are complicit 
Brexiteers, please replace any #NoDeal hashtags with #WTOBrexit. Let's call it what it is!A WTO Brexit is better than any EU fudge?  
It’s pretty simple Brexiters.You can’t trade without a trade deal. A no deal Brexit means Britain would be the only country in the world with 0 trade deals after we leave the EU on March 29th 2019. 
Brexit will allow us to have lower, fairer and simpler taxes   
"Near zero optimism." "It's going to be very messy." Senior officials in Theresa May’s team are privately terrified Brexit negotiations will fail  
Well ... if this doesn’t kill off the referendum result I don’t know what will! 
Stockpiling food/medicines/blood, we will deliver #Brexit for the will of the people, the will of the people means disaster for the 48m who voted remain or didn't vote at all, a tory govt is going to use a non binding referendum to destroy the many, think about that #PeoplesVote 
'I talk to students up and down the country about Brexit. They are firm supporters of a second referendum' #FinalSay 
WTO Boss says Britain will Trade Fine after Brexit. There will be NO trade vacuum and he will personally work to ensure a smooth transition  
The EU must have a death wish as it risks destroying itself over its Brexit malice, in their maniac desire to punish Britain for leaving they seem prepared to damage their own national interests, EU industry needs a fair deal, the UK’s in a much better position to go it alone. 
Sign our petition calling for a referendum on the Brexit deal #FinalSay 
Good question! Through personal friends who have left because of Brexit I alone know of 7 who won’t.  
Sold down May's riverShe will never be forgivenShe surrounded herself with 5th columnOn our hands & knees foreverAll we ever wanted was a fair #BrexitBritish-EU cohabitation based on common sense, mutual benefit &goodwillChurchill, where are you!#EU 
Although the Zim election is too close to call,I'm convinced Nelson Chamisa is ahead of Emmerson Mnangagwa & could take it. I've closely followed this campaign from day 1. If it goes to a run-off, Mnangagwa will lose hands down; a run-off is really a referendum on the incumbent. 
I think @mrjamesob will emerge a hero but some Brexit editors will have to live with a) Leading their readers to economic disaster and b) being unwittingly manipulated by hostile foreign money.  
Adam... you need to stop putting yourself down. I have total respect for democracy and different opinions. I have never called for a second referendum...now I know what I didn't know 18 months ago I am worried enough to want to fight for what I believe in. That's good isn,t it?  
There was a little bit of snow earlier on this year.It interrupted the flow of food into the shops for a few days.Panic buying made the situation worse.Now just think about #brexit #supplychain chaosafter a #NoDealBrexit under this incompetent govt ? 
@novonordisk Could I ask what plans are in place to supply insulin in the UK, if a no-deal Brexit becomes a reality?Thank you 
Hurtling towards a no deal Brexit, they exclaim...No. More than 40 non-EU countries want free trade agreements with the UK when we leave the EU.Crashing out of the EU, they say...No. We'll proceed on World Trade Organization (WTO) rules. We've been a WTO Member since 1995. 
The EU risks destroying itself over Brexit malice - EXPRESS COMMENT  
Surely Bannon should be excluded as an enemy of the state & undesirable or are fascists ok with @ukhomeoffice now? 
This is what Brexit and the MPs that have supported it have fertilised and emboldened.We cannot let them win.  
Steve Bannon - Trump’s chief strategist in 2016 election - now in close liaison with Farage, Johnson, Gove & Rees-Mogg in anti-EU campaign... One might almost think the two things might be related. #Brexit #voteleavebrokethelaw 
Extend to Pretend!Liam Fox: The public told us to leave the EUThe public already wonders why it's taking more than 4 years after referendum to fully remove ourselves from #EUTo attempt to extend our membership even longer is a complete betrayal.#Brexit 
If Barnier and Juncker don’t like the UK's #Brexit proposal and insist on continuing to punish us then they leave us with no choice. No-deal is the only logical next step.  
HOW THE PARLIAMENTARY CONSTITUENCY OF #TOTNES VOTED AT THE EU REFERENDUM:53.9% Leave46.1% RemainSource: Professor Christopher Hanretty. 
Nadine Dorries MP - "There is a definite sway and a definite global move towards the right. A global move towards being eurosceptic.“Because the EU has served well Germany and a small number of countries. But there are others who have paid prices." #Brexit  
More than 300,000 people back The Independent's campaign for a vote on government's Brexit deal #FinalSay 
Theresa May tells people not to worry about plans to stockpile food and medicine in run up to Brexit You couldn’t make it upBrexit madness  
Rees-Mogg DISMANTLES calls for second Brexit referendum with THIS dazzling point  
The proportion of voters who favour a referendum on the final terms of any Brexit deal has overtaken those who do not for the first time - the momentum for a #PeoplesVote is growing! Attend the People's Vote March for the Future on 20th October:  
Ye looking forward to Brexit, aye? 
They manufacture cars too...USJapanS KoreaThey make wine too...AustraliaUSNZSouth AfricaThey produce fruit too...AustraliaSouth AfricaNZMexicoUSSt LuciaDominicaThey produce meat too...AustraliaNZArgentinaAnd we can lower or scrap tariffs post-Brexit. 
Another Remoaner losing their mind over the referendum result. 
Fascinating to hear the so-called “Taxpayers Alliance” explain the entire future of our post Brexit country in detail but being unable to explain who funds their salaries. What are they hiding? (Asking on behalf of many genuine Taxpayers)  
A 'no Brexit deal' would mean a government negotiation failure, if that happens then there is no alternative but to call a General Election.  The only government who can sort this Tory mess out is a Labour government  
Steve Bannon on 2018 Midterms: This is Going to be Trump's First Re-election-A Referendum on the Trump Presidency (VIDEO) The mid-terms are as important as the 2016 election was.  If Dems get the majority they will unwind everything Trump has done.  
It is perfectly clear, the Establishment are STILL deaf to us, the little people. There is talk of delaying article 50. A second referendum is on the cards. And we now know Theresa May is Angela Merkel, a slightly less offensive wig.... #Brexit  
The economic impact of Brexit:A no deal (WTO) scenario means a decade long recession - worse than the 2008-2009 financial crisis.  
Our current government is on borrowed time. #spygate all roads lead to the uk.#failure to deliver #brexit we voted for.Restricting #freespeech and imprisoning ppl brave enough to speak out.#freetommy #FreeMelanieshaw#mayout #ticktock @Jonteinspain 
Is UK Govt really so inhumane that it would pursue a policy that risked supplies of vital drugs? And why would the UK want to impoverish its own pharma sector by losing the EMA and cutting supply chains.No wonder Brexiters have to lie and blame to get their no-deal-Brexit.  
The patriotic Kate Hoey & Frank Field threatened by Momentum thugs with deselection from the Labour Party, their great sin is voting for Brexit & putting Country before Party, they represent 1,000’s of Labour Leave voters across Britain while their Leadership betrays them. 
In the event of a no-deal Brexit, UK Network members will be fully protected. We've been stockpiling beef and beef based medicines for over seventy five years. 
Straight from the horse's mouth - so @david_lammy @ChukaUmunna @Anna_Soubry Can we NOW dispense with the #FakeNews of how #Brexit on WTO will be a catastrophe for Britain - Stop spreading #Remoaner lies 
Since 1990 only 24% of net immigration has come from the EU with 76%  from outside the EU. @jeremycorbyn should realise that one of his arguments for supporting Brexit is false.  Immigration unlikely to fall if Brexit goes ahead. @UKLabour @Labour4EU @@Keir_Starmer @peoplesvote 
Naivety of UK PM is as appalling as it’s embarrassing-this is the future of the country! Theresa May’s attempt to bypass Brussels in Brexit talks fails as member states line up to back official EU position  
The sky will cave in, volcanoes will erupt and their will be a tsunami after #Brexit unless we remain the the #EU#GuessProjectFear 
Another Brexit Ultra who can't grasp that if UK chooses to leave the systems that allow frictionless trade and supply then ... there won't be frictionless trade and supply. Not much the EU can do, unless Jenkin is advocating that it refuses to accept the UK's choice.  
As a parliamentary body, the CMS select committee is very cautious. Having investigated I'd say it's almost certain that Arron Banks received substantial foreign donations to fund Brexit. If he wants to sue, bring it on. 
Brexit has already done damage which will take generations to heal: if it doesn’t happen now, half the population will never forgive the other half; if it does happen, NEITHER half of the population will ever forgive the other half. 
We've got to the bit in the fairy tale where even the most deluded members of the crowd start realising that the little boy is right.Emperor #Brexit has no clothes.The question is, what happens next?#PeoplesVote 
Great article that elegantly makes a point that I have been pitching during my fortnight in London, now ending. The thought of a London sans immigrants is truly depressing.  And completely unnecessary.  Brexit = own goal.  
British farmers say a no-deal #brexit would be an "Armageddon scenario"Let's be blunt. A no-deal #Brexit would be little short of an act of war against the British people by a tiny minority craving a #BrexitTaxHaven.#PeoplesVote #StopBrexit 
Brexiters are going to be very upset on March 30th if we've left the EU and the country's still full of brown people and EU citizens. then what? what are they going to do post-Brexit when Britain's still full of foreigners? you see what a slippery slope Brexit is @jeremycorbyn? 
ppplleeeasee folks stop dancing on the head of a needle to justify ineptitude. FBSBook said it had banned/stopped use of illicit data in '15. A lie. It said its platform had not been used to influence Brexit initially - a lie. Then slowly but surely truth came out. 
We are uniting the north for the Great Northern Stop #Brexit Conference! We are delighted to add Julie Ward @julie4nw, MEP for North West England, who joins previously announced speakers from Yorkshire & The Humber (@RCorbettMEP) and NE England (@Jude_KD).  pic.twitter.com/KLwfcQbGwI 
a woman in Boots just looked at my pro-EU bag and Bollocks to Brexit sticker and started asking me my opinion on bite creams  maybe she thought ah now, here's a woman who knows what she's talking about! 
When I got up this morning one of the first things I saw was the photo of a removal van. It was filled with the belongings of my friend @cos_detoma and her family. Their history is now one of #Brexodus. My second friend in two weeks to leave because of Brexit. Miss you already x  
The rejection of Achakzai & the whole anti Kalabagh Dam gang by the voters is a referendum & a mandate for the incoming government to build Dams in Pakistan. #DamsForPakistan 
“Jacob Rees-Mogg warns his ultra rich clients about the ‘considerable uncertainty’ of Brexit, whilst telling British people to follow him over the cliff edge.” (Gina Miller) 
The ERG will always cry betrayal. A soft brexit won't be a hard brexit. A hard brexit won't be hard enough. No deal will be the wrong sort of no deal. Nothing can placate them. May and most Tory MPs should stand up to them and stop them holding the whole of the UK to ransom. 
Mike Russell @Feorlean speaking in Renfrewshire  @theSNP new members meeting ‘Brexit creates biggest challenge 2Scottish Parliament but also presents a huge challenge for Scottish People, we have to b prepared & protect Scotland’  
The Astronomer Royal:The Prime Minister, Mr Oliver Robbins, has instructed me to announce that following a no-deal Brexit, continued rotation of the Earth cannot beguaranteed.Plans beyond 29/3/19 should NOT assume night follows day, nor vice versa  
I care about Brexit so much that in a couple of minutes I’ll be interrupting the Berlin Pride festivities to talk to the nation about how shit it is.Fortunately for me and for LBC listeners, you can’t see what I’m wearing 
The narrative: "I voted for Brexit. I had no idea what it entailed. I bought promises for things that were undeliverable. The leaders of my glorious revolution had no plan and all scuttled back under their rocks. But if I now don't get what I was promised, IT'S REMAINERS' FAULT."  
We are being sold down Brexit river How come 5th column of politicians & civil servantswholly living off our taxes,dependent for every mouthful of food& the roofs over their heads on our money,are allowed to work night & day to deprive us of #Brexit?  
“The campaign for a second referendum isn’t really a campaign for a second referendum.  It’s a campaign for stopping Brexit.” @PaulGoodmanCH 
This is the 2nd Labour MP that’s had no confidence motion passed against them because of their Brexit stance not representing the constituents. A reminder that an overwhelming majority of Labour members/voters are anti-Brexit. It’s time for a policy change @jeremycorbyn. #FBPE 
Part of a thread. Brexit will harm the worst-off most.  
Brexit means no cheese, no butter, no sandwiches, and now everyone's going to get gonorrhoea. Remoaners really are superb at hysterical comedy!  
Steve Bannon on 2018 midterms: "This is President @realDonaldTrump's first re-elect. This is gonna be an up or down vote. It's a referendum on the Trump presidency." #Hannity 
Should we postpone/extend/rescind Art 50 and hold a 2nd referendum?...please rt. 
The Brexit bill covers what we would’ve paid had we stayed during transition period& handily covers EU budget hole for that timeframeWhat EU don’t get is, if they’re not giving an FTA, we don’t need a transition period & don’t care about their budget gap 
Putin's favourite GOP congressman is also friends with Nigel Farage and the family of Arron Banks. Notice the connection here#Trump #Russia #Brexit  
How Brexit has been the EU's saving grace  
Parliament investigates the use of black propaganda in the Referendum. Dominic Cummings, one of the leading black propagandists, refuses to be questioned by Parliament. He then leaks the report, garners press attention, and calls it "fake news". The BBC reports it uncritically. 
'I talk to students up and down the country about Brexit. They are firm supporters of a second referendum'  
Steve Bannon on 2018 Midterms: This is Going to be Donald Trump's First Re-elect - A Referendum on the Trump Presidency (VIDEO)  via @gatewaypundit #VoteRed2018#RedWaveRising #VoteDemsOut#KAG2018 
DUP’s Brexit ads overwhelmingly targeted voters outside N Ireland w/v similar messages to supposedly separate Vote Leave. Raises more co-ordination questions says @naomi_long @openDemocracy latest 
BFE: The #PeoplesVote March for the Future takes place on October 20th! Have you signed up yet?  Don't forget that the majority of the country now backs a #PeoplesVote on Brexit given the mess we're in! Sign the petition here:   
Good point by someone on here, @bbc has also taken down the parliament channel and Daily/Sunday politics. As if they want to shut down debate and criticism of UKGov/Brexit. Something stinks. 
Fake news isn’t the problem, Fake Democracy is.1) Transfer law making to the EU2) Hold a Referendum on whether to take it back or not3) People vote to take it back4) Govnt works to betray the peoples’ verdict 5) MPs plan to restrict free speech  
Bannon in contact with Rees-Mogg, Gove and Johnson. Bannon is the top link man between the kleptocrats and the fascists and racists who in the form of a Kleptonationalist axis are, in alliance with Putin, trying to destroy our democracies.  #brexit #FBPE 
We heard the same B/S argument from the tobacco lobby. Don’t interfere with our targeting of kids with our advertising, because there is no evidence that they are in any way influenced. Question - then why do it, and at considerable cost? Brexit was rigged by bad people. 
RT @spikedonline  When people say they want to ‘stop Brexit’, they’re really saying they want to stop democracy, says Brendan O’Neill:  
The economic cost of Brexit often headlines, but there’s the awful social and personal cost as well. Too much to ask @10DowningStreet to actively counter the irrational xenophobia unleashed? 
You need this analysis of no deal Brexit on NHS: 
I agree, a referendum on immigration should be held..  
Bannon is 100% correct, these are not your average Mid-Term elections.  We need to treat this like we are electing Trump again.Steve Bannon on 2018 Midterms: This is Going to be Donald Trump's First Re-elect - A Referendum on the Trump Presidency (VIDEO)  
Austria seeks to avoid hard Brexit, Kurz tells May  
We’ve reached a tipping point on support for a second referendum. Brexiteers have nothing left to offer. This is as good as it gets for them. Nobody is coming out in favour of Brexit any more. Momentum is with #Remain&Reform. 
I believe Labour leader said we should go along with public opinion on Brexit rather than challenge it...  
I remember, in 2016, how struck we were by the similarity between the Brexit vote and Trump's election. Now we know. They were the SAME THING. Run by the same people, for the same purpose. 
A *lot* of people wanted to express their views on our #Brexitometer in #Falmouth today.Only *one* person thought #Brexit was going well.And the vast majority thought there should be a #PeoplesVote on any final #Brexit deal.Are you listening to your constituents, @SNewtonUK? 
A referendum on what? Both Remainers & Leavers would vote against the crap ‘deal’. We had the Leave or Remain questioned answered 2 years ago. 
The obvious solution for these islands is to allow Scottish unionists easy relocation to the Brexit South where they can wank off toffs in top hats for the fat off their tins of spam to their hearts content. In return, we get all the English folk with brains. 
Mr Lineker is advocating a 2nd referendum. I am merely reporting that the idea is gaining in popularity. There’s a difference. A big difference.  
Emile Smith-Rowe aka Brexit De Bruyne. Get used to saying it because we are stanning heavy this season. 
Someone published recent threatening emails sent from a couple of cabinet members to BBC staff . Cameron started these threats a few years ago, now the BBC has lost all public support, it has become a political propaganda machine 
Funny the effect referenda have on people. During the last people’s referendum, barely a squeak from Adonis (one of my political heroes). He’d barely said a word about Europe before that. Then, after the result, this.  
Fascism always had HUGE appeal for the English upper classes (think Unity Mitford), they flocked to Nazi Germany and fawned over Hitler. They sent back gushing reports of German efficiency and friendliness. Jews? Never saw any, so clearly no problems with them. Brexit macht frei 
Dear @theresa_may The Medicines Regulator says Brexit will threaten imports of insulin, none of which is made in Britain.As a type 1 diabetes sufferer, you will presumably be taking your chances along with the rest of the population? 
Lets get this straight If anyone dies because of post brexit shortages  you brexists will be to blame 
My view: Theresa May = a Globalist Lib Masquerading as a Conservative who’s blocking BREXITThere’s no Way Referendums like BREXIT Shld be Allowed to be Ignored/Overturned in a DemocracyBrits Deserve Better; Democracy Demands itThe Conservative Party should Oust Theresa May  
I see that people being delayed at stansted because of the weather is major headline news, there are fights breaking out at the airport.Good luck with No Deal Brexit & EU Open Skies agreement chaps. 
Genuine question: Did you or any of your Brexit supporting colleagues ever attempt to find out about how a no deal outcome would, could or might impact something like insulin supply before advocating a 'no deal' stance? 
A no deal Brexit will result in all shopping items constantly being classed as “unexpected items found in the bagging area”. Stop this madness. 
Stop playing the emotive card. You know darn well its not a question of humanity. Its logistics. If medicine is held up at ports, or needs a different import tax tariff, it takes time. Time = shortages. Brexit is a political choice by the UK, not a necessity, you know that too. 
Majority of voters back 2nd #Brexit ref for the first time   
If Brexit means stockpiling goods and medicines isn’t that a little bit of a clue that it’s not a brilliant idea? 
Why do I believe we can get out of this mess?Neither Remainers nor Brexiters are confident we'll get an acceptable deal.The vast majority of the UK doesn't want 'No Deal'.So, MPs know that any Brexit is literally going against the will of the people they'll have to answer to. 
The EU want UK dosh.That is the long & short of it.They have no intention of ever giving us a 'deal' which is palatable.Walk away, then negotiate like equals, or not at all.#Brexit. 
No, Steve Baker, who retweeted this tweet - THIS IS YOUR DOING! This is what you campaigned for! This is what you wanted! THIS IS ON YOUR HEAD!You and your fantasy Brexit! Don’t blame the EU because YOU COCKED UP!IT’S YOUR FAULT! #BrexitShambles#StopBrexit pic.twitter.com/7BvAQZzXAU 
Brexit Survival Kit. Could be a market for this with so many thinking there’s going to be an apocalypse.  
Just as thousands of Brits head for France and Spain for a well earned holiday, the pound crashes and you get is 1.12 Euro for the weak pound, still we have got our country back innit #brexit #morons 
Let's not forget that barely anyone cared about EU membership until the campaigns started. Cameron’s referendum took a non-issue and turned it into one which will poison British politics for years.  
*Brexit Bus Reality*  
The EU is keen to get the Withdrawal Agreement signed before we finalise trading relations. Signing it will close down several options that many Brexit-supporters would want left open including payment of the divorce bill. 
A committee of MPs is set to warn of the "democratic crisis" of fake news and data misuse, heavily criticising Facebook.It follows Channel 4 News' investigations into Cambridge Analytica, Facebook and the Brexit campaign:  
Make the most of it - because Brexit will change your holidays forever.  
It is simply not true that we need a trade deal to import medicines. We already import these from countries where no FTA exists. After Brexit, I cannot see why we would apply any restrictions on medications being imported. Do some research and stop scaremongering  
How Vote Leave cynically took advantage of the Jo Cox murder by restarting their campaign of highly deceptive social media dark ads just one day after the killing, despite having given their word that they'd observe the 3 day pause in Brexit campaigning. 
The campaign for a second referendum isn’t really a campaign for a second referendum, says @PaulGoodmanCH 
#ABBA ‘s Bjorn Ulvaeus on #Brexit: “I’m a European through and through and really, really sad that some Brits don’t want to be with their friends. I just don’t understand it.” 
Post-Brexit registration process for EU citizens to be trialled in AugustSod that..just introduce ID cards for all of us..(Govt, Facebook, Google, FSB, CIA know everything), stay in the EU,  allow FOM & use the EU CONTROLS you failed to use!#PeoplesVote 
In a contested issue in which both sides claim to represent the democratic will of the people, but one insists on a referendum and the other will do absolutely anything to stop such a clear vote, which one do you think is telling the truth about its confidence?  
On @BBCNewsnight next week, exclusive report finds strong likelihood of dead rising due to Brexit.  
I don't understand that 2 labour mps  have vote of no confidence for supporting brexit when Corbyn is anti Europe.  What a crazy world we live in 
CAMERON shit how am I going to get out of this, after me saying the peoples vote is final! MAY don't worry you resign and get me in as leader by hook or by crook! Then ill bribe the media to be anti Brexit and drag it out so they don't notice the concessions I've GIVEN AWAY.! 
Hope Labour politicians are getting the idea backing Brexit is a really bad idea.  
Just seen BBC lunchtime news. Reporter said fake news was microtargetted at people in US election but studiously avoided saying so about Brexit, despite the release of the Leave adverts yesterday.  By covering up part of the news, they turn all the news into fake news. 
I can stomach a party in power that I didn't want or vote for, I only have to wait 5 yrs to have a go at voting them out again.Meanwhile I can rely on HM Opposition to keep the government on their toes. However #Brexit is for life, & there is NO FUCKING OPPOSITION! #PeoplesVote 
Daniel Zawczynski MP - “There should be no doubt that Britain has much to bring to the global market place and we should see #Brexit for the opportunity that it is.”  
We’re currently having a tantalising glimpse of future Brexit life at the Swiss border. We can’t take any merch with us and they’re going through our equipment piece by piece. The joys. 
My complaint to them: 
Yesterday after claims that sanndwiches would be doomed after Brexit we joked that the next trick from the Remainers was to threaten the plague.We were joking.Today they threaten us with mutant VD.  
We've always had left/right politics in the UK but in truth, I would say that most of us are centreish. I'm increasingly concerned that, post referendum, we are being encouraged to take sides against each other on things other than brexit. There are other ways, find them. 
On my poolside sun lounger, reading abt latest Brexshit developments and I wanna yell at every one of my fellow German, French, Dutch and Belgian holidaymakers that the majority of us are livid and want Brexit cancelled. Tout suite! Jetzt gleich! Instead I’m being very British... pic.twitter.com/No9kOueVHY 
The rise of the Sweden Democrats is not about a return of nativism. Much like the Brexit referendum and the election of Donald Trump, it is the story of a people increasingly fed up with elitism and political correctness, writes @HugoBrundin 
No one comes close to @IanDunt on writing about #Brexit. This is accessible, funny, & makes me want to go to bed and not get out again.  
‘@RogerHelmerMEP: Brexit will bring down food prices for UK consumers.“If (as I hope and pray) we leave on schedule, then we don’t have to pay EU tariffs at all.  And that, in simple terms, is why food gets cheaper.”  
I forget....was this meant to be a referendum on something? Anyone? #auspol 
I have complained to the BBC about the Wark interview and will tweet their response 
BREXIT: Brexiteer Frank Field loses vote of no confidence by local party  /#EU #Brexit #Labour 
I've signed up to demand a #PeoplesVote on the Brexit deal - will you join me?  
And that’s over simplifying it. Because to be a proper referendum, there would have to be every feasible type of Brexit to vote on. The game is up. There is no one type of Brexit. "Brexit means Brexit" is meaningless. 
Steve Bannon: Midterm elections will be a referendum on the Trump presidency  
I’ll tell you why Brexiters don’t want the matter to come back to the people. Because they know there is no one version of Brexit. So it can’t be a 2 choice question anymore. It would have to be Hard Brexit or Soft Brexit or Remain. Their vote is split. 
If you've forgotten all the lies told during the Brexit referendum and what the truth has turned out to be, then here is a nice little reminder. #remain #Brexit #BrexitShambles ⁦@RalfLittle⁩ 
The only #PeoplesVote that mattered was the biggest democratic vote in our history  held on June 23 2016People from all backgrounds voted to Leave undemocratic #EU@DavidLammy @GaryLineker @campbellclaret take note.The People won. The Establishment lost.Get over it!#Brexit  
We are on my home turf at Barnard Castle with @NE4EU saying bollocks to Brexit!  
So the BBC are deleting prominent YES campaigners YouTube videos that feature any BBC content that shows either them, or the NO parties in their true self.Now I wonder why they ALSO decided to remove the LIVE parliament channel.Its a coup folks & not just brexit. 
Are people really stupid enought to believe that Brexit could cause super gonorrhea? 
This is fascinating and shows the Tony Hall regime to be  mediocre and slightly shady. Such a good point about the Brexit law breaking. A great national crisis is approaching and BBC management is clearly not up to it. Time for the journalists to rebel. Time for Hall to go.  
REVEALED: The DUP's Facebook ads during the Brexit referendum overwhelmingly targetted voters outside Northern Ireland:  
I'm pointing out for fairness that @kirstywark may well have had a producer yelling in to her to say that. We don't know the background to this. 
What happens when the puny citizens of Europe dare to defy the EU project... Don't let our historic referendum result become just another statistic. Support us at  
Remember Steve Bannon is just a foot soldier like Farage, Johnson, Gove & Rees-Mogg. The faces of Brexit & Trumpism. We must be more concerned about their masters neoliberals and neocons on both sides of Atlantic. Who don't like the EU tax regulations  
This must be a record for tweets that didn't age well, three hours and shot to pieces by @shahmiruk releasing slack channel messages, now in the hands of the police, that PROVE once again Dominic Cummings grasp on reality is about the same as Arron Banks wealth; it's an illusion. 
From GoogleDue to multiple copyright strikes associated with the videos below, your YouTube account has now been disabled:Video title: John Major on Marr- a devastating Brexit critiqueVideo URL: Takedown issued by: #bbc 
In a UK full of rising fascism, the looming horror of Brexit, and the worst government in modern history, I take great comfort in the people marching for a better Scotland up in Inverness today. Have a fantastic march, rain or shine. #SaorAlba #AUOBInverness 
Clear upward trend in people wanting a #PeoplesVote, clear downward trend the other way.With 8 months to go, and the implications of Brexit becoming clearer by the day, the calls will become deafening. Let the people decide.#PeoplesVote 
Important poll/referendum. RT if you think Humbug’s cuter. ‘Like’ if you think @lordcoopy is cuter. 
Because they *are* tax funded, i.e. get their money from government.There is a whitewashed idea that #BBC is a neutral, objective body. It is not - never has been. As *state broadcaster* it reflects government policy, whether Tory or Labour. Brexit just makes this obvious. 
Tim, this sort of “Brexit Betrayed”talk is tragic, it’s like eavesdropping someone talking to their therapist about a former employer or ex girl friend 
Brexit is 244 days away. #brexit 
Fuck Brexit forever.  
Wow..keep up the pressure..be in no doubt #Remainers, #RemainerNow, #Releavers...#Brexit ain't a done deal unless you allow it.Don't give up. #Remain is winning.#Brexit hands the UK to the Far Right. Thwart their plans.Fight for a #PeoplesVote#FBPERT 
Brexit is coming after your fannies and penises now. Project fear has gone full mental.  
BBC, Ch4 & Sky are very subtle, they manipulate news with innuendo, half truths & statistics from politically motivated organisations.Follow an audit trail most have some kind of EU financial support if it's Brexit, possibly CIA on defence.  
David Cameron swanned off leaving the country with #BrexitShambles David Davis swanned off with his imaginary Brexit impact reports Boris Johnson swanned off after promising a magic 350 mill/wk to NHS Jeremy Hunt swanned off promising a pay rise that never quite came...... 
Mims Davies is Tory MP for Eastleigh in Hampshire. She has consistently voted against more power for Wales, against Wales having a say on Brexit and missed other key votes important to Wales. This week Theresa May appointd her as Secretary of State for Wales... #ToryShambles 
Interesting observation. In twenty five years of Brexit campaigning I never once met a Remainer who could even begin to explain how the EU actually worked, including Oxford law graduatesThey just thought 'it is broadly a good thing'.Fluffy & nice.  
Extraordinary reluctance by some to concede reality of by-elections on ABC. Yet to hear that instead of being a referendum on Bill Shorten,  the result exposes Turnbull as a failed leader whose government can only offer a war on the poor & tax cuts for the rich.Apologies, ABC? 
So Labour's official position is you can be racist, you can be misogynistic, you can be homophobic, you can say victims should shut up, but you can't support Brexit? What a broad church of single minded bigots the Labour Party have become... #ChequersMeansCorbyn 
Millions of diabetes patients could be 'seriously disadvantaged' by insulin shortages after no-deal Brexit  
WATCH: Westmonster out with Tory MP @abridgen in his constituency."If we are perceived to be the Government that let down the promises we made about delivering Brexit properly we will be punished at the polls"VIDEO:  
If you’re a Labour voting Brexiteer and you’re in any doubt of your party’s position This rounding up of hardworking MPs, who simply followed their party’s manifesto and the #Brexit referendum result, is disgraceful @JohnMannMP will be next  
This from former political editor of Daily Mail and former head of Brexit dept in UK govt is a bit of a change of mind.  
Malcolm Turnbull on 12 July said #SuperSaturday byelections were a referendum on leadership. Bit awks now.  
.@KateHoeyMP represents the 70% of Labour constituencies who voted Brexit in a faithful and honourable way. A disgrace she should be treated this way.  
Really have a problem with snobbery & condescension shown to Gary Lineker & others for "daring" to comment on Brexit. No offence but these intellectual snobs could learn a thing or two from him. Brexit is a crime against the working class, not a noble act to help them #BREXIT 
The editor of the FT responds - again - to the BBC's Brexit coverage  
For clarity @BBCNewsnight @KirstyWark @BBCNewsnight @ElectoralCommUK 
The electoral commission is a body where the accused is investigated , tried and sentenced by the same people. We are taking them to court & when that process is finished it will be fact . Brexit has driven certain elements of the press mad!  
Or deliberate?‘Huge cache of leaked messages show how Eurosceptic Tories have repeatedly pressured the news outlets inc @bbcnews @bbcr4today to shape coverage of Brexit – and joked about cutting off a BuzzFeed News reporter’s testicles’ #StopBrexit 
For years international businesses have used loopholes in EU tax laws to avoid paying their fair share. If we rid ourselves of the EU's tax laws, we can have lower, fairer and simpler taxes after Brexit, says @CharlieElphicke 
Did anyone read the article? It doesn't say they won't sell us medicine but that the supply will be delayed or interrupted by the fall out of no deal Brexit. Paperwork, customs delays and temperature controlled transport. Not really hard to put the pieces together. 
She (@KirstyWark ) gets paid enough to stand up to the management on key points of principle.  She isn’t a new little cub reporter.Findings by the EC or ICO resulting in fines are just that.  Not allegations.  Any more than a conviction is just an allegationWhat is happening? 
So Theresa May is reportedly planning weeks of public warnings against a no-deal Brexit. Or to put it in plain English, the PM who told us that “No deal is better than a bad deal” is now actively campaigning for Remain.  Betrayal writ large. 
Every single Brexiter so far has two plans:1. Refuse to blink and hope the EU27 blink first2. Hope a catastrophe ends the EU before Brexit dateIf neither of these things happens they have absolutely zero clue of what to do except moan about their beautiful Brexit.Pathetic 
In a democracy there is no final vote. It is a core democratic right to oppose any government policy no matter how it was arrived at and to seek to garner enough public & political support to overturn it. Where this right ends so does democracy.#PeoplesVote #StopBrexit #Brexit 
Malcolm Turnbull said these by-elections were a referendum on leadership. Labor is winning four and the Libs can’t regain the formerly safe seat of Mayo. #goodonyoumalcolm 
@kirstywark @esmewren @nicholaswatt @djoeclark#voteleavebrokethelaw“When asked if he thought micro-targeting by..Facebook actually influenced behavior, @DamianCollins said: “You wouldn’t spend millions of pounds doing it if you didn’t think it worked.” 
Turnbull said these by elections were a referendum on the major party leaders. Then he lost every single contest. Well done @billshortenmp and @AustralianLabor. #auspol 
Brexit cheat Darren Grimes is begging for money online to raise funds to challenge the Electoral Commission's findings that he intentionally and knowingly engaged in electoral fraud in the Brexit referendum. He & others blatantly cheated the UK public - We need to #StopBrexit 
Securing Scottish decision making on priorities for this funding is essential - regrettably #Brokenshire has form in trying to diminish devolution.....The €1bn grab: Fund to replace EU money after Brexit will be in Westminster's hands | The National  
Well done Chris. There's something weird going on at the BBC. Us Corbyn supporters have seen it for a while but now remainers are seeing it too. It's basically anything that embarrasses the Tories gets shot down. 
Gerard Batten: If you are 1 of 17.4 million people who voted Leave, you should feel rightly betrayed.#Ukip fought for 25 years to be where we are today.We fought for the referendum.We won the referendum.We NOW have to win the result...#Brexit #EU 
Gary Lineker says we need another referendum on Brexit. How cynical. One minute Remoaners say Brexit is too complicated for us plebs to vote on, the next they want to march us back to the polls to stop it, writes @Tom_Slater_ 
I asked this question just after May announced the Chequers deal.   The revelations of Mrs Mays deception keep on coming.  With all that has happened, do you believe that since the beginning May has deliberately set out to sabotage Brexit? 
I like that defence of @KirstyWark who may well be having to say the incorrect thing repeatedly as the @BBCNewsnight officials may have briefed her to.Sadly, lying or shall I say denying facts only makes things worse. #VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw - this is a fact, not an allegation. 
“This is what no-deal Brexit actually looks like”.by ⁦@IanDunt⁩ 
Finally, most of the media made Brexit. They platformed fascists, liars, fantasists and near-Nazis, racists, self-aggrandising egotists, and absolute bellends. They failed to challenge the lies, scrutinise the costing claims, ask any real fucking questions at all. /11 
The UK imports 51% of the food we eat. We do not produce enough to feed everyone, and because of the impending brexit food is currently rotting in fields and greenhouses because foreign workers aren't allowed to pick it. 
9. If you voted Leave, and you're now scrambling round Aldi nicking all the herrings for your Brexit Bunker, you're an absolute asshole of the highest order of assholery.10. Clickbait scaremongering about food shortages is irresponsible.11. LMK when the riots start. /10. 
Theresa May ratting on Brexit will release all sorts of genies from the bottle. You haven’t seen anything yet ...  
@Arron_banks have you seen this picture of the impartial @DamianCollins and his wife Sarah Richardson - how can anything his committee reports on be anything but biased anti/Brexit nonsense - notice not one remainer was interviewed by his #fakenews committee- funny that 
Brexit will bring down food prices for UK consumers.When we Leave EU, we Leave the Common External Tariff.And that, in simple terms, is why food gets cheaper!Lord Price: “The EU has pretty penal tariffs on food, to protect European farmers”.#Brexit #EU 
Since the partition of Ireland in 1921, Irish nationalists have sought reunification through a referendum. Not only is that referendum now almost inevitable but, for the first time, it’s winnable,” 
When you wake up to read the latest No.10 #ProjectFear #Brexit story.They have officially become a parody of themselves. No medicineSTI’s (super ones)No sandwichesNo cheese or DairyHow on earth do America, Canada, Japan, and all the other Non #EU countries cope? 
They didn't bother listening to the experts when we, very reasonably, spent the last two years pitching long reads on the potential impact of Brexit on people in poverty, especially food poverty. But now a Crisis looms, one that could have been prevented, and they're all ears. /4 
Tory MP on #LBC: 'We always knew Brexit was going to be difficult.'Er, those of us with memories longer than a goldfish remember being told it would be the easiest deal in history. #Brexit 
- Morning, Border.- Morning, Jean.- Grand looking day, Border.- Tis that, Jean, and fresh with it.- This Brexit thing is desperate bad, Border.- It’s unseemly, Jean, that’s what it is.- Unseemly’s the word, Border. Scundering for us all.- Scundering, Jean.- Cheerio.- Bye 
This is really flying. Add your voice, even if you’ve already done @peoplesvote_uk. Theresa May MP: Give People a Final Say on Brexit Deal - Sign the Petition!  via @UKChange 
The European structural and investment fund of €1bill was set up for the SG to tackle poverty, pollution and infrastructure.  WM have now taken control of this fund via Brexit. If you think there is no power grab, or an attempt to rid Scotland of its powers. Think again. 
Somewhere there is Brexit Germanophobic looking at that getting confused that "we've" had 4 and "they've" had 1.  
Hello is that the main bossman of West Ham Villa? This is Brexit Dave, I used to run the Bad Team. Hi. You must buy Daniel Ingredients from Liverpuddle, he could be very nice for your loudest soccer concerts next semester.  
This is *disgraceful behaviour* BBC Newsnight.Electoral Commission has proven what electoral *criminality* has happened and *how* it happened and it was intentional.It is only the BBC that *undermines* the facts with the dishonest use of *allegations*.Cc @KirstyWark 
Standing by all the mainstream media analysis about how they were wrong on #SuperSaturday being a referendum on Shorten’s leadership. Standing by....any minute now...  
My piece for Westmonster: Why Brexit will mean lower food prices for consumers:  
Families broken apart.Northern Irish peace threatened.Innocent people- victims of hate, assaults, even death.Potential break up of UK.Never mind economic drawbacks, just these negative issues alone are enough for Brexit never to have even been considered... 
Pat Leahy makes point that Harris's handling of abortion referendum is insulating him from criticism of health serv  
Why should the EU compromise on its core principles of governance, which all members sign up to, for the sake of a deal with a soon-to-be non-member? Everyone should want as benign a Brexit as possible, and compromises are possible, but UK seems to want EU to compromise itself.  
It's remarkable the amount of abuse I'm getting for this piece. I'm being deluged with people telling me that Britain should 'know its place'  and 'good riddance' to the UK with Brexit.  Slightly depressing.  
'@BBC policy is not impartial' Article in this week's @RadioTimes by @RaymondSnoddy 
Talk of stockpiling food & medicines. MHRA saying people could come to harm. Pushing through Brexit at any cost. Brexit was based on cheating. Electoral Law was broken. When will this be stopped? Why aren’t all of you people in power putting a stop to this utter madness? 
There you go, it's the #EU that could have a medical crisis after #Brexit and not the #UK.  No. 10 and #ProjectFear really aren't doing to well with this orchestrated attempt at fear are they? It's going as well as the #ChequersPlan  
Millions of patients could be affected by 'no-deal' Brexit medicines shortages, says MHRA chair Sir Michael Rawlins.#NHS #NHS70 #Brexit 
Disgraced Tory MP Priti Patel has said "We should encourage young people to get involved in politics & support their engagement" - and that is why she donating to #BeLeave's Darren Grimes fund to protest at being found guilty of cheating in the Brexit referendum #BrexitShambles 
This is my #FBSIParty I support Scottish Independence & am calling for a second referendum. I am looking to connect with others who agree.Please:  1 Like 2 Retweet 3 Follow I will follow backCopy this tweet to your own.#ScotRef #IndyRef #IndyRef2 
4/ One thing we do know, and which has been extensively documented, are the multifarious ties between the Trump supporting right in the USA and the #Brexit right in the UK. So many ties that one could reasonably talk about there being a single Trump-#Brexit political movement. 
According to recent polling, 1 in 10 people in Scotland think Theresa May is handling Brexit well.  
Austria seeks to avoid hard Brexit, Kurz tells May  
Listen all you Brexiteers, what’s your answer to this? We can’t organise the train times, let alone bring in customs regs in weeks. Brexit can and must be stopped. @peoplesvote_uk Businessman Tells O'Brien "They Haven't Got A Clue" 
The campaign for a second referendum isn’t really a campaign for a second referendum | Conservative Home  
The Brexit referendum forced us into two camps. It pitted friends, family, colleagues & partners against one another. Now there's more anger & less kindness. It wasn't like this before. Imagine what it will be like if we do leave.Is it worth it? I believe not.#PeoplesVote 
One of the historic strengths of UK politics since 1880s is you can't buy elections. Sadly that's no longer true. The referendum was bought by dodgy money and foreign influence. We need to clean this up urgently. 
3/ And one has to ask, is this just disorganised rage within a part of the political elite against anything seen as hindering #Brexit, which would be dangerous enough, or is its prevalence across the Atlantic a sign of a much more coordinated campaign to undermine democracy? 
Let’s sum up: Vote Leave cheated then won referendum by tiny %. 2 yrs on we haven’t got a deal acceptable to all Tory MPs, let alone the country or EU27. No deal will clearly mean chaos but is increasingly likely. But EU will have us back. Case for #PeoplesVote now unanswerable? 
There’s fake news, electoral fraud, rule-breaking. All ‘Cheating’.  Whether you voted #Remain or #Leave, don’t let the privileged British establishment duck the blame for their mess. Demand a vote on whether to accept or reject their poor deal/no deal #Brexit.  
ALTERNATIVE: @DavidDavisMP highlights new Brexit blueprint as May’s plan falters. “It’s ready to go. It would be attractive to European countries wanting to avoid No Deal and losing the £39 billion Brexit divorce bill.”Time to dump Chequers!  
I didn't have a fucking clue what the Customs Union meant, or understand the complexities of the Single Market. I didn't know I was voting to prevent food & medicine stockpiling.Neither the fuck did you.#Brexit is a fucking disaster, you didn't vote for that.#PeoplesVote 
We've never seen so much uncertainty, so little clarity, looked so weak, been so divided, in such chaos. Some things are now clear:- Any Brexit deal is inferior to EU membership.- A 'No Deal' devastates our country.- The people must choose what we do next.#PeoplesVote 
1/ I'm more worried by the politics of #Brexit than the economics; the democracy-weakening torrent of lies, the rage against the rule of law over A50, the attacks on the civil service & electoral commission, the fascistic invocations of the "Will of the People" etc.. #StopBrexit 
Worth repeating (daily?) that in Brexit negotiations @MichelBarnier is acting in line with a clear mandate from EU27 leaders and that both they and @Europarl_EN will have to ratify result. Not some sort of solo mission by ‘Brussels’ as some in UK seem to suggest. 
Our #FinalSay petition for a referendum on the final Brexit deal just cleared 310,000 signatures! Join the campaign and let your voice be heard -  
The Prime Minister was told by the Czech PM that her Chequers Brexit capitualtion is unaceptable to the EU. So she's only three options 1) no deal Brexit 2) a Canda style deal 3) further captiualtion which = no real Brexit. The PM needs to know that the later is not acceptable. 
PS I want to stay in Europe !!! In Scotland ,No to Brexit , Yes,Guys & Dolls,FACT!!!!!-Edwyn, 
The BBC are really trying to bury the illegality of the vote leave referendum campaign. Why would our tax funded national broadcaster do that? 
My position remains that, 2019 is a call for a Referendum on Restructuring. Restructuring is purely A National Issue, we should not allow party affiliation to deter us. @benmurraybruce @OfficialPDPNig @realFFK @PremiumTimesng @officialKolaO @renoomokri 
#TweetYourCraziestRumourGary Lineker was playin' Bungle in the Rainbow reboot when the Brexit Referendum result got announced.  
Your Sat 28th July reminder it is now a LEGAL FACT that both Leave campaigns deliberately broke the law to win Brexit referendumThe Leave MP's should be in jail#VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw 
Once again, BBC news appears to be confusing “balance” with established facts (and lies) #Brexit  
Cannot repeat this enough. More than 40 non-EU countries want free trade agreements with the UK when we leave the EU. Such trade deals will only be mutually beneficial if we're not constrained by EU regulations post-Brexit. We must be free of EU rules when trading outside the EU. 
They're springing up everywhere!Yet another #Petition for a vote on the actual  #brexit deal:   via @UKChange 
Game of Thrones is coming to an end, with the last series due to air next year.Fans can take some comfort from the fact that Brexit will offer an opportunity to live the fantasy of feuding Lords, class division, rampant poverty and disease, and many intriguing ways to die. 
I’ve just placed only the second bet of my life - 6:1 on Brexit not happening by 1 Jan 2021. I could finance a large 2021 mansion on those odds, but the inner puritan wouldn’t allow more than £1 
Jackson , I know you regard yourself as a humorist but as Tory Deputy Leader in Scotland could you offer some practical advice to a country that voted against #Brexit (as you did to be fair) but is now told that we must stockpile medicines (& lots of other things)  
This really shows how clueless Bannon is about European politics. Support for right-populist parties is rising in some EU countries, but *despite* and not because of Brexit.  
We are being sold down Brexit river  
Essentially what this proves is there is a Far Right machine run by Steve Bannon, Robert Mercer that is behind the corruption of the #brexit ref. The country can either be a victim of their activity & their brexiter puppets like @Jacob_Rees_Mogg and @BorisJohnson or we fight 
Thanks @RichardNewby3 , it’s always worth repeating this. Brexit is madness, it must and can still be stopped @peoplesvote_uk 
It’s simply beyond me that you appear to say this with pride!! The incomprehensible incompetence of your Governments handling of Brexit has put us in a situation where your now literally saying we’re making contingency plans so that we kill as few of you as possible!  
WAKE UP. Post referendum, the opposite of Leave is not remain. It is street war & the collapse of democracy  
"I change my mind when the facts change."Well, so you should. But really: the facts never changed over Brexit. We always knew it was going to be a shitstorm, and we told you so again and again and again.The facts didn't change. All that changed was your knowledge of them. 
@KirstyWark looked absolutely ridiculous here.  The world knows it is no longer  an "allegation", the invetigation has been on every news channel - apart from the BBC.  Is the BBC  involved in all this criminality? 
There is no Brexit plan, never has been. Labour has no plan either, just soundbites & political games. The best Brexiters can offer is; have faith & we'll muddle through somehow. Ration books will be issued soon. #StopBrexit. 
Oh the government are worried about the spread of #fakenews and are trying to clamp down on it. No they're not, they are worried that the internet has allowed the public to see beyond their lies. #Brexit wasn't supposed to win. They want us mushroomed. In the dark and fed shit. 
I just saw the phrase "the time of maximum political power for the lead-damaged generation" In the ongoing Brexit chat on my blog.That would explain EVERYTHING (about Brexit and Trump, too) and now I want to hide under the bed.It's not boomers per se, it's lead poisoning. 
"Near zero optimism." "It's going to be very messy." Senior officials in Theresa May’s team are privately terrified Brexit negotiations will fail.  
i hate Brexit ,FACT!!!!!!!!!!!!!@@!!!!!!!!@@!!-Edwyn, 
This of course should have been the consistent and confident Brexit Plan A - not the Chequers debacle  
The government is stockpiling excuses in case of a hard Brexit. 
One of the nicest compliments ever and shows how traditional tribal party loyalties are now turned on their head and brought people across political spectrum together to form a new alliance in their opposition to Brexit. Thank-you Tom fellow Eireannach.  
NOTE to the PMTheresa , I *get* that you've a lot on your plate just now- what with #Brexit an' all - and a disobedient dysfunctional Cabinet doesn't helpBut what happened to those *burning injustices* you were going to tackle ?Are they still on your *to do* list ?#JustAskin 
Today's mood: Get increasingly angry/ panicky that Continuity Remain campaigning energy has gone into an impractical second referendum, rather than selling the idea that A50 should be revoked. 
Mrs May and the Government’s Chequers Agreement is a complete betrayal of Brexit and everything it was meant to be, says Gerard Batten#ForTheNation#FudgeOffMay 
It's now nearly three months since we said Theresa May's big plan for delivering Brexit was to fail. How time flies.  
The head of Arla, the dairy firm, on the Today Prog, warns of very high import duties on dairy products under WTO terms.  But the WTO figures are maxima, not mandatory.  There’s no reason to suppose that a post-Brexit UK Govt would apply punitive import duties. 
If you have not already signed the petition to ask for a #PeoplesVote on the impeding #Brexit deal then please do so here. Also please share with everybody you know to get more people to sign. #StopBrexit. Have a lovely weekend, #rain or #sun. 
Always wanted to draw Theresa May as an ice cream. After the recent heatwave and more Brexit chaos here’s today’s @yorkshirepost cartoon. Enjoy! 
Leading UK aide savages May's handling of #Brexit negotiations"We’re going to offer vassal state with a note attached saying ‘would you like your £39 billion by check or direct debit?’ It is catastrophic and she is to blame”  
Their treatment of Chris here is shameful! 
@KirstyWark isn’t stupid, she doesn’t speak for herself there, she is simply following strict orders from above. @BBCNewsnight need a clear out at the editorial level in order to regain their reputation. 
Our analysis of @nmcnews data shows that month on month, registration of new nurses from the EU has flatlined between the #Brexit referendum result in June 2016 and April this year. Read the full story: #NHSworkforce 
The report doesn't mention it of course but most of the report applies to the fake antisemitism news campaign against Corbyn as much as BrexitFake news a democratic crisis, MPs warn   
6 years ago today London was a beacon of openness before Brexit and the USA was in a real democracy with a dignified President Obama. All before Russia interfered in US and UK elections. We are still under cyber attack from Russia. #Resist #Impeach #FBPE 
There comes a point @BBCNewsnight where attempting to provide balance strays into attempting to facilitate deception. Chris Wylie on Newsnight emphasising that charges against those who have broken our electoral laws aren't ALLEGATIONS they're FACTS...well done @chrisinsilico 
Churchill saved Europe & inspired the European Union. He would have had as little time for Brexit as for appeasement  
The misinformation that was told about Brexit during and after the referendum.The Independent is really pushing its Final Say petition campaign - now with 307,000 signatures.Time the politicians caught up. 
Hey @DExEUgov, I have a plan.How about we withdraw article 50. Then as soon as you come up with a Brexit plan that doesn’t involve stockpiling food, secures all citizens rights, secures the economy and doesn’t place a hard border in NI, we’ll let you trigger it again. 
I don’t think #Brexit can be better defined.  
My bit on another inspirational week in Brexit for the government  
Anxious about Brexit?Don't worry.Theresa May is off on her walking hols to relax and unwind.  
Peace in Northern Ireland is still not a done deal, says @andrew_adonis, and Brexit poses its gravest threat.  
Theresa May knows full well that the UK will suffer terribly from Brexit -  amplified with No-Deal. But, she is toothless in the face of Tory party factions like ERG - disaster capitalists who see only personal profit in UK economical collapse. We need to #SaveTheUK #StopBrexit 
Happy holidays,Keir.What a fight you once promised to give the Tories on Brexit.What a pitiful pushover you proved.  
Our #FinalSay petition for a referendum on the final Brexit deal has cleared 300,000 signatures! Join the campaign and let your voice be heard -  
#BBCR4Today reporting EU has kindly agreed to put Brexit on the agenda for the autumn summit of Heads of Govt. SO GENEROUS! EU bureaucrats have treated UK with contempt since EU ref - ignoring all we give to Europe in defence, security, trade etc... 
The list of every MP that has backed a referendum on the final Brexit deal  
Steve Bannon on 2018 midterms: "This is President @realDonaldTrump's first re-elect. This is gonna be an up or down vote. It's a referendum on the Trump presidency." #Hannity 
We've a problem over these BREXIT negotiations, yet everyone slings their hook & heads off to the Cote D'Azur for a month - It's an absolute outrage. At least PM May is only in Austria for 10 days. Rome burns & Europe waits until its had its wretched vacation. The mind boggles! 
Jacob Rees-Mogg, the guy who said we'd see the benefits of Brexit in 50 years time, is also saying that extending article 50 for 2 years is a failureDoes this have anything to do with the crackdown on tax dodging he was hoping Brexit would let him avoid.?Just askin 
@Radio4Today One of the themes of your coverage this week has been food shortages after Brexit. Yet you have failed to ask the most obvious question:"Why is the Government even contemplating the pursuit of a policy that will lead to avoidable food shortages?" 
Birkenhead CLP Labour members agree to demand Brexiteer MP Frank Field is suspended and have Whip withdrawn for backing Tories! @jeremycorbyn - are you taking notice? Members do NOT support #Brexit. 
Demand for my British company collapsed instantly with the referendum result. It provided international project management.  Nobody wants to do projects with the UK any more. I look forward to Brexit destroying the jobs of Leave voters. 
"EU PARLIAMENT REITERATES ITS VETO ON #BREXIT DEAL" Summary of what MEPs said yesterday.  Important for this to be reported.  Read it here: 
For us at the moment, 50%-55% of our components only need to be sourced from within the EU.Why?Because the EU represents all its members at the WTO.But after Brexit, 50%-55% of our components would need to be UK sourced, which is virtually imposible for complex products. 
It represented the best of us, confident, optimistic, outward looking. A sharp contrast with today, #Brexit represents the worst of us, a retreat to a narrow view of the world, suspicious, spiteful and closed. We are better than this!  
Brexit: A letter from a Remainer daughter to her Brexiter mother. 
As Brexit looms, stockpiling food seems the only sensible response | Ian Jack  
Bannon tells ⁦@seanhannity⁩ about the incredible reasons these #Midterms2018 are crucial;  “It’s an up or down vote on the entire Trump referendum..”“They’ll impeach (no grounds) first thing..” #LunaticLeft is in complete meltdown mode; while the Economy Booms! @POTUS #RED 
7/For surely the answer is no. You did not oppose Brexit in any meaningful way. In fact enabled it, voted for it.This is therefore equally yours & Labour's Brexit too.So have a nice break. The crisis will be worse when you return. If you even bother. I care not. 
It's clear to me that the EU do not want a Brexit deal they want capitulation and the UK in the EU. 
May's taken control of the #Brexit negotiations. She's attempted to bypass #Barnier by going behind his back with her infantile Chequers plan. Heads of the #EU countries have rejected her direct overtures. What did she expect, to divide and conquer. She really is very naive. 
Because Brexit is Pants!Hello, I custom made these for a friend. EU swimming trunks. If anyone is interested please put your name below. Can do swimsuits too and bikinis! #eusummer #weloveeu #holidayshop #nogammonhere Love #wordupdesign x 
A British withdrawal is inevitable.The Reunification of Ireland is inevitable.It's time to have the conversation.#Think32 "Brexit Bombshell: All Northern Ireland people would be better off in a new united Ireland says new report"  
“The excitement they experience when they murder an unarmed animal is  entirely due to their deep feelings of inadequacy and impotence in ordinary life. " - John Cleese. #trophyhunting #bullfighting #foxhunting #brexit #animalcruelty #yulin 
As I’ve said, Brexit is going to be - as a bare minimum - worse than 2008. All of the indicators are now saying much worse.This article shows household debt spiking, the difference between the 80’s and now being we’ve voluntarily cut down the safety net.  
Opinion: If you've forgotten all the lies told during the Brexit referendum and what the truth has turned out to be, let me remind you  
Birkenhead CLP overwhelming no-confidence/withdrawal of whip vote for Frank Field who recently (with three other Labour MPs) voted with the Government on a knife edge Brexit vote -   
The past two years have proved one thing: Brexit voters were given a choice they didn’t understand  via @bopinion 
Amazing from TGA! EU 27 responsible for crazy Brexit? Well before the referendum it was clear a Brexit will finish for the U.K. either in accepting Norway model or Canada ++ FTA...now EU should give best part of SM without other obligations otherwise EU responsible for no deal !? 
Give People a Final Say on the Brexit Deal. Please sign the petition. 300,000 so far! #PeoplesVote 
Enough is enough.Brexit is illegalIt has no benefitsIt provides no solutionsIt creates chaosIt's the sort of populist nonsense that a generation died to prevent.Tribalism and populism never truly go away. We must always to ready to fight easy solutions based on hate.  
The DUP probably held meetings to figure out if Short Strand had expanded or not before Emma’s sectarian stunt.  Grow up. These are serious times and @duponline are complaining about a bus sign instead of trying to define a policy to help our companies deal with their #Brexit 
Italy’s ruling parties recognize Crimean referendum, Rome sticks to EU’s line - politician 
Exactly. We are having the same problem in the UK over Brexit. The left hate that they lost and haven’t stopped screaming and having tantrums since then. So many of them didn’t vote rather go to music festivals instead and get hysterical afterwards. 
Jesus, this is a chastening read from @IanDunt - on the nightmare brexit scenario for UK just-in-time food imports. "This is what no-deal Brexit actually looks like" -   
Does anyone else think, I want to ask these questions but, just how deep does this go? Dark money, Brexit connected to dodgy diamonds deals (could they even be laundered c*nflict?), UK politics has been poisoned and the Tories are neck deep in this shit. #DissolveTheUnion 
If these people get the majority, they will begin unwinding everything Trump has done. It is incumbent upon us to do what the tea party movement in 2010. The midterms is another referendum on Trump. We have to get others registered and out to vote if we expect to win the midterms 
#quote"in the bizarre,worst-case scenario where theEU was so determined to punish Britain for Brexit that it banned all exports of food across the Channel + tried to starve us into submission,the availability of food in Britain would fall by less than 1/3"  
"A referendum is a good idea though probably a no-go. If it happens, cld we have a vote on recalling #DougFord? No, the entire Ford family. They’re not good in cities. Like raccoons, they need their own secret separate place." #DougFraud #onpoli #topoli 
I was never good at languages in school. Can any French speakers or those schooled in the language tell me what this says? Do it sound good? We are really hoping for some good news over here #Brexit #EU #Brexitdeal 
Steve Bannon on 2018 midterms: "This is President @realDonaldTrump's first re-elect. This is gonna be an up or down vote. It's a referendum on the Trump presidency." #Hannity 
Big thanks to Kevin - a farmer from Coonamble - for dropping by to support Lock the Gate volunteers who are gathering votes today in the People's Referendum on Coal and Gas. Vote online here:  
When we finally get rid of Brexit and the Tory govt, this man (who I often disagree with) should be made sole presenter of #Newsnight 
1979, the Scottish devolution referendum and the fall of Callaghan's Labour Government:  
Final Say: The Independent's Brexit petition reaches 300,000 in just over 48 hours  
Not a second referendum. A General Election.  
A brilliant and very thoughtful MUST READ thread from @cliodiaspora on the strategy we must adopt to win a People’s Vote. Her warnings about the need to avoid the mistakes made by Remain in the 2016 referendum are essential reading for all who want to save UK from disaster.  
Keep goingKeep goingKeep goingTruth will prevail at the end of the day(Though #Brexit days are appallingly long ones) 
Sure. In the same sense that he was also completely opposed to Brexit, which happened on his birthday. He even had multiple meetings with people, such as yourself, and was determined for the FBI to investigate Trump specifically because of his own unverified and biased work.  
Just voted for the NEC candidates who I believe genuinely want the best for the people and the UK regarding Brexit and will fight for that, here's hoping you win @lukeakehurst @LisaBanes_ @JohannaBaxter @Jasmin_Beckett @EdaCaz @gsjosan @MariannaMasters @heatherisone @MaryWimbury 
Frit. They know #PeoplesVote is coming, and realise their Disaster Capitalist dream is now seriously under threat. EEA/Customs Union is their only way of getting a Brexit. But even this would mean we’d lose all influence - and still be much worse off  
They have a trade deal with the EU not the UK. On hard Brexit we are no longer part of that and have WTO rules in place. This requires all goods are checked at the border and tariffs applied. So it all gets caught up in the same border issue. No infrastructure to deal with it /1 
When Brexit hits - never underestimate how utterly insane the UK media will become and the army of media Scotland will need. Invest what you can into this  
#BBC Why tonight at @BBCNewsnight @KirstyWark was spreading Brexit lies about imaginary "allegations" Vote Leave cheating?Vote Leave cheating is an established fact by the Electoral Commission.@KirstyWark is breaking fundamental BBC rules for accuracy! 
Leavers before the referendum: “We need to leave or 80 MILLION Turks are going to move here and we’ll all be speaking German in 10 years” Fast forward 2 1/2 years and someone mentions that Brexit might not be a good idea and it’s “remainer scaremongering” 
I do wish diabetics who are worried about supplies of insulin running out, which may lead to many deaths, would just believe in a red, white and blue Brexit no deal better than a bad deal sovereignty blue passports freedom make Britain great again.  
Exactly how I feel. So shocked at our national act of self harm and angry at the people who orchestrated Brexit and happy for a no deal disaster to happen to us whilst their wealth shelters them from its impact. 
The way things are now I’m certain if they had another referendum we’d be remaining. I know many leavers (including me) who voted based on emotion, personal prejudices or listening to the brexit bandwagon who would now vote remain. It’s clear now there cannot be a good outcome. 
Brexiters hate experts, remember? You quoting the Medicines Regulator is no match for the blind faith demanded by the Leave Campaign and it's magical unicorn promises... Tine for #FinalSay on the Brexit deal 
The best two-minute summary you will ever hear of this Brexit fraud. 
After calls from business owners who face the devastating prospect losing their businesses because of Brexit, James O’Brien lets rip at the “fraudsters” who led us to this ridiculous situation.Hats off to @mrjamesob.Worth watching & sharing. 
Dominic Cummings, chief executive of Vote Leave, says that if there were a second referendum, Leave would win it with an increased majority. I believe him. Especially if he were in charge again. 
#JaneygodleyVoiceover Tereeza is bricking it over Brexit  
How David Cameron's welfare cuts led directly to the Brexit vote  
An almighty mess, and then the breakthrough: how Donald Trump would negotiate Brexit 
No UK prime minister has visited Africa since 2013. In contrast Macron has visited Africa nine times. UK believes it will "form trading links with the Commonwealth post #Brexit".I can't see how UK can compete against EU on this continent. 
"What good is a referendum? That is a meek response," Wong-Tam says now, directly criticizing Tory. She's all-in backing Keesmaat. People didn't want the megacity, she says, and the people got that anyways 
So Darren Grimes' crowdfunding video isn't hosted under his own YouTube account. It's among the videos created by recent Guido appointee Tom Harwood.#brexit  
As a T1 diabetic I’m in two minds about this because if it is a no deal & I die within about 3 weeks, at least I won’t have to hear about fucking Brexit ever again.  
This is a lump of granite. It’s hard. Very hard. This is how I want my Brexit.  
Brexit bias EXPOSED: Jacob Rees-Mogg leads calls for Electoral Commission resignations  - I HAVE COMPLAINED TO THE E.C ABOUT VOTER INTIMIDATION & THEY IGNORED IT. Can we have International inspectors to oversee our next election. 
The @LibDems are picking up support as #Brexit threatens to ruin Britain.Help turn 10% into 20%.Turn 20% into 30%.And turn your back on the #Brexit supporting @Conservatives & @UKLabour parties.Support the @LibDems & a #PeoplesVote with the chance to say no to #Brexit  
Britain’s concentrated economy is likely to become even less competitive after Brexit  
So if Frank Field and Kate Hoey's CLPs can have votes of no confidence in them for voting with Tories on Brexit, Birmingham Yardley should surely be doing the same for @jessphillips who it turns out is working for Tory Lord Ashcroft for cash on the side. 
Overturning Brexit: our elites have contempt for the lower orders.  
Our #FinalSay petition for a referendum on the final Brexit deal just cleared 300,000 signatures. Join the campaign and let your voice be heard  
The misinformation that was told about Brexit during and after the referendum  
If the government cracks on this and extends Article 50 then I predict the following:1: A leadership challenge against the PM2: The rise of extremists as a backlash 3: Electoral oblivion for the Conservative Party 4: Nation humiliation 5: A worse deal in the long run#Brexit  
I watched @Channel4News  tonight and their excellent coverage of today’s revelations of horrible targeting of lies in the referendum run-up. And I watched @BBCNewsnight turn this into a story about what FB means to young people.  And I wondered: WTF has happened to the @BBC ? 
The  election hacked by  & intellectual property taken to . Good bye Brexit  ... wonder who wins cyberwars? 
Was just on BBC Newsnight and yet again they try to shut down an established fact: Vote Leave cheated and broke the law in the referendum. That's not an 'allegation'. That's a fact. That is the finding of the Electoral Commission and is why Vote Leave was referred to the police. 
Endless #brexit garbage but those who fought WW2 and have passed on would love to see a united Europe It’s what the fight was about 
Wow! Over 300k signatures in 48 hours. Keep it going folks, send it to friends and family via Twitter m, Facebook, Messenger, text or email. Brexit is to important to ignore. Next target 500k signatures. ⁦@jk_rowling⁩ ⁦@GaryLineker⁩ ⁦pls RT  
The Independent's Brexit petition reaches 300,000 in just over 48 hours  
300,000 people call for a #PeoplesVote in 48 hours- The country believes Brexit is going badly- From both sides, we know so much more now than in 2016- We must not be shut out of the final decision- It’s time for us to have the final say#PeoplesVote 
Its great isn't it..  Especially as it's due to an EU directive and not the Cons, which you are aware of.But go ahead, crow..The Govt taking credit for EU policies is why the UK is in the brexit mess it is in. That and Austerity#StopBrexitSaveBritain 
This is the best photo I've seen capturing @UKIP spirit.Taken in 2016 in the lead up to the referendum. At 7am multiple Kent @UKIP branches  cheered on @Nigel_Farage who was leading the flotilla @fishingforleave.Let's fight for Brexit once more @GerardBattenMEP 
So are we, its about time as we need to #StopBrexitLabour MP Stephen Kinnock has said Arron Banks' donations before the referendum need to be looked at more closely#PeoplesVote #FBPE 
For anyone blithely imagining that a no-deal Brexit won’t be so bad please, please take a read of this. Then tell me it won’t be so bad. #PeoplesVote 
Theresa May's 'reassurance and comfort' about stockpiling food is utter rubbishBy @ElfreaLockley #BrexitShambles #Brexit 
Labour have opposed this shambolic Tory Brexit plan in Parliament over and over again.On the right, votes with the govt.In the middle, votes against the govt.On the right, abstentions.The small group of Labour MPs voting with the govt are helping keep the Tories in power.  
BREXIT: Wider probe into pro-Brexit multi-millionaire Arron Banks is needed, says MP /#Brexit  #Toxic #PeoplesVote  
This is what we need. Much more true to why we voted to leave and much more likely to actually be deliverable. Encouraging that it is at least in preparation #Brexit  
My best friend on post-Brexit trade with America: "I don't want access to medicines where the adverts say you might sh** yourself, have a brain aneurysm and die!" 
For the first time, more people support a second referendum - and this is despite a leadership vacuum in this country and a state broadcaster that refuses to report the shift in public opinion. 
1. UK could cancel Brexit and stay in EU on same terms, says French governmentFFS Don't pass this up @theresa_may @jeremycorbyn.1st one to back a #PeoplesVote wins the next election..there is no Better Deal than the one we have. #Remain#Brexit harms us.  
The thing is, there’s an FA Cup Final every year because facts change and one result doesn’t stand forever. So this is pretty much the worst analogy possible for defending Brexit, isn’t it?  
A Brexit dividend! For Austria!Austrian Foreign Minister says Brexit has made Austrians less Eurosceptic. Good 
If @KateHoeyMP had any integrity whatsoever she'd resign, trigger a by election and stand as a Brexit independent  
The Brexit fallback was commissioned by David Davis and is still being worked on - lawyers are converting it into a legal text that will be ready to go should talks collapse 
. @Jacob_Rees_Mogg is a fanatic who cares not a jot about the death and suffering ordinary people might suffer so long as he and his venal transatlantic clique get their #BrexitTaxHaven for the rich. #Brexit #StopBrexit #PeoplesVote 
EXCLUSIVE: The 'reserve parachute': Secret Brexit plan being drawn up by ministers in case Chequers deal is killed off by EU  
#brexit PollWhat's the best option for Britain?Please vote and retweet 
I’m so sorry but some of you did more to engage people to vote on love island than you did the last general elections and referendum 
It is beyond a joke that the Government persists in a policy that requires us to stockpile food and medicine as a result of a gerrymandered referendum, which was narrowly won almost certainly due to law-breaking. It is as if they are deliberately determined to humiliate the UK. 
COMMENT OF THE DAY: Brexit appears to now be a gateway drug into extremism.  
Well that weirdly divided opinion! Brexit is like this generations Oasis/Blur. Can’t we all just like Pulp for Gog’s sake. 
Mayor @JohnTory prides himself on reading reports and doing other research. So why was he and his staff insisted today that he wanted a referendum before the civic election? Hard to believe they didn't know this  
Liam Fox backs a no-deal Brexit and warns Theresa May that extending talks would be a "complete betrayal". So the Secretary of State for International Trade wants complete withdrawal from every UK trade agreement with the entire world. Utter madness. 
So the “fall back” option is what ⁦@SteveBakerHW⁩ and ⁦@DavidDavisMP⁩ had already produced? Crazy idea, but ditch Chequers now and get Brexit back on track. #ChequersMeansCorbyn 
From one who knows. Brexit becomes Brexcrement.  
Opinion: If you've forgotten all the lies told during the Brexit referendum and what the truth has turned out to be, let me remind you  
Another sign that Brexit will end up with Council of Ministers rather than Commission. But British shouldn’t  necessarily think this will make a deal more likely.  
If Brexit hopefully reminds us of one thing in Britain, its that the historic divisions among us, of nationality, race, class, whether one is an immigrant or not... are Trojan horses used by the most selfish of villains to manipulate us to act for their good.  Not ours. 
This follows Vauxhall CLP’s ‘motion of no confidence’ in Kate Hoey just yesterday.Field and Hoey have consistently voted against the Labour whip (and with the Tories) on key Brexit proposals in Parliament.Labour members in those CLPs have obviously had enough. 
This video focuses on the danger to Scotland if it does not become independent before Brexit.  
Watching The Running Man and preparing myself for a no-deal Brexit. 
No deal would be catastrophic, sure.  But let’s not lose sight of the fact that any Brexit would be harmful. Chequers plan sacrifices 80% of the economy 
Poll: Last @YouGov poll suggest Uk wants a Second Eu referendum. Do you want a second referendum? Vote and retweet for a big sample 
The leaders of the Brexit campaign understood the world view of the English so much better than the Remainers. Calling for a popular front to defeat the English will merely fuel the worst fears of those who voted Leave, says @JYDenham 
Kate Hoey unanimously lost a vote of no confidence by her local party, while Frank Field still faces the same battle.#Brexiteers take note. This is the Labour party that claims - claims - to respect the result of the EU referendum 
Liberal Comfort Blankets - Carole Cadwalladr posted a nonsensical tweet today showing the swing of opinion from Remain to Leave during the EU referendum campaign and claiming this as evidence that the Leave advertising worked.This is a ludicrously  
This is quite good on why a 2nd referendum is a bad idea. Obviously, the only people in favour of a 2nd referendum are people who don't accept the decision of the first one and want to overturn it   
Six years ago today. Remember what a dazzling brilliant creative inclusive multicultural world-facing nation that for a moment we were...What would Danny Boyle's Brexit tableau look like?  
A border between Northern Ireland and Ireland would cost lives @Jacob_Rees_Mogg. It's not a case of if, or but, it's a case of when. Politics, Brexit, Power, Ambition, Money; none of these things are worth a human life.We deplore what you stand for.#StopBrexit #PeoplesVote 
The second referendum will actually be the third. First was 40 odd years ago. So it’ll be best of three, which seems fair and reasonable, aye?  
So: Climate change IS real; every year hurricane season gets worse and Greece is on fire.Brexit WILL lead to food shortages and poverty.Trump IS a Russian mole, sabotaging the West on their behalf.At what point do we start telling rich old white guys to shut the fuck up? 
Because tragically the @BBC has lost any sense of news values when it comes to Brexit  
What this means is Vote Leave cheated and broke the law to win an advisory referendum. That is not democratic.A #PeoplesVote is. 
“Brexit will cost the average family £900/year”“Scaremonger”“Sorry I misread that, Brexit is already costing the average family £900/year”(Remember Leavers, we’ve not even left yet).  
Listening to @mrjamesob today about all those personal stories regarding their futures and a no deal brexit - I found myself relating to every single one of them . It’s scary when you can see what’s coming .. incredibly scary . 
Toronto had a referendum on amalgamation.  It was completely ignored.  It’s not even a strategy.  #Fordectomiesarepainful... 
Andy Davey on the red moon, Theresa May, Boris Johnson and Brexit - Political Cartoon Gallery in Putney  
More tales of woe from Brexit Britain. With no migrants there is no one to pick the fruit, so it is rotting in the fields. As a result, the children starve. This could all have been avoided.  
Brexit: Liam Fox says no deal better than a 'betrayal' of voters by prolonging negotiations with EU  
If Remain won a 2nd Referendum - how can we expect Leave Voters to accept the result of a 2nd Referendum, when Remainers did not accept the result of the 1st Referendum. Voters get misled in all Elections, so that alone cannot justify a 2nd Election.@georgegalloway@talkRADIO 
A no deal Brexit means 60% of our food becomes unavailable. This effectively creates a national food supply crisis. This will cause huge amounts of anger. And I’m willing to bet that the angriest, shoutiest people will be the people who voted for this. 
Now that Imran Khan is going to run Pakistan, we could do far worse than put popular but eccentric English all-rounder Derek Pringle in charge of Brexit. 
‘@LiamFox’s 3 warnings for May Extending #Brexit negotiations would be a "complete betrayal"  Accept a no-deal Brexit over requesting more time to negotiate a dealShe’ll suffer a major Conservative rebellion if she seeks to extend talks  
Is it essential to preserve democracy in the UK to offer a 2nd ref/people's deal on Brexit? 
Can there be any clearer demonstration of the bullshit-sodden catastrofuck of Brexit than the man who said it would be the easiest deal in history now saying we should go for the easiest no deal in history? pic.twitter.com/bFsDNvqXMZ 
The brilliant  thing about this relentless stream of remain rebel propaganda is that it isn't working!!  I'm very proud of my fellow Brits for refusing to listen to all this utter garbage & for keeping their resolve.#brexit #WTO #WTOdeal 
Theresa May will go down in history as the PM who betrayed the UK to the EU. May is deliberately sabotaging Brexit because she can’t stand the fact British voters rejected the EU & she lost. Brits have a choice to make May or Brexit because May will never allow a real Brexit  
Facebook messages used by pro-Brexit campaigners during the 2016 referendum have been published for the first time by a parliamentary committee examining fake news. 
We must not normalise what this sham govt are doing. They are caught in dangerous tunnel vision, desperately clinging to power no matter the consequence to the people of this country. #Brexit #voteleavebrokethelaw 
UKgov: We’ll make sure there’s adequate food in case of a no-deal Brexit.UK people: Great! Does that mean the poor can stop using foodbanks then?UKgov: Don’t be silly, what we actually meant was that there’d be adequate food for those that can afford it. 
Dear @theresa_may / @MattHancock Curious to know whether the inquiry into why >20,000* excess deaths occurred from Jan - April 2018 - has begun? Whilst govt talks of “stockpiling medicines” perhaps understanding this first might be helpful, to avoid more catastrophe.#Brexit pic.twitter.com/liY4865ywt 
Dave Brown on Theresa May and Brexit - Political Cartoon Gallery in Putney  
6 years ago and Andy Wigmore... Bad boy of Brexit.... hero of "taking back control".... best mate of Arron Banks and..... comms director and number 2 at @LeaveEUOfficial is leading the team out for the Olympic team..... The BELIZEAN Olympic  team. 
Brexit has ruined job interviews. "Where do you see yourself in three years?" "Drafted into the expeditionary force and about to invade Calais in search of adequate food." 
The Tory Brexiters appear psychologically incapable of understanding that the EU27 countries value group cooperation and solidarity, and that the EU is a rule-based, not a make it up as you go along, organisation. #Brexit #PeoplesVote #StopBrexit 
If the threat of grounded planes, food shortages and even the country literally running out of fucking blood didn't convince you that a no-deal Brexit is perhaps a bad idea then congratulations - you're as stupid as Liam Fox.  
Anyone else find interesting that polls are now showing Remain in the lead by 55/45, while almost the entire political class and media are pushing Brexit? 
Long Read: The Arron Banks allegations.The full Channel 4 News investigation into the man who bankrolled Brexit – and his African diamond mine empire. 
In blunt and public remarks, Michel Barnier says he'll never accept Theresa May's plan for customs after Brexit  
The EU is incapable of negotiating a beneficial #Brexit for both itself a federal bloc & a sovereign UK for fear of setting a precedent, it craves power not a deal. The sooner Mrs.May realises this the better. Nation-state sovereignty is considered far right within EU circles.  
To recap, Labour angry with Kate Hoey not because she is a Brextremist, but because she propped up the Govt. This is about Labour wanting to impose their disastrous Brexit upon us rather than the Tories' disastrous Brexit. It is about power, not principle. 
How our democratic norms die. Tonite on #bbcaq Chloe Westley of secretively funded Taxpayers Alliance. She ran social media for Vote Leave churning out Facebook dark ads in #Brexit campaign. What sort of thinking in BBC puts such people on a programme?  
Dom Cummings on Brexit Betrayal party: If [Remain] gets its way [on 2nd ref], Vote Leave 2 will be much much worse than VL1. VL2 will win by more than VL1 ... morph into new party, fight next election to implement the promises we made in the ref because MPs shown can’t be trusted  
Tory MP"I have been around my constituency asking people what they think of [the #Brexit white paper]... To them, it just doesn’t pass the sniff test...of this being a proper Brexit. We remain attached to too many vestiges of the EU" 
The aim of Brexit hardliners is to cross the line on 29 March 2019. They will if positions are not made clear, if the heart remains silent, and if people like me, EU citizens and migrants, continue to be viewed as toxic rather than integral to the fabric of this country. 34/ 
It may well be in terms of immediate impact, but make no mistake: there is no good Brexit. There is no Brexit for the many > by default, it is only for the few. It will make the UK poorer, it will rob Britons of rights. It will make life worse for all but a handful of people. 29/ 
How long do you think is OK, when the country is going down the pan and the clock (fertilised by Labour and their whipping of MPs) is ticking?10 weeks max until the EU needs to take any WA to the EU27 for ratification.245 days to Brexit.Tick tock.  Tick tock.Tick tock. 
A bit like #Brexit denial?If you think about it Alastair, #Brexit denial is a crime against Democracy! 
Millions of British patients would be hit by medicines shortage in event of no-deal #Brexit warns head of ⁦@MHRAgovuk⁩ #BrexitShambles #PeoplesVote 
 Look beyond LondonEverything is still far too focused on London and my view is that essentially nothing has been learned with respect to the damage that did in 2016. Yes, local groups have done a lot around he UK, and we have learned about impact of Brexit on different 19/ 
And then there are so many others who need to get that platform too: women (who will be more severely affected by Brexit for all the reasons set out below); people with disabilities or particular illnesses etc; pensioners; particular sectors etc.  17/ 
from people who are not politicians / big campaigners. They are "just" people. Their stories need to be heard because they give a real sense of the impact of Brexit. Some, like younger Britons, have made good progress on this, but it's not enough. We need to hear them more. 16/ 
the heart, the emotion. There has to be a positive case for the EU that is not driven just by points about trade etc. It has to be about the personal dimension of Brexit. Just ask this one question of someone who still supports leave: why do they think it will benefit them? 13/ 
408 seats are for Leave, only 242 for Remain.  That is why @theresa_may has to bow to peoples' decision to leave the EU.  LANDSLIDE.  @BorisJohnson #borisjohnson #boris johnson #Brexit @theresa_may… 
I'm trying to understand the continued acceptance by ex-Remainers (esp MPs) of Brexit, even though it was born of lies, tainted by fraud, likely malevolent interference & found seriously detrimental or incoherent. We Brits once noted for common sense seem to have lost it. 
There is going to be a political realignment after May destroys the Tories. Moderate Brexiteers should start signing up at  We need to be ready to save Brexit. 
After #Brexit farming will cease to exist and food imports from the EU will stop. Now is the time to plant a vegetable patch and get some chickens & pigs. There will be sacrifices but those who prepare will survive!#NoDealBrexit #NoDealSurvival 
Just incase you didn't know #Brexiteers...RT if you'd like #Brexiteers to understand this. #EU #Brexit  
For a long time I have been puzzled as to why the government allowed BBC and SKY News to be so painfully biased against this country and brexit and then I realised. . . . . .they're all singing from the same hymn sheet - more conspiracy from this rotten government. 
And Tax Payers Alliance are on #bbcaq tonight! @BBC in full brexit backing mode 
This is superb. But tactical problem for remainers is whether emphasising no deal catastrophe turns opinion against Brexit or turns opinion in favour of any deal, no matter how dire? More here:  
Majority now back a second referendum on Brexit terms.Support for it has been steadily increasing in the face of parliamentary deadlock, anger among Brexiteers, and the rejection by EU of large parts of May’s plan.The “will of the people”, Brexiteers say  
You, Banks, Farage and others undermined Brexit when you conspired with the Kremlin for its campaign. 
Even Remainer MP admits second Brexit referendum is WORST thing Britain could do  
Brexit: British attempts to bypass the European Commission in Brexit talks by dealing directly with member states are failing, as national governments line up to back the official EU position: The naivety of May and her Brexiters is astonishing!  
A Unionist recently told me that Brexit supporters are reluctant to speak out because the "dominant narrative" is one of opposition to Brexit. So I want to speak to people who are pro-Brexit as their views are just as important. Get in touch. RT! 
This is the point: not just 36 ways a no-deal Brexit will hurt us. There are thousands of ways, some tiny, some monumental. For some people in specific situations any one of them could be life-changing. Above all, remember lives/livelihoods destroyed so gratuitously & pointlessly 
Disgraced former defence secretary Liam Fox says "No Deal" better than "the complete betrayal" of extending Brexit talks. Wow, senior Tories now transparent in their desire to drive the UK economy off a cliff   
Apparently in the UK to win a referendum you need to run a dodgy campaign and lie. #VoteLeave #BetterTogether 
BREAKING NEWS: young people whose futures are going to be destroyed by Brexit support the option to not have their futures destroyed by Brexit  
Final Say: Nick Clegg backs Independent’s campaign for a referendum on final Brexit deal  
Why are the new revelations of dirty tricks and lies by the Brextremist groups during the EU Referendum considered strong enough to lead @Channel4News, but not considered worthy of a mention by @BBCNews tonight? 
The UK's trade secretary now says going without a Brexit deal is better than a Brexit extension  
I know that you may have problems with complex things like numbers, @piersmorgan, but it wouldn't be a second referendum. It'd be either a THIRD (if you count the 1975 referendum) or the FIRST referendum on the final deal.  
If you get an email about Brexit from Theresa May Dominic Raab or the Tory party Do Not Open it..... It’s SPAM!!!!!  
Brexiteers accuse Remainers of “loving this great Country to fail just so they can say ‘told you so’”Next it will be “Remainers prefer to be right than to cooperate to get a workable Brexit”It smacks of panicWhen Catalan processists began to say thus, it meant they had failed  
More on the BBC's favourite panel show guests the Taxpayers' Alliance here. It's a key part of the shadowy network of hard/far-right lobby groups covered in @MollyMEP's new website on the "Brexit Syndicate". 
Liam Fox warns Theresa May that extending Brexit talks would be a 'complete betrayal' 
Watch how James @mrjamesob, the consummate, quintessential radio presenter holds it together, he really wants to say fuck this fucking nonsense, fuck #Brexit & the fucking Brexeratti who are fucking ruining our country, fuck you & fuck you some more. But he can't, so I will.  
Six years ago this very day. When Britain had the exact opposite of the mean, nation in decline spirit delivered by Brexit  
Wasn’t it young Liam@who said negotiating Brexit deal would be exceptionally easy peasy? Yes, it was 
That’s not my Brexit & it’s all the EU’s fault, britsplains head of pro-Brexit think-tank.@HenryNewman’s failure to recognise that the consequences he rightly fears follow directly from what he and @OpenEurope campaigned for & defended is shocking. 
Fucking Brexit.Something we didn't want, didn't need & didn't ask for. Forced upon us by a weakling Tory PM who disappeared faster than Lucan. Taken up by another Tory PM who can't please anybody. And a sickly Labour Opposition that merely props up the Tories.Fucking Brexit. 
We're doing all this Brexit stuff supposedly in the name of democracy. Democracy means people power.Only 11% of Brits think this is going well.If the people are feeling powerless, like we're stuck on a train that's quickly going off the rails, something must change#PeoplesVote 
Liam Fox, Secretary of State for International Trade has warned Theresa May that extending Brexit talks would be a 'complete betrayal.’ The betrayal is that 2 years have been wasted by this shambolic, shower of a Gov’t who even TODAY can’t agree on a plan!  
This Liam Fox, with Murdoch,Farage and Sarah Sands from BBC the day after Brexit vote. Move along little people, nothing to see here, everything above board. Let’s crack on with this  “easiest deal ever”!  #brexit  
If Tory party deliver a very weak/BRINO Brexit, they will be toast - will be mass exodus for UKIPIf Tory party agree to a second referendum, they will be toast.. nobody will trust themThe only thing they can do is deliver a real BrexitTheresa May won't do this so #MayMustGo 
By your logic @piersmorgan, there wouldn't have been a referendum in 2016 because we had one in 1975. When circumstances change, the public can reconsider.Circumstances have changed since 2016...nothing Leave promised is happening. Let's vote on Brexit reality, not fantasy.  
ScotTories: How can we divert attention from our head office confirming medicines are being stockpiled due to Brexit? ScotTories: *snaps fingers* Got it! We’ll take a policy already implemented by the SNP, and pretend we came up with it...that should do the trick.  
I like you Chris but this wasn’t the brainchild of the Tories. It resulted from an EU directive. One of the many great things the EU has done for us. History will not look back kindly on this govt Chris. You’re doing us irreparable damage with Brexit.  
M&S is offering a preview of Brexit Britain  
OMG. Best . News. Ever. That leavers worship a guy who packed off to Malaysia & wanted brexit to stop this & to create disaster capitalist UK so he cld get his cheap labour here always a mystery . Turkeys & Christmas come to mind. #ExtremeEULoyalty 
There is an assumption in this article that I absolutely reject, and am astonished that a member of Open Britain should make it: that Brexit is a done deal. It is not. "Europe must wake up to the looming nightmare of a no-deal Brexit | Henry Newman  
When people say they want to ‘stop Brexit’, they’re really saying they want to stop democracy, says Brendan O’Neill:  
BBC deny this story and asking me for my source. Another Attenborough moment no doubt. If we have gone any small way to stopping this then great. But I don’t believe this & they will be giving Dimbleby the night out, so he can’t say with glee ‘we’re out’. Stop Brexit. #FBPE 
Dominic Raab to unveil new post Brexit public information campaign...  
Kate Hoey MP Took 57% of the vote on re-electionLoyal to Corbyn during his no-confidence voteTrue to Labour manifesto to deliver on results of Referendum Shat on from 50,000 feet by Hard-Left Mafia. @KateHoeyMP #KateHoey 
UK: “Brexit means Brexit!”EU27: “What does that mean?”UK: “Brexit means Brexit!”EU27: “Alright then, Brexit means Brexit”UK: “How punitive! Destroy your core principles or we’ll go full Weimar and it will all be your fault.”   
A huge thank you to MEP Alex Mayer @alexlmayer for taking the time to visit the farm today. We talked #FaceTimeaFarmer, #blackgrass, #GlyphosateisVital, #Brexit, #Apprenticeships, #BuyBritish, and much more . #YourHarvest@NFUtweets @FarmersWeekly @Europarl_EN 
Before the EU referendum, John Major said it's "not politically credible" to hold another referendum after a vote to Leave. Couldn't agree more... #RightTheFirstTime 
Brexit cancelled. 
Our petition for you to have a #FinalSay on the Brexit deal has reached 290,000. You can join in by signing here  
This headline is just utter tripe. No disrespect intended to tripe of course. Am I furious about the utter shambles that Brexit is and the harm it will cause? Too right! But seriously ⁦@dailyexpressuk⁩ do your job more honestly than this 
What is the legitimate left-wing case for Brexit? — the eu has all the problems of a neoliberal capitalist country multiplied by the amount of member...  
Every time I talk to British media, the question ‘do you think the EU wants to punish Britain?’ is asked.... while in fact most Europeans pitty the way in which the UK punishes itself #Brexit 
New images of Civil Guard using gas against public during Catalan referendum  
Anyone noticed that Brexiters have completely given up arguing there are any positive benefits from Brexit? 
According to this article, if a country leaves the EU, the EU should make sure that the leaving country keeps all the benefits of staying, but without the costs. The EU should also compromise on of its 4 freedoms#brexit #brexitshambles #brexitlies 
#Conservatives now stand for nothing, and so fall for everything, writes Bow Group Chairman @B_HQ for @prospect_uk #Brexit#conservatism 
Vote Leave accused of using Facebook ads to breach Brexit campaign pause after Jo Cox murder 
Dominic Cummings: If there’s a 2nd referendum, prepare for a Vote Leave government  
.@natalie_bloomer is me while I'm away and I defer all my Brexit opinions to @jonlis1 who'll be doing a couple pieces for the site. 
Right that's me done, I'm off on holiday for a week. Please no one message me any Brexit stuff while I'm away, I cannot express how much I do not want to see it. 
The Brexit/Trump era took away Anthony Bourdain & Jonathan Gold, but left us with this bloviating shitbag who wants to "Brenter" other countries to incite culinary conflicts that never even existed. Stick to yelling about Beef Wellingtons in Hell's cafeteria, a-hole.  
My bit on your inspirational week in Brexit  
If you're a South-East Labour Party member, I'm running for the NPF. If you elect me to the NPF, I‘ll work with you and our members to protect our communities and the poorest against a hard Brexit and Austerity.Please put a cross next to my name when you fill out your ballot   
In Lidl today, British Strawberries = £7.30 per kg.Spanish strawberries = £4.23 per kg.British Strawberries are rotting in the fields (yes, they REALLY ARE) because EU pickers didnt come this year & UK workers cant/wont do the job economically.This WILL get worse post-Brexit  
The EU27 aren’t punishing the UK. Britain has chosen to leave. Britain has set its red lines. And both these decisions have consequences. These consequences are called Brexit. 
Nothing surprises me about these criminals any more. Brexit is a con dreamed up by currency speculators enabled by Russian dark money, electoral fraud and race hate and STILL they pursue it. The DWP, much like war criminals, are hiding the evidence.This is the downfall of tyrrany 
And they said that #Brexit had nothing to do with racism. It's been abundantly clear, since the vote, that there's a grubby little secret locked away in the minds of many in the UK and Vote Leave made good use of it to swing the vote their way.  
Theresa May’s attempt to bypass Brussels in Brexit talks fails as member states line up to back official EU position.Amazing how those Tories drop Fair Play while always pretending to be the paramount upholders of British values 
Dear @piersmorgan next time you're thinking of buying a new home, let me be your agent. Just give me the money and I'll get you somewhere really good, honest! But remember once you've given me the money you've made your decision and there's no turning back!@GaryLineker#Brexit  
New PP leader wants to make holding a referendum illegal—which is not only anti democratic, it proves that the people who have been in jail for nine months already for holding a referendum are being held unjustly. If it was a crime, why does he need a new law to make it a crime?  
Many ppl now believe that @theresa_may has deliberately set about thwarting #Brexit and her standing as a leader across huge swathes of the country could not be lower.Not to say Corbyn stands any higher but a strong #Brexit leader must step forward to avoid #conservativewipeout 
‘We have always said, always, that the door would remain open,’ says French European affairs minister Nathalie Loiseau  - we should consider this and have a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal:  
But at least there’ll be blue passports (make in france that will have to cross the new border) and bendy bananas (that will probably be rotten with trade delays and ridiculous expenses under WTO trade terms).  How’s that whole #brexit thing looking?  
Now remainers are publishing photographs of empty shelves in supermarkets which were being enlarged claiming food shortages because of brexit. People fooled by this bullshit need to wake up to what and who remain are. These are the people who will sob loudest when shackles go on 
I use a deliberately (melo)dramatic image - Weimar Britain! - to  get EU27 leaders to focus on the strategic risk of Brexit (altogether) & a mishandled Brexit in particular:  
I’ve just been out stockpiling for Brexit - #Brexit #remain #remainers #leave #EU #brexitchaos #BrexitBetrayal 
Those calling for a second referendum should be careful what they wish for, says Dominic Cummings: 
We New Yorkers forget how lucky we are to even have AC on trains. In London, the only chilling sensation you get is the spine-tingling reminder that Brexit actually happened 
Reading Cummings blog, a rebuttal of the DCMS interim report, it's disturbing that he believes his attempts to deflect are effective, concentrating on minor details, steering the reader away from the crux of the matter - VOTE LEAVE CRIMINALLY CHEATED..... pic.twitter.com/LR2t6VGFwf 
Organicco's easiPAYER will integrate product quality with security of payment from supplier to end user. Taking away all risks associated with new clients, whilst meeting all international regulations and tariff. Another solution for #BrexitInvest at  
You’re the elite. And the rest of your statement is a lie. I was wondering when you’d blame us for this mess. Because that is what Brexit is all about: blaming somebody else for your problems. You caused this disaster. Own it. 
London Labour activists deselecting Labour MP @KateHoeyMP is a risky move for a party that currently relies on 158 seats that voted for Brexit 
A privilege to join George Eustice MP & local businesses in Redruth for an engaging discussion on economic renewal, tax policy reform, establishing the UK as global trading & re-energising Britain’s buccaneering spirit post Brexit. No doom & gloom or stockpiling discussions here!  
I'll remind you that Keir is not part of the party which brought us to the brink of a massive disaster by firstly calling the referendum and secondly making a mess of the negotiations. Enjoy your holiday @Keir_Starmer 
Wish @NicolaSturgeon would stop agitating for a 2nd independence referendum and get on with the day job  
Guy Verhofstadt, the European Parliament's spokesperson, has described the British Brexit Bill as 'sabotage'. @IainDale asks: Should the UK's £39bn Brexit bill be made conditional on a British-EU Free Trade agreement?  
Farmers warn of 'Armageddon scenario' if we don't get a Brexit deal  
Jeeeeesus. The #Brexit food supply issues are terrifying. Read this.  
How long after reversing the #Brexit decision will it take Remainer's to start saying that they've got a mandate to join the EURO, the EU Army & the Schengen Area ?  Not Long is my bet.  
NO ONE expresses better or more eloquently how I feel about this mind boggling, shitfest that is Brexit than @mrjamesob Put him in charge of everything! 
a) I voted Remain & would do so again. b) The UK economy is stalling because business never likes uncertainty. You can't blame  Brexit because Brexit hasn't actually happened yet.  
#Brexit looks like a great success so far. Our next step in exterminating humanity will be a referendum where the US votes to leave Earth (because Earth doesn't treat them fairly). 
I've said it before and I'll say it again: Sarah Wollaston is clearly very strongly anti-Brexit (fair enough), which makes the fact that she backed Leave up until June 2016 very bizarre.  
Ooh. Looks like Aaron Banks is getting his whole chapter in this report. Cant’ wait to get to that bit. Let’s just say the tease is “Spending on election or referendum campaigns by foreign organisations or individuals is not allowed" 
Notable that this piece on media failure and fake news omits any mention of journalists’ behaviour in our referendum in 2014. We’re just not on London’s radar.  
I am gratified to see that the Committee has ignored a concentrated attempt to make its focus on the subversion of the #Brexit referendum be about spending or other ephemeral matters. Report mentions these but goes straight for Russia’s throat on #Brexit AND US elections. 
This is true. Referendums are generally the opposite of democracy. They are the tool of autocrats, from Bonaparte to Putin. It may be tempting, when squeezed into a corner by demagogues, to call for a referendum. But that call is best resisted.  
Hey @GaryLineker could you ask @PiersMorgan if it worries him that the UK economy is already over 2% smaller than it would be if we hadn't voted for Brexit & is he not worried about it getting many times worse, which it will?  
Brexit is a mistake and we all know it #brexit #blunder 
Remoaner @DavidLammy has written a long list of *terrible* things that will happen if we have a No Deal Brexit. Shame he forgot some key ones:10. Mass flooding11. Attack by Godzilla 12. Plague of locusts13. First born given in sacrificeAny more?  
Rules mean rules, we reject them at our peril. My latest Brexit Blog post on this week's developments, talk of treason and punishment, and what we can learn from A Man for All Seasons, just up:  
Who said @UKLabour was listening to its #Brexit voters?  
“This totally anti-democratic move meant that even though the referendum was won with 51.6% of voters backing devolution, the Labour government decided not to implement it.”  
Honoured to be in Santiago de Compostela, forging closer links between #Wales & #Galicia. Our new relationship comes at an enormously important time as we prepare to leave the EU. The people of Europe are our valued friends and will continue to be after #Brexit.  
Since the Brexit vote, voters have been subjected to non-stop elitist insults. We’re dumb, racist, were fooled by a bus, have destroyed the nation. Such abuse would be seen as hate speech were it aimed at any other group.@Tom_Slater_ on the new elitism 
I'm not pointing any fingers, but much of the mainstream coverage missed out just how conniving, cynical and in its own shameless way - inspired - the UK government's Supreme Court Brexit case was. N.B. May contain Lord Keen of Elie.  
Theresa May took over at a time when the country needed a strong leader, a tough negotiator and a true patriot who believes in Britain and the opportunities that Brexit presents. She's failed miserably on all counts. Enough is enough! #MayMustGo 
Henceforth he shall be known as Raab C. Brexit, the central plank.  
“Mr. @AndyWigmore is a self-confessed liar and little importance can be attached to anything that he says”. @DamianCollins and DCMS Committee report on Russian bots for Brexit and fake news:  
People are talking up “No Deal Brexit” again. Why this is monumentally stupid:1. UK citizens will lose right to live in the EU (& vice versa) overnight.2. Police info sharing on int. criminals will end.3. A run on the pound is v.likely.4. A hard border Ireland is inevitable. 
At present some cocoa products from Africa are subject to punitive tariffs of 60% and some canned fruit 146%Doing away with these tariffs would not only mean cheaper fruit and chocolate, it would hugely help farmers in the developing world. #Brexit  
The whole referendum was based on lies and false promises. 
As Gary Lineker calls for a second referendum, there are concerns over what he’ll do if Brexit is reversed:  
Those Brits now wanting a second chance to opine on #Brexit include 1 in 5 Brexit voters...  
What if we have a 2nd referendum and Brexit wins again? What happens then? Best of 5? 
If the #Brexit bus was around today.....#MAYMUSTGO#ChequersMeansCorbyn 
Question for you, Jugs @GaryLineker: If we now have a 2nd referendum on Brexit & this time vote against it, can Brexiteers then immediately demand a 3rd?If not, why not? 
Odds on second referendum and no-deal Brexit tumble after surge in betting  
It is likely because of the bullying and drunkard behaviour of the EU that a second referendum would give a higher leave result so that means---- a third referendum. 
NEWS! Being ‘too hot to eat’ excellent preparation for a Brexit where there won’t be anything to eat  
Let’s Go!!! : France preparing for 'brutal divorce' with UK as Paris warns no-deal Brexit would cause gridlock in every European port' | via @telegraph 
Here are the searching questions the EU27 are failing to ask themselves in the wake of Brexit  
Yes @Jacob_Rees_Mogg it would mean the failure of the treasonous scheme to throw the British people off the no-deal cliff, producing great profit opportunities for disaster capitalists, and forcing a desperate UK to become a tax haven to attract business. #Brexit #StopBrexit 
A senior German source & I discussed my worry that if Brexit went wrong Germany risked a simultaneous “battle” with US & Russia + collapse in relations with UK. My friend didn’t disagree but wrily observed Germany had often picked fights on too many fronts  
Clear evidence that NUS and student's unions are in line with what students on the ground think!The majority of students in our membership (across HE and FE) did not get a say last time and know full well that only a #PeoplesVote will stop a hard Brexit!  
Key takeaways: 1), With new subpoenas, Mueller Report won’t come before Nov, making midterms a partial referendum on his probe continuing. 2), Probe will grow, because Trump biz no longer off limits. 3) The criminal deal—promising to lift sanctions in exchange for dirt on Hillary 
When this Brexit sh*te is brought to its inevitable inglorious end, this guy needs to be awarded an OBE, or something  
BETRAYAL! EU expert says second referendum on Brexit would be a DISASTER  
Liam Fox warned Theresa May not to extend Brexit negotiations, claiming that doing so would amount to a “complete betrayal” of Brexit voters  
Arron Banks is singled out. Concerns are raised about foreign funding of Brexit campaign groups. DCMS remains unconvinced about the source of some of the money spent by the leave side - particularly by Banks 
So, does @LoveIsland's Hayley finally understand #Brexit?  
>when Brexit doesn't actually mean Brexit  
Let's name it "Brexit" 
How far will the Brexit right go with its attacks on the integrity of democracy ? All the way to the end of the line? Me in @spectator 
Spine chilling. This small businessman almost in tears tells @mrjamesob how Brexit will put him out of business and ruin his livelihood and those he employs. Inherited wealth Brexiteers like @mogg_jacob will have a lot to answer for as the anger grows against them. 
Theresa May set to announce                           **SPAMAID** Brexit stockpiling apocalypse  
yes, and it wasn't a Russian, nor a meme from Vote Leave that encouraged me to vote for Brexit. Millions of us have been waiting for this vote for decades. 
Alexa, show me a metaphor for the Leave referendum campaign.  
It's fun watching this cycling but it's a bit of a bummer not having a clue what's going on.I feel like David Davis at the Brexit talks. 
New facts have come to light since the referendum result which mean that many have changed their mind since  
The government’s plans for a #Brexit “Settled Status” for EU #Citizens in #Britain is unlikely to work smoothly and will hurt the most vulnerable ones: 
Important to understand Crux of #Brexit is that #UK voted in #EUref for the #MagnaCarta narrative identity it shares with #CANZUK, NOT #EU’s Charlemagnian alternative. It was a choice between two possible futures. #Leave won & #Remain lost. It’s time to #RespectTheResult #ukpoli 
Once again the best thing on Brexit this week: @samknightwrites on Brexit in @NewYorker - why has so much of the UK press led its readers to personal and national economic disaster? 
Any Brexiters who still quite like the idea of a no deal Brexit should read this article by @IanDunt. 
When does the ghost of Brexit’s father appear on the battlements to tell Brexit it has been betrayed? 
The government's proposals for a 'Green Brexit' are far too weak. Will you ask Michael Gove to tell the government to make these proposals much stronger? You can do it here with just a few clicks > Photo by G Bennett 
Stand-Off: EU Rejects May’s Softest Brexit Plan Yet, Pushes Full Customs Union Membership   
She just won't get the message, will she?Theresa May’s latest attempt to bypass Brussels in the Brexit talks fails yet again as member states line up to back the official EU position.#NoDeaNoBrexit#PeoplesVote 
Failure to have a planFailure to create a planCreate a plan but fail to agree it#Brexit was a fucking failure from the fucking beginning, you couldn't win honestly so you cheated & broke the fucking law. You have no fucking clue. Brexit has failed, give it up. #PeoplesVote 
Caroline Lucas backs Independent's campaign for a referendum on final Brexit deal  
What would day one of a no-deal Brexit actually look like? I take a peek into a possible future for @Independent. It's Saturday 30 March 2019.... 
New figures show almost 70% of students support a #PeoplesVote on the final #Brexit deal. Clear the public need control of their future:  
SNP always keen to talk up the Claim of Rights. They believe the people of Scotland should determine how it is governed. Its been a while(many SNP generations) since we had a referendum on devolution. Lets have a referendum to decide if we keep or scrap the pretendy parliament. 
She  @KateHoeyMP is a highly principled woman I have known for 40 years. Some of her principles I agree with #Palestine #Iraq #Trident #Brexit #Corbyn others not #Ireland #Foxhunting But give me Hoey over a hundred of the Blairite backstabbers 
No, Richard, what was indefensible was hiding an important report that stated Scotland could be one of the richest countries in the world, moving the goalposts on the devolution referendum and counting non voters, prisoners and dead people as a vote for No - you dickheads!  
Compare and contrast.1. @IanDunt on what a no-deal Brexit means 
A betrayal on Brexit would push British politics to the extremes  
More polling data indicating that the majority of the British public now supports a 2nd referendum on a Brexit deal. We need the informed consent of the people which is why we should have a #PeoplesVote  
Theresa May’s attempt to bypass Brussels in Brexit talks fails as member states line up to back official EU position  
The evidence paints a picture that the mayor of Toronto, @JohnTory, was in on a colossal backstabbing of his fellow citizens. Council slashed, he calls for a referendum that can't happen, then we learn the mayor's race is unaffected even though council races are.#topoli #onpoli 
European Parliament says it will veto Brexit deal over Theresa May ‘backsliding’ on Irish border  
 “Brexit means stockpiling medicines... and we're meant to be reassured?” 
Another Tory helping out a law breaker and, like Baker, Mogg and of course Trump, undermining the institutions which ground our democracy. Remember the Tory rage at the Article 50 court case. The law is the basis of democracy, these MPs are its enemies. #Brexit #StopBrexit 
On June 22 2016, I was asked to write three long scenario pieces explaining what might happen next for each possible referendum result. They were never printed. I've just stumbled across the one for "Leave". I was wrong about Boris - PS this is what my unsubbed copy looks like.  
Final say: Majority of students would support a vote on the final Brexit deal  
Q. Why do the Tories keep on backing failed privatisations of public services?A. Because Tory ideology is religiously based on the extreme free-market economics of Hayek & Friedman.Even financial crisis couldn’t change their minds. Prepare for more privatisation after #Brexit 
I sold my main business (manufacturing) mainly due to Brexit. Not sure if the remaining one will survive a hard Brexit. Taking back control? 
Fake news. These are major delays. Brexit crashing the system. Ps good trolling @jubileeline 
Not one of the 10 people running the once-impartial Electoral Commission supports Britain’s Brexit vote.In fact, 3 of them chose to breach neutrality with anti-Brexit remarks even while in post.No action from their official regulator… Speaker Bercow. 
There’s a simple and obvious answer to this: #EEA + a customs union. Crystal clear that an EEA-based #Brexit has always been the only viable alternative to crashing out with no deal (as I’ve been saying for about two years!). Time to get real.  
Brexit youth group's Facebook ads reached mostly older audience  
Only a quarter of Brits think May will secure a good Brexit deal, poll shows  
There's no middle ground re Trump any more, no desire to be fair.Even today's undeniably excellent growth numbers will be deemed a fiasco by his critics. As with Brexit in UK, only extreme partisan positions are acceptable. Any attempt at impartiality must be abused/crushed.  
Have two type 1 diabetic children. About time we pulled the plug on Brexit.  
Very good piece by @IanDunt outlining the horror show that will happen with food production and supply if ERG Brexit maniacs get their way (& he left in the Astronaut bit, an excellent editorial choice imo). 
Unfortunately, a no-deal Brexit will almost certainly affect regular scans. The radioisotopes used can't be stockpiled and need to be imported - meaning that any delays at the border will be passed on to patients. 
Putin is offering cabinet member-like praise of POTUS this morning, and it is both gross and disconcerting all at once. Not letting go of Donbas referendum idea. Can't wait to see POTUS response. 
So the same people who didn’t go to the public last year when increasing the number of wards to 47 from 44. NOW want the public to be consulted? That’s pretty rich no? Why didn’t we have a referendum last year if they cared what we thought? #TOpoli #ONpoli 
#quote "The head of the WTO has told Sky News, BREXIT will NOT cause a disruption in trade. Robert Azevêdo @WTODGAZEVEDO has said he *personally* will work intensely to make sure the process is fast, + smooth."This has been known for nearly 2 years. So why all the scare stories? 
With the government in chaos and parliament in gridlock, the case for a #PeoplesVote is growing every day. But the campaign for a #FinalSay on Brexit must avoid the mistakes of the past, writes @CarolineLucas  
The whole Brexit mess is an absolute fucking shambles, a national humiliation, and being organised by people you wouldn’t trust to look after your kids in case they sold them. My patience couldn’t be wearing much thinner. Something needs to change, and soon. 
Fix Irish border or face hard Brexit, EU lawmakers warn May  
Theresa May’s attempt to bypass Brussels in Brexit talks fails as member states line up to back official EU position  
@JORISLUIJENDIJK has been chronicling the increasing despair of the Dutch watching the Brexit self-immolation process. For them it is the loss of a close ally in the EU. (The Irish largely feel the same way)  
So @TorontosMayor Did the people of Toronto have a referendum to increase councillors? If not, why the need for a referendum to reduce the number? @joe_warmington @TheSun @globeandmail @CTVNews @JamieMauracher 
NL was consistently like-minded with the UK on the majority of issues within the EU as well. Budget discipline, free-trade, single market, strict on competences, pro-Development etc. They’ll be disproportionately harmed by Brexit though. Another waste of a great relationship. 
Why on earth would I want to get involved in politics?! This is me being grilled by @krishgm on where my politics comes from, the vision for the future and Brexit.  
100% of insulin used in the UK is imported, and a disruption in the supply could have serious consequences for patients."Millions of patients could be affected by 'no-deal' Brexit medicines shortages, says MHRA chief" 
"The UK makes no insulin" observes head of MHRA. Sadly, neither does my diabetic son. Brexit isn't a jokey pantomime between mediocre politicians. It has real consequences.  
‘@DKShrewsbury: Brexit - deal or no deal – UK businesses are winners. “There should be no doubt that Britain has much to bring to the global market place and we should see Brexit for the opportunity that it is.” 
Our #FinalSay petition for a referendum on the final Brexit deal just cleared 280,000 signatures! Join the campaign and let your voice be heard -  
This strikes me as true too: a second referendum would destroy what's left of Britain's social fabric, politicians would become even more despised. And without Project Fear, tough to see how Remain could win a second round.  
As a British EU negotiator, I can tell you that Brexit is going to be far worse than anyone could have guessed  
Updated story: Tory wants a referendum on the size of council in the face of Ford's plan to impose 25 wards on Toronto, but the deadline to put that question on the ballot has passed  
The People Voted. Brexit won. End of. Any further fabricated 'referenda' concocted by the elite, Establishment & its Deep State operatives is merely a fig leaf for its brazen coup d'etat. Everyone can see this. No one is fooled any more. Change has come and Globalism is finished.  
On this graph in the piece - I'm constantly surprised when I'm researching Brexit how close the UK-Netherlands relationship is. From trade, to political climate, to lobbying for aviation liberalisation, they always come up.  
Just a thought but you know how people are telling us we will run out of food because of Brexit have they forgotten that countries outside of the EU have already discovered food and trade and may be quite keen to fill these mythical potential shortages 
Thank you @mrjamesob I am closing down my business as we speak. Brexit has already caused a price hike in materials I need and thanks to cut backs due to austerity I have had 3 businesses I contract for go bust leaving me owed 10s of thousands. This will get worse. 
Not completely true. Brexit has awaken the previously silent British pro-europeans, has started debunking the 40 years of anti-EU lies and has brought EU together like never before. Sometimes a crisis is necessary to move things forward. Let's not waste this crisis. 
A couple of points:1. If you are suggesting even wider illegality in the campaign, you are strengthening the case for the referendum to be annulled. Good!2. Do you have any comment on your ads that appear to have run during the moratorium following the murder of Jo Cox?  
The former boss of supermarket chain Waitrose has warned that a "no deal" Brexit would push up the cost of fruit, vegetables, meat and dairy products  - Use our leaflets to show the impact of Brexit on food trade:  
#Brexit: No withdrawal agreement without a “backstop” for the Irish border, says #EP Brexit Steering Group  via @Europarl_EN 
May's soft Brexit plan was officially rejected by the EU yesterday. She needs to realise that No-Deal is a possibility that should be seriously considered. 
Michel Barnier kills off Theresa May's #Brexit customs proposals  
Football legend Top BBC presenter Political pundit  Gary Lineker's #Brexit tweet has caused a stir  
Bringing you my weekly message after a very busy week meeting EU leaders re Brexit and visiting the Irish Defence forces staff who help to run the Operation Sophia rescue mission.  
An acrimonious No Deal Brexit would have profoundly damaging consequences for Europe. The economic effects would be bad for both sides but the implications for our shared security and defence could be far worse.  
The only reason this hasn't been a clear and simple Brexit is because there's been an infestation of Remainers refusing to accept the democratic principle at the heart of government and the media. What follows will be a mess and will be their (your) fault. And you will be blamed.  
To @JohnTory: the proper response is “That is a terrible idea.” It is not “Let’s waste everyone’s time and money on a referendum on this terrible idea.” There is NO REASON for this chaos except Doug Ford’s spite. 
You know Brexit has lost us the European Medicines Agency to Amsterdam?Did you also know that the UK's Medicines and Healthcare products Regulatory Agency is starting to lose work to agencies across the EU?#wato 
Unpopular opinion: in a democracy, referendums are a failure of political leadership. They are a cop-out masquerading as consultation, and usually end up causing more problems in the long-term. Cf Brexit 
Make your mind up JRM.It might be 50 years to see the “benefit” of Brexit but an A50 extension especially to see if people still want it is “a failure”.We know what the failure is.Look in the mirror. 
The system is bust:A 'friend of the Blairs' took the top job at the Electoral Commission a few months after the referendum.Someone with a track-record of outspoken anti-Brexit views.  
Insisting that Brexit will lead our nation to prosperity while at the same time having your investment firm transfer its cash back into the EU is the very definition of hypocritical tossery.  
Letting May take care of Brexit is like letting Harold Shipman take care of your Gran. 
After a string of calls from business owners who face losing their companies after Brexit, an angry @mrjamesob railed at the "throbbers" and "fraudsters" who led us here. This is vintage O'Brien. 
If a majority now want a 2nd EU referendum why are we not being allowed one? The UK is supposed to be a democracy, so why are we being forced to accept #Brexit by a handful of the Tory right wing? @theresa_may 
I would hazard a guess that an awful lot of leavers didn't have a clue what sovereignty was before the referendum and lots still don't. Personally I've always felt safer being in the EU with all it's protections. Much rather that than this shower of shit of a government! 
I hoped that the Mayor was going to defend Toronto's democracy and Council's own sanctioned process and court upheld ward boundary review. Not meekly object to Ford forcing this on Toronto "in the right way" and offer up a referendum.We have to rise + defend Toronto ourselves. 
Brexit Thought For The DayThe EU wants to blockade Britain, stop our planes flying, starve us of food and medicine, jam up up our ports as well as damage our security, economy and trade.No one in their right mind would want to be part of such an evil regime, would they?  
For all the folks now nodding sagely on discovering dodgy FB ads in Brexit and its subsequent use for Trump. Go look at Rob Shorthouse video on youtube actually explaining *live* how Better Together and Project Fear used it for dodgy political ads in Scotland IndyRef 2014. 
we know tory is a fraud because his council just led a four year process to review the ward boundaries. now he's saying: let's have a referendum on what we just decided. we know john is useless and won't ever stand up to the dutty premier. we have to do it ourselves 
A "referendum" is not an vigorous defence of Toronto's democracy. Very weak response from one who wants "strong mayor" powers.This political targeting of Toronto can't be stopped with a referendum. The City of Toronto Act calls for "consultation." Ford can not rule by fiat. 
mayor @JohnTory is proposing a referendum on this election's ballot to decide if we should change our boundaries and size of council. he's validating ford's idea, playing good cop to dug's bad. I think he's working with dug on this. we can and must say no to them both. 
You know who else once proposed a referendum on cutting council in half? Doug Ford, in August 2013. (See entry at 1:36) 
well, it's a good thing putting horrible and extremely disingenuous policy ideas to a referendum has never backfired anywhere in the english-speaking world  
Christ alive, these people who jump on you when you express anything other than full-throated support for fucking Brexit. You look at their timelines and it's all they've got. Well, that and picking on child abuse and murder but only when it's non-white people doing it. 
Stephen Daisley's latest comedy headline: "Could Brexit revive the SNP's fortunes?"  Yes, let's hope they 'recover' from winning 60% of seats in Scotland at the general election last year. 
.@johntory knows full well a referendum at this point is unlikely. This is spin. He's perfectly fine with what Doug Ford is doing. This is not standing up for Toronto - the only city council being attacked by Ontario's premier. #topoli #onpoli 
Mayor Tory says he wants a referendum on the size of Council. 76% were against Mike Harris' Mega City and the PC government amalgamated 'Toronto' anyways. 
This is equivocal from the mayor. Calling for a referendum. It is not an unequivocal defence of Toronto. This is not what what was needed. 
Mayor Tory speaking out against Doug Ford’s reported plan to cut city council almost in half.  Says needs consultation.  “Let’s put this Q to the people” wants a referendum #topoli #onpoli 
If any hard Brexit fan would like to say what @IanDunt has got wrong I’d love to read it: 
Kate Hoey and Frank Field. 2 MPs who've fought for #Brexit to be delivered in the face of Labour's negligent attitude to the result.And now Labour activists are working to kick them out.Well done Labour, you've once again shown your contempt for Britons and our democracy!  
Join our summer campaign against Brexit. 
Nobody who considers no-deal Brexit to be a genuine option could have even the faintest concern for the interests of the UK and its population.  
This businessman tells @mrjamesob that leading Brexiteers "haven't got a clue" when it comes to the reality of a no-deal Brexit.  
I want my #finalsay on Brexit, and if you do too you can sign the petition here:  
Call me a cynic, but I rather doubt that Gavin has changed his mind about Brexit.  
Would've owned the consequences, but not only didn't I get my version of Brexit (we'd already be out & have deals up and running), but we're not getting anything remotely like Brexit. An 'implementation period', where we keep paying and can't implement, is just more EU.  
Tory’s are finished for me. Bring on UKIP (only ones who would deliver brexit )   
Exactly why political micro-targeting is a problem way beyond the EU referendum. In addition to being beyond regulators to check on accuracy etc, it means different promises to different people - very damaging for the notion of political accountability. 
Barnier tears up May’s Brexit plan saying the EU ‘cannot and will not’ accept her customs proposals  
Gibraltar voted to remain in the EU by 96% and the UK and Spain have yet to reach agreement over its future after Brexit. Read@jamietrinidad on how Gibraltar can never 'leave Europe' #Brexit #Gibraltar 
“Britain was perfect in 2012 before Brexit caused all the problems” is the biggest self-snitch going 
Surging support for UKIP on Brexit and immigration, new poll shows  
Brilliant stuff. On one level Brexit has been the making of you. On another i feel a bit sad that you - and all of us activists, commentators and mortals following Brexit closely - have spent so much of our lives on something which is all so unnecessary. 
"The impact of a 'no deal' #Brexit on the #NHS and medical research will be immediate" @martinmckee latest #BMJOpinion lays out the consequences of the ongoing political chaos around Brexit:  
No they don’t Andrew. Soros and his cohort are ploughing a fortune into stopping Brexit and this is being fed through a pro Remain media. A debate was had, a vote was had & a result was obtained. We leave either with a deal or without one. 
All this talk about a no-deal Brexit reminds me of the financial crisis of 2007-08. And not, I'm sorry to say, in a good way. 1/11 
Steven Camley on Michel Barnier killing off Theresa May's Brexit customs proposals – political cartoon gallery in Putney  
more on the hidden ad campaign designed to sell Brexit  
What do you think about Brexit?Good to see the question put to British artist, Myles Sanko, by a Catalan journalist in Diari de Girona.Reply: Brexit is a sad political disaster which never should have happened. The world, in general, should be coming together, not separating.  
MPs can easily resolve Brexit. Problem is too many MPs won't accept the result and are trying to stop it. 91% of MPs voted for the referendum to take place and it's a disgrace that many of those same MPs won't support implementing the result to leave the EU. 
This is exactly the point. May is trying to move Overton window so we will see her Brexit fudge as less catastrophic and thus more acceptable. Don’t let her. Rather make the window move the other way- if this is what Brexit means, don’t do it at all  
That caller was right about James DysonHere he is explaining what he really wants from Brexit:1. An exemption so he can still bring in EU engineers;2. No workers' rights so he can "hire & fire" staff at will; &3. No corpn taxIs that what Leavers voted for?@LBC @mrjamesob 
You cannot simultaneously claim that it will take 50 years to see the benefits of Brexit and suggest that the slightest delay in starting that 50 year period is the “definition of failure”.  
If you've forgotten all the lies told during the Brexit referendum and what the truth has turned out to be, let me remind you  
What Brexit will mean for UK food supplies. Read this, then go stock up on canned goods  
Liam Fox has said that extending the Brexit talks, to reach a deal, will be a betrayal of the referendum. He prefer an utterly disastrous 'No Deal' Brexit. This from a man who once said that a post-Brexit trade deal would be "the easiest in human history"... #BrexitShambles 
Remainers have defeated democracy. Not implementing the result of the referendum of 23 June 2016 is tantamount to election rigging. This will cause a social schism in the UK that will be impossible to heal. The alternative to democracy doesn't bear thinking about. 
Labour MP Kate Hoey has sparked the ire of elite Remainers, Blairites and Momentum types alike – purely, it seems, for her commitment to Brexit and voting it through parliament:  
Ok so y’all know I love @mrjamesob -but in all objective seriousness, having listened to him on @LBC all this week, I do believe history will remember him as one of only people in British Media brave enough to tell the truth about #Brexit. Outstanding (if scary) broadcasting. 
£200 Million for the "frigate factory" was one of the promises in the open letter Paul Sweeney signed back in 2014 before the independence referendum.  
The #Tory far-right have three different strategies for getting a hard #brexit: 
As Parliament looks increasingly incapable of resolving Brexit, voters increasingly think -- maybe the matter should come back to us.  
He isn't discussing wealth, he's raising the point that Mogg made a business decision that appears to run counter to his assertion that Brexit will be a huge success. Have you made contingency plans that involve Ireland or are you just one of his little people? 
I've voted for #NEC candidates who will:1) commit @UKLabour to adopting the full IHRA definition of antisemitism2) give members a say on Brexit policy#NECElections 
England trying to impress Scotland with its Brexit negotiations.  
TFW when you claim that campaigning for a second referendum is 'undemocratic', but campaigning to raise funds for someone found guilty of breaking election laws to undermine our democracy is 'perfectly OK'...Helpful link:  
£900 - which is precisely the figure Mark Carney said Brexit was costing us. This isn’t rocket science.  
It's clear that @KateHoeyMP's 'vision of an inward-facing, isolated Brexit Britain doesn’t represent her constituents, young or old' - no wonder, given that hard Brexit will cost them £800 EACH. READ Barney Dowling in @LabourList 
I know I'm supposed to be all Anti-Brexit and everything but still... I can just enjoy this for a moment, can't I?! Thanks @David_Cameron ! 
Election results of FATA is also a referendum of FATA-KP merger & indictment against Mulana Fazl-ur-Rehman and Mehmood Khan Achakzai, both vehemently opposed FATA-KP merger.MMA won 3 and PkMAP 0 seats from FATA.PTI won 6 seats out of 12 FATA seats.PATHANS are the best. 
Why has it take 2 years to put brexiters on the spot like this and expose the emptiness of brexit. 
We need to draw up laws regulate the online political world the same we do the real one. And we need a full investigation into everything that happened, on all sides, during the Brexit referendum. ENDS 
Leave Facebook ads were seen by millions of voters in the run up to what was a very tight vote. Brexit campaigners say they made no difference - so why spend £3.3m+ on them? Who knows if they influenced the result but can't say they didn't. 
The DUP spent £32,750.73 with AIQ on pro-Brexit Facebook ads. Only about 10% were aimed at N Irish voters. As many as 4.2m English, Welsh and Scottish  voters sat DUP in the final three days of the EU referendum campaign. 
SERIOUSLY ?!?!....What kind of government willfully takes it's country to a point where stockpiling food and medical supplies could be a necessity ?... It's beyond ridiculous now, it's insidious !!....BREXIT MUST STOP NOW !! #FBPE #StopBrexit #StopTories 
Perhaps the best analysis so far of what Brexit "no deal" means, by @IanDunt Should be essential reading in Whitehall.... 
Look at this. The swamp wants a further referendum and produces polls to "prove it". Sorry - the 2016 referendum was held, Leave won, and we WILL be leaving.  
European people are suddenly beginning to realise the costs and effects of a corrupt subsidy & tariff regime most thought normal. #Brexit will bring much needed perspective to debate about the EU, which is only just getting started in continental Europe.  
Remember when Britain was somewhere to be proud of?When we were seen as a Global Superpower?When we were kind and welcoming to others?Me too. #London2012 was Peak-Britain. Then Cameron, then #Brexit, now May. We are a global joke because of the #BrexitShambles 
A referendum is a method by which intelligent humans can make things that contradict common sense happen without taking any responsibility for the outcome by delegating decisions to the ignorant majority. 
Veterans for Britain refused to give Facebook permission to release their ads to the @CommonsCMS We wonder if this is one of them, commissioned by Imaginexit Ltd whose director was the media spokesperson for VfB and who had invoices paid by Banks' Better for the Country Ltd...... 
This is what no-deal Brexit actually looks like   
It's official - the Brexit White Paper is dead. 
Actually as most people know, it's down to the failure of the Conservative Party itself because it is in turmoil & chaos due to the likes of you Mogg, pushing for an extreme version of Brexit. One which only you & the Tax Haven worshippers want.#PeoplesVote#FiftyYearsDividend 
You are the elite.And you are indeed unleashing something that you will regret... ...a wild, jingoistic, self-wrecking Brexit that does not have public support — and to which British youth of all social classes are overwhelmingly opposed.  
There's only one second referendum I'm interested in now.And that's #IndyRef2The Tories, and the Westminster Parliament have already shown their contempt for Scotland, and the wishes of our electorate.We can never trust them again.#DissolveTheUnion 
Christian Adams on Michel Barnier killing off Theresa May's Brexit customs proposals – political cartoon gallery in Putney  
Supermarkets criticise food stockpiling suggestion in event of 'no deal' Brexit  
Confidence that Theresa May will get a good #Brexit deal is plummeting. Over 70% are not confident.What many have yet to grasp is that there is no such thing as a good Brexit deal. #StopBrexit #PeoplesVote 
WTO Boss says Britain will Trade Fine after Brexit. There will be NO trade vacuum and he will personally work to ensure a smooth transition  
There has been huge focus on Banks's contacts with potential mining investors in 2015, as he launched his Brexit campaign. As these discussions were going on, Banks's biggest business, his insurance operation, was getting a mystery capital injection  
It's no coincidence that the Swedish Democrats left Ukip's EFDD to sit in the ECR with the MEPs from Finland and Denmark. That's how they see the future and the Swedish Democrats want a referendum on Swexit.  
Ingram Pinn on Theresa May taking personal control of the Brexit negotiating team. The move hands control of the last phase of Brussels negotiations to the embattled May and her chief Brexit adviser, Olly Robbins – political cartoon gallery in Putney  
As a British EU negotiator, I can tell you that Brexit is going to be far worse than anyone could have guessed  
For the first time, more people support a second referendum on the terms of the Brexit deal than notShould be a 2nd ref: 42%Should not be a 2nd ref: 40% 
“Raab said there needed to be ‘conditionality’ tying the Brexit divorce bill to the deal on future relations. ⁦@MichelBarnier⁩ countered: ‘It is quite clear that what has been agreed in December and March has been agreed for good’.” 
Worried your favorite player might get traded? When NBA players switch teams, you can switch jerseys. Learn more about American Express Jersey Assurance at . Terms apply. #AmexNBA 
But surely #Brexit is proof that the American political marketers are right - endlessly parroted silly slogans work. And yes, that makes people more cynical & distrusting, which makes them less willing to engage with reasoned political debate. A vicious circle.#StopBrexit 
Desperation from Theresa May on her Europe tour1) The Czechs have rejected her white paper2) Experts warn the white paper makes it unlikely the UK can join the Trans-Pacific Partnership3) Now three-quarters of Brits say May is handling #Brexitbadly 
I’m very disturbed to see that people breaking the law are being punished - Darren Grimes, Tommy Robinson. Bring on Brexit & we can take control of this madness. 
BREAKING! EXCLUSIVE TO BBSThe EU may cut off Britain's fresh air supply after Brexit.Looks like we will lose our holidays, sex, fish, sandwiches, food, medicine and butter. Now they want our air too!#Brexit "Still worth it" pic.twitter.com/uub4LKYK4x 
This mythical idea of "sovereignty" badly needs punctuating.  As a result of Brexit, we're going to have far less control, influence and power.  What good is sovereignty if you end up taking decisions you have no option but to accept? 
Trump and Brexit: how can the US and UK media tackle a culture of lies?  
Liam Fox has warned May that extending Brexit negotiations would be a "complete betrayal" of Brexit voters, telling Business Insider that the prime minister should commit to instead leaving the European Union with no deal: Fox is a zealot, pure and simple!  
Should Gary Lineker have shared his support for a second Brexit referendum? Watch again ▼@toadmeister | @GaryLineker 
It's bollocks: Jeremy Corbyn is pro-Brexit. The party under him is pro-Brexit. Silly little bits of paper like this - and protestations from Labour MPs who want to try to show they feel the pain of Brexit - do not change that inconvenient truth.  
Kate Hoey is saying exactly what the Labour Party manifesto stated.  Let's not kid ourselves.  Momentum have wanted her deselected for a very long time.  It has nothing to do with Brexit.  The purge is beginning.  
Congratulations to @Sidcup_Labour and @CroydonNorthLab on passing motions calling on @UKLabour to support a #peoplesvote! Even more to follow soon, #Brexit is not inevitable! 
So a Remainer MP @jc4southsuffolk, who never wanted to leave the EU, is now trying to convince us to accept a faux-Brexit EEA. This is just establishment plan B to scupper Brexit. THREAD  
We need a #PeoplesVote - but this time things must be different. Those of us who want to stand up to the Tories' disastrous #Brexit must learn from past mistakes & make the case for a better Britain within a reformed EU.My piece for @independent 
Always enjoyable putting across @FFSake_ message about why young people deserve a #PeoplesVote - appears even the brexiter I was debating agrees with a  @peoplesvote_uk now!  MPs have consistently left out the voices of future generations on #brexit - time for a #PeoplesVote! 
The former Waitrose boss has warned that a no deal Brexit would increase the price of fruit, vegetables, meat and dairy products.Families are already struggling, they can't afford to see their bills rise further still. Please share 
Labour's @KateHoeyMP facing deselection because she backs Brexit  
Maybe the Brexiters were right when they said food will be cheaper after Brexit as all we’ll have to eat is grass and some sticks. 
Coming to a city near you... This summer we will be holding rallies across the UK to show why we need a #PeoplesVote on the final #Brexit deal  
Progress and Momentum claim to be at loggerheads. But there's one thing they seem to agree on: that people like @KateHoeyMP, who refuse to betray the Brexit vote, have no place in Labour.Read this for the backstory to last night's no-confidence vote:  
Michel Barnier kills off Theresa May's Brexit customs proposals BLIMEY ! RAAB GIVING BARNIER *THE EVILS* !IF LOOKS COULD KILL !! 
Hot stove, UK version: “They had the experts, they just wouldn’t listen to them.” | As a British EU negotiator, I can tell you that Brexit is going to be far worse than anyone could have guessed  
Theresa May is off to the EU to discuss/obtain Agreement to her White Paper with individual nations, Barnier’s already told her it’s a waste of time & rejects her proposals, why won’t she listen & deliver the Brexit she promised, she stands for nothing!! 
1. #brexit is a coup. I have added a few names in recent months as more have put their hands up to join the ERG & their Party Central. So this my current role of dishonour. Johnson, Leadsom, Mogg, Wigmore, Mercer, Banks, Hands, Davis, Farage, IDS, Fox, Redwood, Gove, Dacre.... 
Facebook yesterday revealed that Vote Leave ran ads in breach of a pause in the 2016 campaign following the murder of Jo Cox MP.brexit fbpe  
The former boss of supermarket chain Waitrose has warned that a 'no deal' Brexit would push up the cost of fruit, vegetables, meat and dairy products  
In the latest Private Eye - he's back! And he's not inconsiderably displeased about Brexit...  
Supporters of a referendum to avoid a GE point out that Conservative 2017 script failed spectacularly, lost English/ Welsh seats, only saved by Davidson, and a GE will effectively be a referendum anyway, just one that risks 4 years in Government... 
As Brexit descends further into chaos every day, it's no wonder the support for a #PeoplesVote is growing. The Government must listen and give the people the #FinalSay. 
The deliberate attempts by a select few to knowingly frustrate #Brexit are nothing short of treacherous & need holding to account. If the vote had been to Remain then we wouldn't be having a discussion about what EU elements we wish to remain within ??Public inquiry needed. 
EP Brexit Steering Group calls on UK Gov to come forward w/its own workable & legally operative proposal for a “backstop” to safeguard the Good Friday Agreement & avoid a hard border,as has already been agreed.Backsliding on agreements already made will only sabotage negotiations  
UK, YouGov poll:EU membership referendumRemain: 52%Leave: 48%Field work: 25/07/18 – 26/07/18Sample size: 1,653#Brexit 
READ | "I have no regrets about backing Brexit. What I do regret is the establishment’s efforts to undermine the will of 17.4 million people", writes @Arron_Banks in the @Telegraph. Support us at   
I use the #FBPE tag.In the UK it is a varied group. I have met very few people that use it falsely or maliciously - and they are usually obvious. It is not anti Corbyn it is anti Brexit, which will harm ordinary people.Many of us like Corbyn's policies, except for Brexit. 
From the action we are taking to tackle violent crime, to Brexit, buses and keeping cool in the hot weather - good to take questions from @LBC listeners across London today. #SpeakToSadiq.  
It's helpful for left supporters of deselection that the first major battle is over Brexit, not Corbyn.  
Charleton Fruit Farm in Angus has gone up for sale for £3.5million.This farm is not far from Castleton Farm that has lost £350,000 since the beginning of summer due to Brexit.This is another fruit farm in Angus that is clearly jumping ship.   
Latest @YouGov for the Times shows how UKIP is making inroads. Now trusted on Brexit twice as much as Lib Dems, and only 1 point behind Labour. Also ahead of Lib Dems on Immigration (almost catching Labour), Defence and Law and order.  
The Independent has launched its #FinalSay campaign to demand that voters are given a voice on the final Brexit deal. Sign our petition here -  
Or negotiations break down and we Brexit without a comprehensive deal. Side deals for critical sectors cobbled together at the last moment. And guess what, it is like New Years day 2000.... fine.  
The Brexit mindset is a stroppy teenager storming out of it's parent's house to live on its own. Now alone with no way to sort the utilities, do the housework or get the shopping, the UK Brexit posse is sat in the dark, scowling & refusing to face reality. 
A majority of the public now back a #PeoplesVote. PM must listen - Government chaos makes even stronger case for all of us to have a final say over #Brexit deal   
Coming up shortly on @thismorning to talk Brexit with @LoveIsland’s Hayley Hughes. 
This year’s Tory Brexit “argument of the Summer”:If Parliament rejects Brexit Deal or none agreed:We’ll need a General Election - it’s only way to avoid another referendumVsWe’ll need a referendum - it’s only way to avoid another General Election.  
To say Brexit is ‘the will of the people’ is now itself a lie on an epic scale   
In Brexit litigation week in the UK Supreme Court, we learned that Theresa May's Advocate General, Richard Keen, must be dual-qualified in Gallifrey.  
13/ A No Deal Brexit will have a massive knock on effect on the nation’s health and it’s healthcare. People will die as a direct consequence of this decision. And that is on your government @MattHancock , contingency or otherwise. /end 
Chequers, a deal that neither the British people, nor the EU can accept. As @ABridgen rightly says, it is an utter "capitulation", a "surrender document", a total betrayal of the referendum result. Support us at  
11/ Horizon 2020 is a £500m European research initiative, funding cutting edge research in the U.K. Since Brexit these projects are no liable for funding beyond 2020. With No Deal they cease entirely before then.  
Theresa May MP: Give People a Final Say on Brexit Deal - Sign the Petition!  via @UKChange 
The proportion of voters who favour a second Brexit referendum has overtaken those who do not for the first time, a YouGov poll for The Times shows  
It would be extremely funny if they do a second EU referendum and England votes Leave again. 
How did we go from the euphoria of London 2012 to Brexit Britain in just six years?  
How would a People's Vote on the Brexit deal come about, what would it look like, and how might the campaign play out? This piece for the @NewStatesman is well worth a read (£) 
Brexit voters (who won by the way) don't believe in this terminology - its #Brexit or be a vassal state. Not hard or soft.  
Mark Carney, Governor of the Bank of England: "Damage to the other 27 nations of the EU if our Brexit negotiations finally crash in ruins will be infinitely worse than the damage to Britain". 
Let’s pop over to #Brexit and see what’s happening...  
When the @BBC main News website is giving prominence to the political views of Gary Lineker, regarding Brexit, you know the quality of debate in our country has gone badly wrong.. 
UK, YouGov poll:Referendum on the final terms of any Brexit dealShould be: 42% (+5)Should not: 40% (-5)+/- June '18Field work: 25/07/18 – 26/07/18Sample size: 1,653 
OK, let's settle this once and for all. I will respect the outcome of this poll and if it doesn't go my way you won't hear me protest (I expect the same in return).Should we have a second referendum on Brexit? 
A quarter (23%) of 2017 Conservative voters now say that UKIP is the best party to handle Brexit - up from 12% at the beginning of the month  
7/So money will be tighter. So will staffing levels.Post Brexit EU nursing applications fell by 96%. Currently there are 55,000 EU NHS.No Deal will mean these citizens have no legal basis to work or live or receive pensions here.We cannot afford to lose any more staff 
Brexit: No withdrawal agreement without a “backstop” for the Northern Ireland/Ireland border says EP Brexit Steering group @guyverhofstadt 
#Brexit Project Fear morning noon & night. Never - ending shut up  FFS were leaving the EU. 17 million voted leave the EU. James O’ Brien, Owen Jones, Gary Lineker, David Lammy, Anna Soubry, Chuka Umunna, Alastair Campbell. This is what 17 million voted leave think of you.  
6/ To No Deal. Firstly May’s proposed NHS funding boost was linked to a “Brexit dividend”.  There is no “dividend”.Your govt themselves est No Deal will cost 8% GDP over 15 years- that’s £159b. Thats the entire NHS AND schools budget combined. 
Brexit BOMBSHELL: May's strategy DOOMED as Czech minister claims PM won't find 'loopholes' wasting her time! Just Leave No Deal! Put 35%import tariffs on German Cars!  
Delighted that my own #Labour party local branch in Shipley adopted this resolution on #Brexit last night  
The EU is eight times the size of the UK.The Brextremists bluster that “they need us more than we need them” is nonsense.Brexit risks doing untold harm to jobs, industry and our NHS.Nobody voted for that. #StopBrexit. 
Incredible. Fox says EU will end up with "no deal". He appears to be under the delusion that it is the EU that is leaving the UK, not the other way around. And he has the brassnexk to accus the EU of being in thrall to a political ideology. What the f**k is Brexit but ideology? 
LISTEN to OFOC's @lara_spirit tell @TomSwarbrick1 of @LBC that Brexit will be a disaster for young people - and that's why a majority of people are now backing a #PeoplesVote 
If you think the publication of this tranche of ads will somehow lead to anyone deciding they were misled, you're still stuck in the mindset that lost the EU referendum. 
I'm pleased the ads have been released. This transparency helps us understand how Vote Leave hacked the referendum.But Remain is doing that thing again, where people get angry about the message, while largely missing the lessons we need to learn. 
Wow. Liam Fox - who once said a post-Brexit trade deal would be "the easiest in human history" - backs a No Deal Brexit rather than extending negotiations. The Tories are prepared to drive this country over a cliff.  
Jo Cox's murder should have been the Jo Cox moment. Sure, not all brexit voters were stupid or xenophobic, but that should have been the moment they all realised who they were enabling, supporting, and encouraging. Should have realised how it would go. Sadly the moment passed. 
Time to cancel the whole thing on the grounds that it was massively gamed.  If we have a #finalsay referendum, how do we know it won't happen again?  Can see money already is obviously pouring into the far right.  Have to stop this & work out how to ensure it can't happen. 1st. 
Today I argue on @ConHome that if we end up in a Brexit Plan B EFTA/EEA  ‘lifeboat’ we & the EFTA states should negotiate with the EU as one to forge a ‘New Common Market’.  
SHAMEFUL: Activists attempting to deselect principled Brexiteer @KateHoeyMP. @PaulEmbery: ‘Kate Hoey has been loyal to the Labour manifesto, loyal to her conscience and has honoured the referendum result rather than trying to subvert it.’ 
Different publication, same old story UK facing "brain drain" as Brexit expected to spur emigration of scientists  
Memo to the BBC: You’re wrong.  A no-deal Brexit will allow us to cut import duties, meaning CHEAPER food.   
A happy, confident and united country. What happened? Ah yes. Brexit. 
Exclusive: Liam Fox tells BI that extending Brexit talks would be "complete betrayal" and shouldn't be done even if there is no deal by March  
Whatever the PM does she's lost the trust of 17.4 million Brexit voters   
I hope I won't have to carry a #StockPile of food & medicines with me as I travel around the UK campaigning to stop this #Brexit madness... I already have to carry my guitar, suitcase & a bag of books, posters, stickers & badges to distribute everywhere I go #tweetyourstockpile 
Exclusive: Liam Fox backs a no-deal Brexit and warns May that extending talks would be a "complete betrayal".  
2/ The NHS, long before Brexit, from your govt & your mate Jeremy, is in poor shape.- We don’t have enough staff (100,000 short total, 40,000 nurses, 10,000 doctors)- we don’t have enough funding (~£26b)- Demand continues to rise by 4% every year  
New post: Brexit Endgame: second stage (which is unlikely to end with no deal)  Where I offer reassurance and comfort about No Deal. 
Brexit has been constantly undermined by a powerful minority in high office:  #BrexitBetrayal 
The Conservative Party in 5 weeks:Share of vote -4Lead on economy -4May lead over Corbyn -6Lead as best party on Brexit -7Lead as best party on immigration -8Support from Leavers -12Con 2017 voters to UKIP + 6 pointsNet handling of Brexit: -40 to -61YouGov Jun19-Jul 27 
Kate Hoey: "Despite all the negativity the average British person, solid and decent, has not changed their mind on Brexit. That makes me feel quite confident that we will leave the way people want." Watch again ▼@Iromg | @KateHoeyMP 
Festival time!!! On my way to @WOMADfestival to talk #Brexit & refugees with @MollyMEP on Saturday, #Fracking with @jonsnowC4 @frackfreeunited @simonpic78 & @TinaLouiseUK on Sunday...and of course listen to some great tunes! 
Project Fear 2.0 – May Plans to ‘Scare People Witless’ to Win Support for Soft Brexit, MP Reveals   
Let us be clear.  The #PeoplesVote is solely to overturn, by nefarious means, a previously held democratic referendum.  What value is another referendum?  Zero.  The mentality that everyone must win. 
In case you missed it earlier in the week, Amazon UK chief foresees 'civil unrest' in the case of a 'no-deal' Brexit  
Nick Clegg backs Independent's campaign for a referendum on final Brexit deal  
When Labour propose nationalisation, more progressive taxation, better welfare, they're doing what it says on the Labour tin. But #Brexit is not on the Labour label. It is collusion with the kleptonationalist right & would prevent Labour achieving its aims.#StopBrexit #FBPE 
I’m getting stick over Brexit. I’m getting stick over antisemitism. I wish I could just go back to the old days of hanging out with terrorists and hate preachers. 
I do not recall the excruciating detail of the 2016 referendum ballot paper, but I am sure that the option to #Remain did not say 'a vote for Remain is an act of Treason', did it? Was it on the bus? #PeoplesVote 
Anyone know what is Ruth Davidson's plan for the disaster that is No deal Brexit her party is enforcing on the majority of Scots that didn't vote for it?I don't think photoshoots will help in that regard 
This is the Brand New Range Rover Discovery it is going to be built in Slovakia because of #brexit well done you silly sausages, putting thousands on the dole from Solihul and the engineering supply chain make all the components still we have our country back Innit  
A TORY MEP has suggested Gary Lineker be tried for treason for supporting the EU and campaigning against Brexit.David Campbell Bannerman said the Treason Act should be changed to target those guilty of “extreme EU loyalty”  
We know from the evidence of @shahmiruk and @chrisinsilico that these #Brexit dark ads had insanely high conversion rates (i.e. Comments, likes, shares)Estimated purchase value of BeLeave ads around £13m But conversion to what? Racist attacks?  
The new @PassportIrish is out.We visit Derry to find out the effect of Brexit and political uncertainty on the border city, and explore why a place of much promise has been held back by decades of discrimination  
If it weren't for austerity, the referendum could easily have gone the other way, writes @fetzert, based on his latest research into the economic drivers of the #Brexit vote. Read here:  @warwickuni 
Friends! Racist Hate Crimes are rocketing!And I'm the latest victim!At my local Waitrose yesterday, an old woman gave me a funny look while I was shouting "You evil Brexit-voting Fascist gammons have stolen my future!" at her!Talk about Our Terrifying Far-Right Backlash!  
A YouGov poll shows a majority of voters now back a second referendum on the Brexit terms; @TomSwarbrick1 asks: would you want a vote on the final deal? 
Vote for me, I’ll be a strong voice, a pro European voice on Labour’s NEC. Brits don’t quit. We just had a referendum where the right wing said yes we should quit. We shouldn’t have quit. I still dont think we should quit. We should remain. Full video here  
Many of the shockingly mendacious Facebook ads microtargeted by Vote Leave/BeLeave had no imprint on them to say who was putting them out and paying for them.If, they'd had one, it should have looked like this.#Brexit #PeoplesVote 
I think you should be a British citizen living in the UK to be able to vote in any election or referendum and only then with ID. 
Nothing is more painful than being told "You don't belong to this country. Get the fuck out!", with your ten year old standing there and breaking into tears. This happened to us for the fifth time yesterday since the #Brexit vote - only once before that in 10 years. 
(I don’t, BTW, think a referendum on the deal will solve all of the UK’s problems, but I think the chances of solving them are reduced further by not holding it. I’d prefer MPs to do their job instead, but I don’t think they will. It’s the least bad from a list of bad options.)2/ 
Amazing news. Vauxhall Labour Party delegates voted unanimously to oust @KateHoeyMP last night for "ignoring" constituents' views, "collaborating" with Hard Brexit Tories and "colluding with Nigel Farage”. You do wonder what she was doing in the Labour Party at all. 
Mrs May’s Chequers plan clearly at death’s door. V appropriate she is in Salzburg to pay homage to Mozart. The Requiem was written for Brexit 
There are only two remotely reasonable options for Brexit. Whatever deal is agreed, or continued EU membership.Those should be the 2 alternatives in a  #peoplesvote/#FinalSay/#FinalsayforallAnything else would be either utterly irresponsible, or divorced from reality. 1/ 
Indeed, for clarity, listen to what Dominic tells the audience at Nudgestock.....he's saying 1.5bn ads were seen by their target audience, this is confirmed in his blogs. Even accounting for discrepancies between monitoring systems, that's quite a difference from Facebook's 169m. 
If you are bored with Brexit now so am I.  If you think it will go away if we strike any old deal, forget it.  We have 10 000 ++++ further agreements to make and it will go on and on and on ... then there's rationing and austerity to pay for it ...#NoDealOrNoBrexit#Brexit  
Retailers attack Government's 'impractical' no deal #Brexit plan to stockpile food  
87k unfilled NHS vacancies! EU staff leaving because of Brexit; cutting of student nurse bursaries, the public sector pay cap; the 'hostile envionment' that denies people the ability to work -Tories have piled immense pressure onto the NHS. #ShameOnYouTories #SaveOurNHS #r4today 
When asked if he's worried about a 'chaotic Brexit' affecting Czech economy considering the UK is its 4th biggest export market, Ales Chmelar, Czech Secretary of State for EU Affairs said the UK would be worse off than the Czech Republic #r4today 
This Rashid selection thing is a bit like brexit, the decision was made, now we must support him as he represents his country. At least he didn’t use a big bus to influence the selectors like Boris. Personally I think he’s a serious bowler! 
DON'T blame ToriesBlame the #EUBlame CorbynBlame immigrantsDON’T blame the Tories who actually called for the ReferendumThe Tories who handled the negotiationsThe Internecine #ToriesDON'T blame ToriesSovereignty is worth it 
If Stronger In cheated as well that's an even better reason to hold a second referendum and police it properly. I don't know a single Remoaner who has anything good to say about the Stronger in Campaign.  
It’s Friday.Getting tired of accusations that I want Britain to fail.Far from it.But it’s obvious that Brexit promises only failure and hardship for most.Let’s keep the excellent deal we already have and stop this madness.#StopBrexitSaveBritain 
If you like me do not accept the referendum result because the vote was only advisory and was undemocratic in both construct and execution. Join me stating it every day. Break through the will of people, it's democracy noise 
Have to say, however much Brexit makes me want to claim asylum in France, I think it would be madness to run a second referendum.  We need a General Election, get the Tories out, heal the country, ask the EU27 to extend the negotiation period under Art.50(3) and sort it ALL out.  
This is my #FBSIParty I support Scottish Independence & am calling for a second referendum. I am looking to connect with others who agree.Please:  1 Like 2 Retweet 3 Follow I will follow backCopy this tweet to your own.#ScotRef #IndyRef #indyref2 
Which is why @UKLabour needs to act now and come out unequivocally for option 2. Brexit is a failed idea that people were conned into voting for. Labour should talk about how the prosperity in option 2 will be much more equitably distributed under their govt.  
Quite rightly, the European Commission’s chief negotiator has ruled out a key part of Theresa May’s "eat cake and have it" Brexit customs plan, effectively killing her latest attempt to preserve frictionless trade while disregarding EU regulations. #fiasco 
It is true too is that Brexit is bringing out progressive voices and right-on democrats in favour of Remain who were either silent or voluble supporters when Scotland was being lied to and suffering a media pile-on. Well now ye ken.... 
Kate Hoey encouraging us not to blame the Tory Govt for their calamitous state and a "no deal" Brexit.Blame the EU instead, she says. People are not buying it.And btw... if no deal is such a "don't worry" option, why are Brexit proponents already apportioning blame?  
70 Ways to Scare Your Leavers...Mrs May plans to release 70 official "scare" documents in the coming weeks on how to prepare for Armageddon.Tory MP: 'We want to scare people witless so people will eventually embrace the Theresa May plan!'#Brexit #EU 
Sorry, that’s @brexit_sham. 
The looming danger of Weimar Britain - a vital contribution to debate which argues convincingly that EU needs to be more flexible in #Brexit negotiations | Timothy Garton Ash  
New @YouGov poll shows support for a #PeoplesVote on the final #Brexit deal. Clear momentum is building for the public to take back control of the final deal:  
At some point, we're going to need to admit that Vote Leave's late binge on last minute racist, blatantly lying ads, laser targeted by Facebook at 'low information', racist voters - aided by massive illegal overspends and illegal data harvesting - DID sway the referendum result. 
Not only is a referendum on reunification now almost inevitable - for the first time, it’s winnable. 
This is what Mrs May always intended. Delay & impede the leaving process long enough so Brexit could be overturned completely. Only UKIP will NEVER give up the struggle to set Britain free from the European Union. We will never, never, never surrender,   
Theresa May's Brexit Customs proposal has been rejected by the EU. This is no surprise, the EU had already rejected the core ideas. The EU can't accept that the UK would collect tariffs for the EU without governance. The PM is treading water while the UK sinks! #BrexitShambles 
Irony:Someone who says you're calling them stupid if you say "You didn't understand the Brexit you voted for" is effectively calling themselves stupid.If it's "stupid" to not understand every economic, legal and social detail of EU-UK relations then 99.9% of the UK is "stupid". 
Rich Esther McVey - just about to swan off on long MP holiday - insists children should work in fieldstone gain ‘vital skills’.What vital skills are they? Apart from filling Brexit fields for free.  
Theresa May set to announce                           **SPAMAID** Brexit stockpiling apocalypse  
Jesus this whole series of uncredited (and therefore illegal) ads during the Brexit referendum is astonishing. Paid for by the official campaign ie using taxpayer money. What an absolute con Brexit is.  
The targeted social media ads used in the 2016 #Referendum by the pro #Brexit campaign have been revealed - and all of them are misleading or blatant lies:  
Nigel Farage:It doesn’t matter how many concessions we make, it doesn’t matter!It doesn’t matter her OWN party say she has betrayed #Brexit with Chequers.It won’t be accepted by Barnier, Juncker & Brussels crowd.They want to force us into a crisis.#EU 
I have a solution to the Brexit problem. No second referendum. We don’t cancel it. Instead we accept that we are not equipped to do it just yet. We simply postpone it "until the time is right" and live with the promise… indefinitely. 
No shit, we’ve all been saying this for years. If Brexit happens it will decimate the UK music industry.  
.@Arron_banks: 'I have no regrets about backing #Brexit. What I do regret is the establishment’s efforts to undermine the will of 17.4 million people'  
I’d rather be Brit-centric than Brussels-centric.  But Brexit is not about being Brit-centric.  It’s about rejoining the rest of the world, where the growth is.  
This is the irony, ERG hard Brexiteers want Brexit as a chance for a shock-deregulation of the economy. But businesses don't even want this because access to the EU market is far more valuable. It's ideology that's become so extreme it's detached from reality. 
great to see that momentum is building towards a #PeoplesVote on the final #brexit deal @peoplesvote_uk  - great way to start the day and we can continue to push for this by signing the petition here: 
British voters support a referendum on final Brexit deal - YouGov  
A Brexit deal will happen, way past any deadline, on an early morning in Brussels, and we will all be wondering what the fuss was about -  
Real eye-opener: from @IpsosMORI most/other important issue question (those saying Common Market/EU/Brexit).  Look at June 2010: hardly shows we were a country itching to talk about it, let alone desperate to Leave - until, that is, the Tories got into government.  
A humiliating Brexit deal risks a descent into Weimar Britain --> Only UK can save itself from humiliation. Time for the sensible majority to take back control of politics, rather than look to EU27 to release the country from the claws of the Brexit loons.  
A majority of DUP’s Facebook ads for #Brexit vote were placed in England, not N Ireland. A loophole means the funding source for their campaign is confidential.  
MEP who wanted “extreme loyalty to the #EU” to be classed as treason also retweeted this  former UKIP MEP repeating the old Brit- centric #Brexit nonsense about how they need us more than we need them.  
What's the difference between a hard and soft #Brexit?   
THREAD: "Overconfident men brought us Brexit. It’s not too late for women to fix it" claims Sophie Walker, leader of the Women's Equality Party, as a Leaver gives us two fingers. But does this bear up to analysis?  
Remain MP Philip Lee admits that he "took soundings" from the EU about plans to frustrate and delay Brexit! We think he should be taking soundings from his constituency, which voted to Leave!  
What would Gary Linemer know about Brexit he’s just a bloke off the telly, says bloke off the telly 
BREAKING:  Spanish prosecutor's office admits no payments to Assange. Esdairo published a widely circulated fabricated report during the time of the indpendence referendum claiming prosecutors had receipts of payments to Assange from the Catalan government 
It's a great piece. But unfortunately yet another version of the "EU27 please sacrifice your own interests to save us from the loons dictating our Brexit policy" approach. Only UK can save itself. Appeasement of hard Brexiteers has never worked. 
Your Fri 27th July reminder it is now a LEGAL FACT that both Leave   campaigns deliberately broke the law to win Brexit referendum@BorisJohnson @michaelgove should be in jail  #VoteLeaveBrokeTheLawPlease Sign And Please Sign 
Worth also noting that a no-deal Brexit would exclude us from EU-wide clinical trials, including any future trials of newly rescheduled medicinal cannabis. Research networks are particularly important for rare childhood conditions 
All this talk of brexit affecting medication supplies isn’t terrifying for us chronically ill folks at all  
With accelerating climate change here on earth, bloody Brexit, Trump, spreading fascism etc, finding water on Mars only increases its appeal as a place to move to. <SIGH> :  "Signs of buried lake tantalize scientists"  
Worth reading - and true, unlike many of the ads.....Vote Leave's targeted Brexit ads released by Facebook - BBC News  
There is no longer any reason to claim the 2016 Referendum should be respected. We should not respect something won by cheats, liars, scoundrels, charlatans and, not to put to fine a point on it, criminals. #PeoplesVote #StopBrexit #FBPE 
TGA has been one of the strongest pro-EU intellectual voices in the UK over decades. But this analysis shows the enormous gulf in mainstream thinking between the UK and the EU on the Brexit negotiations. It is both revealing and saddening at the same time.  
Theresa May is boxed in and the chances of a messy Brexit are rising. Plus Friday's other headlines  
Majority now back a second referendum on Brexit termsNo, I am a YouGov subscriber, they didn’t ask me! Democracy says we have voted already! 
The proportion of voters who favour a second Brexit referendum has overtaken those who do not for the first time, a YouGov poll for The Times shows  
Just find it really weird when people act like the Brexit vote brought back fascist/right-wing politics overnight, rather than being a consequence of stuff that had already been happening for decades 
Great if Labour is finally decoupling from the Tories on Brexit. Corbyn needs to go too if they’re serious about it.  
In 24 hours the @Independent #FinalSay petition has hit nearly 250,000 signatures. The mood in country is changing. If you want the chance to stop #Brexit - please sign and share today   
Lies, lies, lies, lies. In almost every one of the Vote Leave Facebook ads, there was a lie, implicit or explicit. Just as well the referendum wasn't about anything significant or lasting. Otherwise we'd be in a bit of fix now, wouldn't we?  
If there is to be a 2nd referendum on brexit I move we go straight to the vote. 
Michel Barnier kills off Theresa May's Brexit customs proposals  
Where does this leave other Tory Brexit appeasers on the Labour side, not least Corbyn?  
While we wait for Brexit/ Indyref2 . We should be compiling a wee list of secluded bays,around Scotland, where we could encourage Pirates to drop EU produce......just an idea 
Majority back second referendum on Brexit @peoplesvote_uk 
Utter madness. @KateHoeyMP has been loyal to the Labour leadership, loyal to the Labour manifesto, loyal to her conscience, and has at every stage honoured the referendum result rather than try to subvert it.  
This is big: A majority of people now support a #PeoplesVote on the Brexit deal for the first time!  
"EU’s chief Brexit negotiator says UK ministers’ attempts to appeal to individual leaders are waste of time".May demonstrates her ability to listen to people by immediately heading off to Austria to waste her time.  
For anyone still misunderstanding.The suggested #PeoplesVote referendum is a vote for/against what’s on offer.Not a vote on what might be on offer.(We already had one of those) 
First lead for #peoplesvote on the Brexit outcome in a ⁦@YouGov⁩ poll 
"Until quite recently many people thought Brexit would start a stampede out of the EU... the risk has all but vanished. That's because we now know one thing about Brexit: it will be a failure... it will make Britons’ lives worse. Brexit has saved the EU."  
Brexit bonus as our new blue French made passports revealed to be edible  
MAY'S BREXIT SHAMBLESAustralia's Former High Commissioner, Alexander Downer, said That Mrs May’s Soft-Brexit will make it impossible for UK to join the Trans-Pacific free trade area while tying itself to EU rules for goods for years to come.  
Town fights for independence from Britain because they're so against Brexit ...  via @MetroUK 
We must never be held hostage by the EU or to be forced into another referendum by the EU or remainers like Tony Blair & Branson, the British people voted to leave that means leave not half stay to appease politicians or big businesses. 
A humiliating Brexit deal risks a descent into Weimar Britain | Timothy Garton Ash  
Many people voted leave as a protest against austerity & for a brighter economic future. Well sadly this dammning report indicates unless Uk changes course we will have to have 50 years of it. There is no jobs first brexit.Be a #RemainerNow & help fight. 
We have treated Brexit negotiations like a backroom second hand car deal.The EU have treated itas the legal termination of a contract like quitting your job. We have never understood this. We keep sending another over confident bloke to explain it to them.  
Theresa May Brexit White Paper Rejected as No Deal Doomsday looms Tory Stockpiling begins.. a special crowdfunded  SpamAid is to be announced  
NEW: Why Remainers advocate tyranny over democracy. Check out our #Brexit long-read and challenge a Remainer to refute it... 
Pro-EU campaigners posing as "Removals Ltd" offer to help @BorisJohnson vacate his grace-and-favour London home - more than two weeks after he resigned as foreign secretary. #Brexit #LeaveEU #RemainRead the full story here:  
Before the Brexit vote: Britain has food banks.2 years after Brexit vote: Britain prepares to BE a food bank.Anything that has worsened our problems so dramatically is worth another vote.#StopBrexit #PeoplesVote 
We have not moved an inch. We just don’t want to accept the consequences of Brexit. EU laid this out on Day 1 and asked us to choose one. We don’t want to.We want to keep all the good stuff.  
News Daily: N Korea returns US war remains, and May in Austria to push Brexit plan  
Brexiteers, disgruntled conservative members etc. - we cannot rest on our laurels after Barniers demolition of Chequers plan. The mal-functioning Maybot is still out to kill Brexit.  
On Farming Today #R4. Theresa May's visit to the Royal Welsh Show was underwhelming with no new policy announcement: "Brexit provided an opportunity to create a farming sector fit for the future" Farmers: No deal means rural Wales would break down & sudden seismic shock. 
Schools are in turmoil, prisons are in turmoil, the climate is out of control and Brexit is a shambles. Wonder if there’s a common denominator?  
This incompetent, inept, incapable woman has spent over 700 days coming up with a complicated convoluted proposal that the EU27 and the British people were always going to reject. Wasted time. Wasted effort. And no further forward to the Brexit we voted for.#MayMustGo 
Why Remainers are confident there is enough time for a second Brexit referendum: The EU would likely extend the Article 50 period if the UK proposed a new public vote. ⁦@NewStatesman⁩ 
The Independent has launched its #FinalSay campaign to demand that voters are given a voice on the final Brexit deal. Sign our petition here -  
bad parenting module 8 - "YES, I will come and look at the Lego model you have spent nine hours working on, son, BUT I AM CURRENTLY VERY BUSY ARGUING WITH AN ANGRY STRANGER ON TWITTER ABOUT BREXIT" 
Kate Hoey facing deselection after Labour activists pass 'no confidence' motion over Brexit stance.Boot her out! She can toddle off to UKIP where she belongs. via @PoliticsHome 
Computers multiply human effort. They are the ultimate lever.Russia has a piddling economy, but they invested in hackers. With the lever of computers, they engineered Brexit and Trump.They lost the Cold War but are now winning the cyber war. 
Preferential treatment suspected of daughter of lead judge for Catalan referendum trial    
Brexit is "the saddest thing that's happened" to Britain and many people were misled, Richard Branson says  
IIRC, this was because the Scottish govt thought to insist on it in the Referendum Act. Whereas Cameron's bunch of chinless dilletantes never bothered. EC has been lobbying for s law change ever since  
This thread by Sophie Germain is excellent.The very heart of Vote Leave's military grade psyops that swung the EU referendum.The thread starts off with an ad with a link to a data harvesting app.#StopBrexit #PeoplesVote 
More than 200,000 have signed our petition for a final Brexit deal referendum – are you listening, Theresa May?  
"This sense of betrayal is clearly behind the widespread anger expressed amongst members...Much as the majority of MPs dislike the fact that we are leaving the EU,the question they need to be asking is whether their opposition to Brexit is worth the sacrifice of democracy itself"  
The 36 states and territories holding gubernatorial elections this year could be the biggest referendum of all on Donald Trump’s presidency.  
Hard line Loyalism’s continued attack on the @allianceparty is going to backfire. #Brexit is tearing the DUPs support apart as Unionists, especially those effected by Brexit, see how insane @duponline’s sectarian stance against Special Status truly is. #TheDUPsRecession is real. 
Every MP's priority should be to do what's best for the country. *Then* constituents, *then* their party.They all know Brexit is bad, yet few have the balls to do anything to stop it. 
A Sky report says whisky is largely immune from a hard Brexit as it doesn't attract much in the way of international tariffs.Maybe not but it does attract those who want to use the name which the Tories will happily give away. 
1. The UK is not governed by the EU but is a member of the EU. 2. International law will cause all our problems if we crash out of the EU without having arranged a good deal. A hard Brexit is not a good deal. 3. The deal available is based on Mrs May’s red lines. #StopBrexit 
Brexit: an unbridgeable divide - at the end of the latest round of talks, Mrs May's posturing has come to nothing. Far from being flexible and pragmatic, the EU's position has, if anything, hardened. An unbridgeable divide just got bigger..  #Brexinfo. 
Cognitive empathy may reduce political polarization. A new study of Brexit  
Theresa May heads to Austria for Brexit talks  
EU wants to FORCE the UK into Brexit CRISIS and 'there is NOTHING we can do' warns Farage  
For first-time YouGov in poll for the Times finds more voters wanting a second referendum then not  
Anyone under 42 is having rights they were born with removed by Brexit. (Those of us marginally older are also very annoyed).  
#BenedictCumberbatch's never stopped surprising us and we've never been boredlast time he wore a bald head wig for Frankenstein and shaved some of his hair gone semi bald for Brexit and now i think he did shave all his hair for his new film, Ironback!  
And early in 2014 the Internet Research Agency was set up by Putin's cook spending $50m a year, with lots of #Brexit messaging. Andy Wigmore initially talked about using 'Russian bots' in his Leave campaign 
Kate Hoey- Local party doesn't support her, her constituents certainly support do2010 GE - 21,498 49.8%2015 GE - 25,778 53.8%2017 GE - 31,576 57.3% (post referendum)Votes speak louder than words 
No people on earth are less prepared for a loss of modern comforts than the British.We're a nation of middle managers. Unless there's a way to hunt food using Excel we're done for.#Brexit 
I spoke to a figure behind #ScotchWhiskyAssociation. He thought it unlikely UK Gvt would do a #Brexit deal which sold out Scotch Whisky to the USA. But I also spoke to someone who owns a drinks company in Scotland. They had dinner with the ambassador. They are not convinced.  
Good. Brexit on WTO rules. As the majority voted for. Make it so.  
Stockpiling food, blood, medicines are the warning signs of an impending crisis, the Tories are in crisis & a No DeaL/Hard Brexit is almost certain, this is irresponsible, reckless Governance, May/Raab/johnson et al  are making it up as they go along & the BBC/MSM are complicit 
Brexit is meaning less, and less, as time trundles onwards, a mean, meaningless, meaning less, ideologically flawed, waste of time, energy and financial resources, while the real priorities in the UK are ignored or neglected.  
This is so well deserved. Chris’s blog is consistently brilliant. A must-read for anyone watching or involved in Brexit.  
Michel Barnier kills off Theresa May's #Brexit customs proposals. Remember when British establishment were calling this a 'deal' & those of us who know about the EU knew it was anything but a deal. Well, EU27 have sent England homeward to think again.   
The proportion of voters who favour a second Brexit referendum has overtaken those who do not for the first time, a YouGov poll for The Times shows  
Theater Review: Ian McKellen brings deep feeling to Shakespeare's tragic monarch in a new production for Brexit Britain of 'King Lear'  
"May can't crash us out with No deal. The Tories would be toast in the next election!"It is terrifying that so few are aware the Withdrawal Bill has basically made democracy invalid to what follows after Brexit.This is why some of us have fought it so hard. 
Kate Hoey has been abused, threatened and harassed relentlessly since the EU Referendum.She was abused and mocked by the Lib Dems. She was abused and mocked by her supposed colleagues in the Commons. Now she has been rewarded with deselection after 29 years faithful service.   
Consider this collection of ads (full of blatant lies) sent out in the last three days of the referendum campaign, then remember there was a significant swing to leave in those last few days.     Now tell me that an overspend wasn't important.   
The UK government has promised there will be 'adequate food supplies' after Brexit, and is counting on grocers to make sure it happens. The industry says that's 'ridiculous'.  
Labour;We could deselect a MP charged with perverting course of justice? Nah. Could deselect MPs who said girls shouldn’t report rape? Nah.Could deselect MPs who are misogynists? Nah.Could deselect MP caught buying sex & drugs? Nah.Deselect MP honouring referendum. YES 
Portugal: 'Portugal wants Britain to welcome all EU migrants after Brexit' 
The EU are not going to accept Mays brexit plan & those in the know never believed they would. They are trying to force Britain into another referendum when hopefully they will see Britain give up & remain in the EU. If ever there was a reason to go its our treatment by the EU 
Presumably these MP types denying the people a #PeoplesVote are chicken shit scared we'll vote the right way this time. What utter nonsense! We've had a referendum won by cheating and breaking the law. Your job is to deliver what is in the best interests of our country not party.  
Kate Hoey has censured for working hand in glove with Arron Banks & the far-right that has been pushing #Brexit.Good.But why has *anyone* in @UKLabour been facilitating Brexit? It's been a far-right project from the outset, foisted on us by crooks & liars.#PeoplesVote 
It would seem that the EU and their lap dog Mrs May are trying to force Britain into a second referendum. They are not even being subtle about it now. The weak people in our society have been frightened badly by their threats and are unlikely to fight such treachery. 
He'd get to vote in a referendum to overturn the law. 
Naz Shah likes a comment on Twitter suggesting rape victims should shut up for sake of cultural diversity = No no confidence motion hadKeith Vaz has sex + drugs orgy with rent boys = No no confidence motion hadKate Hoey votes for Brexit = No confidence motion passed unanimously 
The TimesMore now back a second referendum on Brexit terms than oppose- as Lab and Tory back to level pegging  
This is pure @BorisJohnson. Confected Euro-bollocks. And there's no imprint on it. No Vote Leave. No Boris... We're in a heatwave. The MPs have gone home. We're now  talking about Brexit in terms of running out of blood. And @facebook has finally revealed its dirty dirty secret.. 
New @YouGov poll in @thetimes.Con 38 (nc) Lab 38 (-1) LD 10 (+1) UKIP 6 (nc) fw -Sun/Mon,The proportion of voters who favour a second Brexit referendum has overtaken those who do not for the first time.  
Brexit is a crime scene (as Chris Wylie said). Don't be drawn into talking about it as a legitimate political issue. It is a criminal conspiracy to defraud a nation - with multiple accomplices, witting or unwitting.Don't engage with anything in it other than the element of crime 
Emma Little-Pengelly deleted this response to me, I like compliment about being "young in politics" as I'm about 3 years younger than her, I must have a babyface  Despite being "young in politics" I know Brexit is much bigger issue than a bus stop.Apparently I'm also a bigot  
Well done everyone, keep on signing and sharing, we will get the message to @theresa_may#FinalSay: 240,000 sign The Independent's Brexit petition in just over 24 hours#BrexitisBonkers #FBPE 
See if you think Brexit means beans oan toast...forget it...we canna grow haricots.... It's tripe and turnips or feck all.... 
Russia’s Communist Party proposes a national referendum on Putin’s unpopular pension reform plans. Perhaps it needs “opposition leader” Navalny’s support to get some coverage in western media outlets  
‘I'm on a quest to find out if a no-deal Brexit will kill me, but the NHS won't give me any answers’  
Tanja is absolutely right. Since the referendum we have talked single market, customs union & ECJ but no politician wants to debate the topic that drove the Leave vote: immigration. No one has taken on the immigration myths built up during the referendum.  
LOL these colonisers are always complaining who other countries vote for when they voted for people like trump and Voted for brexit because they thought it meant less coloured ppl coming in the UK. Pakistanis can vote for who ever they want so GET DEFOOK OUTTA THERE BUSINESS!!!  
It is disturbing how many citizens believe "Brexit could have worked in the 2 years we've had but May sabotaged it!"Public mood has shifted against Brexit. But the extremists have become even more unhinged and there are still too many apathetic as well. 
Whatever one thinks of Brexit the idea that Russia was behind the reason why people in Corby or Hartlepool voted to leave the EU is a  total fantasy. Let’s not go down the rabbit hole that the US has gone down.  
I wld hazard the guess that literally noone who voted for Brexit, even the softest of soft Brexiteers, wanted the UK to stay in the EEA & CU & EAW & EIO & EMEA, maintaining FoM, large budget contributions, ECJ, EU instructions in criminal cases & EU doing our trade deals. Noone. 
The proud saboteurs sailing the Big Ship #BollockstoBrexit down the Thames to bid BON VOYAGE to #BREXIT! We had a wonderful evening & there was not a bucket of slimy dead fish in sight! @mikegalsworthy @frankendodo @sazmeister88 Photo credit @AnneIdaForest 
I was wondering your views on America entering negotiations with the EU for a tariff free trade deal ? I’d love to be a fly on the wall in Liam foxes house today .. as Obama said “ back of the queue “ .. brexit is doomed and offers no tangible benefits .  
How odd that those who claim to revere the ‘will of the people’ are straining every muscle to deny the people a vote on the facts - as opposed to the 2016 lie-suffused theory - of #Brexit.Why are #Brexiteers so very very scared of a democratic #PeoplesVote? 
It's clear that Brexit supporters, having failed to explain the advantages of leaving the EU, are now pinning their hopes on the argument that EU negotiators are being mean to the UK and the failure of the Brexit project is all M. Barnier's fault. 
oh dear it looks like @theresa_may has just lost another round of #Brexit but this is nothing new as Barnier has been consistent in his refusal to bow down to little englands idiotic demands, its about time we had #indyref2 & got out of this failing union 
Good to see serious and positive engagement between @DominicRaab and @MichelBarnier - it’s going to be a busy summer but progress on #Brexit deal is doable.  
Ha!So he's squatting as  well. How do they get away with it !!David Davis on Brexit, Chequers and why EU said he was lazy  
Your government couldn’t deliver a pizza . Brexit offers no tangible benefits . America seem to want a trade deal with the EU ahead of us now . Liam Fox must be spitting feathers  
That PM attempt to sell her #ChequersPlan to the young electorate is going well then, where she seems to have disregarded questions and views on #Brexit #MAYMUSTGO 
Look at the absolute state of this. A far right Tory nutter tweets that the treason act needs to be updated to outlaw criticism of the Tory Brexit shambles, but instead of condemning this lunacy, the BBC actually choose to amplify it.The mainstream media is broken.  
On Treason: Enemies don't attack our nation with armies these days, they pervert our politics through control of mass media and infiltration of social media, they corrupt it with big money, and manipulate it by funding highly influential think-tanks. #StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE 
Facebook released brexit referendum campaign ads today to the UK parliament & they are pretty jaw-dropping. You'll want to just go scroll through @carolecadwalla 's timeline and see for yourself. 
SUBSISTENCE AGRICULTURE part of the Ladybird #brexit skills series  
Almost quarter of a million signatures already & you can watch the numbers growing almost by the second. Let's keep it growing so they have to listen.Theresa May MP: Give People a Final Say on Brexit Deal - Sign the Petition!  via @ChangeAUS 
No wonder Zuckerberg didn't want front that British UK Parliamentary Committee of Inquiry on the 2016 Brexit referendum. So much illegal dodgy shit was going on. And Cambridge Analytica used Facebook data to micro-target these dark ads@LouiseMensch@thespybrief@TheRickWilson 
I didn't realise until now that the "These Islands", report entitled, "Don't mention the Brexit"!", sorry, "Response to the Sustainable Growth Commission", was written entirely by Kevin Hague. Even his cheerleading team quoted in the front pages don't get a word in. 
The "Will of the People" rhetoric is being used to delegitimise the democratic right to oppose, & demonise opponents of #Brexit as "enemies of the democratic will of the people". The right to oppose is central to democracy. Where it is denied democracy dies.#StopBrexit #FBPE 
We’ve reached the “at least there will still be enough food for everyone” stage of Brexit  
It’s not the the ‘will of the people’ Brexit is about. It’s the will of England. A small, largely empty part of it, controlled by non-doms. 
Illegal spending. Illegal coordination. A campaign based on lies (350m a week to the NHS) and Cambridge Analytica targeted dark ads full of false claims and racist dogwhistles. This is the official @vote_leave campaign folks. #Brexit built on lawless bigotry  
You are showing your ignorance about football @montie. For cheating Juventus were stripped of two championships and relegated.  So the lesson from football is to strip Leave of the referendum victory & kick the government out.#StopBrexit #PeoplesVote 
A PM who promised the British people she'd deliver a full Brexit and then secretly conspired to deliver a fake Brexit is now seeing her fake Brexit plan fall apart. What do Tories do next - wait for her to come up with an even faker Brexit?? FFS show some gumption and dump her.  
“Brexit is the will of the people.”  
BREXIT: Vauxhall Labour prepares to deselect Kate Hoey  /#EU #Brexit #Labour #PeoplesVote 
This is the most serious act of self-harm any UK Government has inflicted on the country since WW2, they're talking about shortage of food, medicine, blood, Saline, doctors & nurses, crops rotting in fields & 50yrs before we see the benefits of Brexit. It's NOW time for #Indyref2 
And ANOTHER new can of worms! Look at this. According to @facebook, these ads were placed by "BrexitCentral/BeLeave". Only guess what? Brexit Central - whose editor-in-chief @matthew_elliott who was also CEO of Vote Leave - wasn't a permitted participant in the referendum...  
Never mind Brexit, it’s already chaos on the continent for British holidaymakers as EU countries struggle with industrial unrest.  We’re better off out of it.   
The British man who tried to take her phone is the voice of Brexit  
Brexit would be dead and buried inside 24 hours if @UKLabour did what was right (by any possible measure) and opposed it. 
Why are brexiters obsessed with George Soros? Can anyone explain how they can ignore billionaire tax-avoiders manipulating for no-deal brexit,  but are all 'soros is evil!' I don't get it. Anyone explain this one for me? 
Much preferred Dominic Raab in Hi-De-Hi , this Brexit sitcom is tragic.  
London has a shortage of almost 8,000 nurses, worst of any region, and up nearly 30% on 2015.Thanks, #Brexit 
Is that the same referendum in which the side that got a narrow 635k swing victory have been found to have criminally cheated?  
Call @mrjamesob tomorrow. 10-1. Chat about Brexit. About trade. About the Irish border. About whatever you like. Even about salmon.I bet he makes you look a fool.  
1/ The Brexiters promised that we held all the cards, now they are whining that the EU is bullying us. The two faces of toxic nationalism - we are the bullied victims so we must liberate ourselves from our oppressor, but we are actually strong and powerful. #StopBrexit #Brexit 
In the US the media (CNN, MSNBC, NYTimes etc) are all over the Trump scandals - Cohen, Russia etc. Here in the UK criminal charges are preferred re the referendum, Leave is slapped with maximum fines, foreign interference is likely: & it makes no difference! Why? 
Piers appears to be confused about the meaning of democracy. We THE BRITISH PEOPLE have every right to change our mind. To question the referendum. To demand parliament acts in our best interests. #brexit is not above scrutiny, the law or continuing democracy. End  
I'd just like to add this is not just about Brexit. It's about the starvation of crucial services, the scything council budget cuts, the depletion of our Emergency Services, the degradation in Social Care and everything else. It's all shit. Everything.#ToriesOut #AusterityLies 
Brexit: arts will suffer without freedom of movement, say Lords  
I don’t see the problem in asking a now better informed public whether they accept the consequences of #brexit unless being better informed is the problem. 
Feast your eyes on the xenophobic, lying, scaremongering wonder of Vote Leave’s ads during the 2016 ref. Then ask yourself who ran Project Fear, whether the referendum was fair and whether Johnson, Gove, Cummings, Elliott should be in UK politics  
NI is on the verge of recession, has some of the longest hospital waiting times and most deprived communities in the UK. And we're quite possibly heading for a No Deal Brexit. But an MP chooses to invest such energy (and polarise communities further) in the name of a bus stop?  
Typical Burnley to shithouse the most Brexit long ball goal in a European CompetitionI love this club  
I see a woman who has learnt nothing from her failed manifesto, the last election, the referendum and chequers. There is a sinister refusal to accept the voice of the people.  
One tries - one REALLY tries - not to dismiss Leave voters as idiots but to dismiss “we’ll have to stockpile food and medicine” as Project Fear Bullshit when we’re QUOTING THE ACTUAL BREXIT MINISTER is a very special kind of wilful stupidity. 
Brexit is so weird.  
'WTO would WORK!’ UK can prosper with Brexit no deal and Irish border would be SOLVED, top academic says  
It doesn’t surprise me that support for UKIP is building because we are the only genuine real Brexit party that really wants to take Britain out of the EU unencumbered without paying them money, without obeying their law and without open borders.”  
Just saw a woman come out of a border shop. Her bag of shopping split & there was milk & onions & bread all over the place. A man walking by stopped. They looked at the mess oozing off down the road & then at each other.“Bit of a Brexit, there”, says he. “Aye, ‘tis”, says she. 
Brexit is easy! OK, maybe not... but we can stockpile.Stockpiling is easy!Mass stockpiling isn't easy, when you don't have the experience, space, logistics, staff, money, etc. 
If this govt or the establishment at large hoodwinks us to going back to staying in the EU in some form or another, Britain's entrapment will have no support from a majority of the British people.Despite remainer dreams, it won't last...#Brexit#WTOBrexit 
Sign our petition calling for a referendum on the Brexit deal  
Where are we on our report card now Scotland? (Please help)GERS: Is Bollocks, DoneTOO WEE: DoneTOO POOR: DoneTOO STUPIT: DoneFISCAL: Report DoneBREXIT: Is bollocks, DoneCAN'T JOIN EU - Is Bollocks, DoneSUPREME COURT - DoneAnybody?- 
SNP Commons leader apologises over fake 'Scotland is a region of England' tweet 'from Brexit secretary'  
It's 10pm. Everyone's walking about Leith in t-shirts all chilled and every pub is named after some wild mammal. And Hibs just won a European game. Cosmopolitan as fuck man. Almost like Brexit isn't gonnae happen 
May's status quo Brexit falls far short of answering the simmering discontents of those who voted Leave - The Telegraph  
I suspect that the no deal Brexit stockpiling food & medicine story is a tactic cultivated by the Tories to make people expect the worst and then be pleased with whatever crappy Brexit deal is negotiated by Theresa May. 
I grew up as a kid in the 1970s, where power shortages, strikes, 3 day week & high inflation were the norm. It was a great decade to be alive. All this scaremongering & Armageddon predictions from the Remoaners after we leave the EU, means nothing to me. Bring it on! #Brexit 
"Calling independence referendum should be a crime". Yes, the @PPopular likes to place #Spain outside the international league of constitutional states. I wish them much success as a banana republic. 
When Alexandra said ‘YOU ARE PATHETIC, SHAME ON YOU’ to Alex, she spoke for the entire nation and it’s the most united we have been since before Brexit. #LoveIsland 
I mean, look at them. Turkey? Bullfighting? Fucking POLAR BEARS? This is the shit on which Brexit was sold? And we find out NOW? Christ. I'm having a whisky. 
No one, no matter how they voted in the 2014 the independence referendum or on the Bexit issue voted for a dystopian MadMax-esque society. Why are people so ready to accept it? Rationing, stock piling medicines, blood products....really?Time for the people to get angry! 
If you're concerned about what #Brexit threatens to do to #Cornwall & the UK, don't just sit there...Join our grassroots movement by:- Joining our Mailing List   - Joining our Facebook Group Your voice *can* make a difference! 
People who are wary of the democratic legitimacy of a second referendum will have to ask at what point do the revelations of cheating by both the leave campaigns become so great they invalidate the original vote  
Hey, most Brexit voters are stupid (according to Remoaners) so how on earth did they manage to navigate their way onto the internet to see all of these adverts you speak of? Which is it?  
'EU also want to KEEP control!' Barnier in Brexit SWIPE as he promises EU WON'T back off . Barnier is So inflexible, Time to Deal No Deal!  
I mean, the fact that all these ads become public only TWO YEARS after the referendum is just absolute horseshit. You can't scrutinise what you cannot see. You can't debate it. You can't counter it.   
Some prison somewhere is going to have its very own Brexit Wing 
As #Brexit-adoring Daily Telegraph has lost a quarter of its readership in one year, the acquisition of toxic Paul Dacre (added to the renewal of the love-in with mendacious Boris Johnson) could well be the kiss of death. 
When will @teresamayMP @10DowningStreet realize that diversity is the most effective way for UK citizens to be spared the adversity that would accompany a ‘No Deal’ Brexit? #FBPE #stopbrexit #PeoplesVote 
The referendum was advisoryIt was only called to try to get UKIPers to vote ToryVote leave liedVote leave cheatedAt this point let's cancel this nonsense say the water was drugged and everyone went bananas and hope no one notices. 
Now Blair weighs in demanding a further referendum. Shouldn’t he be in prison?  
From this thread, Vote Leave seem to have exploited every dirty legal loophole of political advertising they could find. Whatever you think of the referendum result, we can't ever let there be a campaign like this again.  
We all know @ScotTories that you are going to ‘fight the SNP’ but just wondered, if it’s not too much trouble, do you actually have any, you know, policies? Like, how to counteract the shitstorm of Brexit? 
Brexit has become like the search for the Holy Grail, the closer you get, the more it resembles Poundland Tupperware. 
Amazing how much you have to say now Matthew, yet your accomplice Cummings was so reluctant to appear before the @CommonsCMS when summoned and none of you would cooperate with the Electoral Commission. You still claiming @darrengrimes_ didn't work in YOUR office? 
British food stores ridicule Brexit stockpiling plans  
Harry Maguire going to Manchester United is actually gonna blow Mourinho’s lid. He won’t be able to cope with a proper Brexit player for fake Brexit tactics... 
Blair Branson & Major are and have been out trying to put the fear of Brexit into us all it will not work the British people are wise to all their crap. They just look the has been fools British people know them to be. 
Good to meet my friend & colleague @AndyBurnhamGM in Manchester this morning to discuss the impact of Brexit in the North West.  
You know what we did wrong? We didn’t ask ministers to negotiate themselves out of a gym contract before we let them loose on Brexit 
The EU's top Brexit negotiator is asking some serious questions about the UK's customs proposal, highlighting one of the biggest obstacles to an exit deal.  
The British people voted for #Brexit to end being ruled by unelected bureaucrats. What we then got is a prime minister who's handed over key parts of govt policy and powers to unelected bureaucrats in Whitehall.When will they learn to listen to the people?#democracyIsDead 
Today: a recap* $120bn wiped off following Cambridge Analytica data abuse scandal* Parliament publishes Vote Leave Facebook ads that are: a) illegal b) racist c) lies (And made by CA affiliate)* Court docs allege @Arron_banks laundered diamonds to pay for BrexitAnything else?  
You are a multimillionaire footballer. We are poor nobodies. "venomous invective" comes from you abusing your privilege making your voice louder than our voicesYou had one vote in the referendum. We each had one vote. We are 17.4 million. You lost. We won. Shut the fuck up  
Not on your nelly - there is no way we #Brexiteers will accept ignoring the referendum which said "would be implemented" - one hell of a stink would result if this was to happen - we voted #Leave and it MUST be delivered 
“Theresa May has declined to promise Wales will not lose any money it now receives from the EU after Brexit.” Concerning times for the Welsh farming industry and rural Wales. 
Barnier & the EU reject the UK's Customs plan, tariff collection & state NI Border backstop not sorted.No surprises there then.Chequers is dead...No Deal looking likely unless concessions made. ERG won't accept.#Brexit is #FUBAR So #PeoplesVote with a #Remain option it is. 
The NHS coming to collect its first £350m cheque a week after Brexit day  
“The official Vote Leave campaign spent more than £2.7m on targeting ads at specific groups of people on Facebook - helping it to win the 2016 EU referendum.”The BBC fails to add - all were lies, many with a xenophobic spin   
Overconfident men brought us Brexit. It’s not too late for women to fix it | Sophie Walker  
Ooof good comment ...Brexit means  everyone pays for a campaign that broke law!!  
The loss of the European Medicines Agency is a staggering loss of soft power and global influence for the UK. Where are the pro Brexit think tanks setting out their detailed implementable vision of how it can all be great? Just vague fantasies and lies.  
There is one gigantic Brexit scariest story doing the rounds involving lots of players from Soros Blair May Robbins to name just the big part players The story so far is economically the UK will be barren of food and money if we choose Brexit over the EU I choose Brexit over fear 
Theresa May on hearing that @MichelBarnier has completely undone her #ChequersPlan #MAYMUSTGO#Brexit  
MP praises continuity Remainer @GaryLineker for being prepared to "not pander to the “will of the people” bollocks". Absolutely shocking attitude to democracy for someone who holds a seat in parliament due to the 'will of the people' of #Tottenham.#Brexit #democracy #Parliament 
Vote leave incorporated the most dishonest and insidious propaganda I have ever seen in a British referendum. The express version,  Also appeared in the Sunday Express. 
Read a few more ghastly tweets gloating over how many leave voters may have died since the referendum.At what point the fucking EU becomes more important than caring about people passing away is not even in my sphere of thinking.May karma visit them all. 
Tintin and the Brexit plan  
Kettle bans. Polar bears. The dodgy Facebook ads created by the Brexiteers during the EU referendum revealed  
Not Brexit, but made us spare a moment for the late, great John Smith MP. #OTD 1992. John Smith is elected leader of @UKLabour"Today we begin a journey to eliminate poverty, injustice and homelessness" 
Remainers don't want Free Trade, of which their beloved EU is a sworn enemy. They want rivers of taxpayer cash for contemporary art galleries and the like. Behind the BREXIT WAR is an epic struggle between (posh) parasitic tax consumers, and (ordinary) beleaguered tax producers. 
A taster of what’s coming post brexit?  - random checks for personal allowances - enhanced passport checks etc etc etc ... traffic went out to m20 from the barriers ( 2 hours ago ) ....  
Strong laws demand product ads are legal, decent and honest, but next to nothing protects democracy against a growing industry that uses stolen data and social media to send targeted lies to nurture and exploit base fears.It delivered Kenyatta, Trump and Brexit. We must act.  
I expose a cover-up by #DWP: staff told to DESTROY evidence of #foodbank referralsA FOI reveals the true extent of the DWP's attempt to hide the problems #UniversalCredit has cause@EstherMcVey1 answers?Read more #GE2018 #Brexit #DWP #Labour 
Facebook has released some of Vote Leave's "dark ads", microtargeted on UK voters by AIQ (closely associated with Cambridge Analytica).This wasn't political advertising. It was lying, on a massive scale.#Brexit #PeoplesVote 
If it's one nation & one people who never needed any help to achieve or develop has been the UK & it's people...So why are remainers so dependent on the EU? The UK succeeded as a world power before the EU..the UK built a significant portion of our world without the EU !! #Brexit  
#GlobalBritain certainly making the news thanks to #Brexit: "Suicide of a nation" in @lobs 
So much is good in this speech. Investment, an industrial strategy, rebalancing our economy, regional development, our rights and protections, education. We stand behind these thingsWe stand against Brexit, it makes it all undeliverable.#PeoplesVote 
Hey Andrew, I’ve got a great idea. Let’s stay in the EU. Given the mess that #Brexit is creating, that must surely be the best option now. 
'If Brexit negotiations have taught us anything, it’s that our future should not be left to 650 politicians in London' #FinalSay 
In fairness, the UK is looking at possible food shortages and low energy famine because of Brexit. We have 500 million tons of soybeans. So logical path is they do one big purchase of soybeans and everything works out for everyone. 
Says the lady who demands our respect for a corrupt Brexit referendum that sends the UK into an economic nose dive. Without a hint of irony. PLEASE! Families being driven into poverty is appalling & unforgiveable & Labour support of Brexit is contributing. Disgusting hypocrisy.  
Vote Leave sacrificed their integrity for their ‘win’. So their ‘win’ cannot be clean. The mandate is compromised. They just wanted it so much they became corrupt. And they have to stay that way to maintain the facade. Brexit is a fraud. 
Don’t miss @thismorning on @ITV tomorrow! #Brexit  
Willer de people Brexit means Brexit Jacob Rees Mogg Get over itTake back control Sov Rin TeaWe are leaving Strong and Stable Theresa and Jeremy #VoteLeaveCheated#StopBrexitSaveBritain#3wordsIcannotstand 
Brexiters are raising the volume on their attempts to blame the EU, Traitor Remainers, Tinpot Theresa & the weather, for the transition of Brexit from Paradise to pandemonium.They're desperate to deflect from the paucity of the idea & the implausibility of it's implementation. 
Gary Lineker’s statement in support of the so-called People’s Vote campaign – because apparently the first EU referendum wasn’t a People’s Vote – reveals how thoroughly elitist the BBC presenter has become:  #BrexitBetrayal 
When you think about it this banner doesn't make sense.  Scotland had a legally binding referendum with a huge turnout and the independence side were soundly defeated." Independence now " therefore isn't possible,  these people cannot accept a democratic outcome.  
Every second of the 11 minutes of this fantastic documentary must be watched. The voice of children being denied a childhood is heart wrenching. Well done @CracksFilm We need a referendum to put #Right2Housing in our constitution & end #homelessness 
The Sun’s editorial today: “How dare gobby Irish politicians keep belittling Britain? Who do they think they are?” Sigh..... #brexit 
If the SNP announced they were planning on stockpiling food unionists would be demanding a vote of no confidence. But because it's the Conservatives it's okay because, um (checks notes) red white and blue? Brexit means Brexit? UKOK? 
BREXIT NEGOTIATIONS:Dominic Raab: I’m a bit new to all this but I think I may have found a solution.Michel Barnier: Excellent – let’s hear it.DR: Well, imagine if we had some cake...MB: Oh merde...DR: And then we ate it...MB: Get out. 
Come on farmers. It's time. March on London. Bring tractors. We'll meet you there. You know Brexit means the end of British farming.@NFUtweets 
There is a change in Scotland.WM knows it. They won't allow Scotland a second referendum because they know we will vote YES.If they thought for one second we'd vote NO they'd grant a Section 30 on their terms and kill Indy for years.Scotland is ready to join the world. 
The UK is preparing to stockpile medicine, vaccines and possibly food in case it leaves the EU without a deal on trade and future relations. (Brexit is in 8 months.)  
Brexit was a coup without guns, instead psyops, and disinformation pushed on us with the biggest propaganda machine in history, social media. 
10 Great Brexit Sandwiches Global Britain Can Enjoy After No Deal  
Have had a week off but come back still baffled that any Tory MP really thinks it's ok for Mrs May to have pretended to the country that she was arranging a full Brexit and then revealed that she wasn't and tried to bounce the Cabinet into accepting a fake one. Just not on. 
We’re stockpiling food and medicines. In case we run out of food and medicines. After Brexit. Did anyone vote for that? Is that the will of the people?  
When we come to do the history of Brexit, Steve Analyst will be regarded also as Steve Archivist, the keeper of the Brexiter memories which Brexiters would sooner forget.  
The EU will never voluntarily agree an acceptable Brexit deal with the UK unless forced to do so. But by giving up in advance on money, citizens rights and Ireland and by failing to prepare for no deal, May has blown all chance of forcing a good deal.   
PM’s Brexit boat “Titanic” is hiked below the water line after EU refuses to allow the UK to act as a vessel for collecting Customs Duties and VAT as proposed under May’s Chequers #Brexit plan. NB It was JR-M that forced it’s inclusion. #BrexitShambles 
“What’s bad for May in the Brexit context is that Juncker pulled off his unexpected deal by sticking hard and fast to EU principles and priorities. Juncker ultimately offered Trump only things...that the EU was willing to do anyway, or was already doing.”  
I don’t think there is anything funny about Arrron Banks. I don’t think there is anything funny about the Leave campaign, which was built on lies and - as we now know - criminality. Nothing funny about Brexit, which is an evil; a complete absence of the good. 
Brussels has rejected Treason Mays Trade deal proposals WTO Rules Applies Walk away and stop giving taxpayers money to this Corrupt Organisation 
BBC Achieves Peak Project Fear with ‘Brexit Threat to Sandwiches’ Headline   
Kate Hoey motion won't be heard for a while yet, but we just passed a motion to go to conference backing a general election and a people's vote on the brexit deal. 
Oh Dear or Oh DearMichel Barnier kills off Theresa May's Brexit customs proposals  EU’s chief  #Brexit negotiator says UK ministers’ attempts to appeal to individual leaders are ‘waste of time’ #DissolveTheUnion or  start to stockpile Blood 
EU Chief Brexit Negotiator Michel Barnier rules out Theresa May’s Chequers plan - @GaryGibbonblog reports 
More than 200,000 have signed our petition for a final Brexit deal referendum – are you listening, Theresa May?  
UK can still dump Brexit and remain a member of the EU, says French minister.Let’s do it. Hold a #PeoplesVote and give the people a say, with an option to stay. #StopBrexit. 
I challenge any MP that is calling for a second referendum to stand down trigger a by-election and stand on that commitment! I guarantee many of you won’t be back. What are you “scared” off? #MayMustGo #ChequersMeansCorbyn 
My Brexit Blog was just visited for the 1 millionth time. Not too bad (I think) for a sole author, standalone personal blog. Many thanks to all who have read and/or tweeted it over the last 18 months or so.  
Theresa May's Brexit in Name Only has been rejected by the EU. Good. Now is the time for the Brexit that Brexiteers actually voted for 
So I inadvertently got Dominic Raab to draw attention to a thread in which I mock his lack of popularity and I’m starting to wonder whether he’s the right man to negotiate Brexit.  
During Brexit I tweeted @arron_banks and asked ... given his concern for "ordinary British people" ... what he paid his Diamond mine workers and what their health and safety conditions were. He responded by blocking me. Now I know. #C4News 
The risk being associated with brexit is ten times higher than that of the year 2000 bug when as we all know, no aircraft fell out of the sky, no ships sank & nothing at all went wrong - despite months of scare mongering. Simply put 10 X F. All = F. All. . . . . 
Access to medicines, including HIV treatment is a very serious concern post-Brexit, especially if we crash out with no deal or fail to retain membership of EMA.As someone living with HIV, as someone who works to support people living with HIV, I believe we must #StopBrexit. 
UK could cancel Brexit and stay in EU on same terms, says French government  Rest in peace UK democracy if that happens. Who would ever trust any elected Government ever again? UK will become lawless as MP's lose the trust of the people. 
May’s Brexit plans ‘dead’ after Barnier rejection  
#3WordsICannotStandBrexit means brexit#FBPE #Stopbrexit 
This is my #FBSIParty I support Scottish Independence & am calling for a second referendum. I am looking to connect with others who agree.Please:  1 Like 2 Retweet 3 Follow I will follow backCopy this tweet to your own.#ScotRef #IndyRef #indyref2 
The European Commission's chief negotiator Michel Barnier has rejected a key part of Theresa May's #Brexit plan; time for Theresa May to call a GE & let #Labour take over for the sake of Britain's future! 
Brexit blow for Theresa May as EU negotiator Michel Barnier shoots down Chequers plan  
As ⁦@MichelBarnier⁩ has rejected the ⁦@theresa_may⁩ #ChequersPlan, it’s hard to see how MPs can back this #Brexit mess.We’re beyond loyalty.Your credibility is on the line now MPs.We’re looking to you to respect democracyRT if you agree  
Brexit: Barnier rules out key UK customs proposal - BBC News  
We Brexiteers surely really need to make a show of support for Brexit asap!I started @artists4brexit in January to help make this happen.All Brexit supporting individuals and groups need to come together now.I say we need to organise a #marchforbrexit! Share if you agree! 
To summarise what happened in Brexit today:We offered the EU a Customs deal which would place a major bureaucratic burden on them... A deal which the EU HAD ALREADY REJECTED MONTHS AGO. In fact the term used was 'forensically annihilated"But we're blaming this on Michel Barnier 
"A Vote Leave source said the football contest could be a 'game changer' because it would allow them to gather the contact details of thousands of potential voters, many of whom would not normally be interested in the referendum." 
@jennyeclair wants a #FinalSay on the Brexit deal. Share your own photo message to show your support and sign the petition  
Full house in Bristol for #LeftAgainstBrexit - let's stop Tory #Brexit!  
Campaigning against Brexit in Oxford - but my immediate ambition for the city is to get the old East Oxford station open & extend Marylebone trains there which would be transformational. Met @AnnelieseDodds & @networkrail to discuss earlier this week 
Brexit: Michel Barnier rules out Theresa May's Chequers customs plan | The Independent How many more times does the EU have to spell it out? 
Saturday's @Underground_RT : One and only @UniofOxford Halford Mackinder Professor of Geography @dannydorling on Peak Inequality: Britain's Ticking Time Bomb as @jeremycorbyn becomes odds on favourite to win the next UK General Election. #BREXIT #poverty 
Watch @MichelBarnier fully reject the #ChequersPlan Customs Union proposal.No more messing about on #BrexitShe put her neck on the line for this pile of rubbish. It is time to play hardball and #MAYMUSTGO 
Theresa May suffers a major setback as the EU expresses serious concerns about her Brexit customs plan  
With the news that Barnier has kicked the #ChequersPlan Customs proposal into the long grass...@theresa_may and @OllyRobbins #Brexit strategy two years on be like....#MAYMUSTGO#ChequersMeansCorbyn 
So Leave had a spending limit of £7m but Arron Banks banks gave £9m he hasn't explained how he obtained, after numerous meetings with the Russians... Oh and look at that massive spike to Leave just before the EU referendum!  
It's ok Piers.If #TreasonMay @theresa_may screws brexit I'm sure feet will be on the streets in every city, town and village.Good luck to her and the conservative party.There maybe trouble ahead  
The "will of the people" Brexit enablers need a common sense talk that ends with "If the people told you to stick your hand in the fire would you do it?" #thingsmumssay 
This has been the position since January 2017. Tories: hard-Brexit. EU: no cherry picking.  
In other words, last October’s referendum wasn’t a crime, and clearly no-one should still be in prison (and still without any trial) for organising it.  
#LeftAgainstBrexit here in #Bristol already rammed with queues out into the street! Amazing support for the left-wing case against Brexit.  
This is simply astonishing. Facebook ads provided to the parliamentary investigation with absolutely NO connection to Brexit, and no markings identifying them as political in any way, used to harvest data for Vote Leave and shape the precise lie then offered to each user. THREAD  
UK could cancel #Brexit and stay in EU on same terms, says French government‘We have always said, always, that the door would remain open,’ says European affairs minister Nathalie Loiseau 
Michel Barnier says that Theresa May's proposal for UK to collect EU customs revenues & vice-versa is unworkable.He's right - it would be a nightmare of red tape for businesses - & remember, #Brexit was supposedly about cutting red tape!#PeoplesVote 
Based on Michel Barnier ruling out Theresa May’s Chequers plan for Brexit, it seems UK has 4 options:1. Extend Article 50 and delay leaving2. Back down and accept EU’s preference: Norway option3. No deal (if Govt is able to convince people it’s not the apocalypse)4. Stay 
On #c4news tonight : the latest on the man who bankrolled the Brexit campaign @Arron_banks and does Labour Govt really pose an existential threat to Jewish life? @jonlansman debates @CohenJust the News Editor of @JewishNewsUK one of the 3 newspapers that claimed just that today 
NOW: a @Channel4News investigation has uncovered allegations that the Brexit donor @Arron_banks had business links with Russia’s state diamond company – and planned military support for a Lesotho politician. 
A hate group has spearheaded an anti-sanctuary referendum on Oregon's decades-old sanctuary law. “Sanctuary cities” are a frequent target of anti-immigrant politicians, who actively spread misinformation to push their extreme agendas.  
PROJECT FEAR now available in a TIN !!** WHILE STOCKS LAST **Can you imagine my joy !!#Brexit #BrexitBrunch 
The BBC aka The Bullshit Broadcasting Corporation is in full anti Brexit over drive. pic.twitter.com/TAbZ6rm1mC 
One of BeLeave’s many targeted Facebook ads, just released by Parliament. BeLeave implied Brexit could deliver a new NHS hospital every 7 days. Instead, here we are stockpiling blood and medicines Such brazen, shameless duplicity. 
LISTEN - What Trading On WTO Rules Actually Means: An Expert's Alarming Explanation /#EU #Brexit #PeoplesVote 
Major Brexit blow to Theresa May as EU chief Michel Barnier flatly rejects her customs plan  
If the point of Brexit is for the UK to "take back control" with emphasis on borders, money etc, then why shouldn't the EU adopt the same approach? Why does British exceptionalism have to apply when the UK won't even be a member anymore?  
Cancel Brexit because no one voted for this? 
Corbyn supporters who accuse #FBPE of being anti-Labour should remember the huge effort many of us put into encouraging tactical voting in 2017 to Labour's benefit.#Brexit #StopBrexit 
This is important #Brexit news.@MichelBarnier has rejected @theresa_may’s Customs Proposal as predicted by @DavidDavisMP.#Barnier has said the only option is a form of Customs Union.May’s #ChequersPlan has failed.No more capitulation. #MAYMUSTGO 
In our times, nothing can be taken for granted. Nothing. Brexit definitely does not mean Brexit and any supposed NHS pay deal for staff does not mean a pay rise. 
You can’t make it upCretinous racist @DavidLammy owes his taxpayer funded living to the ‘will of the (deluded) people’ in his constituency yet he views the ‘will of the people’ on #Brexit a load of ‘bollocks’He makes @HackneyAbbott look like a fucking genius pic.twitter.com/Fmluh4BBId 
Sir Peter Soulsby, the excellent Mayor of Leicester, is moving a motion in Leicester Council for a people’s vote on Brexit at next meeting on 4 October. Follows Liverpool, Swansea & many other towns & cities 
Michel Barnier rejects Theresa May's Brexit customs proposals: Did anyone think they would accept them? The proposals compromise the EU’s integrity, they were always a non starter.  
Broadcasting establishment elite @GaryLineker thinks British voters were “brainwashed” and is demanding another Brexit referendum.@georgesoros would be proud! 
Bob Moran on Theresa May, Brexit no-deal and the heatwave – political cartoon gallery in Putney  
SORRY TIMMY, THERE'S NO MEDICINE (a spoof LADYBIRD BOOK)Part of the 'Learning to Live with #Brexit' series.#LadybirdBrexit #FBPE 
We've reached a crucial point in #Brexit.@theresa_may has no intention on delivering, breaking all her promises.She will water down an already failed #ChequersPlan to be worse than Remain.I've batted for her, but now must bat against her.Too weak for my taste.#MayMustGoNow 
You didn't think we would organise a conference on #Brexit without inviting @acgrayling did you? Of course not. We are naturally ecstatic to formally announce that AC Grayling will indeed be appearing at the Great Northern Stop Brexit Conference in #Leeds! 
‘Vassalage, Satrapy, Colony Status for the UK’ – Boris Tears into May’s ‘Turd’ Brexit Plan Again   
EU, unsurprisingly, rule out unworkable customs proposal from May. Yet again, Barnier sets out need for backstop to be agreed. Let's remember, it is the EU that are standing up for people of this place, ensuring that NI is protected- NOT  the UK Govt #Brexit 
Soldier killed in Northern Ireland added to Port Ellen's war memorial on Islay reminds us the 30-year civil war/Troubles claimed 3,600 lives incl 500+ Army. Why a Brexit border is a dangerous issue  
Hey jug-ears. Have you paid your taxes yet?@GaryLineker has a bloody cheek, leeching from the working class, slagging off England fans at the Euros, then expecting us to take his opinion on #Brexit seriously. 
#Brexit update: govt now admts it wants to stockpile food, medicines etc, only to be told we don't have space to do it.  Yet another thing they haven't thought through!  Cartoon time ... #StopBrexit #DavidDavis #Remain #EU #FBPE #ABTV #WATON #PeoplesVote #FinalSay 
Also I can't believe my phone is still autocorrecting Brexit to Brecht. Dude. I very rarely talk about experimental German playwrights. Get a fucking algorithm. 
So yes May is doing it for her Brexit plan, but it is potentially very helpful for Remain/People's Vote. 
The referendum in 1975 was whether to stay, in or leave, the Common Market that the UK joined in 1973. Ted Heath took the UK into the Common Market without a referendum.  
So, Barnier has now entirely rejected May's Customs Plan, & there is an irrevocable impasse in Brexit negotiations.Any sane leader would just propose a Norway deal, avoid the cliff edge economic collapse, and then work out how to solve the NI border problem with no time limit. 
New advisory referendum. [the Government will act on the result of this referendum]Do you like Marmite? 
This is why #WTO deal is much better than the sellout that @OllyRobbins and @theresa_may have cooked up behind the backs of their government. They have neglected around over 80% of the economy in their deal to throw them under the bus. #Brexit #MayMustGo 
Musicians are refusing to perform in UK because of 'humiliating' post-Brexit visa process  
UK divide and conquer routine doesn't wash with Barnier, who warned that attempts to appeal to EU leaders over his head were a waste of time, as he tore up Theresa May’s proposals on customs after Brexit.   
YouGov finds 24% would support a party who promoted anti-Islam & anti-immigration policies.38% would vote for brand new party on the right who are committed to delivering #Brexit@AMDWaters & @ForBritainParty have stepped forward to represent those people 
One has to feel empathy for Michel Barnier: he has, since Brexit's inception, been steadfast in his principles & in his application viz Brexit negotiations with the UK. Always the true gentleman, he has been more than accommodating in the face of a hapless & clueless UK Govt. 
The Prime Minister must not concede more ground to Brussels - the government's White Paper already goes too far as it is. As it stands it represents a 'Remain Brexit' that nobody voted for.  
BREAKING BBS NEWS!SEX could be rationed after Brexit!PLEASE RETWEET URGENTLY pic.twitter.com/BGjeZUXdHL 
This. Vote. Matters.Due to NEC policies, Labour is embroiled in an antisemitism scandal and members don't have a voice on Brexit. Support the #LabourNEC candidates who would give members a Brexit vote at conference and who support the full IHRA definition of antisemitism  
.@vincecable : "@libdems have been fighting for the British people to have the final say on any Brexit deal, or worse still, no deal.“I congratulate The Independent for joining this campaign. It’s both a brave and correct move.” 
The Tories using the British people as a no-deal bargaining chip are akin to terrorists threatening to shoot the hostages if their demands are not met. Those demanding a no-deal are even worse, they want to shoot the hostages come what may. #StopBrexit #Brexit #PeoplesVote 
1 Parachute Boris into Brussels, yelling 'Brusswankers' through a megaphone2 Leave EU entirely, cease payments, send bill for UK share of EU assets, get on with life outside the EU & never mention Brexit again3 Put T. May & Michel Barnier on a terrorist watchlist (4 the lolz)  
Vote Leave's targeted Brexit ads released by Facebook  
Permanent rage is a hard left thing. Brexiteers will only get cross if Brexit doesn’t happen.The figure on the bus was the amount of £ controlled by the EU which could be reassigned on leaving - e.g. to the NHS.The no 1 issue for Leave voters was sovereignty.Glad to help. x  
They way people are talking it's like we are going to have to do Africa style pleas on TV after Brexit."Just £3 a week will keep Kerry and her 5 kids in Iceland chicken goujons for a month"... 
Michel Barnier has just confirmed what David Davis said about May’s Brexit plan. Chequers now pretty much dead in the water. James Forsyth has the latest:  
Fair play to whoever decided - in this airless, sweltering train carriage - that fuck it, they’re just going to open their pack of egg sandwiches and tuck in. Because that is as brexit as it gets. 
It's not leave or remain, it's what's best for country. Our current deal is our best option for jobs and opportunities for young. Anything else is inferior and just pure self harm. Brexit is a complete con, sold by lies, and scaremongering about immigration.  
Michel Barnier tears up Theresa May's Brexit customs proposals  
Be part of the Brexit resistance - join us at Autumn Conference.Register now:  
Changing your mind when the facts change is a matter of common sense. It’s what normal sensible people do every day. The facts about Brexit are clear: we were lied to & misled & cheated. Time to think - and vote - again.  
Facebook has handed over details of scores of shifty online ads targeted at its users by Brexiteers during the EU referendum campaign  
Ladies and Gentlemen - the Secretary of State for Brexit .........  
I wonder if designing a #Brexit proposal to meet the needs of the Conservative party rather than one that meets the needs of the UK and EU might have been a teeny error  
Brexit won't fix the issues that made people vote for Brexit.That's what should worry the Government and all responsible people. 
Do you want a referendum to have a #FinalSay on the Brexit deal? Share your own message of support for our campaign. You can also sign the petition here:  
NEW: Huge blow for Theresa May as Michel Barnier rejects key plank of UK's Brexit blueprint 
It was the SNP that asked to be involved int he Brexit talks. Conservative Gov told us, NO, It was the SNP who were not informed on various Brexit papers. It was the people of Scotlands parliament which was ignored on our Brexit votes. So much so WM attempted a power grab.  
Turns Out Brexit does Not Actually mean Breakfast. Or lunch. Or Dinner. Frankly Stockpiling because of this. 
.@BenPBradshaw – Barnier has killed the Brexit White Paper  
 Labour Party members  BALLOTS ARE NOW DROPPING Elect me to Labour's NEC and I will put Brexit at the top of Labour's agenda, campaign for an independent harassment policy and for the full IHRA definition of antisemitism#LabourNEC #LabourSay 
David Davis could be forgiven a rye chuckle today after the Brexit press conference, says @JGForsyth 
May has 'last chance' to sell her Brexit plan directly to EU leadersSurprised? No Deal has to be the only option!  
Michel Barnier rules out Theresa May's Brexit customs plan  
Andrew Bridgen MP - "If you look at the pattern of the negotiations, and I think they have been very weak on our side, it’s more of a capitulation than a negotiation.“The white paper is certainly on the right colour paper. It has been a surrender document." #Brexit  
Barnier clear on TCA & FCA & more besides in press conference: “The EU cannot and the EU will not delegate the application of its customs policy, of its rules, VAT and excise duty collections to a non-member who would not be subject to the EU’s governance structures” #Brexit 
Prof. Alan Sked - "Theresa May will surrender anything in order to keep us tied to the EU, she doesn’t believe in #Brexit."I don’t understand why Brexiteers in her Cabinet haven’t resigned by now and why the Tory Brexiteer backbenchers haven’t demanded a leadership election."  
What connects all the possible outcomes of Brexit is that the British people voted for none of them, writes @stephenkb 
MICHEL Barnier blamed Jacob Rees-Mogg's backbench MPs for increasing the risk of a no deal #Brexit Three cheers for JRM 
Prof. Alan Sked - "Clearly at one stage Tony Blair wanted to become President of Europe. He is a fanatical European federalist."He does think that anything that can happen in this country to overturn Brexit is a good thing." #Brexit  
Jeremy Corbyn: "We've got to have A Deal! - We can't have a NO-Deal end to this process!""It's a bit sad that 2 years on from the referendum, we are having this kind of conversation. What on earth has the Tory govt been doing for past 2 years?"#Newsnight #fridayfeeling #r4today 
Michel Barnier and Dominic Raab aim for October Brexit deal  
I agree that the BBC's attitude to climate change has improved, although this requires constant pressure from scientists. On economics as far as I can see it does not even recognise there is a problem, and Brexit is the result of that.  
Brexit WARNING: Michel Barnier blames Rees-Mogg amendments for INCREASING no deal risk  
Remember, #VoteLeave campaigners repeatedly said that #Brexit would be dead easy and simple... 
Barnier kills off May's Chequers plan by ruling out cross-border trade"UK wants to take back control of its money, law & borders & we will respect that, but #EU also wants to keep control of its money, law & borders & UK should respect that!Good!#Brexit 
We have launched a campaign calling for a referendum on the Brexit deal. So far more than 210,000 of you have signed it. We started this process, we should have the chance to decide the outcome and have a #FinalSayIf you agree sign our petition and RT!  
Holiday omerta broken, to write a wee piece for tomorrow's @ScotNational on the amazing chicanery of the UK government's Brexit Bill case.  
#EU chief negotiator Michel Barnier says "a large part" of the #Brexit deal has now been agreed, including the issue of citizens' rights - but warns that "the job does not stop here"  
We joined the European Economic Community in 1973. The referendum in 1975 was on whether to stay in the EEC, not whether to join. The EU didn’t exist until 1 Nov 1993. Stick to football Gary. 
Musicians are refusing to perform in UK because of 'humiliating' post-Brexit visa process  
At joint Brussels Press Conference, after talks with Raab , Barnier says the EU “cannot and will not delegate responsibility for its customs policy, VAT and tariffs to a non-member”.  That would appear to kill the Chequers #Brexit agreement which is based on just such a plan. 
We must have a robot's vote in all future elections. Theresa May will be both Prime Minister & Leader of the Opposition. Brexit is Brexit, Brexit is Brexit. Brexterminate Brexterminate  
In all seriousness, if there’s a second ref Remain should focus on “do you want to never hear about fucking Brexit again? Are you sick of everyone you banging on about a topic that few gave two shits about three years ago? Vote Remain This Time” 
It's important that we create a positive vision of post Brexit Britain. In this new era let's stand tall as a confident, outward-looking, truly global country.  
'The referendum gave sovereignty to the British people, so now they deserve a final say on the Brexit deal' #FinalSay 
Second referendum question should be A) Have you had enough of this shit?B) Do you want years more of this shit?A wins in landslide. Mandate to knock it on the head. 
Ouch. Barnier has dismissed the Facilitated Customs Arrangement. The UK is either in our out of the customs union. #Brexit 
We don't mean to alarm anybody, and it's probably just us being part of Project Fear of something, but it kind of looks like the government's own statistics show a catastrophic plunge in household budgets that directly correlates with the date of the vote for Brexit.  
Michel Barnier has just rejected Theresa May's Chequers plan for Brexit.   
If Brexit was cancelled tomorrow then your racist colleague would rage on Facebook about moving to Dubai, the Mail would splash with FUCKING TRAVESTY and Farage would threaten he was going to fail at being an MP again. by Monday we’d be past the worst, I say do it 
Our #FinalSay petition for a referendum on the final Brexit deal just cleared 210,000 signatures! Join the campaign and let your voice be heard  
 The time has come to vote! Elect me to Labour's NEC and I will campaign to put Brexit at the top of Labour's agenda#LabourNEC #LabourSay 
. @DailyMirror one of many media outlets covering ourprotest with @OFOCBrexit , where we offer Boris help moving out.Young people don't want a former Foreign Sec lounging about on taxpayer's money, they want a #PeoplesVote on the Brexit Deal.#FFS 
The Independent's petition calling for referendum on final Brexit deal breaks 200,000 in just 24 hours  
Correct Piers. If you voted for Will Young to win 2002 Pop Idol but then thought a couple months later, actually, Spirit in the Sky is a banger, you can’t just re-vote and have Gareth Gates crowned champion a year later. Brexit means Brexit.  
'If Brexit negotiations have taught us anything, it’s that our future should not be left to 650 politicians in London' #FinalSay 
It seems that we have a completely shaved head now.... Brexit filming finished. Grinch promo on. (via story of ) 
I'm so angry and embarrassed about Brexit all the time it's fucking exhausting 
Yet the Brexiteers assured us that UK citizens in the EU would be unaffected by #Brexit. As the broken promises stack up, the case for a #PeoplesVote continues to grow. And make this one a #FinalSayForAll while you are at it. 
Good to see another move towards @peoplesvote_uk Hope you vote for it at your conference ... Overconfident men brought us Brexit. It’s not too late for women to fix it | Sophie Walker  
Tony Blair backs Independent's #FinalSay Brexit campaign - you can sign it here -  
UK & EU "both want an ambitious free-trade agreement" - EU chief #Brexit negotiator Michel Barnier  
#quote"In order to deliver Brexit there MUST be a change of Prime Minister. It will require an inspirational leader to face down Project Fear + to provide a positive vision + policy suite for post-Brexit Britain."Thoroughly good article by @JLongworthLML. 
I am especially (but not exclusively) interested in the following issues for my visit to the UK: austerity; welfare reform, including Universal Credit; the use of new technologies by the govt in the social security system; child poverty; and Brexit.   
Anti-Brexit protestors offer to help Boris Johnson move out of 'grace-and-favour lad pad' after cabinet resignation  
They cheated.They lied.They are desperate to profit from damaging your family, your friends, your country, your future.This is the reality of #Brexit.Democracy isn't frozen in time. Time to think again. 
“The UK wants to take back control of its money, law, and borders. We will respect that. But the EU also wants to keep control of its money, law, and borders. The UK should respect that.”@MichelBarnier #Brexit #Article50 
Blimey  - even the tube is now trolling Theresa mays handling of brexit …. #brexithaos 
Thing is David, as a democratically elected MP it is your job to ensure that the result of the referendum is respected. It is simply a matter of democracy, whether you like the #Brexit result or not. If you don’t feel you can do that then you should resign. 
Tory MP: The White Paper is certainly on right colour paper!It’s more a capitulation than a negotiation - a surrender document!I’ve already put my letter of No Confidence in.I warned PM that I saw Chequers paper as betrayal of our democracy.#Brexit #EU 
Except we know Brexiteer ring leader in chief @Nigel_Farage said opposite. Leavers never accepted '75 Referendum decisive 2:1 result from day 1, they told lies& made false promises about EU in Referendum campaign so their credibility on this one is 0. Leopards don't change spots! 
Dear crying, whining, blubbing Remoaners,We love:BritainEuropeEuropeansEuropean nationsEuropean cultureGlobal opportunitiesDemocracyWe loathe & despise the EU & #FBPE halfwitsIt’s simple really. Like you.#BrexitThanksNormal people  
Summary:1. I've spoken with Farage and JRM about a 2nd referendum.2. And I say bring it on.3. After all, next time Remain can rig it more effectively.4. And even if we lose again, so what? 5. We can just demand a 3rd one.6. Talk about third time lucky!7. That's all, folks!  
It just keeps getting worse. I used to think the #brexit mess was due to utter incompetence by the govn, but as we discover more it looks increasingly like it was wilful neglect & maybe even deliberate economic sabotage. Unbelievable. #PeoplesVote #FinalSay 
Really our lives dont depend on it. Willing to bet that this time next year I will still be alive after brexit 
Overconfident men brought us Brexit. It’s not too late for women to fix it | Sophie Walker  
Rees Mogg and Corbyn.Both Brexit Fantasists. Mogg’s Vision. Low regulation, low taxation sweatshop factories he can profit from.Corbyn, Dreaming of representing  the workers of aforementioned factories. Both cheeks of this late 19th early 20th century’s arse#StopBrexit#FBPE 
The effort to stop Brexit happening is gathering momentum. I voted Remain but find this campaign a disgraceful attack on democracy. The British people voted to leave the European Union, and leave we must now do - END.  
Good heavens above ... The #BetterTogetherBrexit is really a calamity the 2014 referendum decision left us open to ... Scots need #indyref2 to choose between independence and "tins of beans" UK #ToBUK 
How Brexit has been the EU's saving grace  
Petition from @Independent calling for public vote on the final Brexit deal signed by more than 200,000 people in less than 24 hours. Read about it here:  And to sign click here: 
The scientific guide to stockpiling food for a ‘no deal’ Brexit  
Whatever the Prime Minister says, stockpiling food and medicine means stockpiling food and medicine. A bit like Brexit means Brexit really i s'ppose ... 
Star Dragon @DeborahMeaden makes it clear why a #PeoplesVote on the final #Brexit deal is necessary - it wasn't clear what people were voting for and we haven't got the deal we were promised  
And I thought in 2016 that referendum wouldn't be reversed but support a vote on the real choice as the depth of the deceit and scale of the looming disaster became clearer  
Sir John Tusa, legendary BBC presenter and former director of @bbcworldservice and the Barbican Centre, told @CT24zive: Why should I be cut off from my Europeanness and from my Czechness? Undoubtedly, the Brexit referendum vote accelerated my decision to ask for a Czech passport.  
Watch the video here of anti-Brexit campaigners turning up at Boris' ministerial residence with a removal van and cardboard boxes...  
Brexit  
PLEASE SIGN Theresa May MP: Give People a Final Say on Brexit Deal - Sign the Petition!  via @UKChange 
So as far as I can tell, this is where Brexit is right now:》May locked her cabinet up to get an agreement.》The next day half her cabinet resigned.》The agreement was sent to the EU.》The ex-ministers changed the agreement.》The EU rejected it.》Everyone went on holiday. 
This was the real flaw in the referendum for me. People saying ‘imagine us in, imagine us out of the EU’. Well, there was always a third thing to imagine: imagine how it’d have all been if we’d actually got stuck in & been a proper member of the EU. 
That's OK Steve, we have a whole load of Leavers stating the terms they would accept the result when the referendum act was passed.  
Come the next elections Parliament will be answering to a population that voted Remain, and an increasingly pro-European population. Letting Brexit happen in a slow-motion catastrophe will only widen the gap between politics and the people. | @Femi_Sorry 
Well done, Brexit voters. Another nice thing you've fucked up for no reason at all.  
"A people descended from Romans, from Britons, from Anglo-Saxons, from Danes, from Normans, from Poitevans,from Huguenots, from Irish, from Gaels, from Germans, a people so mixed there is hardly a man who can point to 'purely English blood.'" Ford Maddox Ford#fbpe #brexit #UK 
“I’m asking members to reshape our position on Brexit at conference in September” says WE Leader @SophieRunning 
Want to remain European after Brexit? This petition might help.  
Worth reading:“Brexit would have been a terrible idea even if done as well as possible, but for the Government to blithely march the country towards consequences that they don’t even themselves understand is an appalling dereliction of duty.” 
"Rebalancing the country needs time and money. Brexit is stealing both from us."@Femi_Sorry in @theipaper on taking the campaign for a #PeoplesVote across the country this summer. Read & share: 
Brexit: British farmers say ‘no deal’ Brexit would be an ‘Armageddon scenario’. NFU president Minette Batters said the food sector could be on the "brink of collapse".  
The Tories told us Wales could be "half a billion pounds a year better off" after Brexit. Now @theresa_may has broken their promise to Wales' farmers. 
A reasonable person: "Brexit has fucked the country"You: "Iraq"Reasonable person: "Iraq was disastrous, but in a world where nuance matters, we try not to conflate different political issues and instead address them on their individual merits"You: "yeah but seriously... Iraq" 
It won't be a re-run of 2016. It will be the first referendum on the govt's Brexit deal.If you believe the British people actually prefer the reality of Brexit to EU membership, not just the lie-filled fantasy of 2016, why are you so afraid to ask them? 
We’ve reached the “at least there will still be enough food for everyone” stage of Brexit  
Overconfident men brought us Brexit. It’s not too late for women to fix it | Sophie Walker  
People in the north east would be better off in new, unified, Ireland says #Brexit report Previously, @davidmcw has referred to a degree of Dublin establishment institutional inertia, partitionist ignoring of #think32 benefits: "Don't give them ideas" 
Cracking piece from James Ball (cf my own @ScotNational column on no-deal brexit lunacy). “With their comments – presumably meant to assure us that they have a plan, or at least a clue – May and her ministers have shown us instead how woefully under-prepared we are.”  
actually not only that, is there an implication here that Hodges and Lilico are guilty of some horrible crimes which are only being covered up by a Brexit/Tory establishment?  
The Independent's petition calling for referendum on final Brexit deal breaks 200,000 in just 24 hours  
With the government in chaos, Parliament on holiday and the UK stockpiling food and medicine, where is the architect of Brexit?  
Dominic Raab's Eurostar troubles suggest the Brexit Secretary might struggle to negotiate his way around Europe  
This heat is just like a representation of Brexit. People wanted a hot summer, then we got given one and now everyone is miserable, confused, angry and scared it’ll never be the way it was again. 
Brexit WARNING: Michel Barnier blames Rees-Mogg amendments for INCREASING no deal risk  
200,000 have signed our petition in just over 24 hours! Keep spreading the word and help the people win the #finalsay on Brexit in a referendum on the deal. And top politicians from Tories, Labour, Lib Dems and Greens agree. Have you signed? #finalsay 
Disagreeing and debate is fine (some of my closest friends have alternative views on Brexit and we get on just fine) but the venomous invective aimed at those with whom you may have an opposing opinion is unsavoury, unhelpful and unnecessary. We all care, you know.   
'Leave means Leave'. Anti-Brexit campaigners from @FFSake_ and @OFOCBrexit offer Boris help to move out of his ministerial 'lad pad'. 
Take 'reassurance and comfort' in plan to stockpile food for no deal Brexit. Fuck me but I'm dim, I can't for the life of me see where 'and we will make a success of it' comes into thisFood stockpiling, the first step to declaring a state of emergency, that's where we're headed  
This is a ludicrous story; no one is suggesting EU nurses shouldn't be allowed to stay here post #Brexit And please note, @politicshome,@IpsosMORI there are MORE EU nurses working in the #NHS now than at the time of the referendum! #Brexit  
Funny isn`t it how all these wonderful remain campaigners didn´t make a squeak about anything else before brexit. Raped schoolgirls. . . not a word, terrorism, they didn´t care, homeless on the street, not my problem, elderly dying of cold, tough. Brexit, my God it will cost me ! 
Anti-Brexit protestors offer to help Boris Johnson move out of 'grace-and-favour lad pad' after cabinet resignation  
'No-deal Brexit will have a number of impacts for energy. It’s unlikely to mean that the lights go out, but it may well result in an increase in wholesale electricity prices and wholesale electricity price volatility.'  
This is actually a very real feature of Brexit ...if I had a penny for all who said this  #IrishMedia 
Police are having to deal with more racist hate crimes following a rise in offences around the EU referendum, figures show  
If @uklabour members want a say on Brexit and want anti-semitism dealt with properly these are the people to get on the NEC  
Musicians refusing to perform in UK due to 'humiliating' post-Brexit vote visa process and right-wing politicians  
If Britain leaves the EU people like Branson, Blair & others will lose hundreds of thousands of pounds. With the elite, money will always come before country & people so don´t be fooled into thinking they are anti brexit for altruistic reasons - they are not. It's the opposite. 
But it's not a joke. The "boom" is the sound of Arron's stash of assault rifles backfiring. This is the foundation that Brexit is built on. Arron's money bought Brexit. And bit by bit, we are learning how...  
Brexit not invent yet, so just moan about weather for now. 
The Independent's petition calling for referendum on final Brexit deal breaks 200,000 in just 24 hours #FinalSay 
Is Ruth planning to re-emerge from the darkness soon? … Has she ridden out the Dark Money, Brexit chaos, Power Grab and Frigates storm? Will people forget May's tax increase pledge? Is there an SNP Bad story imminent that she can jump on? The BBC Scotland film crew is poised.  
Is Theresa May the least trusted PM ever? Only 26% think she will negotiate a good Brexit deal!  Member of Soros foundation?            #fo2eu 
The Govt is heading from Brexit crisis to Brexit crisis with no land in sight. It is clear that @theresa_may is now set to go down with the ship. The only way to escape this ship-wreck is to give the people a life jacket: a final say on the deal and the chance to #ExitfromBrexit 
The EU is playing Ireland like a fiddle. It is using Ireland to weaken Brexit. It is exploiting the border issue to try to keep the UK inside EU institutions, against our democratic will. Brussels’ cynicism knows no bounds.Brendan O’Neill in today’s Sun 
Spanish leader of the PP proposing the new crimes of “illegal referendum without violence”  and “improper sedition”. This is how #Spain tries to regain credibility abroad? Ridicolous.  The only “improper” thing is the use of criminal justice to solve political problems. 
This is the most important issue of our time. I think it's important to sign the petition, whichever way you voted last time. It's essential that we have full transparency on what Brexit really means and have the final say on the way forward.  
No guarantee from May on farm cash after Brexit. This is the clearest sign yet that UK Govt will throw agricultural funding into the comprehensive spending review in future. That means a continuous battle to protect the Welsh food and farming industry.  
Hi there is your unroll: Thread by @PeterKGeoghegan: "So Arron Banks is back in news. @openDemocracy has been following the 'Bad Boy of Brexit' for &gt;a year. Here is some o […]" Share this if you think it's interesting.  
If Trump was negotiating Brexit it’d be the UK getting the £40 billion!          #fo2eu 
He struggled with Gen. Hameed Gul when making PTI, then he struggled with Gen. Musharraf for his referendum and for PMship but didn't get it, then he struggled with Gen. Pasha for 2013 elections but unsuccessful, then struggled with Gen. Zaheer but Dharna failed, sad long journey 
Is this the same Farmers who had "Vote Conservative" displayed in their fields at the last election?  The same Farmers who voted for Brexit and the same Farmers who refuse to back an Independent Scotland?  
I really can't see where Lineker gets the gall from to criticise a majority vote. The gormless sod is so thick he couldn't piss and hit the floor. When it comes to brexit he can be the country's sexual adviser - when we want his f*ckin opinion we'll ask for it. 
Times: "The commission fears the British are playing a game of divide and rule — by offering proposals that undermine the very basis of the EU and then threatening a no-deal Brexit to put pressure on member states." Commission have woken up to this being a negotiation then. 
We didn't join the EU in 1975, the EU didn't exist until the Maastricht Treaty in 1992, which we joined without a referendum, Gary. 
Corbyn is an utter disgrace. He cannot win a GE without many of the 16+ Million Remainers. We'll not simply forgive and forget. He may get his beloved Brexit, but he'll never be PM. 
Fixed it for you @SunPolitics"Former England Player Patriotic hero Gary Lineker declares ‘blocking Brexit is more important to him than football’ as he backs a second referendum" 
 'No Deal' will not be disastrous... in fact, it is now very likely to be the best Brexit outcome! Read my latest article for @prospect_uk: 
Remember this the next time the government tries to tell you that Brexit can't be stopped.  
Farmers warn of 'Armageddon scenario' if we don't get a Brexit deal  
UK could cancel Brexit and stay in EU on same terms, says French government  
Perhaps relevant to these AIQ Vote Leave ads would be @the_opf’s latest working paper finding strong predictive personality factors among the UK’s electorate in the referendum. 
TB: 33m+ people voted in the EU referendum wanting a better country, not to be poorer, not to put further pressure on our already stretched health service, not for job losses or to stockpile food and medicines. It should be your #Finalsay  @independent 
Michel Barnier makes a rare foray into internal UK politics with a stark warning that the actions of the ERG in Parliament are increasing the risk of a no deal Brexit. His testimony to the @LordsEUCom at a meeting in Brussels last week.  
Stockpiling food and medicines is the tip of an iceberg of Brexit chaos...  
Talking post Brexit trading arrangements with constituents running a micro business supplying flower bulbs & how we can improve disability signage with another constituent - why I love being back working in #Broxtowe and out of #Westminster #GettingStuffDone 
"People rush to Greggs to stockpile sandwiches as the BBC issues a dire warning that after Brexit there will be none". LOL THIS IS TRUE, THE BBC REALLY HAS PUT A SANDWICH WARNING ON THEIR WEBSITE!!  
Good on Gary Lineker for backing a campaign for a second Brexit referendum, saying: "Some things in life are more important than football."  
It indicates the whole level of debate from the outset. It just descended into name calling and it’s probably what lost the remain side the referendum. Too busy calling everyone thick and racist, which just consolidates their position, instead of engaging with them. Heigh ho! 
Looking forward to people Instagram posting their meals of “Road-kill served with a jus of wilted hemlock, sprinkled with the bitter tears of post-Brexit regret” 
Meanwhile, concern with immigration is close to a 15 year low - down from over 50% naming it as a top problem in run-up to Brexit vote to under 20% now.  
“There is a really powerful case for a People’s Vote on #Brexit” Vaughan tells @BBCWalesNews 
With threats to agriculture, steel, high value manufacture, aerospace, financial services, construction, nhs and academia brexit without membership of EEA and a customs union Wales is sleepwalking into an economic crisis bigger than we already have. We need change.  
The SDLP has called for parties to field a joint anti-Brexit candidate against DUP MP Ian Paisley if a by-election is called-"With parliamentary arithmetic so tight, it makes perfect sense for those who want to positively influence Brexit to collaborate"  
Enjoy your cheap and easy European holiday in the sun this year. Because of Brexit, it will be your last one.  
The prime minister has proposed a half-in, half-out plan for a hard Brexit that has pleased no one, least of all the electorate. We need a People's Vote on the Brexit deal. My @Independent column: 
In the form of Arron Banks, the biggest British political donor ever, Britain has a Russia collusion scandal. It Looks Exactly Like Trump’s.  …#StopBrexit #Brexit #PeoplesVote #BrexitGate 
Treacherous @theresa_may is due to release 70 papers on how to prepare for a no deal Brexit but academic Joanna Williams warned it is simply a plan to “scare” British people into accepting her final Brexit deal.   
"Brexit Bombshell: All Northern Ireland people would be better off in a united Ireland says new economist report"  
In response to the BBC's "Brexit theat to sandwiches" nonsense...  
We should have a name for the various scandals of cheating, criminality and Russian involvement in the #Brexit referendum. I suggest #BrexitGate. If you think that's a good idea please RT. Best to get all this under one label. #StopBrexit #PeoplesVote 
10 Great Brexit Sandwiches Global Britain Can Enjoy After No Deal  
Brexit has turned some people crazy ...  
Given the turmoil Brexit has caused, this is a very generous offer. Stay in EU with all the privileges we enjoy now, which are better than those of any other member.We should grab it with both hands. Let the people decide on Brexit reality instead of Brexit fantasy. #PeoplesVote 
Today marks 763 days since the EU referendum was held, the same number of days between the 2015 and 2017 general elections.The will of the people is under constant revision and with so much at stake it's time it was put to the test again. Agree? Please share  
Best thing about Brexit is the possibility of a united Ireland. Well done Brits, you played yourselves.  
I'm not saying Gary has to wait 41 years, but there's no constitutional precedent whatsoever in the UK for holding a second referendum to reverse a first before the first result has even been implemented. If he did understand British democracy then he would be respecting that. 
.@DominicRaab's Brexit war cry as he says it's time to take back control of our borders, our laws and our future  
Interesting to see this so high up the BBC’s most read news articlesBBC News - Gary Lineker backs Brexit referendum campaign  
Public concern about the #EU and #Brexit rises to historic levels: Our latest Issues Index shows concern about the EU at the highest since 1974  
Today PM @Theresa_May attended the @RoyalWelshShow where she met farmers and food producers and set out the Government’s plans for a post-Brexit farming policy.  
It’s simple: The current EU membership deal is way better than any Brexit deal. 
A statement in relation to our client, Darren Grimes."Brexit is the most important political issue of this age; views are held passionately on both sides but Darren’s appeal is however not about the merits of Brexit, but about his freedom to have and express his own opinions".  
Is #Brexit irreversible? Of course not! The UK can change its mind at any time and political leaders from across the EU have been clear that the door remains open - #PeoplesVote @peoplesvote_uk @peoplesvote_hq 
Pretty much Daily Mail Brexit Bingo in one tweet. Bravo 
Gary Lineker backs #PeoplesVote Brexit referendum campaign.Brexit is “going very wrong indeed,” says ⁦@GaryLineker⁩.Give the people a say, with an option to stay.Please RT to spread the word.  
The reason we have Brexit is the same reason we have a Tory government. More than half the population of the UK are really not smart enough to understand what or who they are voting for. 
Theresa May is the worst PM in a century.If she went on TV and said "I'm resigning, Brexit is a fucking catastrophe and I will not go down in history as the person responsible for it" she'd instantly become the best PM in a century.Or at least sneak into the top 20 
Could 'no deal' preparations shift opinion about Brexit? Maybe, but in unpredictable directions. My latest Brexit Blog post, just:  
"The public thought it would be easy for the UK to strike a commercial deal with the EU... it's not a remote, third world country."In a debate with Alastair Campbell, economist Andrea Hosso says it would be easy to reach a Brexit deal if there were "political will to do it."  
WATCH: Brexit is not irreversible, despite what Theresa May & her Government tell you.EU leaders, including France's Europe Minister today, have confirmed that the 'door remains open' for Britain. Everybody needs to see this. Please RT:  
UK can cancel Brexit and stay in the EU on the same terms, France promises 
Brexit cuts Brits off from help when outside the EU.If a UK citizen is robbed in a country where they can’t get to a UK embassy or consulate – they could instead go to another EU member consulate for help. Not so after Brexit.  
EU Tax avoidance directives come into effect Jan 1st 2019. Could this be the reason they need Brexit at any and every cost? 
I personally decided Brexit was a bad idea once I'd drawn up a list of the people who thought it was a good idea 
Our #FinalSay petition for a referendum on the final Brexit deal just cleared 190,000 signatures! Join the campaign and let your voice be heard -  
UK prepares for Brexit surrender to Frenchman. Soft Brexit/BINO seems to back on the table. Once you get that far, the next question has to be "so what is the point of leaving exactly?" 
With respect the Irish didn’t vote in Brexit - we are ... and I’ll say this slowly for those finding it hard to keep up ... a separate country to you  
The irony is that, whilst they bang on about “the will of the people” the only reason that Brexiteers don’t want a second referendum is because they are afraid that the will of the people has changed. They couldn’t care less about the will of the people. 
The most important thing to stockpile for Brexit is hatred of the Tory Party. 
75% of people Darren's age voted AGAINST Brexit, and to represent young people, you choose the one young person who's not just pro-Brexit, but CRIMINALLY pro-brexit?! REALLY!?!? 
The Brexiteers are terrified of Linekar because he's got broad appeal and he sounds sane. They've not got anyone of that calibre backing Brexit. The closest they can manage is David Icke. 
I think I do. You can have a referendum like we did on joining the EU in 1975 and then after a while you can have another to see if the people have changed their views. Presumably that can then happen again, right? Or is there some sort of time limit?  
BBCOperation Brexit Barrel Scrape  
Theresa May waffles without answering the question on whether she thinks Britain will be poorer after Brexit.Yet, she knows Britain will be poorer after Brexit. All government economic reports show that Britain is heading for an economic catastrophe.  
Just want to let everyone know that after a ‘no deal’ Brexit there will NOT - I repeat NOT - be a shortage of Forman’s smoked salmon.  We’ve were smoking salmon for 70 years before joining the EU and will carry on 70 years after we leave.#WeAreSmoking 
Lineker not the first: “If a democracy cannot change its mind, it ceases to be a democracy.” - David Davis, former Brexit Secretary, in 2013  
DO NOT PANIC says Theresa May as they stockpile food for a no deal Brexit scenario.Isn't the fact that we are having to stockpile food a reason to panic? A reason to think that things are going terribly wrong? 
Hey @GaryLineker I hear you are calling for another referendum, do you remember this tweet?  
BBC's Simon Jack says Brexit Will Break Our Sandwiches!  I'm in bits here..........LOL...tears....weeping.... LOL....ribs hurt....  
The BBC’s flagship Today Programme is giving too much air time to Remainers promoting "monstrously stupid" ideas about food shortages and planes not flying:  #Brexit 
Ayesha Hazarika: I’m backing a 2nd referendum — extreme politics is on the rise, & Brexit needs an intervention.Here's her intervention: 'I know better than you.'  
The "Will of the People" rhetoric is being used to delegitimise the democratic right to oppose, and demonise opponents of #Brexit as "enemies of the democratic will of the people". The right to oppose is central to democracy. Where it is denied democracy dies. 
The Partido Popular, now in opposition in Spain, vows to make illegal any future referendum agreed between Catalaonia and the current Spanish government.So anything discussed will be immediately overturned once the Spanish government changes. No future for Catalonia in Spain.  
Seemingly in Brexit Britain when the facts change you denounce it as fake news scaremongering by experts and leftie luvvies, then stick your fingers in your ears and dream of blue passports and Polish people no longer being in Greggs. 
I'm not convinced we are handling Brexit negotiations as well as we might.  
2013: "Independence threat to hospital blood supplies."2018: "Brexit: government admits plan to stockpile medicines and blood."  
BetterTogetherers who condemn Brexit lies (manifold) should also recognise how key points their 2014 campaign were also a con 
Gentle Reminder: EU Referendum Bill 2015 - which made possible the Brexit referendum & associated madness - the SDLP had 3 MPs in W/Minster at the time; none bothered to vote. The moralising & pontificating would be worth more had they bothered. Honest abstentionism over laziness  
Justice Elizabeth Musoke: people express their will and determine their destiny through electing their representatives. By extending their tenure without a referendum, MPs deprived the people of their right to elect their leaders  #AgeLimitJudgement 
One of your main news stories today is "Gary Lineker has backed the campaign for another EU referendum"     Hang on a minute I thought the democratic process had already been done on that one ? #Hypocrite 
Boring to moan about the downside of Brexit, let’s focus on the exciting possibilities: living in an abandoned motorway services; coming up with a tasty recipe for fox; marrying a 3D-printed rifle; trading sexual favours for insulin, and vice versa - none of it will be dull. 
Cancelling 5 frigates joins Brexit as another main plank Better Together that’s collapsed - decision two major issues of our times EU & Indy based Fraudulent claims punted by Tories 
1.5 million young people denied a voice about THEIR future in the 2016 referendum have since turned 18.55,000 people turn 18 every month.Tories & Labour are rightly going to get a thrashing from them if they go ahead with Brexit 
The future of the UK is in the EU. There is a majority & an ever-growing one in support of that. Brexit is futile, because if it happens it will be reversed, so it is a hideously expensive & destructive waste of time. 
You’ve reached  UK Gov.If you’re calling the office to discuss food rationing press1.If you’re calling to discuss the impacts of Brexit on your business press2.If you’re calling to discuss which food to stockpile press3.Please note our offices are closed until Sept 4th.  
Musicians are refusing to perform in UK because of 'humiliating' post-Brexit visa process  
Brexit is hurting those that can afford it least with its higher prices and near stagnant economic growth. Predictions point to things getting worse, not better.No thanks, now we can see Brexit for the calamity it is, a #PeoplesVote is needed. 
Government admits that post-Brexit food stockpiles will be insufficient. Pregnancy will be forbidden. One citizen in 10 will be asked to die to reduce population. "We must all make sacrifices to preserve the Will of the People," says May. 
The Independent has launched its #FinalSay campaign to demand that voters are given a voice on the final Brexit deal. Sign our petition here -  
Absolutely spot on, Tom. And that includes anyone who worked with Russia to influence the Brexit vote.   
Can someone do flags, t-shirts and car stickers:"Brexit has made me ashamed to be British""I apologise on behalf of my compatriots for their ignorance over Brexit""Viewers of Brexit are assured that a normal level of British stupidity will be resumed as soon as possible" 
Tell you what, why don’t we just have one last FA Cup Final and whoever wins that, even if they cheat to win and even if they play rubbish football every game afterwards, gets to keep the FA Cup forever? #Brexit  
.⁦@BBCNews⁩ you get that we are now laughing at you, right?You are officially a parody "news" outlet.#ProjectFear #Brexit  
If you don’t want to see tweets off his personal then unfollow him. Gary could post photos of dogshit on the pavements if he wanted to... Instead he chooses to comment on the Govt Brexit negotiations... (which is very similar)So unfollow him or shut up. Problem Solved. 
a Remainer sent me this as an example of their Brexit armageddon stockpile. Because if there's one thing you need when the apocalypse comes, it's premium filter coffee.  
Kate Hoey: Thank goodness we are now leaving EU!Now a need for David Davis White Paper to be published in full.Huge amounts of money from foreign donors going to Remain campaign.Leave Campaign treated very unfairly by Electoral Commission.#Brexit #EU 
#Brexit will be a tragedy for #Leeds and other British regional cities, many of which have in recent years picked themselves up and reinvented themselves after decades of industrial decline. 
At no point during the referendum was the term "advisory" ever mentioned. It was merely dug out by desperate remain voters after the result. The official government line throughout was that they would carry out the result of the vote. Thats what voters were told. 
Mr Shapps -A #Brexit based upon the 2016 referendum is like buying a house without knowing the price, without having a survey, and without even knowing if you've got the job that is going to fund the mortgage..What we need is a #PeoplesVote based upon known facts & honesty. 
1. Meanwhile, there'll be no more banging on about Brexit from me until after a long lie down - here are a final few thoughts after another crazy political year -  
If they are serious about winning support for a second Brexit referendum, best to keep Blair (and probably Brown) quiet. Every time they opened their mouths first time round you could feel the leave vote hardening. 
No wonder Waitrose is struggling, food imports from outside the EU carry tariffs to protect European farmers.Brexit means cheaper food.Why not come clean & admit you believe in the political dream of a Federal Europe?This bullshit is worthless.  
‘The Brexit process has proven that young people like me were right to vote Remain – we need a final say’  
I’m sitting in a cafe in London listening to the people at the table next to me chattering away in Spanish.And it’s lovely.#brexitIsBonkers #BrexitIsPersonal #brexit 
"The European Union has been extraordinarily patient in trying to deal with a government that is divided and incompetent."Alastair Campbell argues that two years after the referendum the UK government still cannot agree on what Brexit should mean for the country.  
LOL: BBC report on ‘Brexit threat to sandwiches’. Project Fear silly season well underway! Clearly someone at the Beeb has been stood out in the sun for too long and gone slightly mad.  
My cartoon Thursday @TheTimes on the predatory Rees-Moggie, aka Palmerston the Cat #JacobReesMogg #Brexit  
So that's it? Parliament is in recess until 5th September? Much as everyone deserves a holiday, that seems like a disproportionately long one given the time constraints of Brexit. 
You don’t get it, I’m afraid. Until the Lib Dems sort out their leadership, they are virtually no use in the Brexit campaign - & they have no excuse for not doing so. Labour needs to sort itself out too  
This is a great read from @TomMcTague. Norway (+) remains the most likely Brexit option because it is would have an 11th hour, emergency majority, whereas there's no way the Commons (or the Cabinet) would support no deal.  
Steve. You were put in charge of Brexit, but you and your cronies fucked it up so badly that we're now discussing the stockpiling of Food and Body Parts.Get in the fucking bin.  
Following Gary Lineker's intervention in politics, A C Grayling and Andrew Adonis are selected as England's new strikers.'They know exactly as much about football as Lineker does about Brexit' said the FA's spokesman.  
"The British press is extremely centralised, and most of it is owned by wealthy men who have every motive to be dishonest on certain important topics" - Orwell, 19452018 - Nothing has changed.#ThursdayThoughts #Brexit 
I am terrified of #Brexit and I'm not ashamed to say so. So many people I know are too. It's like living with an abusive partner who does whatever dumb, cruel things they like no matter how you try to reason with them, only the abuser is the #government. 
Can't think of any other country in the world which would grant a Mozambican student a vote living in UK for the Referendum on EU but denied it to my UK born mother in Paris. The franchise was bizarre& unfair. The lack of a threshold has meant the country remains deeply divided. 
I’m not worrying about a ‘no deal’ Brexit and the stock piling of food & medicine. The majority of MPs are against ‘no deal’ so, presumably, they’d vote no confidence in the Government if that was the scenario. Bring it on. @Theresa_May won’t last much longer. 
Brexit: John Major is called a 'traitor' for calling for second referendum. - The people who call him that should be ashamed of themselves! But they have no shame and they don’t consider the dangerous implications of the things they say.  
They have all been simply allowed to scuttle under their rocks, having lied to the country about how simple, easy and brilliant for the country Brexit would be. Drag them into the light and get them to admit they fucked up. THAT would change hearts and minds. 
What I would love to know is why the BBC does not get guests like Patrick Minford - ever feckin present before the referendum - to come back now and defend their statements that we would do a trade deal in months because the EU would beg us for one. That could make a difference. 
No deal Brexit would push up fresh food prices, says ex-Waitrose boss  
And if Scottish Labour can't put the protection of citizens from Tory Brexit Britain ahead of its own political agenda, then your party deserves to be consigned to the dustbin of history because it's not fit for purpose. | #Scotref #Indyref2 #Brexit 
If the plan is to change leavers minds on #brexit after they won the referendum this should about do it.  
Indy is no longer just about yes and no, it is the only, let me repeat, the ONLY chance that Scots have to stop Brexit, the tories, destruction of our economy & of the powers of our parliament and stop the usurpation of our fundamental rights and freedoms. | #Scotref #Indyref2 
Musicians are refusing to perform in UK because of 'humiliating' post-Brexit visa process  
The Final Chance. Then the Final Final Chance etc etc. And the Prime Monster will take each one and delay, delay,delay.It's  a set-up. First kick her out, then Brexit.  
Boris Johnson destroys Theresa May’s #Brexit plans "The Chequers white paper means...vassalage, satrapy, colony status for the UK. Our laws will be made overseas, enforced by a foreign court.“It can’t and won’t work. #ChuckChequers” 
I agree with Priti, we should encourage more young people to get involved with politics. We should give more attention to the concerns of 75% of 18-24 year old who voted to Remain. And have a #PeoplesVote on the #Brexit deal where 16-17s are allowed to vote on their future.  
Blair quite right when he said leaving Brexit was merely the first phase. These people want no checks on their power  
OK...so you’re a fan of Cricket, but you’re allowed to have an interest in Brexit; Gary’s a fan of football, but he’s not? So my question remains, is it different for different sports? 
That Mercury list, ha!  Am i wrong, or is there not a single Welsh, Northern Irish or Scottish act on there? Ha! HA! HAHAAHAAAAAAAHAHAHAHAA   HAAHAAMost Brexit Mercury, EVER. 
I understand the desire for a 2nd Brexit vote but it's not happening. Neither Labour nor the Tories want to take political responsibility for a Brexit u-turn & nor do they want to navigate a post Brexit u-turn political landscape. Also Corbyn probably wants Brexit more than May. 
Liam Fox says there shouldn't be preferential access for EU migrants post-#Brexit but adds:"that’s a debate we still have to have in the UK in terms of policy"More evidence that Remainers in Cabinet want to keep free movement under a different guise 
Brexit LIFELINE: @theresa_may handed 'FINAL CHANCE' to win over EU leaders for her plan!! THIS is your final chance to Actually get the British people who voted leave in our so called democratic vote to actually trust you!! DO YOUR JOB or #ResignNow!    
I wish to god that we would so life can go back to normal and Brexit will be shown for what it is - a monstrous mistake foisted onto British society by a disfunctional tory party. Brexit voters are not wrong - we should just never have had this fundamental decision dumped on us.  
Farmers warn of 'Armageddon scenario' if we don't get a Brexit deal  
Your Thurs 26th July reminder it is now a LEGAL FACT that both Leave  campaigns deliberately broke the law to win Brexit referendum @BorisJohnson @michaelgove should be in jail  #VoteLeaveBrokeTheLawPlease Sign AndPlease Sign  
Brexit in the form that it was sold is undeliverable. We need a People's Vote on the Brexit deal.Here's why the @peoplesvote_uk campaign is growing in strength every day: 
This Valentine’s Day, take a stand and buy your own chocolate. For you and for teddy bears everywhere. #SetTeddyFree 
The best place for the UK is in the EU. We must stop #Brexit before it's too late for the UK, for trade, & for #CitizensRights. Brexit has already split families ideologically & must not be allowed to do so physically.#StopBrexit 
The Gov't isn't learning its lesson on the teaching Brexodus happening in front of our eyes.  We can't let the ideological wet dream of Brexit extremists get in the way of a good education for our children. We need to add teachers to the jobs shortage list  
“If we can’t get our relationship right with our closest and biggest market, what hope have we of getting a free-trade agreement with any other country?”British farmers say ‘no deal’ Brexit would be an ‘Armageddon scenario’  
Gary Lineker has changed his mind- and the British people are entitled to, too - as the former Brexit Secretary, David Davis, once famously said "a democracy which cannot change its mind, ceases to be a democracy" @peoplesvote_uk 
The hard-right have turned their fire on @GaryLineker and @billybragg. I guess anything to avoid truths like:These was an orchestrated con involving the far-right and Russia manipulating BrexitThere isn't a better Brexit deal than what we haveThe far-right coup is ongoing 
UK could cancel Brexit and stay in EU on same terms, says French government #FinalSay  @Joncstone 
Day 1334 in Brexit Britain. Sue who used to live next door stole our stockpiles of blood during the night again. We heard rumour of French cheese in Margate, but it was a ruse to lure people to the jam mines. The broadcasts say trade is imminent. Farage watches from his blimp. 
I’m not even particularly interested in relitigating or delegitimising the referendum. I am interested in keeping Democratic norms in place as much as possible. This Trumpian claim the electoral commission is biased on top of breaking the law damages that. 
So JC you back a #Brexit that leaves us Poorer with Less Control & Fewer Rights & deny a #PeoplesVote; you've lost a chunk of Scotland & alienated a swathe of #Remain, face disadvantageous boundary changes & now an angry Jewish community...anything else? Maybe change your stance? 
One min the European Communities Act was due to be repealed and the next minute the Tories confirm the UK will be party to the Act until 2020. This hokey cokey approach to key details of #Brexit is typical of this dysfunctional Tory Govt. 
Former England striker @GaryLineker has joined the @peoplesvote_uk campaign backing a second EU referendum.  
This tweet from a year ago is being bandied about. Happy to admit I’ve now changed my mind. Didn’t envisage at the time that we’d ever contemplate a ‘’no deal Brexit’ and the ensuing carnage that would bring.  
UK can still dump Brexit and remain a member of the EU, says French minister I HEARD HER ON THE RADIO THIS MORNING - SHE WAS VERY IMPRESSIVE ! 
As the Brexit ship flounders on the tidal wave of reality, the Telegraph retreats to the safe shores of the "lets tear up human rights" fantasy island (thanks, @conorgearty)  
Ok I’m trying to prove the mood of the country here politically on the right of politics so @theresa_may and the @Conservatives can witness what’s happening and the way voters are likely to vote next election if we don’t get #Brexit So please LIKE VOTE and RETWEET thank you. 
1st time in 1,000 years UK laws made overseas, enforced by foreign courtYou can’t Leave an organisation & still be bound by its rules!But that's what Chequers white paper means.It's colony status for UKIt can’t & won’t work.Chuck Chequers!#Brexit #EU 
Arragh, thank ee, thank ee, sir, fer the solving of meself agin. Tis lost and awandering I’d be if tweren’t fer yerself an yer kindness. God an Mary bless ye an keep ye and may the Brexit divil hisself ne’er lep up out o the fiery depths o hell an bite yer arse, begorrah  
A 2nd EU Referendum? I was initially against this, but given the unholy mess that has developed and the choice now between no deal or May’s half in half out then I think there has to be a second vote. We should end this nightmare as Thatcher’s U turn over the Poll Tax did. 
Is @garylineker right to use his media platform and influence as an English hero to back calls for a second referendum? 
George Galloway: "Any attempt to extradite Julian Assange to the United States and possibly to his death by execution will be the most acute crisis, including Brexit, that the government will ever face." Watch again ▼@georgegalloway | #MOATS |  
It’s not too late to stop destructive Brexit before it wrecks everything. Please RT as much as you can, for not everyone has this information.#StopBrexitSaveBritain#PeoplesVote 
Brexit: Is stockpiling of foods and drugs reassuring?  
Brexit obsessed, the Telegraph, loses nearly a quarter of its circulation in just one year  
Absolutely staggering. @KellyTolhurst - who has supported every single piece of the government’s Brexit legislation - has written to @MedwayMessenger to point out how important it is that Medway businesses have access to migrant labour from the EU. 
For everyone saying they don’t want a 2nd referendum: How about we just admit Brexit was a stupid idea & won’t fix anything you thought it would? Then let’s just drop the whole idea & have a cup of tea. 
Brexiteers who would appreciate their winning vote to be respected, by actually leaving the EU, are extremist, apparently. #Brexit 
Gary Lineker backs Brexit referendum campaign  
"My Brexit war cry"? "I have the words of many Mail readers ringing in my ears"?"Come what may, we will be ready for Brexit"?  @DominicRaab, you should be ashamed of yourself spinning such nonsense. But at least there is some honesty here in terms of who you are listening to. 
THIS IS JUST TO SAYI have eatenthe plumsthat were inthe stockpileand whichyou were probablysavingfor post-BrexitForgive methey were nutritious and I was so weakand so hungry 
UK’s premier climate science denial campaign group included in network of organisations pushing for a hard Brexit.Says it all really. 
May is an absolute curse on the country and a cancer on the Tory Party. To use government to purposefully seek to frighten the British people is an absolute degeneracy worthy of the worst regimes. This was rejected in the referendum. She is a disgrace.  
This is what u call a silly boy. And the SNP had us giving 16 year olds the vote in their failed referendum!Cheers 50  @yakuza72 
If in 2014 we knew what we do today, i.e. Vote No for:BrexitTory AusterityLabour AbstainingStockpiling FoodStockpiling MedicineWorst Economic Growth in the EUDUP BribePower GrabWe would be independent.Dont ever forget that.Indepednence will come, it is inevitable 
*slaps roof of a edinburgh studio flat* this bad boy can fit so many one man shows about brexit in it 
Now billionaire Richard Branson hits out at Leave vote - Brexit is making UK 'poorer' . Why doesn't he leave us alone - accept the will of the people and then piss of back to his little spoilt brat island which hopefully will get hit by another hurricane.  
Politics isn't football. Brexit isn't football. It's a really stupid analogy which would only ring true for people who were really, really very stupid indeed. Which is presumably why you're using it.  
Billy Bragg and Mr. Corbyn are two of the most anti-racist, inclusive ppl ever, Brexit is causing a spike in hate crime/xenophobia/Islamophobia/real racism, but #bbcnews along with their tory masters smear/lie about decent men despite Islamophobia being rife in the tory party. 
Twitter profiles be like :a) Here is everything I am doing that involve me, Selfie, Selfie, Selfie, Selfieb) I have a Dog/Cat look what he/she can doc) Retweeted thisd) GIF, GIF, GIF, GIF, GIF, GIF, GIF, GIF, GIF, GIFe) Loads of half naked shots tagged as boredf) Brexit 
Sign our petition calling for a referendum on the Brexit deal  
If Brexit really does bring back the 'Good Old Days', the one thing I'm very excited about is seeing dogs stealing strings of sausages from irate butchers. 
2) There will be severe political consequences that will not be able to be contained. With politics at a all time low in our country people will either goto the far right, the far left or all civil disobedience. This isn’t a threat this is fast becoming a reality. #Brexit 
So for Theresa May Brexit is 100% definite, we can't change our minds, have a 2nd vote - but when it comes to defining Scottish parliament powers/competence, then Brexit is hypothetical.  
Odd how it is always the millionaire loud mouths that are against #BrexitNow billionaire Richard Branson hits out at Leave vote - Brexit is making UK 'poorer'  
Delighted to welcome  Home Secretary @sajidjavid to Portugal. With  Minister for Internal Administration Eduardo Cabrita he discussed the UK’s future security relationship with Portugal & EU. @ukhomeoffice #ModernAlliance #AncientAlliance #Brexit  
"As a British EU negotiator, I can tell you that Brexit is going to be far worse than anyone could have guessed"Brilliant article by @GuitarMoog in the Independent. Did any of us vote for this mess? 
I can’t stockpile a toffee crisp for ten minutes so I think I’m unlikely to survive brexit 
BREAKING.....No deal Brexit could leave Britain short of air to breath, the EU have said they will stop all air floating from the EU to the UK unless we pay them.........@LeaveEUOfficial 
Clearly Leave meant there would be a 350m per week windfall post Brexit, not official guidance on stockpiling food. 
Gary Lineker: Brexit will be a disaster Bloke: So a guy who can kick a football is an economist/political scientist?Economists and political scientists: Brexit will be a disasterBloke: We've had enough of experts 
Please make sure you know the difference, this is not the referendum!  
The only way we're gonna style out this deal is with some sick unnecessary skills so I propose a no-look Brexit. 
Barishaki. Amendments that directly impact on the people’s sovereignty, enshrined in article 1 of the constitution, if passed without a referendum are deemed to have offended our constitution’s basic structure #AgeLimitJudgement #MonitorUpdates 
The BBC licence payers should have a referendum on Gary Lineker’s salary #GaryLineker 
Yeah how *boring* right? Especially when Blair recently explicitly blamed corrosion of trust in politicians as a factor in the rise of Trump and Brexit as though it had *nothing to do with him* but was somehow the fault of others carping on. 
No Deal Brexit likely to mean "pretty significant increase" in cost of fruit and veg says former trade minister and Waitrose boss. 
People say the Brexiters don't have a plan. But they do, it's just that they don't want the public to know about it.It's called "Getting a #BrexitTaxHaven for the rich and screw everyone else".#StopBrexit #PeoplesVote #Brexit 
What do I want from my politicians right now? Someone, SOMEONE senior to be the person who stands up, talks against the party line and galvanises things to stop the utter stupidity that is Brexit. It could happen, no one courageous enough it seems? 
By choosing to put his head above the parapet to back #PeoplesVote, @GaryLineker has shown the courage many of our MPs have lacked. #Brexit  
The UK government is preparing information posters for their #Brexit stockpiling initiative #adequatefood 
Brexit impact over 15 years. Per household annual £ loss:1. Soft Brexit (EEA) = £2,6002. Negotiated bilateral agreement (Canada model) = £4,3003. Hard Brexit / No deal / WTO= £5,200  
The Brexit fans told me, if we wait long enough, the German car manufacturers will force the EU to give us as many FA Cups as we want. 
Brexit is "the saddest thing that's happened" to Britain and many people were misled, Richard Branson says  
The new Brexit Secretary of State has had his first taste of the Brexit shambles that his party has inflicted on this country. He failed to outline the cost of Brexit to British businesses, jobs and households.. The people are entitled to know the cost of Brexiters' folly. 
Hypothesis: the Brexit mess is due in part to the decline of trades unions, as this deprived a generation of Tories of experience in how to negotiate.  (The loss of wider cultural capital about negotiating skills also matters) 
I am not proud of the fact that , alas, I was right.  Indeed it is now even worse than I thought it might become which makes it all the more important that Scotland stands up for a different approach.  #Brexit  
Suspect for every pound we don't put into EU post Brexit (the so called Brexit dividend the Brexiteers promised us) the UK will be ten pounds poorer overall as our economy shrinks from the damaging consequences of hard Brexit.  
Hi Grant, this referendum was the 2nd one.The first was 40 years ago.Why did the Tories decide no to respect the result of the first one?  
With a clean Brexit, the UK can become a free-trading, free-market hotbed of innovation, growing in prosperity. A beacon of light and liberty to a continental Europe beaten down by the Franco-German EU project:  
From the FT today"Brexit has converted many young Britons into fanatical Europhiles of a type that barely existed in the UK before" 
Who would have thought it? The mad hatters are having to stockpile tea in readiness for their #Brexit wonderland! Where are all these countries queuing up to do trade with us?! 
Very interesting to see both N. Irish & Welsh top law officers agree wholeheartedly with Scotland’s Brexit Bill Also suggest the UK position “an extravagant claim”   
I support the #PeoplesVote campaign, but their rallies are all in Remain cities, apart from Birmingham which was only 50.4% Leave.If you continue to preach to the choir/echo chamber then you'll only make the same mistakes as the 2016 referendum. 
London renters ‘only have room to stockpile six tins for Brexit’  
Things I didn’t know before the Brexit referendum: How many of my colleagues in the job appear to be ultra right wing on the political spectrum. If they’re not, how gullible they are in believing the bile pumped out by ultra right wing groups on Facebook. Very sad. 
“Having maintained numbers pretty high from the EU, they are falling off a cliff, and that’s absolutely down to Brexit.”Brexit blamed for dramatic drop in EU teachers  
"This is not just any food.... this is adequate Brexit food"  
Final day of meetings with EU leaders kicks off with @GiuseppeConteIT. We’ll be discussing #Brexit and other key European issues  
@MichelBarnier and @DominicRaab will give a press conference today at 17:30 CET @EU_Commission , following this week’s round of #Brexit negotiations  follow live here:  
He’s right. Whether you voted leave or remain the outcome is now heading for disaster. Only way to resolve this is a #peoplesvote Gary Lineker joins campaign for a vote on the Brexit deal  
This is just days after Remainers claimed butter, cheese, and yoghurt could become “occasional luxuries” thanks to Brexit – really getting desperate as the deadline approaches.  
“The door will remain open." France's Europe Minister Nathalie Loiseau stated on #r4today that the UK can remain in the EU if we change our minds.Brexit doesn’t mean Brexit. Brexit means Remain. 
My beloved son @NivenR1 is 22. He’s just the right age to reap the benefits of Brexit in his retirement 50 years from now. Enjoy son! 
May has compromised, a lot. Do the Stop Brexit extremists support those efforts? Of course not. They campaign for a nonsensical 2nd ref (best of five?) revealing yet again that they have never accepted their defeat. Means even moderate Brexiteers will not/cannot trust them. 
Me, standing just outside the EU after Brexit.  
To all those getting upset about Lineker pushing for a second Brexit referendum: relax, A-list luvvies almost always back the losing team. They’re a privileged curse that hardens resolve of ordinary folk    
Brexit will leave Scotland with fewer Teachers, Dr’s, Nurses, Carehome Workers, Fruit pickers etc, it will not only have a dramatic effect on our economy, but also quality of people’s lives. Scotland, is a union that damages our country so badly worth it? #DissolveTheUnion 
"The new #Brexit secretary … bounced into the room with the swagger of someone who was fairly confident that he was a wee bit brighter than his predecessor … Being one step ahead of David Davis is still being several steps behind everyone else." (John Crace) 
With under a year to go until #Brexit, this is a pivotal moment for the environment and the laws that help protect it. Your voice can make a difference – take action now:  #NatureLaws 
Brexit Is Killing London's Housing Boom  
Steve, your tweets are getting more and more ridiculous the more shambolic that Brexit becomes.A British government, IN PEACE TIME, is organising stockpiling of food because of its own stupidity and you’re saying we should keep going or there’ll be trouble?  
As a Brit, it’s great to see you guys connecting the links to Brexit as well.My first awareness of just how far we had fallen was when Farage’s victory reference to Jo Cox went by without comment from the media.To expand your record there - he didn’t just call it “bloodless”: pic.twitter.com/jqebL853d7 
⁦@Jacob_Rees_Mogg⁩ calls Irish Deputy PM a ‘patsy’ of ⁦@JunckerEU⁩ - time for English politicians to stop this condensation. Irish political class having  a much better Brexit than our near neighbours   
Why are banks not shouting that Brexit will be an economic catastrophe?Because, behind the scenes, they have been offered 'incentives' to stay in Britain & not relocate to the EU.'Incentives' mean deregualtionYou will be screwed.Another banking crash will happen 
.@DominicRaab @DailyMailUK : With ambition, hard work, and energy – on all sides – we can strike the right deal for the UK. Come what may, we will be ready for Brexit  
This highly professional sham of a campaign to promote @darrengrimes_ as an innocent party by the likes of @matthew_elliott @patel4witham and other members of Vote Leave is the latest take on using the media to sway public opinion against the authorities....it never ends well.... 
4. The various Banks's related Leave groups raised nearly £12m for Brexit - but recorded spending of c£1m. How? Why? Where did all the other monies go to?  
So Arron Banks is back in news. @openDemocracy has been following the 'Bad Boy of Brexit' for >a year. Here is some of main things we discovered (thread): 1.  Banks spent £8m+ on Brexit. But in 2014 he was in real financial difficulty   
People like #GaryLineker want a second referendum. Because the first referendum got the wrong answer. Jean O’Brien gets amongst his fan club   
Are we 100% sure this whole brexit thing isn’t a huge PR stunt by fray bentos pies? 
May's Chequers White 'Flag' Paper:No prospect of future trade dealsNo control over our lawsNo independent immigration policySupremacy of ECJStill agree to pay EU 39 Billion pounds!Shows how far Govt has gone down the road of capitulation.#Brexit #EU 
7. Brexit threatens peace in Northern Ireland, which also voted against.8. Russia interfered and influenced the result.9. The referendum was advisory and non-binding.10. The govt has no mandate for Chequers or No Deal - the only options left on the table. 
Therefore parliament did not have the authority to extend its term.This amendment is therefore null and void.There ought to have been a referendum and non was held. 
He divided a nation and destroyed its spirit. He let in dark forces that have engulfed our nation, a nation that has suffered decades of incompetent government and now faces Brexit ruin. He was the worst prime minister in living memory - bar one.  
I voted Remain, however I don't agree that a 2nd referendum is the answer as it destroys the purpose of having referendums/votes. The government need to stand up and admit Brexit is unworkable and that we would be better off remaining. If May has to fall on her sword, so be it... 
If you're in Inverness at the weekend for the #AUOB march, do not buy Pot Noodles from the local supermarkets.  I'm stockpiling them to get me through the 50 years recovery period from Brexit.  You can buy Pot rice instead as they're maukit. Thanks for your understanding. 
"Dominic Raab's Brexit War Cry" lols. Never let it be said they are not all total loons.  
The problem, as #Brexit is clearly demonstrating, is that in an increasingly interdependent world absolute sovereignty invested in the nation-state is no longer practical.The truth is that #Brexiteers need to start facing up to reality instead of blaming #Remainers. 
Brexit: Not too late for UK to change its mind and stay in EU on same terms, says French minister - Politics live  
Stockpile food in the event of a no-deal Brexit? Dream on | James Ball  
Brexit is going to be austerity on steroids... I am going to fight it tooth and nail as it will hurt the poorest and most vulnerable hardest....who voted for this? #PeoplesVote 
Theresa May’s Brexit outlook on a rice packet  
Keep on digging media. At last BBC are doing their job and not protecting Brextremism on the spurious basis that the Brexit debate is over and it is not in the public interest to reopen it or challenge it.  
One MPs view on the value democracy in the U.K. #Brexit  
After @TheEconomist  & @Independent now also @GaryLineker gets behind the #PeoplesVote campaign for a people's vote on the final #brexit deal - on the very same day that the French Europe Minister says the UK could stay an EU member on existing terms @peoplesvote_uk 
How’s everyone’s stockpiling tinned food going? I know it’s not ideal, but think how easy meal decisions will be for a few years... none of those time consuming drawn out “what shall we have?” Discussions. Maybe share your ideal tinned brexit meal ideas? 
It will be wonderful when football helps save the country by stopping Brexit. Just imagine the street party! Then England will go on & win #EURO2020 & national pride can be restored #GaryLineker #StopBrexit #PeoplesVote #Football4EU #TeamEurope 
It’s hugely reflective of modern society that a referendum based on next to no facts but loads of hot air & emotion...garnered the biggest voter turn out in decades.And then we are confused when it becomes a mess.This is the social media age.And we have only ourselves to blame 
The merest prospect of a unity anti-Brexit candidate is surely the best news @ianpaisleymp has has for yonks. No? 
why do people keep saying that ignoring the result of the referendum would be undemocratic? the referendum was ADVISORY!! #Brexitchaos 
This is my #FBSIParty I support Scottish Independence & am calling for a second referendum. I am looking to connect with others who agree.Please:  1 Like 2 Retweet 3 Follow I will follow backCopy this tweet to your own.#ScotRef #IndyRef #IndyRef2 
After losing faith in Dominic Raab, Theresa May drafts in a special consultant to help with the final Brexit negotiations.  
Why the gov's "will of the people" Brexit mantra is bollocks:1. Vote Leave cheated.2. It was based on lies e.g. £350m for NHS. 3. Only 37% of the electorate voted for it.4. Scotland & London voted against.5. 69% say Brexit is going badly.6. Public supports a #PeoplesVote. 
Hmm. So when Arab states imposed an air, sea and land siege on Qatar, there was no stockpiling or doomsday scenarios as remainers predict will happen in post-Brexit Britain. It's almost as if those predictions are hysterical  
What we hope for is YOU joining @darrengrimes_ to share the guilt of committing criminal offences relating to electoral fraud instead of promoting this masquerade....shameless.....shameless and guilty....call this 'Exhibit A'.... 
A message for Lord Keen. The reserved powers model of devolution means if it isn't listed as reserved it is devolved. There are no caveats.  Scotland can make legal preparation for Brexit, without your permission, as can NI & WalesDon't mess with the Scots, we have form  
 TODAY is the day Ballots open for Labour's NEC election today. Make sure to support the candidates who want  Labour members to have a say on Brexit To better represent nations and regions on the NEC To uphold the IHRA definition of antisemitism#LabourNEC 
It is another genius stroke.Compare the visceral, instantly relatable quality of the PR message with the truth.The PR wins flat out, by being a great story.Of course, the Electoral Commission cannot comment, so the Brexit elite can say anything they like. 
Disinformation takes many forms.Take the crowd funder for Darren Grimes's legal fees.It rests on the preposterous notion that Matthew Elliott & the wealthy Brexit elite do not have Grimes's back.It is a PR campaign against the body that ensures electoral law is upheld. 
"I'm backing another referendum until I get the result I want"Best of three? Five? Myopic. 
Brexit: Not too late for UK to change its mind and stay in EU on same terms, says French minister - Politics live  
Hi @GaryLineker rather than calling it a second referendum, could you call it an informed referendum? 
Brexit Bombshell: All Northern Ireland people would be better off in a new united Ireland says new report  
With critical knife edge votes on Brexit, there has never been a greater need for an anti-brexit MP who will vote to protect all our interests  
Brexit metaphor nine billion and two  
Macron, Tusk, Varadkar, they all said it last year. There is *no* inevitability about Brexit #StopBrexitSaveBritain #BrexitCanBeStopped 
"Brexit is perhaps the most complex thing the UK has attempted in the lifetime of most of us, and it is being run by people who don’t understand the absolute basics."  
Things Britain isn’t prepared to cope with:HeatColdWetDryFood ShortagesFuel Supply DisruptionPower CutsRiotsEconomic TroubleWorld TradeExtremismHybrid WarfareCyber AttacksCorruptionElectoral InterferenceBrexitRealityThings Britain can cope with:Denial 
The UK region that will be hardest hit by a bad Brexit for financial services is not London, IT'S SOUTH WALES - Cardiff, Newport, Swansea. Other regional centres that will be clobbered include Edinburgh, Chester, Leeds & Northampton. via @financialtimes 
Now we need another Referendum based on the feelings of a football presenter 
Before the referendum, I committed to accepting the result. It seemed to be Remain campaigners and media doing the asking. We should have spent longer asking them.  
Boris Johnson ramps up his attacks on Theresa May's #Brexit plans 'You can’t leave an organisation and still be bound by its rules.But that is what the Chequers white paper means.It can’t and it won’t work. Chuck Chequers.'So #ChuckChequers 
Backing a second referendum simply kills off democracy. #Brexit 
Every day more people are calling for a final say on Brexit. Add your name to #exitfrombrexit today:  
On the basis of the amount of dishonesty or wilful ignorance Darren has shown since the referendum. I think people should help Darren by teaching him the value of honesty, an education, and respect for others,How are you going to help him with that, Lucy?  
Now Gary Lineker calls for ANOTHER EU referendum - Brexit is ‘going very wrong indeed’ . Who the hell does this moron think he is. He should save talking tripe for TV and flogging crisps.  
 The stark reality of Brexit underlines the strong case for @scotparl control of migration powers. 
Another Brexit triumph. We want to leave as the US and EU agree to go for a tariff freed deal. Guess who is the more attractive partner for that nice Mr Trump. Even the endlessly deluded Liam Fox might pause for thought here. 
That it comes to this: stockpiling food & medicine because of an utterly pointless lunatic fetishism. Just Stop Brexit: clean & simple, & above all sane. 
I’d have thought that not accepting and respecting the result of a national democratic referendum was the very definition of “extreme politics”.  
Is Theresa May the least trusted PM ever? Only 26% think she will negotiate a good Brexit deal  
French EU minister said on BBC Today prog this morning she respects referendum result, but if UK changes mind most welcome to stay in EU on same terms as now and all EU nations feel same way. Time for People's Vote. 
On the day when @MichealMartinTD launches my new book @UCC, here's a synopsis | Brexit and the North: making a bad situation worse  via @IrishTimesBooks @DubrayBooks 
Final Say: The Independent's petition demanding a vote on Brexit deal reaches 100,000 signatures - The Independent  
That decides it. A travelling crisp salesman has demanded a second referendum. I demand I no longer pay his wages in the form of a BBC license fee.Twat!#GaryLineker 
SDLP call for single anti-Brexit candidate to take on Ian Paisley in North Antrim  
He is not afraid to say he supports a second referendum unlike many politicians & talks a lot of sense about politics & football- and we are really pleased he is in conversation @BylineFest on 26 August - don’t miss @GaryLineker - last discount tickets  
We’re sawing off Scotland at 8:30 tonight. If you don’t want Brexit, get north of the border and join the party. 
Gary Lineker joins the campaign for a People’s Vote on the Brexit deal. RT!  
French Minister for European Affairs on @BBCr4today confirms UK CAN stay and keep rebate. Another reason more and more people are backing a #PeoplesVote on the final #Brexit deal 
The collective negotiating clout of the EU as a whole  can stand up to #Trump and get concessions. A post #Brexit Britain by itself, however... 
The gvt wants you to think Brexit can't be stopped. France's Europe Minister Nathalie Loiseau just blew that out of the water.Asked on #r4today if the UK could remain in the EU on the same terms if we change our minds, she said "sure, of course" & "the door will remain open." 
I’m backing a second referendum — extreme politics is on the rise, and Brexit needs an intervention  
How ironic that Brexit has been the catalyst for the USA and Japan to get better trade deals with the EU whilst the UK gets a worse one, maybe none at all.Why? Weak leadership and traitorous Remainers.  
Those campaigning for a second referendum do not represent the peopleThey broadly represent the condescending wealthy, establishment figures and Londoners who sneeringly think everyone else in Britain apart from them is thick via @PoliticsHome 
Boris Johnson slams Theresa May’s ‘soft Brexit’ as grassroot Tories call for her to be sacked 
So, Brexit brings us:Stockpiled foodStockpiled medicineDeath penalty ‘opportunities’US chlorinated chickenUS udder-infection milkCommemorative stamps Blue passports Any more joys? List your favourite below  
In recognition of the sainted Gary Lineker's campaign to hold a second #BREXIT referendum , Walkers are to launch their new " Sour Grapes " flovour of crisps.......... 
Leading Remoaner Gary Lineker declares ‘blocking Brexit is more important to him than football’ as he backs a second referendum  
Even Brexit will be quicker than this!  
Mac on Theresa May and Brexit negotiations – political cartoon gallery in Putney  
According to ITV News it is of note that Gary Lineker backs a second referendum. Fucking great journalism. Now theses eagles of truth need to seek clarification on Joe Pasquale's position on solar energy. 
June 2017 : "The UK will have brighter future after Brexit."July 2018: "(It) is about making sure that we'll be able to continue to do things that are necessary once we've left the European Union." 
The UK Government should take No Deal Brexit off the table today. The only people they are threatening are their own population.Me for @Euronews 
2016: Brexit will mean an extra £350m a week for the NHS.2018: Try these 7 surprisingly edible recipes for squirrel meat. 
Nigel, here in Australia we’ve seen your accomplishments campaigning for Brexit and we think you’re an absolute cunt.  
Real story here isn't that Lineker wants an anti-democratic second Brexit referendum. Luvvies will be luvvies. It's that his tax-friendly "freelance" contract allows him to dodge BBC's political bias policy >  
Top BBC earner Gary Lineker backs second referendum.Desperate stuff - it’s not best out of 3!  
"Whether you voted Leave or Remain, did anyone really vote for the mess we seem to be in, let alone the prospect of no deal with all the terrible consequences attached to that?”[Gary Lineker]#Brexit #VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw 
As @BorisJohnson says, it is not too late to save Brexit - join the campaign at  
Brexit won't cause terminal damage to the City, says Barclays boss  
I'm absolutely staggered that we have politicians championing the benefits of Brexit to deliver cheaper food. We have the third cheapest supply of food in the World. Every British citizen has a right to safe, quality, affordable and sustainably produced British food. #foodforall 
Dominic Raab admits food will be stockpiled in event of no deal Brexit, but it’s OK as we can all eat that tasty “sovereignty” and “control”  
"Brexit, with a bit of luck we won't starve."Not such a great slogan is it? 
“Extremist parties have been astonishingly unsuccessful here...A Brexit sell-out...would make the UK just like everywhere else - an angry nation, openly at war over class and identitarian issues.”  
It beggars belief that Brexit is still the course of action, knowing that’ll make people even more vulnerable, governments are supposed to support society not break it, I believe this is NOT the will of the people but the will of this government. 
Andy Bell - Will the British people be poorer as a result of brexit?Theresa May simply waffles & side steps the question. #StopBrexit #FBPE 
Gary Lineker joins campaign for a second referendum on Brexit  
What Priti Patel is saying is ‘we should encourage the young to break electoral law’. This is disgraceful. It shows how much these Brexit fanatics want to change the lawfulness of UK democracy.  
Former England striker and football pundit @GaryLineker says blocking Brexit is even more important to him than the sport as he throws his weight behind a People's Vote.  
Legend claims, when Britain is in dire need, on it’s last legs, Merlin will bring back Arthur, as a saviour. I find it interesting that around the time of the referendum, this statue appeared on #Tintagel Island, just after Merlin’s face was carved upon the rock #FolkloreThursday 
.@VinceCable on @GMB says if food and medicine shortages weren’t a possibility as a result of Brexit the Conservatives wouldn’t be planning to stockpile them 
Steve Bannon & Boris Johnson. Steve Bannon & Nigel Farage. Steve Bannon & Jacob Rees-Mogg. Notice a pattern developing? #Brexit #VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw 
Young Brexit activist who was fined £20k by election watchdog launches bid to fight back against ‘politically motivated stitch-up’  
Brexit going really well, latest: PM stockpiling food & medicines; Tory MEP says to be pro-EU is treason; Boris Johnson plotting with US Far Right wrecker Steve Bannon 
I like @GaryLineker. But "stopping Brexit is more important than football"? That's surely going too far... 
Independent launches petition demanding referendum on Brexit deal #FinalSay 
Surprise, surprise...Fewer City jobs will move to Europe for Brexit day, Bank of England believes.  
Steve Bannon. - met with Jacob Rees-Mogg Dec 2017 in London - interviewed in London on @LBC by his mate Nigel Farage & calls for people to “rise up” - now meeting Boris Johnson Anyone not concerned?#Brexit 
EU citizens living in the UK will be able to apply for settled status in three easy steps:  #citizensrights #eu #brexit  
The benchmark for Brexit success has been lowered to survival 
I have no idea why Gary Lineker supporting a 2nd referendum is newsworthy. What next? Timmy Mallett supports proportional representation? Limahl backs the Norway option? This tweet gives away my age  
Make no mistake about it, this is what all campaigners for a another referendum so soon after the one in 2016 want to happen. x  
The moment Brexit lost it with the public was when Mrs May said we needed to stockpile food & medicine. NO-ONE voted for that 
My column: A betrayal on Brexit would break British politics and push voters to the extremes. It would be a catastrophe for our previously moderate country.  via @Telegraph 
Gary Lineker is backing a campaign for a second Brexit referendum."I find the whole thing more bewildering and worrying than ever." said @GaryLinekerWhich is precisely why you should shut the f**k up and let the grown ups get on with it  
Reason Trump now dealing with EU on trade is because it is BIG, STRONG, & cannot be BULLIED. In each respect the opposite of Brexit Britain 
Well, said Gary Lineker. It takes courage to put your head above the parapet knowing you'll get abuse from trolls & Brexit media. He's well off, he doesn't need to risk his popularity, even more credit to him for speaking out. #PeoplesVote 
Honestly... the more i think about the amazing things we could be doing with all the wasted Brexit preparations, the money being set on fire for military boondoggles & outrageous subsidizing of toxic fossil fuel industries, the more I want to find a way to loudly make the case. 
Extraordinary the BBC is appealing against Cliff Richard ruling, after their invasion of his privacy & the devastating court ruling against BBC. Same arrogance & tin ear for public mood as they are showimg in supporting Brexit 
That this sham of a govt is considering *stockpiling food & medicines* in the event of “no deal” - in Britain, in 2018 -demonstrates just how locked into dangerous tunnel vision they are.Brexit was based on cheating. #VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw #VoteLeave 
READ: @GaryLineker joins the campaign for a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal. Please RT:  
Rabbit it the headlights as she takes us into a Brexit apocalypse  
With so many people living in poverty it’s completely pointless to suggest they stock pile food for the Brexit fuck up 
Gary Lineker says 'Brexit is more important than football'Give up Football then, plonker, we don’t want you there either!You know nothing about politics!  
"NEW EU MIGRANT CAMPS FUNDED BY BRITISH TAXPAYERS" - Exposé of EU’s plans published on Tuesday. And for Remainer MPs demanding votes on #Brexit, please note you get no vote on this. Read:  
Brexit & ‘hostile environment’ are having an appalling impact, not least in H&I. As well as teachers not applying to come, non EU teachers are refused visas & EU teachers who’ve been here for years are leaving. Tory policy is destroying our communities.  
"Some things in life are more important than football" #Brexit  
Northern Ireland to lose one of its 18 designated days for flying the Union flag because of Brexit  
The European Referendum Act 2015 was passed by both Houses of Parliament and became law. The government creates bills which can then become law eg. Brexit bill. 
Boris Johnson furiously CONDEMNS Theresa May’s soft Brexit as ‘VASSALAGE’  
Theresa May will pledge post-Brexit overhaul of farm funding to cut red tape  
Gary Lineker joins campaign for second Brexit referendum: Cheers ⁦@GaryLineker⁩   
Brexit: when you want to leave but have no planTrexit: when you have no plan, so you leave  
You asked us to factcheck this graphic - it's based on DExEU analysis which explicitly said it could not be made into forecasts.Even ignoring this, many of the figures are still incorrect.#Brexit #EU 
In the two years since the #EURef many of us have been scratching our heads as to why the UK had so supinely surrendered to every outrageous demand from the EU?All is now clear.When PM said 'Brexit means #Brexit'What she really meant was,'Brexit means REMAIN.'#BrexitBetrayal 
Just remember re Brexit, that EVERYTHING we are being told - and will be told - by all sides, including the side we favour is spin.Take with salt...if your supermarket has any left! 
Remainers greeted Jeremy Corbyn at  a rally in Hayfield, Derbyshire. @jeremycorbyn you need to listen to @CarolineLucas There’s no such thing as a ‘jobs first Brexit’  
Everything that happens with the raptors is some kind of referendum on the franchise over the last 5 years. Other teams just get to exist. It's kinda tiring 
There’s a difference between respecting the referendum: i.e. taking the result, and the context in which it was obtained, and giving it serious and appropriate consideration, and blindly following it in contravention of your binding duty as an MP. 
[checks in on Brexit][nodding] “things seem to have escalated nicely”[checks out on Brexit]  
Brexit puts at risk our:Security, economy, healthcare, food safety, energy supply, global trade, employment rights, environment, science base, universities, manufacturing, & farming.But the EU put rich folks' tax havens at risk.So the English public did as we were told.  
Britain is stockpiling food, drugs and blood so they don't run out after Brexit  
“This election has become more of a referendum on the government’s legitimacy,” said @sopheapfocus. “The pressure to vote is fierce.” Thrilled to contribute to this report for @guardian on voter intimidation ahead of #Cambodia's national election on Sunday 
If Pitch Shitter claims "defeating Brexit is more important than football", dare we hope that he gives up his £1.75m pa @BBCSport salary & concentrates on attacking the democratic will of 17.4m people? He surely can't do both and have the @bbc maintain a shred of impartiality... 
And Fast & Furious is a criticism of police misconduct and and referendum on the basic social unit of the family.And Transformers is a treatise on American Imperialism and the fallacy of eminent domain.  
"What would be next," asks Lord Keen, "an independence referendum bill? Even an independence bill?" Sure. Why not? That's precisely what Dáil Éireann did in 1919. 
The UK is preparing to stockpile blood and medical supplies in case of a no-deal Brexit || via; Businessinsider  
Trump's worst nightmare.He's tanking in MI, MN, & WI.And he's made the '18 mid-terms a referendum on himself--not peace/prosperity.Voters prefer Dems to keep erratic Trump in check--a theme Dems should push.And only 31% want Trump re-elected in '20. 
Blair: Britain could flourish under 'Hard Brexit' if adopts low tax, low public spending, deregulated economy (but says not sure many voters want that)   
i have read this entire blog post about what @jeremycorbyn 'actually said' in his speech about British industry post-Brexit. i am actually angrier now than i was before! he's living in a bubble, a bubble filled with yes-men to stop it bursting. madness. 
#Iraq currently has no official Gov’t, disabled parliament, many #ISIS attacks daily, no public services, no salaries & the law is being broken by Iranian Militias everyday.Hope now the international community understands why #Kurdistan implemented a Referendum for independence 
Interesting interview, particularly Blair's admission that Britain could 'flourish' with a no-deal Brexit.Great to see the Frost interview baton pass into such capable hands. Congrats mate.   
If you want a proper glimpse into post-Brexit Britain I highly recommend watching an insightful documentary called 28 Days Later 
We have gone from:2015 - nobody is talking about UK leaving the SM. Glorius Brexit future.2017 - we must leave SM. There may be 2-3m jobs lost. It's worth it.To: 2018 - it will take 50 years to get back at 2015,start stockpiling food & medical supplies. NI buy candles. Riots. pic.twitter.com/3e8nS0owOn 
This is my #FBSIParty I support Scottish Independence & am calling for a second referendum. I am looking to connect with others who agree.Please:  1 Like 2 Retweet 3 Follow I will follow backCopy this tweet to your own.#ScotRef #IndyRef #IndyRef2 
Every time I think that the @BBC headlines have peaked in the stupidity, they manage to to surpass themselves ... "#Brexit threat to Sandwiches" !!!  
Letters: The Independent's campaign for a Final Say referendum on Brexit  
As a British EU negotiator, I can tell you that Brexit is going to be far worse than anyone could have guessed  
Dep. Sec. Sullivan met #UK Minister of State @tariqahmadbt on sidelines of #IRFMinisterial today to discuss an orderly & predictable Brexit, reaffirm US commitment to the transatlantic relationship & cooperation of range of bilateral and global priorities.  
Translation:1. Trump declares trade war with EU2. EU says "we will retaliate"3. Trump says "bring it on"4. EU slaps tariffs on key Trump voting state industries5. Trump backs down6. Farage tries to 'spin a win' for @potus7. The world quietly smirks8. #brexit is now DEAD pic.twitter.com/6cQUc43qSj 
The lack of change over Brexit in the electorate is still pretty astounding.  
When UK Services industry leaders were interviewed by Committee on Tuesday, they were all critical of the #ChequersPlan capitulation approach to #Brexit.18mths they engaged with UKGov, but were all blind-sided at the last minute.80% of UK economy  
May tells the public to ‘take comfort’ in the fact that the government has plans to stockpile food and medicine in the case of a no deal Brexit. All other countries that trade with the EU manage to do so without this. Who is she kidding? It’s Project Fear by Remainers yet again. 
Everyone has suddenly become an expert, that's true! But are you arguing for a technocracy? That's a dangerous precedent. Besides, predictable outcomes are the domain of science. And, on that basis, we'd be in referendum hell ad infinitum!  
Can #Remainers not see what’s happening here?!? By supporting the EU you are blatantly harming our nation. If the #EU can make concessions this quickly with @realDonaldTrump why can’t they with us?!? Let me tell you, THEY WANT OUR MONEY! Wake up! #Brexit  
If it wasn’t so important for the future of our nation and my kids futures I probably would have given up by now and called it a day with regards to #Brexit but every day I wake with renewed enthusiasm to keep fighting the good fight for them and our democracy. #Brexiteer 
Why haven’t I got behind Brexit by now?1. It was a stupid idea then.2. It is a stupid idea now.3. Just look at the people who think it is a good idea.4. Er, that's it. 
If no deal is better than a bad deal, and no deal means emergency stockpiling of food and medicine, what on earth does a bad deal look like?#Brexit #peoplesvote 
#BREAKING Theresa May confirms that the government is stockpiling food and medicine as she tries to reassure us about Brexit. Scratch the surface and everything about her screams panic. @ScotTories 
All this hatred of the EU is baffling,  the EU didn’t introduced zero hours contracts. It’s was the U.K. Governments that allow workers to be exploited, both Labour & Tories have turned a blind eye. Brexit will see employers desperate to stay profitable, employees will suffer 
But back to the Jewish Chronicle, Jewish News and Jewish Telegraph. What purpose does their wrong and misguided campaign serve? They make passing reference to a "government in Brexit disarray" while pouring out insults that make a continuance of that government more likely. 
Department accused of wanting to delay report on the cost of a united Ireland until 'after Brexit' (via @thejournal_ie)  #UnitedIreland 
Gary Lineker joins campaign for new Brexit referendum. The sportsman-turned-broadcaster believes Brexit "feels like it is going very wrong indeed" and wants a #PeoplesVote. 
Ex-British Prime Minister Tony Blair is predicting a stalemate on Brexit. He even thinks there could be a second referendum on whether the UK should leave the EU.  
Gentle reminder.Russia invaded the Ukraine and took Crimea by force (meaning their soldiers killed Ukrainians) before holding a stacked referendum to join Russia.If you think this is okay, you are unAmerican.#TheResistance 
Priti Patel supporting Darren Grimes tonight. I think anything goes now with the Brexiteers. The gloves are off and they are not fighting truthfully or cleanly. Shameful that any MP should support law breaking. Stop Brexit #FBPE 
The EU has standard third country controls. We voted to become a third country. The Tories Brexiters want no formal trade relations with the EU. That's what the WTO option means. Choices meet consequences. #Brexit  
Yes. Stopping Brexit is much more important than football, football has thrived in recent decades through the amazing talents and skills of our friends, who come from nations across the globe.  
If there is anything that illustrates the  recurrent dysfunction of this place it is the co-dependent DUP & SF neatly setting up a sectarian headcount in North Antrim, after which neither would be voting to protect us against the impacts of Brexit.  
Brexit: Theresa May tells public not to worry about plans to stockpile food and medicine...Definitely what the Brexit bus promised. Definitely.#StopBrexit. #FBPE. 
Gary Lineker: Stopping Brexit is more important than football  
#Design inspired by #Brexit's very own #VinceCable - "the #Libdem Man" Just Live With It Range #Competition to #Win a pair of #Sneakers - any size. T&C's see 2 tweets above#Giveaway #amazing #Libdems #fashion #trainers #liberaldemocrats #LBRUT #Mortlake #Putney #Teddington 
THIS @ajcdeane explains exactly how #Brexit is supposed to work re #Immigration. We get to choose WHO, and we get to rid ourselves of the racist immigration policies that discriminate against many of our friends in the Commonwealth.#SkyPapers 
It's a pity that Mr. Lineker doesn't practice what he preached. Like all #Remoaners, he hates the idea that the 'plebs' decided to vote for #Brexit. 
Hey Remainers!If Darren Grimes can get £20k in a week or so for his legal action surely we can do the same for the FairVote Judicial Review re the cheating at the referendum.It was standing at just over £8k when I donated.  
The EU has played a blinder in opening serious trade negotiations with the US today. It shows up the Tory team as totally amateur, and emphasises how isolated the UK would be after Brexit.    It would be hilarious, if it wasn't so serious, so sad and so embarrassing.  
#Filmidea.The Brexit Club: a group of young people learn that however you voted, you’re totally fucked. 
The Independent's petition demanding a referendum on Brexit deal reaches 100,000  
Tory MP and ex-cabinet minister encourages people to give money to support Brexit activist fined after the Electoral Commissiom found the law was broken during the referendum campaign  
Tonight I’m genuinely upset about Brexit. Someone I Love is diabetic and worried about the impact of Brexit on supplies of insulin. So am I. Maybe it’s time the Govt thought about it too #exitfrombrexit #libdems 
Trial runs for full blown authoritarian extremism now in full-swing. A senior Tory politician and Brexit adviser now advocating imprisonment for freedom of speech on EU matters. Ironically the last man hanged for treason was notorious fascist Lord Haw Haw  
BREAKING NEWS: Rich celebrity voted remain, still wants to remain, demands 33 million people return to the ballot box until they get their democracy exam right. #brexit #garylineker #sticktofootball 
#FBPE isn’t just a hashtag for me. It’s friends. Like minded people. Ordinary people doing extraordinary things. Thank you all of you. Fighting #Brexit is not something I ever imagined myself doing. But your strength passion and wit inspire me everyday. Thank you x #stopbrexit x 
What have the @Conservatives ever done for us?Increased poverty Decimated public services Reduced our credit ratingBrexit100,000+ austerity linked deaths Increased homelessness Enabled racismRuined the NHS Armed terrorist statesMade the U.K. a laughing stock. 
#Brexit is about a lying, cheating gang of rich bastards who will use any trick and cause any amount of suffering in order to slash their tax bills and tear up health, safety, environmental and workplace regulations which eat into their profits. #PeoplesVote #StopBrexit 
Is this the end of #Brexit?Surely there’s absolutely no reason whatsoever to continue with it now.  We will get a much better deal with the USA if we remain a member of the EU. #StopBrexit 
Brexit: Two wasted years not fixing the real problems that people were crying out for change on. Two years of lower growth and lower tax revenues that we could have spent on improving the U.K. All to be followed by 50 years of depressed opportunity. Who voted for this stuff? 
Rees-Mogg asks WHO IS RUNNING BREXIT elected politicians or faceless career civil servants  
#Brexit..... what you were promised and what you're getting is a tad underwhelming..........  
The Independent has launched its #FinalSay campaign to demand that the electorate is given a referendum on the final Brexit deal.Here is your chance to have your voice heard on our future relationship with the EU by signing our petition here.  
Perhaps the people who gave Grimes £625,000 days before the EU referendum could pay it instead. Huh. Matt. What do you think?  
Britain’s economy has slowed to a standstill, largely because of Brexit  
Dominic Raab is Brexit Secretary in name only: The "proper Brexit Secretary", remains Mr Olly Robbins, Mrs May's trusted civil civil servant... 
.@GaryLineker has tonight backed a referendum on May's final Brexit deal. He has a v big Twitter following that will delight @peoplesvote_uk. And he's free of BBC rules on political impartiality cos freelance/non news role etc 
Why respect a second referendum if the first isn't respected? Seeing the irony in that probably beyond you. 
Thinking of buying a gun to protect my family during the Brexit Riots. Maybe that chain gun from Predator.  
Fixed that for you,Mate“The choice before the Scottish people couldn’t be clearer, the austerity economics of British nationalism #Brexit or the transformation of Scotland’s economy as a proud Independent #Nation “#DissolveTheUnion 
Gary Lineker Joins Campaign For A Second Referendum On Brexit'Brexit feels like it is going very wrong indeed,' says footballer-turned-broadcaster.#PeoplesVote 
This student is a hero and a lesson to us in Scotland how we can prevent people being deported European citizens due to Brexit or deported to a warzoneWe did it with the Glasgow girls. Civil disobedience lets not be scared  to protect our citizens and our fight for Independence  
Barclays chairmain DESTROYS claim Brexit will kill Britain with these BRILLIANT comments  
Hear from @GaryLineker @BylineFest 26 August about why he supports a 2nd Referendum- Lineker joins campaign for second Brexit referendum - Sky News  
Gary Lineker joins campaign for a second referendum on Brexit  
The result of a democratic Referendum is not 'will of the people bollocks', Mr Lammy.  
Imagine if @Conservatives try to fight a GE with her in charge having not managed to deliver a proper #Brexit. 1997 will look like a decent result  
Is it her born-to-ruleness that makes her so blithe to how insane this sounds, beyond the Brexit-deal bubble? What does a Project-Fear-chastened 2014 No voter think of this? Or have they all moved to Jockholm?  
Theresa May is coming to the Royal Welsh tomorrow to say goodbye to Welsh farming before Brexit. 
The Brexit Minister has promised to make sure there's adequate food after Brexit - the 25 best piss-takes. 
Grassroots Conservatives fed up with fake-Conservative Theresa May: you're welcome to join @UKIP - for a true Brexit  
Retweeting as this is incredibly important - @DiabetesUK aware of "significant planning" for post-Brexit insulin supply. We've studied what happens when insulin supplies uncertain. It's not good Why silence from medical profession? 
Piers, are you stupid? The World Cup occurs every four years; General Elections should happen every 5, but Theresa May had one after about 18 months. Democracy didn't end 23 June 2016, its perfectly reasonable to have another EU referendum as things change. 
If the government cared about people enough to ensure we will have “adequate food“ after brexit, we wouldn’t have food banks now, would we? 
762 days since the Brexit vote. Still yet to see or hear any kind of coherent plan or argument for what comes next. No rush. For all the bleating & blaming there’s still nothing. So now the options are oblivion or what exactly? Dogma or prejudice isn’t a strategy. 
A betrayal on Brexit would push British politics to the extremes, writes @AllisterHeath 
Gary Lineker calls for second Brexit referendum and blasts Theresa May for "mess" UK is in  
Stockpiling in PEACETIME!!?? It simply isn't sinking in.. Brexiters don't get it at all. Egged on by wartime references; 'digging in' 'never defeated', notions of superiority, tribalism and using Brexit as a revenge on austerity, angry at being marginalised and ridiculed. Tricky 
Dig for Brexit.  
Boris Johnson slams Theresa May’s ‘soft Brexit’ as grassroot Tories call for her to be sacked  
Another #Brexit problem they tried to keep quiet about for as long as possible!#Brexitchaos#BrexitShambles 
1/ A few clips from this week's sitting of DExEU - am session - focusing on the impact Brexit will have on the UK's service sector. @hilarybennmp: 'What will be the consequences of a no-deal *outcome* for your members?' Adam Minns (Executive Director, CBA) shares some thoughts. 
A betrayal on Brexit would push British politics to the extremes' | via @telegraph 
We've gone from Soft Brexit, to Hard Brexit to Try-Not-To-Starve-To-Death-Brexit...And Theresa May wants us to "take comfort" that at least we're stockpiling food?  
Remember that big red bus and the promises of ‘free world trade’ leading us to a land of milk and honey?Only the Conservatives could have created this chaos. #ToryUK2018Brexit secretary admits food will need to be stockpiled  via @CityAM 
Nigel Farage: "It's a mystery to me how Trump can spend one day in a meeting with commissioner jean Claude Juncker and conclude a much better trade deal, but Theresa May has spent 2 years negotiating brexit and has got nowhere. Please, America, lend us President Trump for a day" 
Betrayed manifesto & 17.4m Brexiters, sold out to the EU, gave up our money & assets, kicked any Brexit benefits into the distant future and prepared the ground for a Marxist gov't. 
Why can't she just say "Brexit will harm the UK economy and trade so we all need to prepare for that"? Their own reports have shown that no Brexit scenario will be better than what we have now. 
While you’re shamelessly promoting celebrities opinions on Brexit, how about you run a nice big headline on what James Dyson thinks about Brexit? A British inventor, a man of high intelligence and good reputation. Not a crisp selling, bland tv presenter. 
brexit is now about a government that you should be proud of is stockpiling food and medicine in anticipation of a no-deal scenario. Hello??? 
Former British deputy ambassador told me today it’s irrelevant Hunt is now Foreign Secretary & would be irrelevant whoever it was: the fact Johnson occupied role for 2 yrs shows the role doesn’t matter anymore and neither do we. Combined damage of Brexit & May will outlive us all 
Theresa May and the Basketcase Tories Brexit is gonna be amazing just start stockpiling #adequatefood 
The same people that voted for Brexit are the same ones voting to save Laura and paul, Alex and Alex... #LoveIsand #LoveIsIand 
Every new Brexit development I read about makes me think just how much good a government with its eye on improving Britain COULD be doing, if they weren't fucking about wasting their time with this jingoistic flag-wanking.  The Referendum was a complete self kick in the balls. 
Theresa May confirms that the government is stockpiling food and medicine as she tries to reassure us about Brexit.Just look at all those mannerisms. God, she’s working hard to stay afloat here. Scratch the surface and everything about her screams panic.  
Boris Johnson has been privately talking to Steve Bannon, as they plot their next moves:After Brexit debacle, one is a potential frontrunner to be next UK prime minister, the other wants to help fascists win in Europe. What could possibly go wrong?  
This from a Scot telling Scotland to get back in its box. Westminster reigns supreme. Do as you are told. Just breathtaking, still seems to be going swimmingly with the UK Govt determining our post Brexit future!  
If Boris Johnson, Jacob Rees-Mogg, Jeremy Corbyn & the rest of the Brexerati were true patriots, they would cancel #Brexit now & help fix our country.They won't, because they only care about what's good for themselves & their Party - not what's good for the UK.#PeoplesVote 
So the UK cannot cope with a brief heatwave. No deal Brexit on the other hand will be absolutely fine.*________________* Just to be clear: no, it won't.  
Trump two-step continues:Nato summit: bluster then retreatMay’s Brexit strategy: bluster, retreatHelsinki: bluster, retreatEU trade wars: bluster, retreatDo you think there’s a trend here? 
Our #FinalSay petition for a referendum on the final Brexit deal has reached 100,000. Help us get to 150,000 by signing here  
I see there is a petition of 60,000 floating around for a new referendum. How about we start another one petitioning for the reestablishing of democracy in this country. 
This is the last straw @JuliansmithUKI don’t trust MayI don’t trust the CabinetI don’t trust most Tory MPsThey are signing us up to an #EU army despite #Brexit#MAYMUSTGO #OllyisnotmyPM 
I've started stockpiling post Brexit essentials #NoDealSurvival 
The Independent has launched its #FinalSay campaign to demand that the electorate is given a referendum on the final Brexit deal.Here is your chance to have your voice heard on our future relationship with the EU by signing our petition here.  
Brilliant visit to @armadalefarm with @KirsteenCurrie to talk about all things sheep, lamb, dogs  and Brexit . Supply chains, local produce and education so important. Also @WomeninAg - talent, confidence, training and succession need tackled. Great day!  @FergusEwingMSP 
So Britain is leaving the EU so it can try and do the same? Like it will try to duplicate the dozens of trade agreements we have as a member of the EU? What is the point of Brexit? (Not that any negotiation with Trump will succeed!)  
We couldn't be more delighted that Brentford and Isleworth Labour have passed a motion calling for a #PeoplesVote at #Lab18 Conference. Home win for @Remain_Labour and @Alewin7Brexit is not inevitable. It just takes enough of us to stand up and stand against.#PeoplesVote 
Theresa May tells us not to worry about Brexit - after admitting needing to stockpile food, blood and medicine  
Why haven't we got behind Brexit yet?Well, if they could name a single benefit, that would be a start.But they can't.I've been asking everyone I come across. For TWO FUCKING YEARS.No-one has named a single benefit. Not even an unlikely one.It's just surreal. 
Brexit just diedTrump just killed it stone deadUSA/EU heading for what looks like a fast FTABrexit: deceasedCause of Death: USA/EU FTA imminent, Trump administered the Coup de grâceTime of Death 9:19 PM - 25 Jul 2018 
Brexit on #LoveIsland: a play in 4 scenes. 
This is new petition launched by the Independent. Now that so many who voted leave in good faith are realising they were misled about #Brexit reality & are #remainernow we say...Theresa May: Give People a Final Say on Brexit Deal - Sign the Petition!  
Black twitter thinking they can take on fiat 500 twitter reminds me of the general elections and brexit 
Megan has avoided the dumping, like the county has avoided brexit so far. Not sure how but we’re still both in it  #loveisland 
Oluwajack was the best guy in this show. Brexit have won tonight #LoveIsand 
Donald Trump has done more in a 1 hour meeting with EU President Jean Claude Junckner than Theresa May has done in two years of Brexit negotiations. #MayMustGo. 
Tory Brexiters are not conservatives. They are shyster conmen. No lie is too big and any lie will do. Real conservatives are bound by a certain ethical standard. I cannot say that of the ERG clan. #Brexit 
The UK, the EU's 2nd biggest customer globally, with a £95bn/yr deficit in the EU's favour, has offered continued free trade. The EU is refusing this because it wants to punish us for leaving. But Brexit voters, not the EU, are to blame for this? Fuck, and if I may say so, off. 
This means brexit is dead, completely dead 
the USA and the EU seem to be heading towards for good tariff free FTA agreementThe Brexitters "easy deal with the USA" is now a dead duck as the EU and USA could have a fair and equal deal.Brexit is now dead, how long before it realises though?#StopBrexitSaveBritain 
The Independent's #FinalSay campaign demanding that the electorate is given a referendum on the final Brexit deal has reached 90,000. You can help make it 100,000 by signing here  
Dear Leavers,I have heard some of you talking about “keeping the faith” in the face of a growing realisation that Brexit is a disaster. That does not show strength. It shows that you lack the intellectual honesty and courage to re-examine your beliefs.Sincerely,Reality 
Dominic Raab is Brexit Secretary in name only: Olly Robbins remains in charge, says @asabenn 
And there you have it. To all who still sit on the Brexit fence now, even after all the news on stockpiling and no deal etc >> this is who you're helping.  Boris Johnson Has Been Privately Talking To Steve Bannon As They Plot Their Next Moves  
For anyone who hasn't heard yet, a group in Austria (@bge_esa) is beginning the process to have a referendum in Austria in late 2019 on the idea of Unconditional Basic Income. Part of the campaign will be a nationwide roadshow. Please donate! #BasicIncome 
If we even thought the EU would really withhold medicines for British citizens as a punishment for our legitimate Brexit vote, we should stop all talks & cooperation right now. Trade is one thing, life-saving medicines is quite another. But, the thing is, it's not remotely true. 
Opinion: If we had a second Brexit referendum, Remain would win  
Great event in Brighton tonight with Labour members discussing the challenges of Brexit & the need to transform Britain. Thanks @hovelabour for hosting. 
The European Commission has backed a newly-launched petition calling for Britons to be able to retain EU rights after Brexit  
Delighted my CLP @BandILabour has just passed a motion for #Lab18, calling for @UKLabour to back a #PeoplesVote! Inspiring speeches from @SalmanShaheen, co-founder of @Another_Europe and our MP @RuthCadbury. #Brexit is not inevitable. 
Owen Jones calls out a Labour MP accused of 'propping up' the governmentBy @nyejones92 #Brexit #BrexitShambles #Brexitchaos #ToryBrexitShambles 
'Farage and Rees-Mogg think they'll win a vote on the final Brexit deal. Bring it on'  
There's been some talk about treason today. Surely any British politician who is trying to drive our country into a situation in which food has to be stockpiled in order to pursue a #Brexit that will harm the county would be a prime candidate for a treason charge.#StopBrexit 
So let me get this straight: A legitimate and democratic UK vote to leave the EU could conceivably be met by the EU withholding medicines for British people and it's not the EU but the UK Brexit voter who's to blame (and should be pilloried) for this? The logic of the madhouse. 
If you think this heatwave is bad, just imagine it even hotter and that Brexit has happened. Hey presto! You just pictured July 2019 and your dinner tonight is piss soup drunk from a bin. 
A lie goes around the world faster than anything else. Some leadership is required in the UK - not this nonsense: “Ireland’s prime minister, Leo Varadkar, even threatens to close his airspace,” claims Daniel Hannan #brexit 
This perfectly encapsulates the madness of #Brexit  
Peter Brookes on Jacob Rees-Mogg, Theresa May and Brexit – political cartoon gallery in Putney  
“We were born into an unjust system. We are not prepared to grow old in it.”That was Bernadette Devlin in 1969This is what I’d like to hear Scotland’s young folk declare to their generation now#Scotland#Independence#Brexit 
TAKE BREXIT TO COURT! There's more than 1 way to skin a cat. This could be a significant weapon in the #StopBrexit arsenal - a really interesting legal challenge that questions the very validity of a referendum based on lies & cheating. @Bremaininspain 
Polish state-funded government communications channel TVP blamed the opposition PO for the failure of President Duda’s constitutional referendum bill because they voted against, handily forgetting that the bill actually failed to pass because of PiS abstentions.  
Two, 50 or 100 years: when do leavers think Brexit will pay off?  
Ex-chairman of Lloyd’s of London writes devastating letter on Brexit  
Fun fact about Brextremist Steve Baker: before becoming chair of the ERG & writing the letter advising that Vote Leave could commit serious breaches of electoral law, Baker played a major role at the bank whose collapse triggered the global financial crisis.#Brexit #PeoplesVote 
Listening to @GiselaStuart on @BBCRadio4 remember why I voted leave and why we have to deliver on the referendum result. 
EU and UK in talking trade today. Juncker goes to the White House. Liam Fox addressed half empty room. Says it will be different after Brexit.  
I now finally understand that "We're taking our country back..." was supposed to be followed by "...to the 1950s"Seriously? Stockpiling food and medicine? Can't wait to bust out one of these bad boys! #Brexit #BrexitShambles #FoodStockpile 
The Independent’s petition calling for the British people to have a final say on the government’s Brexit deal has been signed by more than 70,000 people. You can sign it here #FinalSay 
Elton John in #Brexit rant saying it's like a cereal that makes you "throw up"  
Project Fear or Project Near?Is stockpiling of foods and drugs for after Brexit reassuring? 
The Independent's petition demanding a referendum on Brexit deal reaches 70,000  
Strong piece from @anandMenon1 on the arguments against another Referendum. But weak on what the alternatives are. Issue remains (to my mind, anyway) that another Ref is a terrible plan except for all the others.  
.@theresa_may’s messing about and taking us to a soft #Brexit has resulted in calls from Ireland to delay article 50 and #Brexit.No.We need someone to get control of this mess and soon.#ChequersMeansCorbyn#MAYMUSTGO 
Theresa May says you should take 'reassurance and comfort' in plan to stockpile food for no deal Brexit 
This is my #FBSIParty I support Scottish Independence & am calling for a second referendum. I am looking to connect with others who agree.Please:  1 Like 2 Retweet 3 Follow I will follow backCopy this tweet to your own.#ScotRef #IndyRef #IndyRef2 
UK businesses feeling confident, jobs soar - you guessed it - “despite Brexit”  
Made the point at tonight's Council meeting that there's no uncertainty over Brexit's impact on public finances: only question is how much damage will be done. Those in favour of Brexit-or who fail to oppose current trajectory need to explain where ££s will come from in future  
The Independent's petition demanding a referendum on Brexit deal reaches 60,000  
Death throes of Brexit  
Confused, we know that thing called brexit is going to already contract our economy by around 10%, so where is England going to get all this money from to spend on Scotland, oh is it coming from Scotland in the first place and then your going to give us some back 
Actually ‘corporate bosses fretting over a no-deal Brexit’ are doing so because they care about the millions of people, in total, whose jobs depend on them & their supply chainsUnlike wealthy Farage, Banks & Rees-Mogg etc who expect to profit from Brexit  
Martin Rowson on Jacob Rees-Mogg and the impacts of Brexit – cartoon  
The money men (and dark money) behind Vote Leave could pay Grimes's fine at a stroke. They are just salving their consciences on the cheap. #Brexit 
And this is from someone who has always been highly sceptical of a 2nd referendum. I just don't see another way out. 
The richer you are, the more able you would be to surf the Brexit tsunami.A no deal scenario would hammer the poorest in society. It would devastate communities up and down the country. This is complete madness. #StopBrexit 
So I genuinely cannot see a way out of this - in the interests of either leavers or remainers - apart from a 2nd referendum that offers a choice between leaving properly (and taking a potentially v big hit but having meaningful freedom) or staying and pushing for reform. 
From Stamford to Shrewsbury, how you can help the grassroots anti-Brexit campaigns  
Pretty much every person I know who voted leave now regrets it & would like a 2nd deciding referendum, now that the true outcome is looking disastrous for the UK economy and for UK jobs... 
Fed up with @theresa_may’s handling of #Brexit?Then please:Sign the petition below & share it.Constantly Tweet & write to your MP.RT & share this message.Use the hashtag #MAYMUSTGO & share viewsTogether we can make a difference. 
The #FinalSay Brexit referendum petition just passed 65,000, at this rate we’ll 100,000 by midnight - retweet and sign...  
I'm sorry but this is a Brexit thread. I'm going to try and take a different line of thought to "remainers want to betray democracy" or "leavers want us to starve and run out of blood" though so bear with me. 
It is time to start stockpiling food. Not for when we get a 'no-deal Brexit', but for when this traitorous government is replaced with Corbyn/McDonnell style marxism. 
As we reach #Brexit we're deploying water cannons to strategic locations ready to be used, for your safety. After Brexit it may be necessary to impose curfews in some areas. Your Regional Commissioner will let you know times and sirens will sound.#NoDealBrexit #NoDealSurvival 
Theresa May says people should 'take comfort' from the government stockpiling medical supplies, vaccines, medical devices, clinical consumables, blood, and food, in preparation for a no deal Brexit. 
If the U.K. and the EU can’t reach a Brexit deal, imports could be disrupted. London is making plans to stock up on key products just in case  
Theresa May is a desperate woman, DETERMINED to push Brexit through irrespective of the consequences for ANYONE or the country !!You see, Rupert Murdoch (her boss) has DEMANDED that she protects Tax Avoidance at ALL cost. Guess what, we are screwed !EU to make it illegal 
Just one word: Brexit. #ConvinceSomeoneToVoteIn4Words 
Sir Elton John has launched a blistering attack on Brexit and the “completely ridiculous” promises made by Leavers  
The Government are consulting on two crucial parts of environmental protections after Brexit in England and we need your help to make these as strong as possible. Respond here:  
Gary Lineker - "If a no deal Brexit happens this will be the amount of clothes we'll all have left on our backs, in times of peace is utter madness. What Are We Doing?" #ProjectFear 
Today's talk about extending the #Art50 timeframe is all about our Civil Servants & PM tying the hands of government with a bad deal and a prolonged #Brexit in the hope of then reversing it with yet another vote.We have to be prepared & free to walk away, No deal means WTO.  
Hey @BBC I recently launched a crowdfunder too. It’s in support of securing the future and rights of 3.7 million people, not myself. Can I get a free ad like this one for it too?  Brexit campaigner Darren Grimes raising funds to appeal against fine  
Unless you think this looks promising, maybe we should give the people a final say on Brexit...  
If you want to understand the relationship of Brexit to reality, there are Leavers elsewhere on Twitter arguing that both the 22 and 24 claims are simultaneously true. Meanwhile, it turns out he’s actually 25. 
Who knew? Alastair Campbell spinning yet another load of bullshit about how our EU friends will deliberately withhold food and medicines to punish us for Brexit. No wonder we didn't see that on the side of a fucking red bus.  
Sorry but if Labour had a dynamic leader who wasn’t stuck in the 1970s and could actually present a genuine Opposition to this Brexit madness then the Lib Dems wouldn’t be needed. Corbyn is doing May’s job for her. 
Barclays chairmain DESTROYS claim Brexit will kill Britain with these BRILLIANT comments  
I’m backing a second referendum — extreme politics is on the rise, and Brexit needs an intervention  
BREXIT LATEST: EVERYTHING FINE.  
Here’s my latest podcast episode - and it’s a very timely discussion with the European commissioner for competition @vestager. It was fantastic to talk to her about big tech, data, Europe and, of course, Brexit...  
The “we’re going down, but we’re taking you with us” phase of the Brexit negotiations has started  
"Elton John claims Brexit voters 'didn't know what they were voting for'"That's nice. Got a bit bored with jug eared crisp advertisers. 
If Brexit means that Joey’s epilepsy drugs don’t get in, I’m going to get really bloody angry. 
I understand that you @GaryLineker have blocked @JuliaHB1 for a rather innocuous tweet.I suggest if you can't stand the heat you should leave the kitchen smartish.Perhaps you should stick to football and not potentially antagonise over half your audience with your Brexit neurosis 
About to do @Channel4News on Brexit. After speaking to @TheMarketingSoc re mental health (where my unscientific straw poll suggested around 99percent opposition to Brexit) 
We’ve reached the “at least there will still be enough food for everyone” stage of Brexit  
Excellent thread. Also applies to hard Brexit idealogues.  
By the way, since you say it's a "choice", I assume you're offering a second independence referendum so we can escape the insanity? 
Britain is stockpiling food, drugs and blood so they don't run out after Brexit  
VIEW | No Deal Brexit isn't an option"The prime minister believes that threatening no deal is a show of strength, but it is the UK population that is being threatened here, not the EU27," says @guitarmoog.Read more:  
“I don’t think people in Britain were told the truth … I don’t think they knew exactly what they were voting for.”Sir Elton John says people were “promised something that was completely ridiculous” over Brexit.  
Odd hearing the EU described as an "Ancien Regime". Since 1992 it has evolved swiftly in ways that would have seemed remarkable even a decade ago. If anything is "Ancien Regime" it's nation state systems struggling to cope with transnational challenges. Brexit is just one example 
I'll take inclusive, Scottish nationalism and a place in the EU over xenophobic UK brexit nationalism, thanks. 
If the Lib Dems had a dynamic leader, campaigning up & down the country over the summer against the Brexit lies & equally against austerity & apologising for the mess in which the Cameron coalition left England outside London ... 
BREXIT BETRAYAL: 'Extremist Remainers RISKING UK's future should be hit with TREASON ACT'  
Happy with a WTO Brexit. We will never be given a good deal by the vindictive eu. Bring on the only real option WTO. We can do deals with the willing then. Who knows maybe in time even the eu might want a deal with us. Bring on WTOnBrexit  
As I was saying... A lot of good sense here from Dublin, the real heavyweights in brexit. Ireland is proving what independence in Europe really means: equality and solidarity with a whole continent.  
Sorry @UKLabour  I want a potential government that fights Brexit. Until you do that, I'll support one of the truly progressive parties that dares to stand against what Farage, Trump and Rees-Mogg have brought us.#StopBrexitSaveBritain 
We've now gone from a #Brexit  which had 'no downside' to the point where the #Government has plans to stockpile #food.   Brexit doesn't work as advertised.  #PeoplesVote #StopBrexit 
Imagine an issue - Brexit or Trump - uniting the editors of the Sun and Mirror, or New York Times and Washington Post, so strongly they publish the *same* front page on the same day. Almost incomprehensible. But to their credit, @stephenpollard, @richferrer and @paulharris01 have 
The Independent has launched a petition demanding a referendum on the Brexit deal. 30,000 of you have signed it so far and that number just continues to rise! The people made the initial decision, they should also make the final one. RT and sign!!!  
Martial Law & Referendum, worse & more dangerous than General Zia & General Musharraf, because it is happening in the name of democracy. 
Shut up, Nigel, you big twerp, go away and play with all the money you’ve made out of the EU taxpayer and the Brexit/Breitbart media circus 
Theresa May taking personal charge of the #Brexit talks is bit like me asking my blind uncle keep a look out while I rob a bank. Both doomed to fail. By the way, I know it's only been 761 days since the referendum but has anybody found any Brexit benefits yet? 
The LADYBIRD BOOK of COPING WITH POWER CUTS.Part of the 'Learning to Live with #Brexit' series.#LadybirdBrexit #FBPE 
 With Remainers in the driving seat on Brexit we'll be taken round the houses to get to our destination, if we ever get there at all! Help us keep fighting for what you, the British people voted for!  
It's going down. I'm yelling timber. #brexit  
If you don't want this smug, entiltled bastard running the country....campaign for a #PeoplesVote don't let him near your children....#Brexit pic.twitter.com/pzLb7Tuyck 
I like how privileged folks have such faith in systems, it is fascinating.See so many WP who say they want a second referendum on Brexit bc they were not told the truth & POC are listening all perplexed, mate when do we ever get told the truth? 
Been getting my heid nipped all day off English Labour fans. They couldn't possibly understand the rage I feel about this pish from their man in Scotland. Corbyn & Dick are Tory supporting, hard Brexit enabling British nationalists and my country isn't going down with them.  
Enough now.Why aren’t the leave voters angry too? This is absolutely not what was promised and has gone so far beyond all that is sane and reasonable, we might struggle to find that country again. Let’s have a #PeoplesVote because the Brexit nutters should not decide for us.  
Needing to stockpile foodstuffs & in danger of running out of critical medicines!!! Make no mistake... from the referendum, botched campaigns & inept Brexit planning... this is what the Tories have brought us to. Did YOU vote for this? 
"They're well aware that the plan is not going down very well."Can Theresa May convince her own party, the general public and European leaders to agree with her plan for Brexit? @andybell5news | @IanDunt 
The only people still opposing brexit as enshrined in law are hardcore ultra remoaners, a small fanatical band of bitter enders, most sensible remainers have, however reluctantly, reconciled themselves to brexit in the national interest 
We voted to leave the #EUWe didn't vote for a #Brexit betrayalPlease sign and RT this petition as widely as possible. @LBC #LBCLIVE #FarageOnLBC #MayMustGoNow #UKIP 
I’ve just announced at my Cabinet meeting a Brexit Commission will be set up to prepare Tower Hamlets for Brexit. It will be chaired by ⁦@AminaAliLabour⁩   
Poll: Do you Theresa May need to give to the people a final say on Brexit deal? Vote and retweet for a big sample 
I will only "take reassurance and comfort" when Brexit is cancelled and you have left Number 10. 
Why haven’t I get behind Brexit by now?1. Are you kidding?2. The whole thing is an utter shambles.3. Leavers still can’t agree on a way forward and are instead now shouting “traitor” at each other.4. The Govt is accepting blocking amendments to its own proposed legislation /1 
Great to interview US ambassador Woody Johnson in Leeds today. He had some interesting things to say on Brexit and trade. Buy tomorrow’s ⁦@yorkshirepost⁩ for the story. ⁦@USAmbUK⁩ 
very balanced (and complicated) account by @anandmenon1 why he does not favour a second #Brexit #referendum  
Steve Bannon encouraging people to “rise up” & “fight to take their country back,” Tory MEP suggesting Treason Act be updated to deal with those showing “extreme EU loyalty,” public being called “Saboteurs,” judges labelled “enemies of the people.” Remember Jo Cox? #Brexit 
BBC, what are you doing publicising this? The man is in trouble for illegal activity during the referendum. Hold him to account, don’t publish his jokey crowdfunding. I’m sure someone’s diamond mine will fund that anyway. 
Having PM take over #Brexit negotiations reflects reality over recent months.  But totally ill-equipped she could not even contrive to deliver a deal with her cabinet, let alone the EU.Expect more concessions. Bet Dominic Raab is delighted to be demoted 8 days into his role #FBPE 
“Saboteurs”“Enemies of the people” Now those demonstrating “extreme EU loyalty” should apparently be tried for treason - so says Tory MEP David C Bannerman. Brexit has inspired truly delightful rhetoric. #VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw #VoteLeaveCheated 
Richard Branson says "a lot of the British public were misled" about Brexit, which he calls "the saddest thing to happen to Europe and the saddest thing that's happened to Great Britain."  
'Theresa May should embrace the idea of a final vote on the Brexit deal - it's probably the only thing that can save her now' | Gina Miller  
Scotland voted to remain in the EU ... this Brexit is a #BetterTogetherBrexit Don't blame Scotland or the EU 
After Brexit these documents will still exist. It is entirely up to the individual member state countries to decide what percentage of consignments they want to check. It’s a myth that it has to be 100%. 
This is a flawed article by the BBC insofar as it overlooks three key facts -1) most of the public do not approve of the #ChequersPlan2) only 26% think Theresa May capable of getting a good #Brexit deal 3) most grassroots Tories are opposed to the #ChequersPlan 
I don't blame those who voted Leave in 2016. They were promised something they thought was deliverable.BUT, if they STILL think #Brexit will be anything other than a disaster, I have no sympathy left whatsoever. Shame on anyone who supports ruining our country.#PeoplesVote 
Many food flavourings come under scope of ADR in their pure form / mandarin oil/vanilla flavouring/ hot x bun mix - all must be used only by pre  approval of EU regs - you can’t just use any old flavour .. plus ADR licence possibly void post brexit so cant be transported ...... 
MARCH 2019: BBC Good Food magazine has had to take a new post-Brexit approach. #AdequateFood 
Thanks to everyone who has backed our Final Say campaign for a referendum on the Brexit deal. Overwhelming response! Here's our petition. We'd be delighted if you sign it – whichever side you're on.  
There is still time to save #BrexitIf we do get agreement with the EU on withdrawal by October, only then would trade talks commenceIt is vital the Tories replace May BEFORE she can botch those vital trade talksIdeally May should be ditched ASAP#SaveBrexit#BinChequers 
Good thread on the second and final day of the Supreme Court hearing on Scottish devolution and Brexit  
Independent launches petition demanding referendum on Brexit deal #FinalSay 
My areas population is 47000+ and according to ECP 1086 people participated in elections this is a complete failure once again for Pakistan & is itself a referendum for #FreeBalochistan.Well done courageous people of #Balochistan!#NoElectionsInBalochistan 
Conservative MP's who support May's treason have to understand that they are going to be held responsible for their aiding and abetting her in the betrayal of brexit and 17.5 million people in this country. 
Day 1049 in brexit Britain. Food supplies are adequate. The blood harvesters came again today and took what they could. Jim fell ill so we left him in the woods as medicine rations are low. We had to burn our blue passports for fuel. Viscount Rees Mogg says all will be well soon 
‘I’m not aware of any plans for stockpiling food. It’s a ridiculous scare story.’ Brexit minister, House of Lords. ‘We will make sure there is adequate food supplies.’ His boss Dominic Raab - ridiculous scare-monger? 
Oooh - just got an email from the MP representing French citizens living in the UK.Main points:- He's asking the government to plan for people moving back in case of no deal- He thinks Brexit won't actually happen  
Should a no deal Brexit occur while you are in the open, use any kind of cover, or lie flat (in a ditch) and cover the exposed skin of head and hands.@JonnElledge on how to survive a no deal Brexit: 
Today I broke down in tears in front of my class of students while talking about #Brexit.  It's not a good look for a teacher but being #inLimbo has reduced me to this.  Luckily my lovely Italian students were fantastically suportive #ILoveEU #BrexitIsPersonal #PeoplesVote 
Brexit: Britons undermining the country through 'extreme EU loyalty' must be tried for treason, says Tory MEP - The Independent  
The engineers of Brexit will not suffer a food shortage. They’ll fly to Lyon in each other’s jets for gourmet food & wine. 
“Let’s get a crowdfunder and get your fine paid through that. What’s £20K to £625,000 an illegal donation AND winning the referendum?” 
WATCH: Elton John attacks ‘completely ridiculous’ Brexit promises  
I think, after all this Brexit insanity is done with, we should maybe consider raising our standards when it comes to electing the politicians we allow to run this country. Just an idea. 
Scotland’s chief legal officer, James Wolffe QC, argued the Scottish parliament’s Brexit bill is “perfectly practical”.Well done Scotland! Shame our Government in Wales wasn't brave enough to stand up over this Brexit shambles and caved into London. 
“People will rightly be angry to see the government listen to Brexit donors in return for donations to the Tory party while denying the British public a vote on their deal.”...or indeed an inquiry into the criminal activities of MPs involved in Vote Leave. 
Brexit is bollocks. There really isn't any more sophisticated deconstruction of it, is there? Sheer bollocks. 
Jacob Rees-Mogg recently compared the EU to the Mafia.The ERG, which Rees-Mogg chairs, is much more Mafia-like - just one of the opaquely funded & unaccountable lobby groups driving #Brexit: the #BrexitSyndicate.#PeoplesVote 
‘Raab will, instead of going to Brussels, take back control of the national larder as food shortages are now an anticipated outcome of Brexit. Project Fear has ceased to be, I note, as a consequence: it is now Project Fact’ #StopBrexitSaveBritain 
Editorial: News that the government is stockpiling medicine proves how disruptive a 'no deal' Brexit would be  
Tremendous performance by the Lord Advocate - detailed , logical & confident:  Scotland's Brexit bill is 'perfectly practical', supreme court told | Politics | The Guardian  
Hearing your government is making plans for a no-deal Brexit is as comforting as hearing your surgeon phone the morgue & tell them not to go on lunch break just yet. 
Scottish Labour talk about 1979 a lot. But weirdly they don't talk much about the 1979 referendum on Scottish devolution where 51.6% voted YES to a Scottish Assembly...and Labour used an amendment to the Bill to rule that it wasn't enough to count as a win for the Yes campaign. 
LBC radio presenter @IainDale a regular contributor on tv shows makes a deliberate decision to lie for cash every time he talks about Brexit. #IHaveNoRespectForThisJerk 
I would like to make a complaint about this individual. Comments about George Soros have well known, anti-Semitic roots. You are probably finished anyway with your galaxy class own goal, brexit. But if u don't deal with ppl like this, you DEFINITELY are@Conservatives 
Not sure why, but I never realised Gibraltar was on the very southern tip of Spain (slightly embarrassed as well, as I tend to be good at geography). Why on earth is it British? How bizarre. Are they going to be completely cut off, post Brexit? 
I did say the day after the referendum that Brexit wouldn't happen, and I do stand by that. Because I am an optimist, and I am hoping that the most base of common sense and survival instinct will prevail. That we won't pull the cord to pour the bucket of shit on our own heads. 
I get somewhat tired of seeing ‘the Tories are the only ones to blame for Brexit.They hold a large piece but Labour hold a big chunk through there lack of opposition.And pretty much every ones of us should worry that our confident complacency played a part. 
Could 'no deal' preparations shift opinion about Brexit? Maybe, but in unpredictable directions. My latest Brexit Blog post, just up:  
Sorry to once again state the fucking obvious, but Brexit is an unmitigated shit show, total madness. Should be stopped or a second referendum at least. Apart from the fact it's been established that Vote Leave cheated, now talk of civil unrest & stockpiling, THIS IS LUDICROUS. 
This looks like a corruption of democracy. Revealed: Tory donors who paid £7m to socialise with PM Theresa May. Jacob Rees-Mogg’s business partner, Brexit backers & wife of Putin minister accused of 'cash for access' deals. READ:  
People may disagree on Brexit but there is no way whatsoever the use of such a hostile and aggressive illustration can be justified.@guyverhofstadt @SebDance @MollyMEP @catherinemep 
John Nelson, former Chairman of @LloydsofLondon says a #PeoplesVote on the #Brexit deal is needed:  
BREXIT BRITAIN LOVES TINNED FOOD!#NoDealBrexit #NoDealSurvival 
Theresa May says ending free movement after Brexit is "non-negotiable"  
How shameful and pathetic! We were supposed to get our country back but all we got is a blue passport. And now we are officially stockpiling cans of baked beans, corned beef and nurofen #brexit  It’s time someone with a brain and common sense steps up @10DowningStreet 
Guy Verhofstadt brands Tory Brexiteer insane for suggesting some Remainers should be tried for treason /#EU #Brexit  
Brexit broke parliament. Now, only the people can fix it   - That's why we're calling for a #PeoplesVote. Help us achieve a People's Vote as a member of our organisation: 
#Brexit would have been a terrible idea even if done as well as possible, but for the Government to blithely march the country towards consequences that they don’t even themselves understand is an appalling dereliction of duty  
BUT @BORISJOHNSON ARGUED it is not too late to save #Brexit!  Once again, he is our one bright ray of hope.   City AM argues, he could still be the country's white knight.  Boris really could save the day!  #borisjohnson #boris johnson 
A 'Sorry' note to our future generations.Sorry we had a successful,multi-cultural life,with access to all that we needed & more,with our friends, neighbours & fellow members of the EU.We blew it & allowed an unsafe, non binding referendum,taken 2 years previously,to stand.Sorry 
Govt admits plan to stockpile medicines & blood in case of no-deal Brexit. 'medicines most difficult to provide in a no-deal scenario, where there is difficult access through ports, will be flown in'. Will this come from #NHS funds - the NHS is in crisis!  
Delighted to meet the great Jon Snow @Channel4News with whom I engaged on the sadness that is Brexit.  
Yup . 100% The only ppl still supporting brexit are either very rich ppl who will get richer from disaster economic or xenophobes. #ExtremeEULoyalty 
What will Brexit mean for homelessness? Our report with @wpi_economics and @HomelessLink says no matter how the chips fall, Govt must not let this overshadow its homelessness agenda and seize every opportunity to end it for good:  
This photo epitomises the night for me... Fun, frivolity and FUCK BREXIT!#EUsailorGirl Captain @mikegalsworthy First Mate @sazmeister88 and the mysterious @frankendodoThanks to  @AnneIdaForest pic.twitter.com/y5BchsvSCF 
Nor do I. But my life doesn’t begin and end with Brexit and it’s implications. We have people on the streets now, we have homeless children now, all this has happened while being in the EU. If it’s going to get worse it then comes down to who has the policies to tackle the issues 
What would you put in a ‘Brexit time capsule’ which only gets opened in 2050? 
Iain Duncan Smith revealed European ports officials have been preparing for a long time for a Brexit no deal scenario arguing the Government will be able to smoothly switch to WTO rules as soon as March 2019  
#Brexit summed up in three words  
Finally found one good argument for #Brexit: UK can grow modern GM plants in the future. 
'If Brexit negotiations have taught us anything, it’s that our future should not be left to 650 politicians in London' #FinalSay 
Read why @CarolineLucas believes it's important to push for a #PeoplesVote on the final #Brexit deal  
This. Happening Now because of #Brexit. Fact not theoretical punchlines. Nick, I feel for you..deeply.  
Outrageous claims made today by a Tory MEP that people opposing a reckless Brexit are “treasonous” - read my stark response for The Independent: 
Pro-EU crowd braces as Bannon unveils right-wing counterpart to Soros’ foundation  #Brexit #Soros 
#quote:"one ally of the PM told the BBC's Newsnight:'We want to scare people witless so people will eventually EMBRACE the Theresa May plan'"TheresaMay's plan being the #ChequersPlan, widely-condemned as a vassalage-version of Brexit, yes? via @MailOnline 
I wonder what Jon Snow thinks about:Brexit, Israel, Trump, Tories,Europe,RemainCapitalism,Universal credit,NHSTuition Fees.Thing is we know what you think Jon. Your supposed to be a journalist not the arbiter of what we ought to think. 
Donald Tusk's end of term report is a compilation of his favourite lines on Brexit.After Chequers, this stands out even more: "the only real alternative to a hard Brexit is no Brexit even it today hardly anyone believes in such a possibility." 
I agree with @HenryCPorter that politicians who lie in order to promote policies that are contrary to the national interest should perhaps be subject to the treason laws. If that were the case now we could prevent the catastophe that #Brexit would otherwise be at a stroke 
Britain will not ‘give in’ to EU threats – MP gives BRILLIANT response to no deal Brexit  
Sensible moderate Brexit commentary: exaggerating wildly so it appears the effects of Brexit will be spread evenly rather than being concentrated on specific already-marginalised groups.  
A no-deal Brexit could make most of us poorer – and Jacob Rees-Mogg richer, says @MollyMEP  
Now hold on...If no deal is better than a bad deal...And no deal means stockpiling food & medicines...What the hell is a “bad deal” meant to look like?!Brexit really isn’t going very well. 
Labour are taking the wrong path when it comes to Brexit - but it's not too late to change course, says Green Party leader Caroline Lucas  
As a British EU negotiator, I can tell you that Brexit is going to be far worse than anyone could have guessed  
Scotland's Brexit bill is 'perfectly practical', supreme court told  
Would the EU extend Article 50? Yes for second referendum/EEA. No for can-kicking.  
"ThEre WiLl Be AdEQuAtE FoOd FoLLoWIng BreXIt! Do NoT BE AlARMed! TherE WiLL be FOOD and FUeL AND mEDIciNE foR ALL!"  
Tonight’s Standard column on @peoplesvote_uk, Brexit & standing up to far right, celebrating the album @AlbumDayUK & what me & Amy Schumer have in common 
Why Remainers are confident there is enough time for a second Brexit referendum. We demand a #PeoplesVote! 
Actually I really really really can’t say this  strongly and loudly enough. We can not afford to be complacent, the risks are too great. #Brexit has to be stopped and the  law needs to be allowed to rule again. Parliament needs to take back control.  
This is not a parody account I repeat NOT a parody account this is the UK in 2018:  Scotland this is complete insanity we need out of this #Brexit catastrophe ASAP! 
If Ruth Davidson has time to appear at events and make statements about childcare then she has time to answer questions on a No Deal Brexit, Dark Money and the latest frigate blow to Clydeside.  
Brexiteers wont be laughing though if Brexit is judged one day as the starting gun to the breakup of the UK with Northern Ireland reuniting with Ireland and Scotland going independent!  
Could 'no deal' preparations shift opinion about Brexit? My latest Brexit Blog post, just up:  
The British people should get the final say on the Brexit deal, with the option to remain in the EU. Agree? Add your name:  
If the EU turn hostile on Brexit and see us leaving as an act of aggression — it’s time to turn to trade deals and the open seas, says @DanielJHannan 
Apparently Theresa May thinks we should take “reassurance and comfort” from the fact preparations will have to be made to stockpile medicines for the eventuality of a no deal Brexit. I’m sure we shall all now sleep more comfortably tonight!  
Re stockpiling medicines etc pre #Brexit. My Physics is a bit rusty in places, but a lot of the radionuclides used in medicine (treatment and diagnosis) have short half lives, don’t they? Meaning that stockpiling them isn’t an option.Do tell me if I’ve missed something here? 
Take a moment to read this and understand the implications. So is we dare to disagree with this Tory MEP he thinks we should be tried for treason. Alongside enemies of the people etc Brexit has damaged us profoundly. It just makes me even more determined!  
The fact that the UK government is now stockpiling blood and food for the increasingly likely possibility of a no-deal #Brexit next year should be comforting, says Theresa May.Feeling comforted? 
Here's how us being in the EU could get you out of a tight spot abroad. An interesting dive into the helpful EU laws we will lose after #Brexit, from @jaminbjoel.  
Ahem, Remain did in fact massively overspend, twice what Leave did, and promised World War 3, instant recession and massive unemployment. So hence we dismiss nonsense about 22 year olds ticking the wrong box and a mate of Farage having lunch with a Russian. #Brexit  
You said it @CarolineLucas - any form of #Brexit is lose-lose-lose. We're worse off every way you look at it. But the good news is we can #StopBrexit with a #PeoplesVote 
Great to meet the Irish Minister for #Europe @HMcEntee. Appreciate new momentum in our relationship. #Irland can count on our clear solidarity: strong support for the Irish Protocol & the need for it to form part of #Brexit #WithdrawalAgreement. #EuropeUnited  
A boring practical point on 2nd referendum/People’s vote: it would require primary legislation & statutory instruments. This took months last time — > 12, I recall — and still led to some flimsy statutory instruments. Another referendum needs A50 extension to have any chance. 
How on earth can @DominicRaab accept the Brexit job when in a week he’s effectively been demoted to bag carrier?  
Looking forward to Brexit helping me with my antimicrobial stewardship work through *checks notes* not being able to get any antibiotics into the country. Ah. 
Brexit chapter from EU council president Donald Tusk's end-of-term report  
What an odious wretch East of England MEP David Bannerman is. To oppose #Brexit and the damage it is inflicting on the UK is to be truly loyal to the people of the UK. Time to #StopBrexitSaveBritain!  
Brexit simplified  
"We need our leaders to be braver — if politics is failing, then we have to ask the public what they should do" says @ayeshahazarika in arguing for a #PeoplesVote on the final #Brexit deal:  
"A second referendum would be nasty and toxic". Sure, *our opponents* are nasty and toxic. That's how they got the referendum in the first place, how they won it, and how they would have kept behaving had they lost it. Now they're using their toxicity as a form of blackmail. (3) 
A brilliant take down of the detractors of @jeremycorbyn’s speech yesterday from Another Europe’s @nickdearden75. If you’re in Liverpool catch Nick at our Left Against Brexit event TONIGHT. Another Europe is still very much possible  
I really dislike this feeling of blackmail that's being imposed (often self-imposed) on liberals - "you can't talk about impeaching Trump, otherwise the crazies will take up arms", "you can't talk about a second referendum, otherwise there will be protests in the streets"- (1) 
The media don't really let the public know how much of an opposition to brexit there is. Here's some more proof  
Reminder of how close pro-Brexit activist Darren Grimes has been to senior Tory politicians, both before and after the referendum that has seen him referred to the police over "false declarations of campaign spending”.  
The biggest democratic vote in our history is now being betrayed by our own Government.#Brexit means #Remain under @theresa_may 
APC can’t win that state. So, he's edging his bet on the mood of majority of the people in his state who will see the 2019 election as a referendum over how the Federal government handled the Herdsmen/ Famers crisis. The Governor just stylishly took the focus away from himself. 
Liam Fox, international trade secretary, in his speech in Washington. He says what the relationship with the EU will look like depends on whether we get “a people’s Brexit or a bureaucrats’ Brexit”.@Suewilson91: The only Brexit we are interested in is a dead & buried Brexit. 
Final Say: Independent launches petition demanding referendum on Brexit deal - The Independent  
You are quite right @guyverhofstadt. Britons living in the EU should know their rights during the Brexit transition period. GER is doing its part to give legal certainty to affected Britons.  
I’m backing a second referendum — extreme politics is on the rise, and Brexit needs an intervention - Evening Standard  
Come and arrest me: “Brexit: Britons undermining the country through 'extreme EU loyalty' must be tried for treason, says Tory MEP - The Independent  
#IStandWithJeremyCorbyn What is wrong with James Cleverly keeping on about Venezuela? - It's his Tory government that's responsible for Child Poverty, Homelessness, a Failing NHS & the Brexit Disaster #ToriesOut #JC4PM #SaveOurNHS 
The Rocket Man (Sir Elton John) speaks out! It's impossible to deliver a Brexit deal that lives up to the promises made by the leave campaign or works for Britain. That's why we must have a #peoplesvote on the final Brexit deal. Please share  
THE REAL BREXIT DIVIDEND  Brexit bonus as Blue passports revealed to be edible   
Come on Brexiteers time to really get behind JRM, retweet and make this go viral, SUPPORT THE MOGG Brexit Means Exit   
I think this Tory government in Britain should be facing charges! It is a governments responsibility to protect their people! Brexit will be the biggest economic and social catastrophe the world has ever seen! Done so purely so those who have, can hold on to it! This is wrong! 
I joined the SNP a week or so after the Brexit vote. A few months later, I went to Scotland for the first time in my life. Another couple of months and I moved here! 
Scottish Labour talk about 1979 a lot. But weirdly they don't talk much about the 1979 referendum on Scottish devolution where 51.6% voted YES to a Scottish Assembly...and Labour used an amendment to the Bill to rule that it wasn't enough to count as a win for the Yes campaign. 
'Ulster Says Dough' #art #DUP #paisley #brexit  
They complain about May the so called remainer in charge of Brexit, yet it's ok to elect idiot euro-sceptics as MEP's to represent our interests. No wonder we're in such a mess and feel under represented in Europe. 
9 Ultimately we need to stay calm, prepare as best we can for "no deal" Brexit in case it proves necessary, keep rebutting falsehoods and weak arguments, and remember that traditionally Britain doesn't elect jingoists - it ridicules them. //  
These are Theresa May's red lines - the Brexit policies she refuses to negotiate:- An end to free movement for people coming to the UK- An end to vast amounts of money being sent to the EU, spending some on the NHS- An end to the jurisdiction of the European Court in the UK  
Get Mel Morris negotiating Brexit @theresa_may 
Only 14 teachers from #EU registered with @gtcs in first half of this year - 186 in total in 2017. @GTCSKen attributes fall to #Brexit and unwelcoming immigration approach by @GOVUK. 
Brexit :2016 : We will be richer than before2017 : We will be just as rich as before2018 : If we stockpile food and medicine we might not have any shortages.2019 : We did not stockpile enough.  
Mr Larkin (NI attorney general) wraps up his submission saying Holyrood's Brexit bill is "elegantly and adroitly drafted" - "it may have caused teeth to gnash in Whitehall" with some of its provisions, but it could operate successfully.  
Yep. The Russians swung it for Trump. Can't be long until we find the same level of proof they did the same with Brexit. Will anyone ever do anything about either?  
Interesting submissions re #CharterofFundamentalRights. A spin off from #ContinuityBill case quite apart from #Brexit cd be judicial confirmation of the extent to which @ScotParl is free to legislate on #HumanRights provided it doesn’t repeal or modify #HRA 
.@BBCNews .@SkyNews Yesterday the PM gave Brexit to an unelected Remain bureaucrat and his chums for them to run.  Do you seriously have NOTHING to say about this today? 
BFE: The Brexit Fiasco is reaching a point where it's simply beyond parody. Just how much more ridiculous are we going to allow things to get? Sign the petition for a #PeoplesVote on the "deal" here:  and SHARE the link with everyone you know!  
Richard Branson joins a number of blockchain entrepreneurs in addressing the unexpected costs of Brexit:  w/ @valeryvavilov @e_rossiello @ReadingSignals via @ForbesCrypto 
Department accused of wanting to delay report on the cost of a united Ireland until 'after Brexit' (via @thejournal_ie) "It shows that Northern Ireland would have a near balanced budget in a unification situation" 
In all seriousness, I wonder if publishers are planning post-Brexit lifestyle books - less Hygge, Lagom and Lykke and more - Rearing Livestock, The Powdered Egg diet, 100 things to do with a potato....also poster idea for turning your garden into an allotment - Dig For Brexit 
Looking forward to seeing Mission Impossible later (no, not the Brexit negotiations - the new Tom Cruise movie) 
Why Remainers are confident the EU would extend the Article 50 period to allow a second referendum.  
That regulator is already heavily politicized and undermining democracy. They repeatedly pursue a young man and issue the maximum fine for an ALLEGED admin error but outright refuse to even look into Remain. #Brexit p.s. I donated to his Crowdfunder appeal! Hit target in 2 hours  
Just like Tommy Robinson, Brexit champion Darren Grimes here broke the law, got caught, and is now appealing for money to fight back against this latest "conspiracy" against patriotic criminals. The new way to elicit cash from mugs  
Public faith in May to deliver on Brexit has collapsed, poll shows  
5 The absurdity of the core Brexit argument - that the UK would be free of all constraints without any negative economic impact - was bound to be exposed over time.The responses:A) we never said thatB) it's worth it anywayC) it's all your fault 
WE ARE STOCKPILING FOOD! This is not what people voted for. This is not the fault of the people. This is the fault of arrogant, self obsessed politicians dragging the country into something they didn’t have a clue about. Shame on all of them! #brexit 
Must read: this devastating critique of our politics & #Brexit - and a challenge to UK businesses to speak out - from a leading British businessman.  
It is sign of the desperate intractability of the #Brexit crisis that a wealthy nation is having to resort to stockpiling food and medicines to demonstrate to the EU that it is not bluffing in negotiations. Only problem is, it is a bluff and EU knows it  
And this. Another lawyer. Another lawbreaker. Another politician who had a formal, official role with Vote Leave who has not been questioned and who is now the minister responsible for Brexit, a result that he helped Vote Leave to achieve -through illegal means.  
-"What are you in for?"-"Fought for ISIS. Beheading people, building bombs - that kind of stuff. You?"-"I tweeted that the drop in the value of the £ was caused by Brexit-related uncertainty."  
Independent launches petition demanding referendum on Brexit deal #FinalSay 
SIGN IT NOW - The @Independent has launched a petition demanding the people have a #FinalSay on Brexit  
2 Initially this can be traced back to the jingoistic variety of Brexit arguments, which gained prominence during the referendum campaign, alongside (it should be recalled) less febrile arguments.  
BREAKING NEWS: Brexit to be put on hold until all the words of European origin are replaced with English equivalents. This project is expected to take around 2000 years. @susie_dent is going through the OED with a red pen now and over time around 97% of UK tweets will vanish 
Northern Ireland's Attorney General backing Scottish Government case now - says Scottish Parliament finished its work on Brexit Bill well before Westminster 
What a laugh...As Britain stockpiles food and medicine, the words "the EU need us more than we need them" are playing on repeat in my head. Out of interest, what EU countries are stockpiling British food and medicine? Any? #Brexit #StockPiling #Indyref2 
This is happening now!"Conservatives will always be with us. If conservatives become convinced they cannot win democratically, they will not abandon conservatism. They will reject democracy" David Frum#FBPE #StopBrexit #BREXIT 
The EU Common Fisheries Policy has been strangling the British fishing industry for years. Brexit will save it!  
#Brexit child in the back: "are we there yet?"@theresa_may driving "soon, soon" (hoping child nods off and doesn't realise they are just driving around the house with no intention of going anywhere 
.@MattHancock on stockpiling medical supplies for a bungled #brexit. What an act of reckless self-harm we’re engaged in  
Back from hols find  theresa_may has taken control of Brexit with Olly robbins. Oh dear They’ve not stood up much to EU  so far 
"It is fair to say that Brexit is not going so well. Even Brexiteer cheerleaders have confessed to me privately that the whole thing needs an intervention — either a pause or another dose of democracy" @ayeshahazarika 
With Brexit moving closer, people are making plans to stockpile food, medicine and English goalkeepers over the age of 30.  
Rees-Mogg's father was a co-author of a book which portrays the rich as the innocent victims of thieving democratic states. This is the creepy 'moral' justication for the tax and regulation dodging, kleptocratic power-grab that is Tory ERG #Brexit.#PeoplesVote #StopBrexit 
Brilliant thread Tessa. It’s completely disingenuous to claim a benefit of Brexit is devaluation of the pound that enables us to rebalance to a more manufacturing based economy. Its patronising, populist bull shit. Trust people with the complex truth & give them a people’s vote  
Nearly at the end of @gaslitnation episode #2, and my god it has to be the most important podcast right now. Are there plans to bring in the Russia/Brexit side of things too, @sarahkendzior / @AndreaChalupa? 
Shame we cannot have a referendum on whether to scrap the licence fee where we pay Lineker 2 mill a year for reading an autocue. 
Varadkar sends out Coveney for more 'I'm a big shot baloney'. Coveney says: "UK can't afford a no-deal Brexit" and such talk is "UK bravado"Coveney says it as if Ireland CAN afford a no deal Brexit ............... THAT'S bravado ! 
After researching Fray Bentos for post-brexit survival purposes, I discovered that Fray Bentos is in-fact a town in Uruguay, and the Fray Bentos products that we were familiar with came out of the meat processing plant there. The plant is now a Unesco world heritage site   
A ruthless transatlantic elite aided by Putin is using fear, hate & bigotry as tools to weaken & hollow out democracy and free themselves from taxation & regulation. Far from being patriotic #Brexit is just one part of their war on democracy.#StopBrexit #PeoplesVote 
As far as the EU is concerned this announcement just confirms the status quo that Olly Robbins is running the negotiations, not whoever may so happen to be Brexit Secretary. 
Theresa May's announcement that she's taking personal control of the Brexit negotiations has made waves in Westminster but not, it seems, in Brussels. 'What's changed?' is one EU diplomat's rather dismissive response to the news. 
You may not care for it nor agree with him but Gavin is doing his job. Now David, how about, rather than reaching for the term treason, you furnish us with some tangible examples of how brexit is in interests of UK populous (tangibe mind, so no abstract concepts like sovereignty) 
DIRE: Pubic’s faith in Theresa May to deliver on Brexit has collapsed, poll shows - and they don’t trust Corbyn either! “Those who trust neither May nor Corbyn to negotiate a good Brexit deal jump from 31% in January to 44%” 
My 85y old father today, who jeopardised his military career as a serving general when he officially advised Gen Zia against his proposal to hold the 1984 referendum instead of general elections.He was 8y when he first saw #Jinnah & is still waiting for his . PakistanZindabad 
Perhaps because you posted something patently untrue and it gets really boring debating with someone who has no interest in reason? You have “faith” that Brexit will be a success, those of us with facts realise the opposite is true  
Make this the story of the summer!MPs demand public are given new vote on Brexit in impassioned open letter#StopBrexit#PeoplesVote 
Why is it so hard #Brexiteers find it so hard to accept that Irish influence on Brexit negs is strong for 2 reasons. 1. Ireland is a member state with no wish to leave. 2. EU26 are persuaded on the merits is the case  
Great thread on U.K. agriculture & the food scare stories RE Brexit  
I'm on a family holiday this week in Menorca. My toddler made friends with a Spanish girl & we got to know her parents. On the 5th day we got chatting about politics & #brexit. The couple said the general view in Spain is it's v.harmful & can't understand it! Indeed. #stopbrexit 
Want to feel old?This is what the Brexit bus looks like today.  
A brexiteer will win the next Tory leadership contest easily. Tory members are overwhelmingly pro Brexit & remainers will suffer for their betrayal the next time voters get a say..  
Voters are losing confidence in May’s ability to handle Brexit, poll suggests -  
Heathrow's chief executive has said US visitors should be able to use e-gates reserved for UK and EU passengers. Brexit could be an opportunity to allow Canada and Australia to use them too. + #CANZUK  
true... I get blocked as soon as a I ask for a rational reason to leave, with evidence... There isn't one, so they bugger off!! They have no argument. I boiled it down to this.... A Venn diagram of those who still believe in brexit..  
I have eatenthe substances of human originthat were instorageand whichyou were probablysavingfor BrexitForgive methey were deliciousso optimisticyet so bleak 
Desperation. @DanielJHannan and @TheSun know people are waking up to the damage #Brexit will do to the UK. Putin's foreign policy is break-up of the EU and we all know now about Russian money funding Leave: these people aren't pro-UK, they're pro fascism, pro their own wealth. 
Your Wens 25th July reminder it is now a LEGAL FACT that both Leave  campaigns deliberately broke the law to win Brexit referendum @BorisJohnson @michaelgove should be in jail  #VoteLeaveBrokeTheLawPlease Sign AndPlease Sign 
See also: “The Kremlin doctored its official transcript of Putin's remarks to journalists, following his meeting on Monday in Helsinki with U.S. President Trump, redacting the word ‘we’ from Putin's statement about the 2014 referendum in Crimea”  
So there was actually a proposition on offer at the referendum? I thought the Remainer line was that there were only two options on the ballot paper so all of the commitments from both sides that Brexit meant leaving the single market etc. were meaningless...  
Bank of England downplaying the exaggerated claims of thousands of jobs in the finance sector leaving immediately after Brexit. The cracks are beginning to show in Project Fear... 
Productive working lunch and great exchange of views with UK HC to #Cyprus @StephenLillieUK; discussed Cyprus issue, #Brexit & strong UK-Cyprus relations. Delighted that @PhotisPhotiouCY @Andriazaf & @eevriviades could join too!  
Another Tory MP will benefit personally if Hard Brexit takes place. Read full story in today’s ⁦@PrivateEyeNews⁩ 
Irish Deputy PM says UK can't afford a no-deal #Brexit. According to a Tory MEP you will be charged with treason for retweeting this - so please don’t   
Last night I spoke at @TamesideCouncil full council in response to @jimFitzpatrick5 who had a moan about Brexit. I stood up to defend the people of Tameside who overwhelmingly voted to leave the EU.  
Scottish polling on support for Brexit is currently showing 73 to 27 for remain vs. leave. (Also: significantly lower support for anti-immigrant, anti-muslim, far-right politics in Scotland than England.) 
Funny, but we've heard no outcry from Westminster MPs that they haven't been given a 'meaningful vote' on this...  Distinctive #Brexit research and news daily:  
We should extend Article50 to explore a solution -Irish deputy PMWhen politicians across Britain and EU have spent 2 years saying a solution is not possible, how will they find one with Article50 extended?This is just a ruse to keep Britain trapped in the EU forever?#Brexit  
Man caught cheating in referendum campaign accuses people who caught him of undermining democracy.  
We want our democratic vote honoured and delivered @Conservatives @theresa_may#NODEAL #BREXIT  
If #Corbyn supports ANY form of Brexit, if he really believes there are ANY benefits from Brexit he's not fit to lead anything...in fact right now I wouldn't follow him, not even out of curiosity. So far he's shaping up to be a megga disaster. #SopBrexit 
I don't understand how you said Brexit was because being in the EU was unfair to the UK but now you're saying the only fair deal for the US is if we join the EU  
As @PhilipPullman said - voting Leave was like shooting yourself in the foot to cure a headache.With no-deal #Brexit our negotiating position is threatening to shoot ourselves in the head. The country is being held hostage by a bunch of chancers, charlatans and Putin lackeys 
The Brexit negotiations look set to become a prime example of how a government surrendered to its opponents, lied to its people and allowed its civil service to take control. It will also show how MPs inside and outside of government, and of all parties, betrayed democracy. 
Britain is stockpiling food, drugs and blood so they don't run out after Brexit  
Some EU nations have the worst youth unemployment rates in the WORLD. Some topping 58%. Its a failing organisation who use the poor and youth to keep mega wealthy people wealthy. Leaving it is a forward step for ordinary ppl , staying is sinking with the ship. #Brexit 
Banks, Wigmore, Hannan all celebrate the return of the Commonwealth and Empire post #Brexit.And this is why #Brexit is bigger than Suez. Economically we're soon going to discover that we are a kind of Gibraltar.  
This is absolutely disgusting. You have broken the law, helped to sell very the referendum and our democracy, and now you pull this ridiculous stunt. You should be ashamed of yourself and the campaign, not trying to smear those who regulate our elections and referendums. 
Brexit is a bit like refusing to pay a mortgage and instead, deciding to pay a massive lump sum to leave your house and then going to live in a field while boasting about how much money you've saved, and how you're no longer controlled by your house and your friendly neighbours. 
March 2019:all over Hampstead, households are stockpiling Waitrose garlic ciabatta.Greenhouses are being hastily erected in garden squares to facilitate emergency avocado production. Brexit chaos has gripped London. 
No David. Implying people should be tried for treason for disagreeing with your mad Brexit views is shocking. It was very un British. 
Bravo Andrew  & thank you ! Seems we aren’t slipping into fascism , we’ve arrived . Disagreeing with the state , even tho brexit brought about by foreign interference , is treason. @ConservativesUK DO YOU CONDONE THIS ? @EUparliament is this conduct acceptable of an MEP? 
Your car is German.Your coffee is Italian.Your wine is French.You holiday in Spain.Currently, all of these luxuries are relatively cheap and easy to obtain.But if you voted to leave the EU, you’ve made these luxuries much more expensive and difficult to obtain after Brexit. 
Mr Fordham says devolved parliaments can "perfectly properly" legislate for statute book post-Brexit. If UK parliament can do it, why shouldn't others? "The rule of law must be the same for everyone", core values of constitution must apply to all 
Remainiacs is THE podcast for all your Brexit detail and utter joyful misery, acutely expressed  
With no PMQS until September here is a reminder of why we cannot believe a word the Prime Minister says on either Brexit or the NHS!   
Ex-chairman of Lloyd’s of London’s devastating letter on Brexit. MPs need to stand up & be counted! This Brexit nonsense cannot be allowed to go on. 
Mrs May could cancel it anytime she likes. It was an advisory Referendum. She could say that it is impossible to implement the electorate's advice. She should tell Monsieur Barnier she wants to revoke Article 50. He will agree. She revokes it. We stay in the EU. 
PROTECT AND SURVIVE: Official government advice on how to survive a No Deal Brexit. By me  
Holy fuck. The S*n & @DanielJHannan significantly ramping up the #Brexit rhetoric - accusing Brussels of 'hostility' & 'aggression', & using pictures of Britain engaged in armed conflict with the EU.Utterly disturbing. This propaganda is unacceptable.  
There is of course no excusing online abuse. But some of the new commentators that found a voice & platform as a result of the 2014 referendum, need to grow up & take some responsibility for the implications of their own actions. 
A second Brexit referendum would be a painful, toxic waste of time | Anand Menon  
"A lot of people are talking up inappropriately the likelihood of a no-deal Brexit. I don't believe it's likely, I don't believe anybody wants it" - Irish Foreign Minister Simon Coveney 
Let’s try and get a huge vote for this twitter poll. Please vote and retweet.Should Britain have a second EU referendum?#PeoplesVote 
1) Clear evidence that the Tory grassroots is deeply unhappy with May and her #Brexit plans2) Tory MPs during the summer recess will feel the heat of this growing backlash 3) When Parliament returns, May and/or the #ChequersPlan need to be ditched 
There is NO possibility of a ‘no deal’ Brexit. The government is using this ploy to make ANY deal look ok. - The only deal worth having is the excellent deal we have right now as a major member of the EU. 
The #Brexit panic hides the rest of the current gov's failures. And even the head of the civil service thinks we shld panic. Better #StopBrexit altogether. #FBPE  @BrexitBin @spaceangel1964 @Women_4_Europe @acgrayling @emmyzen 
No longer going to bother debating the issue of Brexit. It’s most ardent supporters acknowledge the UK will be financially & economically worse off . The UK government is also in the process of stockpiling food & medicine. Too high a price to pay . Enough is enough. 
Is the Government stockpiling medicines and blood products - and should we be worried?Theresa May says she's being "sensible" with preparations for a no deal Brexit to ensure "we'll be able to continue to do the things that are necessary once we've left the EU" | @andybell5news 
Brexit Britain and the EU have filed for divorce at the WTO, paving the way for Britain to regain her independent seat at the top table of world trade.  Support us at  
David Davis again, 26th May 2016, this time claiming (rather oddly), that post-Brexit Britain would be able to strike separate trade deals with individual EU nations (despite that being a reserved power for Brussels)  
Here you go, Brussels is upping the trade war with the USA without your explicit permission.  Viva #Brexit  
My pharmacy’s already experiencing delays. I had to wait more than a week for an essential medication. Apparently something to do with quotas & UK falling down the EU pecking order. This is expected to get worse with Brexit & suggest people don’t let critical meds run too low!  
Worrying about Brexit AND global warming is now resulting in so much distracting competition for my attention that I'm actually thinking of drawing up some kind of anxiety schedule to help me distribute the despair more efficiently. 
Here is the original tweet Conservative MEP David C Bannerman deleted so as to appear less offensive #brexit  
 Hi Darren. You forgot to mention the £625,000 given to you by Vote Leave in the last days of the referendum campaign, which was then used to buy targeted Facebook adverts using the exact same dataset and the same shady company that Vote Leave used. Must have slipped your mind.  
This was a great interview. I know it's boring to grill MPs about the same old Brexit questions, but given none of them have ever answered any of them satisfactorily, I'd agree, it would be nice to see this type of grilling elsewhere on the BBC. 
Brexit in the form that it was sold is undeliverable. We need a People's Vote on the Brexit deal. My video for the @Independent this week  as they endorse the @peoplesvote_uk campaign. 
Depressing that when I called yesterday for Parliament to sit over the summer because of the Brexit crisis & to pass urgent non-Brexit bills including equal marriage & abortion rights in Northern Ireland, I was opposed by Labour & Lib Dem leaderships as well as the Government 
the possibility of a united ireland as a result of english racism & brexitme:  
This is so evidently the way forward. What is wrong with our MPs? Why are politicians like Caroline in a minority? We need a broad based coalition to oppose Brexit, let’s worry about the minutiae later.  
Remember after Brexit and Scottish Indy, the Tories and Unionists are telling us that rUK won’t trade with us.. but they still expect us to look after their Subs and Missiles for 10+ years till they find somewhere else for them.  #DissolveTheUnion 
Live scenes as Theresa May takes personal charge of Brexit talks:  
Brexit offered by Rees-Mogg "threatens to turn us back into corporate chattels, stripped of our hard-won civil and democratic rights." Good piece from @MollyMEP 
Brexit has had such a wonderful effect on our society.Conservative MEP David C Bannerman has just likened Remainers to ISIS Jihadis, and wants us tried for treason.  
FFS the white helmets are a terrorist group. Why the hell are we having these people in this country. Are we short of terrorist ? I think not. Not only are we being screwed on Brexit by May but we are being well and truly turned over on migration and terrorism. 
Last day of @SODEMAction anti-brexit protests outside Parliament yesterday before the recess. Libdem peers #LordCotten, #LordBradshaw & #LordNewby @RichardNewby3 all paid friendly visits! No doubt, Steven Bray and Sodem will be back in fighting spirit in September! @snb19692 
Yesterday, the government admitted it was planning to stockpile food and medicine to secure an 'adequate supply' for a doomsday no Brexit scenario.Nobody voted to inflict that level of harm on their families and communities. Help us fight it:  
Let’s just take a moment to applaud David Cameron’s cunning plan to hold a referendum to end the Tory Party infighting on Europe and marginalise their eurosceptic crackpots. Resounding success. #Brexit  
One of the most important revelations from the Vote Leave scandal is that the argument used by politicians that the ‘referendum was democratic’ and the ‘will of the people’ is a total & utter untruth. Breaking the law means breaking democratic principles. #Democracy101 
brexit.jpeg trump.png  
At @UKSupremeCourt for #ContinuityBill case it’s clear the court is in no doubt that #EUWithdrawalAct has altered the legislative competence of the Scottish Parliament. So there has been a #PowerGrab.  @ScotTories & UK Govt please take note #Brexit 
Christian Adams on Government admitting to plan to stockpile medicines and blood in case UK leaves EU with no deal on Brexit  – political cartoon gallery in Putney  
Lots of talk of treason theses days but not much understanding of what it means. I would say anything that deliberately harms your own country is treason. We know a ‘no deal’ brexit will harm the country so it’s treason. A bad deal brexit will harm the country, so again treason. 
I’ve been stock piling food for a while now and I advise others to do the same, there’s no way I trust this bunch of upperclass hooligans get us through Brexit with something going tits up! 
Home Office guidance for EU nationals remaining in the UK shows Brexit will cause the next #Windrush. Not everyone has a smartphone. Not everyone meticulously stores utility bills. Not everyone has a credit card. None of this means they should be deported. 
The real vision for a post-Brexit Britain. Criminalising those who disagree with your political views  
Hard Brexit for my birthday cake  
Putin is masterful. Russia’s economy is smaller than Texas. No real military might. He set up the UK and US, via Brexit and Trump, to trigger their own destruction from within. 
NEWS! Brexit bonus as Blue passports revealed to be edible  
the gammon is strong on @mrjamesob this morning. listening from Toronto, the most culturally diverse city in the world. Torontonians keep asking me about Brexit with concern and bemusement. Greetings from this Trump free oasis of North America. 
Young Brexit activist @darrengrimes_ who was fined £20k by elections watchdog launches bid to fight back against ‘politically motivated stitch-up’: 
As government advocates stockpiling food & medicine in event of Brexit disaster, one man admits he will be "stockpiling" large amounts of cash  
You just don't get it do you @DCBMEP The many fighting to overturn Brexit are doing so to protect our country not the EU. It's just that any analysis you do clearly shows the UK will be stronger in the EU. It's about us not them. 
Do you agree with @theresa_may’s approach to #Brexit?If no, have you contacted your MP to tell them?There’s a major push by No 10 over the summer to sell this sellout.Don’t leave it to someone else. Let your MP know your views and rescue Brexit now. 
"I hear some argue that a referendum would be divisive, but it is difficult to see how it would be more so than what is happening now" Dominic Grieve is absolutely spot on. A #PeoplesVote may be the only way to secure public consent for what happens next 
One thing that the #Brexit process has proven is that the UK has absolutely no friends in the EU, not even our closest neighbours. We should walk away, whatever it costs. 
Sums up the arrogance of the political class unwilling to tell the truth about Brexit. A political elite who think they can use their power to hoodwink the largest democratic vote in British history.You won. Take responsibility for it rather than deflecting blame onto others.  
Are the news readers of the BBC and ITV really going to sit there and lie to the nation regarding scots indy support and brexit fiasco?How can they sit there and knowingly lie 
A crowd is offered a fireworks display. They say yes and stand close by in happy anticipation. Those in charge know the fireworks are pointed directly at the crowd. They know the people, given the new info, would reject this if given a vote. But they just let it happen.#Brexit 
Our ⁦@Adamstoon1⁩ ⁦@EveningStandard⁩ as Government says it’s stockpiling food for a no deal Brexit ....  
Labour Party people! NEC Election time, again. Please re-elect me to the NEC. I’m campaigning for a diverse, open, welcoming Labour Party, focused on fighting the Tories, not each other, and campaigning against a hard and vicious Brexit. Full video here  
.@TiceRichard: “The PM has made yet another catastrophic error and has lost the trust of majority of the British people. Chequers does not mean Brexit.”  
Oh, and I would support a third referendum, if the voters were misled and the campaigns were found to have acted in the second referendum as they have been proved to have done in the first. The problem is not the result, it's the way it was achieved and the impact of it. 
Taste the Brexit  
"I believe that Brexit, whether it’s a bad deal or no deal, is a big deal. But it’s not a done deal." @LaylaMoran Demand a final say on Brexit, with the option to remain in the EU:  
Ex-chairman of Lloyd’s of London’s devastating letter on Brexit  
The more ministers are forced to confess reality of no deal, the more people will realise Brexit they were promised was a fraud. ‘Project Fear’ lie was all Brexiters had. Now ministers are openly telling voters it’s true, let them choose between food stockpiling and staying in EU  
There is still time to change course on #Brexit – if those of us with shared values, across all parties, join together in resisting the growing tide of right-wing politics, and start pushing back.  #PeoplesVote 
Given Scotland voted to remain in EU ...this Brexit is a #BetterTogetherBrexit  ... They must not be allowed to forget that. It will be an important part of winning #indyref2  -  remembering and repeating that this is a #BetterTogether Brexit. Please RT 
WORLD TRADE: Brexit Britain and EU file for divorce at the WTO. “An important milestone as we prepare for our departure from the EU.” 
The Brexit Syndicate website is a crucial resource. Thanks to @MollyMEP et al: 
This is @mrjamesob's brilliant response when a caller told him that Brexit happened because of him.  
To show how successful the @conservatives #Brexit plan has become, @theresa_may , her of numerous u-turns and lack of Brexit comprehension has taken over all negotiations and @DominicRaab is now demoted to Minister for Food Stockpiling and Rations.  At least these will be blue... 
1. FFS...if I hear another commentator who knows #Brexit will be bad, stating we shouldn't have a #FinalSay with a #Remain option before we leave & have to go through with it because we have to respect the existing vote I shall be looking to buy a new TV! 
Ernst & Young have reported to the U.K. government on the consequences of Brexit on medicine supply. The U.K. govt must share that info with the Scottish govt so we can plan together. It’s becoming urgent & patients deserve reassurance.  
Theresa May: Folk are stockpiling food and the Brexit department is cancelled. This really couldn't be more of a farce...Tory MEP: Hold my beer. 
Siri, show me a post-Brexit theatrical Hellscape.  
A 1996 article in @thetimes by #MichaelGove contemplating a life outside the #EU. The Swiss & Norway models & American #WTO options are described. "It is still in Britain's interest to stay in the EU" he concludes. #Brexit #NoDealBrexit #EuropeanUnion @michaelgove 
Surely since Brexit is undermining the stability of the British State and the integrity of the United Kingdom, Mr Bannerman is calling for this to apply to himself & all the other Hard Brexiters? 
WATCH: Sir Elton John launches a blistering attack on Brexit and the “completely ridiculous” promises made by Leavers.   
Well said Deborah! Intelligent women are speaking out about the benefits of Britain in the EU. Brexit will deter career women (taxpayers!) losing the employment safeguards of EU law. Sadly, many female professionals will move into the EU instead. Brain drain. @Women_4_Europe 
Brexit: UK cannot afford not to have a deal, says Irish government - Politics live  
Everything going wrong with Britain at the moment is captured in this tweet. An elected politician wants to be able to charge people who disagree with him about Brexit with treason.  
It cannot be repeated enough that every single senior figure from the Vote Leave campaign said that a deal was all but guaranteed. It might be that the British public has resolved to leave regardless- but leaving without a deal was not the proposition offered at the referendum.  
Farage questions the integrity of Dominic Raab after accepting his new position as Theresa May's bag carrier. He's been totally sidelined in the Brexit negotiations as Remainer civil servant Olly Robbins takes the lead. Pathetic! Support us at  
I think the most banter form of economic collapse following No Deal Brexit would be if hyperinflation rendered sterling worthless, forcing the bottom-up adoption of the Euro 
Is there anyone who isn’t A) insaneB) a bit racistC) wealthyD) anonymous E) a massive racist F) too old to be to deserve a say in our children’s future... who can explain why Brexit could be a good thing for the country? 
This MEP thinks I should be prosecuted for treason. Because I believe that the currently United Kingdom is better off in the EU and that #Brexit is wrecking our great country. Interesting take on the word treason. What a tweet  
Olly Robbins is in Brussels today for more #Brexit talks. Top of the agenda is the 'insoluble' Irish backstop issue - but how 'insoluble' it really? Is there a way through?Maybe. Some thoughts after chats with both sides. 1/Thread  
I have eaten the plumsthat were in the iceboxthat you were probably stockpilingnext to the insulinfor Brexit.Forgive meI did not know it would be Battle RoyaleWhen I voted for the busthat one time. 
I think people forget that there's a huge network of distributors in the UK that keep shelves stocked by making daily deliveries to the major supermarkets. Any delays at UK ports would lead to empty shelves within a day of a no deal #Brexit. The government MUST know this already  
#LBC James I hate Brexit cry  baby  O’ Brien on LBC now. Brexit bashing, again does it everyday 5 days a week. Biggest idiot on the radio by a distance. Does anyone listen to this  clown. Get him off LBC, get someone else on. He’s boring us all to death.   
Theresa May’s Food and Drug Stock Piling for No Deal Brexit 
The Independent has come out in favour of a @PeoplesVote_uk on the final Brexit deal.If you want Labour members to decide whether the party should back a People's Vote, sign up to #LabourSay 
Cancel Brexit.  It’s not good for UK or EU.  The vote appears to have been fraudulently obtained and has numerous issues of foreign influence designed to harm the UK.  Who benefits most from a Brexit?  Who is most harmed? 
Post Brexit Britain: Enliven "adequate food" on Christmas day by pouring your ration of evaporated milk around an upturned tinned peach half to make it look like a fried egg! @TwopTwips 
Chief Executive of the GTCS said: “Having maintained numbers pretty high from the EU, they are falling off a cliff, and that’s absolutely down to Brexit” after figures show only 14 EU teachers applied for GTCS registration up until June 2018.  
Foreign trips are amazing. People get transformed. Neha from Laxmi Nagar went to UK for 10 days and now she is worried about how Brexit impacted the European Union. 
Can we stop Brexit now or? Like for reals people will die on a no-deal Brexit if there are medicine shortages  
Based on the correlation of people backing Brexit and people wanting to bring back the Death penalty, the odds are that DCB's law may be worse than it first appears. 
Big Ben silent still. We'll need entertainment in the post-Brexit world: I email Mr Rees-Mogg to suggest a Camelot-style theme park celebrating his life. We can call it Jollywood. No reply yet so I assume he is ruminating. He has much on his plate, as do all we Men of The Turnip. 
A hard Brexit will make Britain poorer and much more unequal, creating conditions that will make a far-right surge more likely, and more potent  
"There are no upsides to Brexit. There is no such thing as a ‘jobs-first Brexit’, and to try and pretend otherwise may be easy but it is also to mislead the public." The brilliant @CarolineLucas on why @jeremycorbyn needs to step up & back a #PeoplesVote 
READ: @CarolineLucas tells the Labour party they must listen to young people and support a #PeoplesVote on the final #Brexit deal:   
No I don't share the Brexiteer fantasy that no EU deal over Brexit will revive the wartime WWII spirit and generate 'cohesion in adversity' to use a phrase from my previous profession. Personally I think it will generate chaos, anger and unrest. A lot of us will simply leave UK. 
Imagine my surprise.May is the enemy of Brexit.The rest is detail.If she is not brought down by her colleagues then we will bring them all down.  
This summer, the pressure on Theresa May to define Brexit became immense:  
If you compare relations between UK & Ireland, what strikes me is generosity from Ireland to UK, even in face of provocative,unhelpful language. No institutional memory in UKG of importance of Anglo-Irish relations and how they impact on NI- this has been writ large in #Brexit 
A no-deal Brexit would make most Brits poorer – but Jacob Rees-Mogg richer. You ever wonder why some of these private-school elitists back Brexit so fervently - even when they know, as Rees-Mogg admits, that it will do no good for their constituents?  
Brexit 2016 - ''it'll be brilliant.. and £350M extra a week for the NHS''Brexit 2018 - ''it's complex... but there'll be 'adequate food''Bexit 2018 - "We will see the benefits but not perhaps for 50 years".Get the impression that they haven't been entirely honest? 
If you had to choose a single individual or entity primarily responsible for #Brexit and the subsequent chaos: 
This morning @Independent has come out in favour of giving YOU the final say on Brexit, with the option to remain.We're winning the argument. If you want to #ExitfromBrexit add your name and share today:  
Yet Mrs May now says we will be bound by EU law for another 21 months. In what world is this real Brexit?#ForTheNation#FudgeOffMay 
In anticipation of the counter-argument...The Human Rights Act is basically a copy-paste of the European Convention on Human Rights. And the ECHR comes from our membership of the Council of Europe (@COE). It's enshrined in EU law too. So if we Brexit... 
Do not forget that the Tories are practically drooling at the thought of a UK without Human Rights protections.Brexit is just the first step... They want to scrap the Human Rights Act.  
Today's Remoaner theme is to pretend we will not have enough food on BrexitThey would do well to avoid that subject, when we leave the protectionist cartel food will become cheaper as tariffs disappear.Don't though expect that truth from MSM 
This is what #resistance looks like. This is what a hero looks like.(And how embarrassing to have the UK represented by the worst of Brexit in that incident.)  
Post Brexit UK this week:Strongmen are good (Columnist for The Times) Death penalty isn't so bad (retired British Army officer) "EU extreme loyalty" should be criminalised (Tory MEP) Meanwhile gov is looking into stockpiling food & medicines... #SunlitUplands 
Brexit: UK cannot afford not to have a deal, says Irish government - Politics live  
When will you act selflessly on behalf of the country over #Brexit? #MAYMUSTGO 
The Independent campaigns for a second referendum. YES.  
Except Owen Jones made several LBC guest appearances after EU Referendum, at same time as Farage was a regular. Making them colleagues. Didn’t seem to bother Jonesy then   
How can you take people seriously if they have #FBPE in their Twitter name & their bio says 'Determined member of the Brexit resistance'?   
Did the EU call for a referendum on the UKs membership? No.Did the EU break UK political campaigning law? No.Did the EU push ahead with #brexit on a 4% margin? No.@conservatives are to blame. Grow up, take responsibility for the consequences of your actions.#StopBrexit 
Two Points:1) disgraceful @KateHoeyMP is sharing this Because2) @CONservatives would absolutely be to blame for a Brexit ‘no dealLet it never be forgotten, & let it be constantly repeated: at every step of the Brexit way, Tories have had a form of majority. It’s on them!  
Theresa May sparks claims of a Remainer ‘coup’ by stripping the Brexit department of control over negotiations with Brussels  
Hi David. I've written several dozen columns expressing my belief that Brexit is a terrible idea and some of its leading advocates are idiots. So my question is, what do you think the appropriate sentence is for my crimes? Thanks in advance. 
Remember to take your ration book! #Brexit #adequatefoodsupplies 
Corbyn and the capitalist cuckoo | Richard Seymour | Patreon: On Corbyn's post-Brexit growth strategy. (Forget the Independent’s clickbait fake news article). 
A no-deal Brexit could make most of us poorer – and Jacob Rees-Mogg richer | Molly Scott Cato  
I was out lobbying against Brexit & met a woman who summed up everything that's wrong about Brexit."I'm for England," she said.It's a little view of the world that does not even recognise our neighbours on these isles, let alone the rest of the world. 
“...the danger is greater, and more complex. I think we can all be better engaged not in preparing for disaster but in stopping it happening at all.” Today’s ⁦@ScotNational⁩ column on the lunacy of a no-deal brexit. #buyapaper 
Brexit should be seen as an opportunity to tackle issues such as low-pay, poor productivity growth & unattractive working conditions. As a UCL economist put it recently: 'Without mass immigration, employers would be obliged to raise the real wage rate.'  
Supreme Court judges are to hear a defence of Holyrood's Brexit billLord Advocate James Wolffe will be defending it The very best of luck to you James remember you are defending Scotland today 
NEWS! Jeremy Hunt confident bad Brexit will be blamed on EU in the same way failing NHS is blamed on the nurses  
Brexit: UK cannot afford not to have a deal, says Irish government - Politics live  
This really shows the dangers of the entire Brexit process. Our societies and economies are intertwined. To break apart serves no purpose.  
Theresa May hasLost the membersLost the core voteLost the wider electorateLost a majority to a far-left marxistLost dozens of MPsLost brexitLost touchLost the plot?UK is about to lose the Conservative partyEither May is toast or the party is toastwhich is it #TeamTory? 
The UK (and thus Scotland) will be leaving 750 international agreements when Brexit happensScotland will need to rely on Rees-Mogg, May, Johnston, Raab, Gove etc to sort out 750 international agreements to replace themOr, alternatively we vote for Independence before 29/03/19 
Despite the referendum result. Despite the fact that it’s the law. Despite the fact that the Catholic Church and its institutional “morality” has caused misery for thousands of women over decades. #Repealedthe8th 
Britain’s banking industry will emerge largely unscathed from #Brexit and retain its position as one of the world’s top two financial centers for the foreseeable future, Barclays’ Chairman John McFarlane told Reuters.  Put that in yer pipe and smoke it Remainers 
Jacob Rees-Mogg always had the look of a spiv who could get you bacon on the black market during the war. Brexit’s beginning to make a lot more sense. 
“No, Jeremy Corbyn – there are no upsides to Brexit” writes @CarolineLucas  
"Far from offering us our liberty, the #Brexit he offers threatens to turn us back into corporate chattels, stripped of our hard-won civil and democratic rights."@MollyMEP on Jacob Rees-Mogg and #BrexitSyndicate.#PeoplesVote 
#Brexit was the biggest democratic vote in our history.The #BrexitBetrayal is the biggest act of treachery,by any Government,in our history.#MayMustGoNow before she does any more damage to our great country. 
. @OllyRobbins not answering questions properly just illustrates how a deep state within the civil service will go fighting to stop #brexit. 
2015: Brexit will be the new ambrosia! We’ll be rich beyond our wildest dreams! 2016: Everything will stay the same, but with added sovereignty!2017: We don’t know what will happen but we’ll probably cope.2018: Most people probably won’t starve. #brexit #adequatefood 
Fuck it. I’m kind of into no deal Brexit now. Let’s see how mental it can get. 
‘Coup’ claims as May sidelines Dominic Raab and boosts controversial Brexit guru Olly Robbins | Robbins faces angry MPs | Corbyn accused of Trump-like policies over 'Britain first' post-Brexit plans | Juncker to meet Trump in Washington today  
That’s why I am supporting it. #Hardbrexit I voted Leave because it means all women will have to leave the country. And if that is not delivered there will be Hell to pay. Can’t believe they put an actual woman in charge of Brexit.  
I recall @DominicRaab with @michaelgove pressing me to agree in the first ever meeting of the @CommonsEUexit Select Cttee that #Brexit could be successfully done in 6 months. I note that almost 2 years on he is Minister in charge of stockpiling essential goods. 
Hearing rumours that Westminster is stockpiling champagne amid fears of no-deal Brexit. 
Apologies. Didn’t realise you had been to NI and asked everyone. NI voted remain btw. It also only exists due to British imperialist interests which is a delicious irony in that it’s existence may the one thing that prevents Brexit. 
From @DanielJHannan: Even the blockade of Qatar hasn’t produced the calamity that hysterical Remainers now predict from Brexit  
The BBC will come out of BREXIT under a cloud lasting decades. They may never recover from it.David Attenborough has been one of the few honest voices at the BBC. Thank you David. 
It is clear from Olly Robbins' response and David Davis's statement that ReMayner Theresa May disclosed the contents of her #Brexit white paper to Remainers in Cabinet in advance of the Chequers getaway but she ambushed the #Brexiteer ministers 
There’s a simple answer to this: commit to an #EEA-based Brexit.  
Instead of stockpiling food and medicines for a no deal brexit, why don't we just buy them from adjacent countries? We could have trade agreements with them and sell things back to them. Some of their citizens could even help harvest our crops.... 
Absolute rubbish. Cameron called a referendum and high profile Tories got into bed with UKIP. Cameron could have stood up to the warring factions in his own party, but chose to rip our country apart. Yes, we blame the Tories. 
Irish Tánaiste Simon Coveney on #BBCR4today was head and shoulders above any UK Gov minister on the realities of Brexit.  Deeply ironic when you remember the mockery, for independence, Ireland got and Scotland gets.... The #BetterTogether Brexit is changing everything. 
Can we just get rid of Govt & the Opposition leadership & reset the UK to default mode. Neither serves the UK's Nat Interest, merely their own self-serving agendas; both back a #Brexit that will cause irreversible harm & deny the Ppl a Democratic way out.#PeoplesVote #Remain 
It is UKGov’s responsibility to announce now that it would take every step possible - request an extension, call a referendum on the deal or a general election, request a suspension or even revocation of Art50, to avoid what would now obviously be a catastrophe for the UK. 10/ 
If your Brexit preparations are similar to those for an oncoming apocalypse, perhaps it's time for a rethink on Brexit.  
Best BBC4 politician interview I’ve heard- Simon Coveney answered questions asked and calmly invited the UK to be positive, stop negotiating with ITSELF and cut the bravado over Brexit- British parliamentary rhetoric means nothing outside of Britain  @simoncoveney @BBCRadio4 
I’m done with Labour after that horseshit from Corbyn. Don’t care what any other policy is, by supporting Brexit in that manner, my vote will have to go elsewhere. 
It should not be considered an option by Parliament, either in votes it holds, or in a referendum on the Withdrawal Agreement, anymore than amputation of a leg should be considered to treat a cold. 9/ 
That #Brexit bus today  
There is no mandate whatsoever for it. All discussion on both sides prior to the referendum was on the basis that there would at least be an orderly, agreed exit, even if there was not a quick agreement on a future relationship/trade deal. 6/ 
John McDonnell goes on @BBCr4today to discuss the economy and Brexit, but gets cornered by tory stooge Justin Webb who wants to talk about antisemitism and nothing else, the journalistic standards of ti's once flagship radio programme are now shot to pieces, #r4today. 
Why The Independent backs a final vote on the Brexit deal  
There’s a very simple way to avoid the utterly appalling and denigrating effects and equally undignified and costly contingency plans for a no deal Brexit.UKGov can take it off the table. Exclude it as a possibility, or at least as an option. Now. Today. 1/ 
It’s Wednesday.And fed up beyond the teeth with this #Brexit fiasco.Shocking that supposedly well-educated, intelligent people are persisting with this inevitable disaster. They have their own agenda.#StopBrexitSaveBritain#RevokeArticle50#FaceDownTheFruitcakes 
Irish-British Intergovernmental Conference is today.Ironically, one Tory #Brexit roadblock would be solved by admitting current set-up is de facto Direct Rule and triggering joint authority. Arlene explains why...  
Taste the Brexit #AdequateFood 
Opinion: A mature democracy would allow for a vote on the final deal, rather than allow bullying tactics to shut down further debate. #peoplesvote #Brexit  
READ: Why @Independent backs a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal. Please RT: 
That last thing I RTed is extraordinary.it is even worse than the independence referendum poetry. 
#Brexit, the easiest thing in history. If stockpiling food doesn't scream 'we lied to you', I don't know what does. Our leaders are being lead, never was this country more in need of leadership than now. Mrs May @theresa_may, Mr Corbyn @jeremycorbyn, you ain't it.#PeoplesVote 
When the government promises "adequate food" after a crash-out Brexit, is that a promise about quantity or quality? E.g. there will be enough food, but it will be pre-single market cuisine? 
Scotland produces more food than it eats ,when food shortages come post Brexit do you believe only the ‘excess’ food will be appropriated by WM for its use?If you do, you don’t know your history or your neighbours! 
Morrisons in Gibraltar, after traffic flow at the border was slowed for one day due to a public holiday in Spain. This is just one small British enclave. This will be daily reality under a no deal Brexit.  
Food for thought: Raab admits planning to secure #Food supply for disaster of a #NoDeal #Brexit 
Ohh the profits to be made from the #BetterTogether Brexit   
SO THERE WE HAVE IT !!Dom Raab says, "The Chequers deal is the most faithful rendering of Brexit which could be approved in Westminster, Brussels and Europe"All this from a Brexiteer, but now puppet of "Oily" Robbins and the PM. 
Did it when the scandal broke. Could no longer be part of a platform that makes us the product it sells to the highest bidder. Could also no longer use a platform that allowed Brexit and Trump to happen and then try to ignore it/cover it up. There are other forms of communication 
The 2019 presidential elections is a referendum on Buhari:NepotismGross ineptitudeEthnocentrismDivisive politicsState sponsored genocideAbuse of human rights and disregard for rule of lawStatist policiesAbroad Medicare@atiku is a better alternative 
And now for the updated pre-summer edition of the thoroughly unscientific and utterly subjective Brexit probability meter... and we have some movement, though it's not making things any clearer 1/  
Mrs May made this clear in her Florence speech: she was committing us to the EU army, defence & foreign policy, and all the police & criminal justice measure, eg European Arrest Warrant etc. The Referendum is being betrayed in front of our very eyes.  
A no-deal Brexit could make most of us poorer – and Jacob Rees-Mogg richer | Molly Scott Cato  
And Jacob Rees-Mogg is now suggesting that it could be 50 years before we see any benefits from Brexit!...Why didn't he tell us that before the referendum?   #FBPE #StopBrexit #StopTories 
Oh don't panic everyone, the government is promising that there will be "adequate food" if there's no Brexit deal!  
ITV are rumoured to be making a follow-up to Love Island called Lord of the Brexit Flies. It’s about 60 million people stranded on an island with no food or medicine and the subsequent conflict that arises between them. Not sure it is going to be popular. #r4today 
The vast majority of the British people want these swine to hang.Moreover if their was a referendum tomorrow the electorate would return capital punishment in a flash.Only lilly livered politicians want rid of it.Lammy, you represent no one.  
In the 2 yrs since 37% of the electorate expressed their dissatisfaction in an advisory referendum, the government could have made a concerted effort to  address the causes of #Brexit. Instead, they are going to stockpile food & medicine & Mr Mogg opens a second fund in Eire. 
Looks like we’ve now entered stage 9 of Brexit.  
And why? For a backward-looking ideological fetish, absolutely no other reason: “Up to 12,000 roles in financial services could leave the UK after Brexit, according to one of the most detailed forecasts yet of the impact of leaving the European Union on the City” @thetimes 
To pretend that there will be benefits of Brexit is to ignore the facts. The only benefits of Brexit are reserved for big investors and the wealthy. Brexit is for the few not the many. @jeremycorbyn @UKLabour @Labour4EU 
I'm preparing for Brexit. #DontAskToUseMySpareRoom 
Here is the man who really runs Brexit.MSM are letting him get away with it.Democracy in the UK is a very thin veneer, starting to fade away completely as our shield, a free press, capitulates to political dogma of deep state.  
Your brexit is going well, isn't it Danno? Stockpiling food and medicines? You'll always,ALWAYS be associated with what comes next. In fact, you'll never be able to wash the stench of brexit off you.@DanielJHannan 
Presumably these people calling for a 2nd EU Referendum will just call for a 3rd, if we fail to vote the right way again. What utter nonsense! We've had a referendum and, even though I was on the losing side, I recognise our job is to deliver the result not ask the question again 
Hotter than #mtvhottest & more twists and turns than #brexit in this #YA #Fantasy #Adventure Blackmail, intrigue & explosive exploits stretch the bonds of friendship, as lost secrets and untold lore come to light in a world full of magic wielding #dragons  
David Eyles: "Fresh and carefully packaged by the Conservative party machine, MPs are being sent out to their constituencies to flog us the Chequers stitch-up. May thinks - fatally - we're too thick to question her wisdom." @Drystonesonnet #brexit #csm 
Elton John: 'There's a new cereal called Brexit. You eat it and you throw up afterwards'  
Given the revelations on BREXIT, it's now the duty of the Scottish government to dissolve the Act of union & protect Scotland's interests 
Spot the difference(Taken from Issue III of The Brexit - available here ) 
Is this all he’s got? Anyone get the impression No. 10 ordered a ‘every department announce something nice’ to distract from the chaos unfolding before us over Brexit? Ooooh....shiny thing!....  
All Mail & Express readers care about is property prices: an estate agent needs to explain to them they’d rise sharply if we abandon Brexit. 
"No-deal Brexit will make it ‘illegal’ to pay pensions to retired expats living in EU. Warning comes as leading service industries say they have been 'thrown under the bus' by Theresa May’s Chequers plan."  
Scenes, as tripe lovers fear post-Brexit shortages as more people discover the Joy of Tripe.#adequatefood 
BREXITPulling out of EU institutions need not prejudice friendly relations with our neighbours but it's becoming clear that the EU doesn't want this. Individual states might want good relations with us but EU leaders have made it VERY clear, they want Britain to FAIL.  
MPs going off for their summer break have time to reflect, away from Westminster.  They should reflect on their legacy.  "What did you do during the great Brexit wars, Daddy/Mummy?" "Oh, I sold my country down the river so as to appease my activists and boost my career" Really?? 
"UNELECTED BUREAUCRATS NOW RUN #BREXIT NEGOTIATIONS" - Read the facts of what happened yesterday, from the mouth of Theresa May:  Simply shocking. @Conservatives 
“If Brexit negotiations have taught us anything, it’s that our future should not be left to 650 politicians in London” | my ⁦column on the ⁦@Independent⁩ coming out for a ⁦@peoplesvote_uk⁩ today! #PeoplesVote 
#brexit Looks Like Olly Robbins who hates us leaving the EU. Taking over Brexit negotiations, with the EU. Look at his stupid smug face. Theresa Maybe & this MUPPET, doing their best to make complete MESS of Brexit. Both Remainers 2 of them don’t want us to leave the EU.    
Make no mistake. The Establishment Brexit stitch-up is now underway. There is no intention of finding a “good deal” or an alternative working solution. It will be impossibly shit deal, no deal or Remain, thereby splitting the Leave vote between unpalatable alternatives. 
And huge thanks to you @RemainerNow for giving the many who voted leave and since changed their minds, including me, a way to add our voice in support of stopping this Brexit madness.#RemainerNow#PeoplesVote 
It will take decades to replace all the great trade deals we have through EU. Mogg says it will take 50 years to get back to where we are now. There’s no public mandate at all for Brexit as the ref2016 is now illegal. Polls are the only public reference point -they say 55% Remain  
Contrary to popular belief, the north of England now has the strongest support for Remaining in the EU of any part of England outside London. 55% back Remain according to the latest polling. People up here are realising that #Brexit is a project of the elite, for the elite.  
Er, no. We’ll blame David Cameron, Boris Johnson, Michael Gove, Nigel Farage and Jeremy ‘7/10’ Corbyn for the Brexit result - and Theresa May, Boris Johnson, Michael Gove, David Davis and you for the inept negotiations which have led to a no-deal scenario.  
Brexit is gonna be OK folks, just make huge stockpiles of food, medicines & blood plasma while we're still in the EU and you might survive.   
We said all along that accepting Brexit on such a dodgy ref result would set a precedent for bringing back the death penalty, outlawing homosexuality, curtailing trade unions and banning abortion. Brexit is only the beginning.#StopBrexit#PeoplesVote 
For those that don't like the idea of brexit move to your beloved Europe I'm sure you will find happiness and Solace. And let the rest of us get on with our lives 
In ultimate humiliation Brexit Secretary Dominic Raab sacked in middle of committee as Stock Piling Food and Medicines begin, Theresa ‘I like walking and cooking coz you can eat it’ May says she’s taking charge, Britain in the grip of Teereza Tory Meltdown  
You asked us to factcheck this graphic - it's based on DExEU analysis which explicitly said it could not be made into forecasts.Even ignoring this, many of the figures are still incorrect.#Brexit #EU 
Britain’s in a Theresa Tory Meltdown Stock Piling Foods Medicines for No Deal Brexit has begun, powdered eggs, we are a Nation of Root Vegetables Daily Racist campaigns for Blue Ration books, Get Corbyn invest in manufacturing education housing transport invent build, Corbynomics  
Perhaps Brexit and the current northern hemisphere heatwave will remind those with short memories ‘why farming matters’  
If the EU turn hostile on Brexit and see us leaving as an act of aggression — it’s time to turn to trade deals and the open seas  
'The referendum gave sovereignty to the British people, so now they deserve a final say on the Brexit deal'  
Every morning I wake up, read the Brexit news and go “Have you all gone stark staring raving gibbering dribbling mad?”  A nation chooses starvation to pursue 60 MPs’ wet dream of disaster capitalism, imperial fantasy & gross enrichment? O and Putin. 
Theresa May announces she will keep UK under EU laws for another 21 months ... So, we are no #Brexit in March 2019. If @Conservatives don't challenge her leadership now they will condemn the UK to zombie state status. 
“Emotionally” we need a second referendum to “heal the wounds of the past two years”. Spoiler: Brexit didn’t cause this division, the abject refusal of Remoaners to accept the result did   
#Brexit: David Davis says British people are sovereignThings have changed.  We should modernise #treason laws to take into account betrayal of the people who are sovereign @theresa_may #traitor to the people; 
The @Independent once and for all proves it is not remotely independent by demanding a second referendum, thereby rejecting the single biggest act of democracy in British electoral history  >>  
Only when this terrible shaming episode of Brexit & Trump is defeated will I be able to breathe without anxiety. 
Stockpiles of food, medicine and blood will be built up if no deal Brexit becomes likely 
Regretfully they don't when the subject is either Brexit or the NHS. 
"There was no move toward recognition of Russia's claimed annexation of Crimea. No support for a referendum. No movement toward Russia's position on a protection force for [OSCE] monitors that would effectively divide the country," said Volker,   
Not sure why the Yankees would want to acquire Britton when it means having to navigate this intractable Brexit problem. Does Brian Cashman really want to spend the stretch drive arguing about Irish customs procedures? 
To be clear: If the majority of the Puerto Rican people want independence, they should be granted it. Period. There should be a new, fair, and clearly worded referendum in any case and a real effort to turn out a substantial portion of the electorate for it. 
Every time I tweet something like this, people come into my mentions telling me that the majority of the Puerto Rican people actually want independence, which got <2% of the vote in the 2017 referendum and ~6% in 2012.  
Out with @fairvotebc crew tonight in #Langford to let people know of the upcoming referendum for proportional representation in B.C. #pr4bc 
Folks aren't seeing the big picture. From Putin's POV, Brexit and Trump are all part of the same thing. He's using information warfare rooted in racism & nationalism to get the West to tear ourselves apart. 
If you’re not familiar with the issues, it’s OK to leave a race or referendum blank. I’ve definitely done it. (sorry, Soil and Water Conservation Supervisor)  
If Dan Patrick wants to make 2018 election cycle a referendum on school and gun safety, bring it on. Texas are ready for change and they’ll vote for me.  
I want every single member of Congress—regardless of party—to support Puerto Ricans’ right to self-determination. That includes providing resources for a fair, binding referendum and a clear path to honor *any* status they CHOOSE.  
Hat tip @WisDems : "Because of @ScottWalker’s budget cuts, last year Three Lakes needed a $15 million referendum just to keep its doors open!"  
Brexit: not an easy option - for all that the new-found interest in the Efta/EEA option is welcome, few of the born-again advocates seem to display any serious understanding of it, or realise that it is not an easy (or quick) option...  #Brexinfo. 
My updated timeline into what's gone awry with Broward Schools $800 million bond referendum. Board members acknowledged today they may not have the money to do everything due to huge cost increases. 
No.  BBC have their orders, Brexit is going swimmingly, don't get the natives excited. 
I don't want Jeremy Corbyn's Brexit. I don't want Theresa May's Brexit. I want a Better Britain in a United Reformed Europe#Brexit#NoDealNoBrexit@guyverhofstadt @theresa_may @jeremycorbyn @vincecable @CarolineLucas @NicolaSturgeon @BestForBritain @rachelashley8 
Now she's our No.1 Brexit negotiator... Paxman : "If I was sitting in Brussels, and was looking at you as the person I had to negotiate with, I'd think you were a blowhard who collapses at the first sign of gunfire"  
The brexit mentality- 'colonise' the world- vote brexit to stop ex colonies coming to UK.- try to get trade deals with far away lost colonised countries instead of EU- complain these countries occupied by GB got independence from GB before GB did... - absolutely no idea....  
I found the core of Brexit the other day. The full article is here but I'll clip the really pertinent parts out to avoid tarnishing your browser history. These are the Little Englanders who would bring down Great Britain rather than allow us to evolve  
Cuba’s new draft constitution takes a step towards #MarriageEquality, defining marriage as “the consensual union of two people, regardless of gender,” but will be put to a referendum later this year.  
Having to watch Euro News and read Irish Newspapers to find out what is going on re Brexit 
I view this pathological need to ‘fix the game’ like a footy version of Brexit. A bunch of old people getting wistful for a time that isn’t coming back and trying to force through a way back there with no real thought for the consequences. 
Brexit by Chris Riddell.  
Up to 12,000 roles in financial services could leave the UK after Brexit, according to one of the most detailed forecasts yet  
We had a referendum to save €119,000 per year in Judges’ salaries. Let’s have one now to nationalise ALL religious run hospitals. Their stance is an affront to our Constitution, our democracy and the majority of our people #Repealedthe8th # 
Bang on from Brendan O'Neill."Remainers are fantasising about a Mad Max scenario. No food. No Medicine. No Prosecco for them to drink" "They are doing it to demonise the democratic vote" #Brexit #SkyPapers @spikedonline 
UK's May says she will lead #Brexit talks from now on  
Now we know why Mrs May worked hard to stop the Lords betraying Brexit.She wanted to do it all by herself.  
Be it Islam, immigration, brexit, the NHS, terrorism the result is the same in all cases - May has screwed them up. No experience other than as a failed home secretary she now works to keep Britain in the EU and is extremely pro Muslim. 
Radical decentralisation explains why Europe developed ahead of other regions of the world. It comprised a system of divided and, hence, competing powers and jurisdictions:  #Brexit 
One of the richest countries in the world seriously talking about stockpiling food and medicines in peacetime based on a minority vote influenced by a crooked bent referendum campaign! This f**king madness needs to end now!#Stopbrexit Stop this madness, I want to get off! 
#BREAKING Everyday #brexit looks worse and worse. Our party will be destroyed by #brexit not all #Tories are mad. 
At the time of the #EU referendum, EU-born UK residents, who were 5% of the UK population, comprised between 0.7% and 25.8% of the resident population in local areas, with concentrations around London, the South East, and the East. New report out today: 
The tragedy is for the deluded Brexiteers is that the EU is 27 other countries, with their own pressing concerns above sorting out the Tory/Labour Brexit mess!!   
2016: Brexit Will improve your living standards in the UK2018: Brexit secretary admits government must ensure “there is adequate food supply” if UK leaves EU with no deal.”  
Breaking:Theresa May seen in conference with her latest Minister for Brexit.  
Dear God this man is nothing less than a Brexit supporting Tory quisling - Labour members need to move fast and decisively to halt this betrayal  
FILM IDEA: 'Daddy or Chips' Heartbreaking post Brexit story of a girl that has to choose between food rations or providing her father with much needed medical attention. Ken Loach to direct. #adequatefood 
The spectacular shitshow that is the Great Brexit Tariff Rate Quota Disentanglement is kicking off again at the WTO. In all likelihood, it will continue to do so for years.  
YOURGOVERNMENTARESTOCKPILINGMEDICINESINTHEEVENTOFA"NO DEAL"BREXITTHEY'RESTOCKPILINGMEDICINES!!!WAKETHE F¥¢KUP  
The last GE lots of us warned against voting Labour and explained that Corbyn is a Brexiter. We were told, by Corbynista remainers, that we were wrong, were fools and that Corbyn was playing 'The long game', and that voting LD was bad because of Tuition Fees.Brexit > Fees. 
That's your biggest worry about Brexit? Not the damage that will be done to Scotland or your constituents? If Scotland has to become independent to have its will recognised & England gets the Brexit it wants then isn't that a win-win? 
Go on, give it your best shot. Stockpiling food & medicine is OK because..........This is my take, No Deal Brexit is the best the government are capable of achieving. They are incapable of delivering anything. They respect a vote that was obtained by cheating & breaking the law 
Our position is clear - we don't owe the corrupt EU, they owe us  #BrexitBetrayal #Brexit #WeServe 
There are some excellent bloggers, but I think @fotoole is the best newspaper columnist on #Brexit in these islands  
A new Brexit bus hits the streets.  
Okay then, forget about Brexit, forget about politicians, don't listen to May, Trump, Farage, or even to Putin. Don't listen to anyone. Just listen to this guy who might well be the most famous and beloved, living Brit on earth. THIS GUY IS A PATRIOT, STOP BREXIT FFS !!!!  
FT analysis shows so called 'Project Fear 1' is all coming disastrously true unlike the fantasy predictions from the Economists for Brexit quoted throughout the EU ref campaign by Vote Leave.  
Theresa May has announced that copies of Hot Fuzz and Shaun of the Dead will need to be stockpiled in the event of a no-deal Brexit leading to ITV4 needing to be switched off. 
Something an awful lot of people are failing to grasp:If you're prepared to deceive, & smear, & misrepresent, & share fake news, & outright lie to get what you want, you're undoubtedly one of the nasty extremists. No matter which side of the Brexit/Remain debate you're on. 
Note this carefully, a Tory MP peddling allegations made in a far-right propaganda outlet. The Tory Brextremists are not Tory at all, they are fully allied with the extreme right. #Brexit #PeoplesVote #StopBrexit 
Very technical read but as a layman what I read is UK trading under its own WTO schedules with legal certainty from day one post Brexit with no deal does not look like certain at all.  
Theresa May is taking personal control over Brexit  
I don't know anyone who has talked so much shite for so long about Brexit. Do you really believe there will be no food or medicines? Really? 
it owns how young people who defend their commitment to fairly soft democratic socialism are "weird cultists" but the people who show up under every tweet about corbyn to call him solely responsible for hard brexit in almost identical language,   are not 
Believe it or not, the European Union consists of 28 nations - it isn’t its own country yet, no matter how badly sad Remoaners like yourself would like it to be! The United States is our top export partner - a post-Brexit trade deal would only cement that further.   
TOMORROW: Theresa May takes over Brexit negotiations, confirms support for death penalty, approves fracking, denies teachers a pay rise, and then fucks off on holiday.Our front page? Oh, just some bullshit about the weather. pic.twitter.com/x2pGGFy6OE 
It's now clear to everyone that Brexit is a shambles. We"re heading for a #NoDealBrexit with no dividend, no benefits, massive unemployment and enormous costs.So what does the Labour Leader do at this crucial time?He blatantly lies by telling people Brexit will be great.  
He Olly Robbins not even Fcking elected !.......... 'It fails the sniff test!' Anger as Remainer civil servant granted TOTAL CONTROL of Brexit  
On 16 May 2016, Farage told 'The Daily Mirror' that a 52/48 Remain victory would be “unfinished business by a long way”. He went on to tell the BBC “there could be an unstoppable demand for a re-run of the EU referendum if Remain wins by a narrow margin”. That cuts both ways. 
Within 24 hours of - very sensibly - warning the EU that Britain won’t pay the “Brexit bill” unless they give us a decent deal,  Dominic Raab is relegated to the role of bag carrier.  He should resign in disgust.  It’s time to remove the useless May.   
Reminder that this extreme national insanity is only happening because, faced with perfectly acceptable compromise options, the UK government has chosen a bizarre hardline stance that almost nobody voted for. You don't need to reverse Brexit to stop this.  
Here is the BBC carrying the bad news that radio isotopes, used in "around 700,000 diagnostic tests a year" cannot be stockpiled.But the BBC were complicit in failing to inform the voting public on Brexit consequences.  
We are living in a dictatorship here in this United Kingdom. How is Theresa Mugabe STILL clinging onto power? I'm lost for words here... She demoted the Brexit Minister and said she will now lead EU negotiations herself. I'm... 
So this week so far, Scots are subservient, the unionist plants in our parliament are gleeful, rationing of actual food is imminent and we didn’t vote for Brexit. Really? 
The Independent throws its weight behind the call for a Brexit referendum on the final deal.#PeoplesVote 
Call the whole thing off, it's beyond ridiculous now.Let's spend our time, energy and money on making our country a place we're proud of, Brexit is breaking Britain.#StopBrexit 
Follow live updates as @theresa_may announces she is taking charge of negotiations with the EU, sidelining the new #Brexit secretary @DominicRaab 
You were, and after the Referendum it emerged that you had prepared no Brexit fiscal strategy. Muppet.  
Brexit: Raab ‘sidelined’ as May takes control of EU negotiations>So Dominic, how’s that new job working out?...  
I really can't take hypocrites like Owen Jones seriously. They rant against Trump, Barron and Farage, whilst simultaneously supporting the Brexit which embodies everything Trump, Bannon and Farage stand for. It's fuckwittery of the highest order, and is doing Labour harm.#FBPE 
Who knew? No deal Brexit means no food Brexit and no medicines Brexit? Didn’t see that on the side of a fucking red bus did we? 
So just to recap the Brexit agenda:Fuck business Fuck employmentFuck tax revenue Fuck peace in Northern Ireland Fuck the people of Gibraltar Fuck EU citizens living & working in the U.K.Fuck U.K. citizens living in the EU, especially pensioners Blue Passports 
No other term for this except “utter bollocks”. UK decided to leave so it is for UK to decide what future relationship it would like.UK could simply exit EU and join EFTA - fulfilling referendum and removing need for stockpiling.Conservatives *opted* not to go this route...  
These Brexit promises get better, eh? Forget the lie that there will be an extra £350 million a week for the NHS, we’ll now have a pledge of having “adequate food” if there is no deal. #ToryChaos 
Corbyn keeps on an insane Brexit path that WILL CAUSE HARM TO ORDINARY PEOPLE. When will his supporters wake up and tell him it's time to change ?Think again Jeremy.  
I've been blocked by the minister for #adequatefood What are the ethics of a citizen of the UK being prevented from seeing the official tweets of a minister who is tasked with ensuring I have #adequatefood after Brexit? 
Last week the Government said that they would be pushing #ProjectFear and the impact of no deal weekly.How much longer are we going to let remainers @theresa_may and @OllyRobbins undo the result of the referendum and push through with the softest of soft #Brexit’s?#MAYMUSTGO 
#DumpFarage? Let’s #DumpOwenJones: @JackBuckby —  | #UK #news #Brexit  
No Piers. What are we doing is THE question. The government are currently stock piling food. Maybe Gary should take your place on GMB cause he seems to know the questions to ask. And to allow people a voice other than his #Brexit#peoplesvote 
What’s a worse post brexit vision : Jacob rees moggs apocalyptic hell hole or Jeremy’s cloud cuckoo land “ everyone is equal “ bull**** ... I don’t know what one is worse . I think they are they are as bad as one another - we should just remain ... best option  
The UK taxpayers have still not had an adequate explanation from the EU CARTEL of how the #Brexit "divorce bill" has been calculated.  How can a NET CONTRIBUTER still owe money when no account of UK share of assets have been assessed.  We should not pay a single penny more!  
If Theresa May remains Prime Minister. This Country will not get the Brexit we voted for. The whole Brexit negotiation is a confidence trick to fool Brexiteers and buy the Tories time to do their worse. What are you made of Tory Brexiteers. Is it Iron or clay? 
I was dead against independence at the last referendum. Now I'm far more sympathetic. Whoever you support, the Scottish parliament is fairly sensible. I'd be delighted to lose the abomination that is Westminster. It is led by selfish wolves. 
People should be paying a heavy price for this shambles. And not just politically. If it’s found out this referendum was rigged with Dark Money senior people should be facing serious charges. They’re dragging the country to its knees.  
More evidence that Scotland is even  more opposed to #Brexit  today than it was in the 2016 referendum.  And that the UK as a whole now firmly against too.   Only the Tories  still want it to happen .  
Last night, Labour, LibDem, Greeen and Independents voted on Oxford City council by 34-6 to demand a People's Vote on the terms of Brexit.  The significant strength of this vote reflects credit on local leaders who for 2 years have  insisted that Brexit is not a done deal. 
“We need to be planning in advance for how we could step up obtaining those supplies from elsewhere if need be” – Sarah Wollaston MP on the stockpiling of medication following a no-deal Brexit.@sarahwollaston | @maitlis | #newsnight 
Bromley and Chiselhurst CLP just passed Remain-Labour’s motion to change Labour’s policy on the EU and for a final vote on the Brexit deal with an option to remain.  @Remain_Labour #Lab18 
I am listening to NewsNight (comedy hour) ..Stockpiling food and medicine in case of No Deal Brexit ‘Powerful Evidence’ FFS!  Before we joined the EU we managed nicely.We had British fish, British workers, British food, less crime, more room. 
If you think this is bad, I heard through the political grapevine that a no deal brexit will result in us going back to 140 character tweets with no thread feature tool. #ProjectFear. 
Preparations for #Brexit that involve having to stockpile anything do not point to Brexit being in any way desirable.Stockpiling tends to be a form of behaviour associated with threat.If Brexit represents a threat it should be stopped in its tracks.#PeoplesVote time#newsnight 
Food being stockpiled, medicines/blood being stockpiled, i didn't see this on the side of a fucking bus, if this is the consequences of a no deal #Brexit then the tories are finished, fuck the country to satisfy Rees-Mogg and his extremists #Newsnight #StopBrexit 
Another day, another significant backing for a People’s Vote on the final Brexit deal. Bravo Independent.  
"A mature democracy would allow for a vote on the final deal, rather than allow bullying tactics to shut down further debate": Dominic Grieve writes in the @Independent on the need for a second EU referendum. 
BRILLIANT night!! my morale has gone all the way up to 11!  let's keep this momentum up all through summer; we WILL stop Brexit, of that i am certain, especially with such glorious enthusiastic people fighting on our side!!  @No10Vigil @mikegalsworthy @albawhitewolf 
Just booked my Ocado delivery for the day after Brexit. Enjoy the bread queues, suckers. It’s all round to mine for avocado-toast and prosecco. 
Reviewing today's Supreme Court hearing and Brexit tweetage, here's one punchline for you. The UK government's lawyer today argued that - Sewel or no Sewel - Westminster is bound by no convention to respect Holyrood's views on whether its powers should be added to or diminished. 
Latest Brexit bus update:“Let’s take the £350m a week we give to the EU and stock up on medicines, medical devices and substances of human origin instead” 
Journalist interviews economist. Journalist does not understand what economist is saying. Economists points out that journalist does not understand. Journalist blocks economist. A metaphor for our post GFC times: austerity, Brexit etc.  
We can’t make this up: The school district featured in @ScottWalker's new ad had to pass a $15 million referendum last year just to keep the lights on b/c of Walker’s budget cuts!   #WISen 
If you live abroad and a Spaniard tells you that Catalan Republicans are fascists or criminals for promoting a referendum:Show this image of a Spanish nazi who vandalised with impunity a Catalan community centre. July 2018. PM @sanchezcastejon, silence is complicity. 
Looking forward to @jamieoliver's 2019 book, should be a cracker. #adequatefood #brexit  
Great question by @CarolineLucas to @DominicRaab on his comment about no wholesale removal of EU #citizensrights in the event of no deal BrexitRecess starting on Thursday - 10 weeks of continuous worrying & uncertainty for the 3.6m EU citizens in the UK lying ahead  
I like how Raab was demoted within a fortnight of being assigned the Brexit Minister role, now he can focus on his new role as Minister for Stockpiling 
Bavarian Town Rejects Turkish Mosque Proposal in Local Referendum  
The week in Brexit:- Rees Mogg says no benefit of Brexit for 50 years- Govt stockpiling food- Amazon planning for "civil breakdown"- Raab "not focussed on detail"- May plan hated by Tories AND EU- Govt plans to turn 140 miles of Kent roads into a carparkIt's only Tuesday 
Elton John on #Brexit - It's like walking through Hampton Court Maze blindfold.. being turned around 16 times & trying to find your way out. The people weren't told the truth.. the British people were promised something that is completely ridiculous. #StopBrexit #FBPE 
Why are they talking about stockpiling blood in the event of a no deal Brexit ? We're live on @BBCNewsnight 22:30 
Fear not punters! I am stockpiling some of the best no-label mixed origin meat that money can buy in case of a no deal Brexit. Blighty may sleep well tonight.  
Now we know what “The Event” referenced in the documentary series That Mitchel And Webb Look was really all about. #AdequateFood #Brexit  
'It fails the sniff test!' Anger as Remainer civil servant granted TOTAL CONTROL of Brexit  
This man is called Olly Robbins he now runs Britain. He has never been elected and is anti Brexit. He tells the PM what to do and controls negotiations with the EU.  
Denial of what? I voted Remain but Brexit won. Any attempt to stop it happening will destroy British democracy.  
Because of Brexit, Britain is facing the biggest crisis since WWII and yet our Parliament has gone into summer recess. This is disgracefully negligent. We need a cross party emergency government and we need our parliament to remain open until the shambles of Brexit is resolved. 
Everyone who says they knowingly voted for food shortages makes an excellent illustration of why the referendum should never have been held in the first place. 
SHOT: @ScottWalker’s new ad touts his “commitment to funding education” at Three Lakes School District CHASER: Because of @ScottWalker’s budget cuts, last year Three Lakes needed a $15 million referendum just to keep its doors open!  
We're doing #Brexit#PrepareForANoDealBrexit 
This is what we should all be concerned about. Not an unnecessary and self-inflicted monumental act of self-harm like Brexit.  
It looks like a Corbyn Government in 2022 will be Theresa May's legacy to the Nation. Her systematic betrayal of Brexit will devastate this country. 
Dear @michaelgove you went out and sold Brexit. You stigmatised immigrants and stood in front of a bus splattered with lies. For this. Tell me: do you still think you’ve liberated us?  
If they were to cancel all their existing trade deals, they would be screwed too. Equally if they suddenly stopped being compliant with their existing trade deals, they would be screwed. Exactly what Brexit means to the UK if no deal. 
Remember how before the referendum people were like "voting to leave would mean taxes would go up and the NHS would probably struggle even more!" and leavers got mad at how hyperbolic they were being? Anyway I'll be over here in my bean-tin fort if you need me 
It's a long and complex story? Involving 30 years of British electorate's opposition to EU integration, a referendum and the EU trying to stitch up Britain. Could be that.  
The secret unit in Whitehall responsible for making sure the Tories lose the next election has placed an unelected civil servant who works for a Remain PM in charge of Brexit. 
Going by their latest astonishing statements, seems Scotland’s Conservative & Labour MPs see it as their job to ensure that if UK is going to spiral downwards into the Brexit abyss then it must take Scotland with it. Once again only @theSNP putting Scotland’s interests first. 
Stop Brexit move to the centre and find a credible @UKLabour leader who would stop spouting dreamworld nonsense and can do worker friendly deals with business 
Post Brexit, cyclists will be in great demand. We'll be the only way to make electricity. #cyclistbrexit 
BREAKING: @Independent has come out in support of a #PeoplesVote on the final #Brexit deal.Here is the front page of tomorrow's issue.  
Arron Banks: Brexit donor paid thousands to Lesotho government minister - BBC News  
Why ever not? The Tories are TOTALLY to blame for the mess we are in. Starting with David Cameron for calling the referendum in the first place. I also hold @UKLabour responsible for not being a proper opposition and bringing down the govt. 
What I  about the Brits most is our sense of humour in the face of tragedy. As our government assures us we’ll have #adequatefood post Brexit, here’s a reminder...Our islands haven’t produced enough food to feed us for well over a century.Nope, not even in WW2. 
Germany: 'Bavarian Town Rejects Turkish Mosque Proposal in Local Referendum' 
May has emboldened Remainers and the EU by putting herself in charge of #Brexit talks when she lacks any negotiating skillsShe has even buoyed Labour who are now laughing at @DominicRaabAs a result she is leading the country and the Tories to oblivion 
Link to @CommonsHealth inquiry into Brexit; medicines, devices and substances of human origin  Govt must produce a plain English guide to the consequences of No-Deal for your healthcare, their contingency planning & the true costs 
Great news that @Independent is backing a #PeoplesVote on the Brexit deal. Momentum is building. We can still stop this madness.  
The second shoe drops in the Brexit coup   
Theresa May is taking personal control of #Brexit#Potemkin #DEXEU 
Often, Eoghan Murphy releases terrible homeless figures late on a Friday. Today he buried shocking new stats on a busy and tragic news day. MW Leo is off posh-interrailing around EU and producing little of substance on Brexit. These guys   
“Never in over 50 years of working life have I seen the U.K. facing such an abject future,” said John Nelson the former chairman of insurance market Lloyd’s of London #StopBrexit #Brexit #PeoplesVote 
He seems to have done what plenty more are thinking of doing. Not sure that anti-semitism and glib UKIP lines on Brexit is what the Party was ever meant to be about or for  
It’s not the fault of remainers. It’s not the fault of the EU.The shambles of Brexit is the fault of our negligent government who, after 2 years, still don’t have a clue about their Brexit strategy.Also, 17.5m voters were duped by a bunch of lies.  
Please do NOT stockpile tripe in anticipation of post-Brexit shortages.Somewhere in Lancashire, a little old lady will thank you for not disrupting her supply. The BBC Comedy Department, UK Government and the publishers of the Daily Mail will probably be very grateful, too. 
Brexit does not have to happen if we don’t want it toSign up and tell your MP to give you a people’s vote between the deal and  our current EU terms 
All over the UK, the #Brexitometer results are the same. From #Durham to #Devon and from #Norwich to #NorthernIreland, the public support a #PeoplesVote on the final #Brexit deal. Here is a great photo from the Brexitometer in #Whitstable in #Kent on Saturday. #Brexitometers 
We must walk away from Brexit talks now. Theresa May is trying to trap the UK in a terrible Brexit deal that basically continues EU membership. The EU don’t want to negotiate they just want to punish us & remainers in power are more than happy to help the EU. WE MUST WALK NOW  
The Independent comes out in support for a #PeoplesVote The momentum keeps going.#Brexit is not a done deal!  
2016: "There is no downside to Brexit."2018: "Ok, real quick, who has seen the movie 'Alive'?"#AdequateFood 
I'm naming this thread "Only Fools and Horses Brexit"  
Brilliant to have the support of the  Independent for our campaign for a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal. Everyone needs to know this, please RT:  
The betrayal of Brexit result is now complete as prime minister takes control which means being tied to the EU right up till 2021 Democracy is killed by the MP's in westminster the people power must now protect Brexit at all costs by ousting the current 650 members of parliament 
The new Health Secretary has confirmed that the NHS are preparing to stockpile blood, drugs and medical devices to mitigate against a no deal Brexit. A no deal Brexit would devastate British livelihoods. We must fight it at every opportunity. Please RT 
4/ Our threat should not be that of violence and disorder, but of a constant and growing pressure to see the law changed to allow for the retrospective punishment of the worst of the #Brexit crooks, charlatans, liars and cowards. 
So today two government departments have confirmed Brexit means they’re now stockpiling food and medicines. At what point does someone say this is actually ludicrous?  
Why is everyone in Britain freaking out about Brexit stockpiling? Makes obvious sense to prepare for any eventuality. Time to freak out out is if we’re NOT prepared for any eventuality. 
I still say Del Boy Trotter should be in charge of our Brexit negotiations.And everything would soon be cushty.#OnlyFoolsAndHorses 
Elton John: 'There's a new cereal called Brexit. You eat it and you throw up afterwards' “I don’t think people in Britain were told the truth to start with. I don’t think they knew exactly what they were voting for." 
Theresa May is taking personal control over Brexit  
1/ I use some pretty fierce rhetoric about jailing many of the worst of the #Brexit politicians. I believe it is absolutely necessary to make our venal & cowardly MPs realise that they will not be allowed to cheat and harm the British people with assured impunity.#StopBrexit 
Interesting that Britons in EU are referred to as the forgotten victims of Brexit. And so I suppose the rest of us are the remembered victims of Brexit. We’re all victims of Brexit - including those that voted for it - & a few rich exceptions profiteering   
There's a reason why "Brexit dividend will be in 50 years" and"There will be adequate food supplies"weren't written on the side of a bus.(note I don't know the source of this pic - I did not make it!)  
Facebook is opening up a huge new office in London, “despite Brexit” apparently   
Bloody hell! From what I saw at 3:30pm, I had a strange feeling that something is not quite right with the way Dominic Raab handled the questioning at Brexit Commons Committee. Now I learn that PM May has downgraded DExEU and Dominic Raab.  
The @Independent launches campaign for second referendum on Brexit  
7/ The net effect of telling the public "don't worry, the government is stockpiling in case of emergency" is to dampen pressure for a less-insane Brexit and reduce public panic in the face of a starvation catastrophe.In other words, it's to lull us while they drive off a cliff. 
Theresa May's Brexit sell-out continues as she sidelines the Brexit department and puts herself and unelected civil servants in charge of the 'negotiations' with unelected bureaucrats in Brussels.  
So the NHS is stockpiling blood in case of a no deal Brexit. They didn’t put that on a bus.  
I've come up with an absolutely foolproof solution to Brexit. It's going to take a while to type it all out, so bear with me. 
A no-deal Brexit could make most of us poorer – and Jacob Rees-Mogg richer | Molly Scott Cato  
The Independent's front page: Why Britain needs a referendum on the Brexit deal. The people made the initial decision, they should also make the final one. We have a total stalemate in parliament and only a referendum can break that!  
The European Commission has backed a newly-launched petition calling for Britons to be able to retain EU rights after Brexit  
THE @Independent launches a campaign for a new referendum.The British people must have the #Final Say on the #Brexit deal' 
How alarmed or not do you feel now Tory Gov. is talking about stockpiling food, in case of no deal Brexit?Retweet so this reaches more people thank you. 
Remember that torrential rain on Britain's EU referendum day?New study finds it probably hurt LEAVE!"if the referendum had taken place on a sunny day, there would have been a small increase in the margin of victory for Vote Leave" 
We are seeking to avoid a no-deal Brexit, but to ensure people’s health needs are provided for in the event of a no-deal Brexit, we’re accelerating contingency plans. At the @CommonsHealth Select Committee hearing today: pic.twitter.com/JbOLl1zQbr 
As someone who relies on a range of lifelong, CANNOT be stopped medications this is terrifying me, please for gods sake stop Brexit, I don’t deserve to have my health and life put at risk, no one does just so the rich can get richer and destroy peoples rights 
5/ So the cost of warehousing is going to skyrocket as Brexit approaches, thus tying up even more working capital that businesses would prefer to be using productively.I suspect many businesses will cross their fingers, hope hard brexit is averted, and not bother stockpiling. 
1/ Stockpiling food and meds for a hard Brexit is just propaganda to reassure Brits that it's going to be okay.Really, it's not going to be okay.Here's why. (Thread.) 
Raab is the footman of Brexit says @GerardBattenMEP 
"Never in over 50 years of working life have I seen the U.K. facing such an abject future," former Lloyd's of London chairman says of Brexit  
In preparation for a No Deal Brexit I’ve just sold my best cow for a handful of magic beans. 
7) so, if you are a Labour supporter but worried about hard brexit, the economy or more importantly rising extremism - Corbyn won't save you.  He is part of the problem, slowly pushing for a harder Brexit than MayIf you don't push him out - you doom the country to Moggs vision 
We* lived through the Blitz! We can survive Brexit! *I didn't I wasn't born then, but I grew up with everyone that did telling me how they suffered years and years of hardship and rationing through no fault of their own. 
This Leave voter is fed up with how the PM is handling Brexit, but he’s also angry with Nigel Farage - for allowing it to turn into a “shambles”  
The shambles, Sir, is the Tories. A Party that led us into the EU Referendum saying they'd respect the result. A Party that attempted to propagandise us to Remain, using public money! That's wrecked every opportunity since, a Party few have faith in anymore. And, nor should you.  
Why EFTA may be the only way to save Brexit -  
it's all very well saying "we survived the blitz so we can survive brexit" but would we have survived the blitz with the knowledge we had decided to bomb ourselves with our own planes 
BrexitCatch itBin itKill it#fbpe #ExitFromBrexit 
ALL OUTLETS EMBARGOED UNTIL WEDNESDAY 9AM: UK government's new chief Brexit negotiator revealed.  
3) some of those Corbyn supporters are no longer supporters as they realised his true #Brexit positionSome have decided that Corbyn is more important than BrexitBut most believed the "long game" theoryBrexit is bad, Corbyn is goodErgo Corbyn must hate BrexitHe doesn't 
'You are not to BLAME!' Rees-Mogg ATTACKS on 'worrying' Theresa May Brexit meddling Jacob Rees Mogg  forensically skewers Oilly RobinsThe Appeaser must for gods sake be sacked.She’s working for the EU. 
"Hormones in beef, chicken chlorinatedNo deal Brexit, in trade isolatedStockpiling medicine, eating from tinsThese are a few of the adequate things"  
See, whatever your view on Brexit, I think it's important that we all stay calm and respect the democratic decision that these stupid thick cunts voted for. 
Everyone in the Tory cabinet has either resigned given up or Raab one minute Brexit Secretary next minute Teereza Sméagol’s lapdog as May consults her chicken Lasagne boiled potatoe 150 recipe books the country is melting 
Get ready for Brexit day  #FBPE 
This is what all the mendacious promises of Brexit have come too. At least you will not starve.  
If the government had said before the referendum that in 2018 it would be stockpiling food in advance of Brexit it would have made zero difference to the result, stop kidding yourselves. 
It’s almost as if this government is in chaos and Brexit is undeliverable...#FFS#Peoplesvote 
There are no benefits of Brexit, but the benefit of being a Labour Party Member is that we can change Party policy at Conference.Support our campaign with @Remain_Labour and pass our contemporary motion in your CLP calling for a #PeoplesVoteHelp to change our position here  
I am at an event on House of Commons terrace. Some very serious speeches going on. And a party boat goes past with everyone on board chanting “bollocks to Brexit”. Gave me a much needed smile after a crap day. Raised my glass to them. 
As Parliament winds down, we will spend the summer working to reverse #Brexit, prep for a #PeoplesVote & work on a manifesto for the UK in case of snap election. The fight does not stop. #FBPE 
IT'S ABSOLUTE RUBBISH THAT MAY is the only thing preventing Corbyn from taking over.  If @borisjohnson was Tory leader he would destroy @jeremycorbyn in a straight  GE fight.  Boris knows how to win!  HUGELY POPULAR.  May is hated!  .  #borisjohnson #boris_johnson #Brexit  
The @Conservatives need to know that this is not our #Brexit ... I won't vote for them ever again if they continue with their #SoftBrexit. The UK will become an extreme right wing nation because of their inability to act upon the result of the #EUReferendum ! 
'The referendum gave sovereignty to the British people, so now they deserve a final say on the Brexit deal' #FinalSay 
'Coup' claims as Theresa May sidelines Brexit Secretary Dominic Raab and boosts top official  
Jeremy Corbyn has finally come clean over his views on Brexit  
If Scotland chooses to join the EU, then we’ll have the same trade deal with England as the EU will have, plus all of the EU trade deals across the globe that Brexit England won’t have.  
On the day the leader of the Labour Party was banging the drum for Brexit because it devalued the pound  
Tice adds “This is devastating news to the 17.4m people that voted to leave the EU as we now look set for #Brexit In Name Only “The Prime Minister has made yet another catastrophic error and has lost the trust of majority of the British people. Chequers does not mean Brexit”  
Singer Elton John tells us #Brexit is like walking through Hampton court maze blindfold! 
I want everyone to know that @CharlieElphicke thinks collecting vat on online purchases is a great idea-he doesn’t realise that many goods will be subject to duties and must be paid prior to release .. absolute class act Charlie - genius . Brexit really does make you poorer 
Last GE: Lab a mess, economy/jobs looking good, UKIP threat dispersed, Brexit momentum favoured Cons. All that & Cons still needed the DUP.Prelude to next GE: Tory memberships torn up, activists/campaigners disgusted, 17.4m Brexiters betrayed, UKIP surge.  
It’s okay Stuart you can come round our house. Down in our basement we already have a wall of spam, a cheese string grotto and a seating area made entirely out of fray bentos pies. We’re cliff edge Brexit ready. Bring it on!!!!  
Don't blame theEU: it’s UK law that now says that we cannot build any post-#brexit infrastructure on the #Irish #Border, as wld be needed under WTOrules for a #NoDeal Brexit (or with deal, but leaving #CustomsUnion) EUWithdrawalAct,Section10,Clause2b: 
#EUSailorGirl and Captain @mikegalsworthy on board the BON VOYAGE #BREXIT boat party  #BollockstoBrexit 
Dirty DUP money funded Leave advertising in England. The sheer stink coming off the Leave ref campaigns & corrupt result makes one gag. Brexit cannot stand. Brexit must not stand. This is not democracy. The #PeoplesVote is coming. #StopBrexit FBPE   
I'm sick of English politicians talking about respecting referendum results when they have trampled all over the Devolution settlement agreed by a referendum 20 years ago #YouYesYet #indyref2 
The bad news (or good news depending on your pov), is the EU knows the UK holds no cards, and the UK knows the EU knows. So yes, the government knows Brexit has already failed & the least humiliating option is flip to Remain before Labour does. The ERG will blame TM come what may  
“Obviously there will be a cost for this”.Britain, this is common sense calling. Your Secretary of State for Health is talking about stockpiling medicines & medical devices in the event of a No Deal Brexit. This is peacetime. Repeat. Peacetime.  
Everything Theresa May does turns to shitA total utter failureEvery red line she throws down she crossesThere are few voters left for her to alienateNow she wants to take full control of Brexit with Olly Robbins pulling her strings..and Tory MPs have their head in the sand 
"Blood for the Brexit God" just doesn't have the same ring to it, don't you think?  
This is a farce. How long will the government pretend this is what people were promised?! Stockpiling medicine and food is not what the Brexiters promised and the public must be given the final say with the chance to exit from Brexit.  
So in just two short years, Tory Brexiteers have gone from:“Brexit will be amazing - it will give us £350m extra every week to spend on anything we like!”To:“We will do our best to ensure that nobody starves to death - but no guarantees” 
So Theresa the Appeaser announces she’s going to take control of Brexit negotiations, Raab will be her stand in & I presume Olly Robins will call the shots behind the scenes, she proves her Remainer credentials, more fool MPs that she’s stalled this long & hoodwinked us all. 
Wow, the full sell out of Britain and betrayal of Brexit is on! No more voting tory for me. Could be the last tory government in almost a generation.  
Parliament Must be recalled for PM to explain why she has grabbed control of Brexit negotiations. Why can’t she trust this to ministerial control? This is undemocratic and the British People deserve a full explanation from the dispatch box!!! RT if you agree. 
‘We still haven't won the arguments we lost in the #EUreferendum.’ Read and share @Jon_Danzig’s commentary on the ineffectiveness of the pro-#Remain, anti-#Brexit movement since May 2015. Link:  
Theresa May wants to take control of the Brexit negotiations. So if she’s stating that she wants to take control now, what on earth has she been doing for the last 2 years? 
Imagine a Labour leader that was against Brexit? Imagine a labour Leader that actually opposed the Tories instead of enabling them? Imagine a UK wide labour that didn't take Tory money to go against a country (which they were founded from) and deny them self determination.  
The Supreme Court of England will most certainly put the Scottish Parliament in it's place later this year.In the meantime the @scotgov must protect us from the horrors of a Hard Brexit.#DissolveTheUnion now thanks. 
#ToryBadNews is always a headline on the last day of parliament as the Tories attempt to sneak out their fuck-ups before they run away for recess.Hilariously, Brexit continues to destroy them with Raab here demoted to deputy BrexSec inside 2 weeks & May taking over herself. pic.twitter.com/8PoOP00dJ2 
DOMINIC RAAB HUMILIATED. May demotes him to Deputy, after Olly Robbins strips the Brexit department of 50 negotiators.  BRUTAL.  FGS  Brexiteers!   Fight back or resign!  @borisjohnson #boris johnson  #borisjohnson #Brexit 
I’m unsure how to approach this idiotic comment . All I can safety say is the tories couldn’t run a bath let alone he country or brexit - but what’s worse is you couldn’t even turn the tap on . Go and join UKIP - you can attend some of Gerard’s marches for his mate tommy .  
Bugger Brexit. Here’s a picture of our puppy instead  
Do you know the worst thing about making this? I started making it BEFORE the Brexit negotiator (David Davis) quit, before Boris Johnson quit, and before we found out that Vote Leave definitely broke the law. I was like "Well do I wait for the next thing?"  
Farage goes full Nazi and warns about Jews in America. This is the same Farage that used threat of the UK being invaded by Turks to persuade people to vote for #Brexit 
The Eu has been clear what Brexit would mean. A third country. It s normal that a non-member would not get the same benefits as a member. Otherwise what would be the point of a membership. Uk s best deal is the deal they currently have. 
Do you remember that vote leave matter last week?Did you know that the Electoral Commission have today fined the Soros backed @BestForBritain remain campaign for donation and spending issues?Why isn’t this making news and headlines?#Brexit 
Have Boris Johnson, Michael Gove et al been interviewed by the police yet after #VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw Brexit revelations? When might this be happening @theresa_may ? #VoteLeaveCheated 
Arron Banks: Brexit donor paid thousands to Lesotho government minister.Even the BBC are reporting it. Gosh.  
I had a horrible exchange with Lord Tebbit in the House of Lords today about my work to stop Brexit. Really shocked at what he said, and fortified that we have to stop this nigjtmare becoming true 
In lieu of the fact that Theresa May will now personally oversee the Brexit negotiations; the PM has appointed #Raab to become minister without pride. 
Oh good, we’re stockpiling blood for Brexit.  
Jacob Rees-Mogg says 'UK is heading for no deal Brexit  via @MailOnline 
Through President Trump, USA is run by the consent of the governed.Through...who...are Germany, France, and fake-Brexit England run by the consent of the governed?In America, one man has made all the difference.In Europe another man has made all the difference: George Soros. 
The Conservatives brought #DarkMoney in from Russia in 2013. Since then they have committed election fraud and gamed the Brexit referendum. But it is a pure "conspiracy theory" to suggest they meddled with the 2014 independence referendum. 
Great work man. It takes real courage to admit that you've been duped by fake news reporting & retract what you've said. I'm with you entirely on still having a beef with Brexit. Hopefully Labour will pivot away from it when the full scale of the disaster becomes more obvious.  
Theresa May takes personal charge of Brexit talks  
Yes - under EU law “substances of human origin” refers mainly to blood and also tissues and organs... so the Health Secretary is referring to the need for blood stockpiles in event of No Deal Brexit  
Are you happy with Theresa May taking personal charge of the Brexit talks? @Nigel_Farage is live #FarageOnLBC 
Brexit minister Dominic Raab says food stockpiling is vital due to risk of a no deal #FlounceOutBrexit but this won't be led by the government. Maybe in the world of @DominicRaab people have spare money to stock up on food but a great many people struggle through a day at a time 
Will we be stockpiling doctors and nurses too that we are also haemorrhaging and won't have access to after Brexit?#StopBrexit 
Well. Health Secretary says UK is now also planning to fund No Deal Brexit stockpiles for medicines, medical devices and “substances of human origin” [blood??]  
Quentin Letts - "The political class have been able to nullify #Brexit, they’ve been able to rubbish it enough that we’ve ended up with this Chequers agreement which is a terrible damp squib."  
Plain English guide needed so that everyone can see the full implications for health of a No-Deal Brexit. This goes far beyond just tariffs. Would hit every stage from research & safe manufacturing to timely availability of medicines & products in hospitals & pharmacies  
Seriously, how would these people have survived The Blitz? We beat the Luftwaffe yet we cannot live after Brexit?   
British citizens voted for #Brexit. Brexit isn't happening. Challenge: explain why not in five words. #BrexitBetrayalInFiveWords 
Can't wait to start my Brexit diet. Goingskinny #adequatefood 
Lying remainer Theresa May puts final nail in Brexit coffin  @ElContador2000 @Smileygirl19681 @dizzytex @TeddyUKIPClark @Lin46222208 @lorraineSW1 @PatrioticBrits @SuzieSzabo2 @gs_burns @Testo_Squirrel @SueWhitaker11 @KarenTh68228076 @Karenco30 
MPs put your country first. There’s no such thing as a Brexit dividend. We’ll be much worse off cast loose from our nearest neighbour, the EU. #StopBrexit #PeoplesVote @euromove @Labour4EU 
What cabinet ministers were saying about Brexit a year ago.  
The ladybird book of PRETEND EATING part of the #Brexit fun a land games series  
Blue passports AND rationing?! Well, Brexit is shaping up to be a real treat for those 1950s fanboys and fangirls who voted for it. Next up, polio and corporal punishment!  
Brexit:From -'and we will make a success of it'To-'there will be adequate food supplies'This is the galactic fuck up of all fucking fuck ups, it's a good fucking job that fuck ups are pretty much self fucking sustaining because they can't even manage to fuck up a fuck up. 
Just returned from filming in Kent...Catching up on“It would be wrong to describe it as the Government doing the stockpiling...” which was Brexit Sec’s response to question of plans for stockpiles of food for No Deal BrexitVia @BenGartside 
Don't worry about a hard brexit: you won't be forced to eat the family pets.  
- No debt - No internal corruption - We don't call decent supporters 'Nazis' and 'racists' - Our policies go beyond Brexit For Britain and @AMDWaters are the clear choice for patriotic voters.Get involved. Get active! 
Dear @ChukaUmunna, Parliament won't accept a no-deal, but there is zero sign of a Commons majority for any other course of action. So there would seem to be a risk of the country falling off the no-deal cliff by accident.#Brexit #StopBrexit #PeoplesVote 
Theresa May is taking personal control of Brexit.  
My catheters are from Sweden.  Need about 5 boxes per month. Also medications. Can  the Government advise what patients should do about essential medicines & medical supplies?  NHS not keen on us stockpiling. Brexit rather serious from where I'm sitting. 
Unless I blinked and missed it #bbcnews at Six on BBC1 didn't mention May elbowing Raab aside and taking over #Brexit negotiations herself, nor mention any of today's Brexit developments at all.Most important UK issue for 60 years or hot weather? No contest. 
Just had the awful realisation that after Brexit, Lurpack is going to cost about 400 quid per 250g. 
Learning to Poach part of the ladybird #brexit skills series  
'No deal' Brexit is 'Armageddon scenario' for farming, NFU President warns.Brexiters: “What would the NFU President know about farming and Brexit? I spoke with Bob down the boozer. He’s a plasterer, but he says farmers will be fine - it’s Project Fear!’ 
Lest we forget, if Scotland chooses to join the EU, then we’ll have the same deal with England as the EU will have, plus all of the EU trade deals across the globe that Brexit England _ won’t_ have.  
MPs from across the political spectrum are coming together to demand the people be given the final say on the deal--and a chance to exit from Brexit #fbpe 
Petition: Rescind Art.50 if Vote Leave has broken Electoral Laws regarding 2016 referendum  
The Govt has announced we may have to stockpile food in readiness for Brexit. We're expected to suck up food shortages for the sake of the "people's will". What sort of democracy is this? It's not the one that my father's generation fought WW2 for.#PeoplesVote 
The @No10Vigil boat party bids BON VOYAGE #BREXIT!!!!!!  #StopBrexit #BollocksToBrexit #EUsailorGirl 
Kevin Hague keeps posting approving reviews of his, "Don't mention the Brexit!", report.The three Profs. all did videos for Better Together's Youtube channel & both Sir Andrew Large & Brian Quinn came out for Better Together in the media. Not exactly an unbiased sample.  
Just listened to Arron Banks interviewed on @BBCRadio4 news; this plausible deniability tactic is beginning to curl up at the edges. So that's a bribery allegation to go with all the others.....tick tock. 
Seriously what is so special about the Union that you would sell your constituents down the Brexit river in the name of it? 
THEY'RE PLANNING FOR A NO-FOOD BREXIT AND APPARENTLY EVERYTHING'S FINE. 
A no-deal Brexit could make most of us poorer – and Jacob Rees-Mogg richerThe Brextremists are using this national calamity to turn back the clock and if we don’t #StopBrexit we could lose many of the social and economic gains of democracy 
Brexit not invent yet, so just make big difficult toilet dirt of actual own self bum on cave doorstep for now. 
Things don't seem to be going well in the Brexit department...  
The LADYBIRD BOOK of GROUNDED FLIGHTS.Part of the 'Learning to Live with #Brexit' series.#LadybirdBrexit #FBPE 
I know I'm showing my ignorance, but I hadn't heard of David Davis, Dominic Raab or Olly Robbins before Brexit was a thingAnd yet many were persuaded by the Brexit argument "I bet you can't name this EU Commissioner"But they've arguably been the most powerful MPs in the UK! 
Dear friends, it has been very moving to receive today personal accounts of how brexit will negatively affect people, their SME businesses, their lives. I suggest that as well as sharing them here send them to local rags, local community associations. This is real #FBPE 
*soft Brexit negotiations  
No harm, but see when the outcome of a referendum being implemented leads to a state of emergency & rationing of food, (gov would rather we didn't talk about stockpiling)at what point do you literally CALL IT OFF AS A BAD JOB #Brexit #brexitshambles #PeoplesVote 
Saddened by @jeremycorbyn speech today.He said: "A Labour #Brexit could provide real opportunities, as well as protections for our exporters."The truth: Any form of Brexit will undermine exporters, cost jobs and hit hardest those who have least. 
Here’s a tweet I’m going to be able to retweet whenever I want and it’s bound to apply to some piece of breaking news:If Brexit is such a good idea, why is everything so utterly shit? 
Dominic Raab calls this afternoon’s take over of his  #Brexit negotiator role by PM “some shifting of the Whitehall deckchairs”.  Not , given the inevitable #Titanic analogy, the best choices of words .  Next he will be humming “Abide With Me”…. 
Does it look like Brexit is going well?  
Theresa May to take charge of Brexit negotiations in Brussels with Dominic Raab 'sidelined' to domestic plans  
The only hope of heading off a sell-out Brexit is now a) the overthrow of May and replacement with Boris or b) no deal.  It’s clear that if May remains in charge or if (god forbid) we get a Labour government, a real Brexit will never happen.  
Theresa May’s sidelining of Dominic Raab shows that the Prime Minister has stopped her puppeteer strategy and is choosing to openly bungle Brexit instead. 
Are you happy with @theresa_may’s announcement where she said that she is sidelining the #Brexit Minister (@DominicRaab) and will now lead #Brexit negotiations herself with @OllyRobbins.Please RT for wider sample. 
NEWS! Woman who can’t negotiate agreement inside her own party confident she can handle Brexit  
BREXIT CHAOS: A no-deal Brexit could make most of us poorer – and Jacob Rees-Mogg richer /#EU #Brexit #PeoplesVote 
The Conservatives are making a mess of Brexit, bringing us closer to a no deal with each passing day. Their ideological pursuit of Brexit means leaving at any cost.  It is essential that the people are now given the final say on the deal and a chance to #ExitfromBrexit. #fbpe 
Brexit is starting to look really appealing with all this talk of stockpiling food. Imagine no more people boring you with their organic kale quiche recipes and coffee grown by beverage curators. 
With Theresa May taking personal charge of Brexit negotiations and ministers now admitting that there may be food and medicine shortages, it should be increasingly plain that there is no Brexit deal that is as good as remaining in the EU. #ExitfromBrexit #PeoplesVote 
New boy Raab creating quite a stir in the world of Brexit.Apparently he’s promised,Wait for it....Adequate Food!!Brexit. As good as it gets.Why didn’t we do it years ago...#StopBrexitSaveBritain 
New Brexit Secretary Dominic Raab admits that the Chequers plan for a common rulebook will hamper the UK's ability to sign free trade deals after Brexit: "I'm not going to tell you that if we didn't have full regulatory autonomy it wouldn't be an additional string to our bow"  
Largest political donor in British history and bank-roller of Brexit but where did Arron Banks’s money come from? He sought Russian investment for barren diamond mine. An excellent short film by @jrug I’m signing cross-party letter calling on @NCA_UK to investigate#Brexitgate 
There is so much "being clear" going on in government today, I'm afraid it leaves most of us not clear about anything much at all. #Brexit#LastDayOfTerm 
Investing in infrastructure, health, education, and in manufacturing which can sell to countries from within the European Union, would provide thousands of jobs, boost our economic growth, and will create lots of skilled work for the next generation. Without Brexit. 
Brexit: Raab 'sidelined' as May takes control of EU negotiations  @theresa_may @DominicRaab @BorisJohnson   Geez when will you get rid of this stupid woman. I have been a Tory all my life but she has to go if i ever vote tory again.  Ukip here i come 
In a #PeoplesVote - a huge 77% of #Labour voters would vote to #Remain. We need a change in direction. We need @UKLabour policy on #Brexit to represent the many, not the few.  
Gov’t slips out a long trail of inconvenient announcements as MPs head for parliamentary recess.EU law will continue to apply for years after Brexit, despite May's promise otherwise.Funding for free nursery milk to be cut & it’s a real terms pay cut for public sector workers 
The Maybot is in total control of Brexit God help us all. A complete and utter remoaner let off the leash without being held too account. Put herself in charge your having a laugh, we are well and truly screwed now. This imbecile can't control het Cabinet let alone Europe. 
BBC News - Theresa May takes personal charge of Brexit talks This convinces me more, that it's her hubby & his mates that are at the back of destroying the UK, for money,if this was America, she'd be impeached for her actions. 
I'd like to us to start prioritising British manufacturing and engineering, I'd also like to see us educating training up a workforce in other key industries on which we depend, like healthcare, social work and construction. We don't need Brexit to do this. 
The UK is already losing £440m a week because of Brexit - and we haven't even left the EU yet. The economy shrinkage far exceeds any weekly budget payments to the EU. Brexit is sinking the UK. This is on you, Tories! #CompeteAndUtterBrexitClusterFuck...We have to #StopBrexit now! pic.twitter.com/hwD9PFgBiR 
Corbyn is right. Globalisation, without intervention to protect jobs in Britain, is leaving communities behind.Corbyn laid out his plans for post-Brexit Britain: bringing back manufacturing and creating jobs.The misreporting has been ridiculously bad. 
Today you sold out brexit even more.May appointed herself in charge of negotiations She gave Robbins more powerShe extended the leave dateUnacceptable. #MAYMUSTGO 
A no-deal Brexit could make most of us poorer – and Jacob Rees-Mogg richer | Molly Scott Cato  
The last person we'd choose to run #Brexit negotiations is the person who's just taken over, assisted by an unelected Remainer civil servant. She must be removed now before she does more damage.  This can't wait.Distinctive #Brexit research & news daily:  
WATCH: while MPs head off for the summer, young people concerned about their future if Brexit goes ahead grade the Gov. With grades like these, the Gov should be doing some retakes. Join our calls for a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal:  
Most of all, it is disingenuous to imply that Brexit provides new opportunities for boosting British manufacture, when these are opportunities we always had, and opportunities now marred by Brexit. I repeat: THERE IS NO 'JOBS FIRST' BREXIT. 
Corbyn said: “A lack of support for manufacturing is sucking … any hope of secure well-paid jobs from a generation of our young people.” Brexit doesn't provide support for manufacturing, it does the complete opposite, and workers and young people will pay the price for that. 
Moment Tory Brexit Secretary is interrupted by news of his own demotion  The jingle of the Sky News phone app alert could be heard as Brexit Secretary Dominic Raab faced questions from the Commons Brexit Committee   
BOMBSHELL: Olly Robbins was ordered by Theresa May to sideline David Davis. Davis finished the White Paper which delivered a True Brexit. May held it back from being published.Then at Chequers May took the betrayal plan by Olly Robbins. Davis only found out on the day. #Brexit 
Fruit farm loses £350,000 worth of produce due to seasonal picker shortages. The damage Brexit recklessness has already done and it has even properly begun. Not impressed with Johnny-come-lately Tories MPs on this -asleep at wheel- did nothing for 2 years.  
Democracy cant work without an oppositon. When it comes to Brexit - which is based on some most troubling political narratives of my lifetime -we have no official opposition. Agree w Corbyn that we need a plan, but not one based on a fantasy about Britain’s role in global economy  
At least the Remainers in No10 are not pretending anymore. "Brexit" being organised by Remainers.  
The Continuity Bill challenge in the Supreme Court is Scotland's equivalent of the Brexit negotiations. Instead of London against Brussels, it's London against us. Watch the coverage from *our* MSM and transpose it onto Brexit. Imagine the EU argument getting *this* coverage.  
Rees-Mogg goes after Theresa May, directly blaming the prime minister for letting/ordering her chief EU adviser Olly Robbins drawing up papers for the cabinet to decide the government's future relationship with the EU without the former Brexit Secretary David Davis's knowledge 
Theresa May has just demoted Dominic Raab. She has confirmed the new Brexit secretary will not be in charge of the talks in Brussels, issuing a statement saying she is taking the lead from now on. I’m heading straight to Sainsburys for a big shop  
When is MSM going to stop giving airtime to this pathetic piece of political novichok?  Grieve’s toxic, persistent and hysterical scaremongering about Brexit is a disgrace. He is Barnier’s stooge in all but name.  
We voted #Leave because we didn't want to be ruled by unelected bureaucrats.  Now we have EU-loving unelected bureaucrat Olly Robbins placed in sole charge of #Brexit negotiations by the useless May.  I despair. 
No one elected Oliver Robbins. He is not accountable to the electorate. He should not be sitting there as though he runs the #Brexit negotiations for Britain. Theresa May is a weak and feeble leader.#MayMustGo Any MP worth their salt should send their letter to Graham Brady. 
Tories main focus in today’s Brexit cttee evidence session is to beat up on Ollie Robbins for the Chequers proposal.  Very big and brave.  How about taking responsibility for the choice their Brexit forces on the country: economic damage v adherence to common rules? 
THERESA MAY: "Have a good summer holiday everyone, by the way I've personally taken over negotiating Brexit, given my blessing to the death penalty and approved fracking projects. Enjoy the sunshine. Don't do anything I wouldn't do. Byeeee." 
If anyone wonders whether Brits will cause absolute chaos by panic buying just before No Deal Brexit, I would point you towards what happened when Build-A-Bear Workshop had a special offer. 
"Despite assurances from Michael Gove last year that Brexit would not impact Welsh branding on food, what we’ve seen this week at the Royal Welsh show is a sign of things to come."@DaiLloydAM 
With Brexit Secretary Raab so quickly demoted to May's bag-carrier I'm wondering if Barnier's team phoned May and said "Merde alors! Why have you sent us this stupid and arrogant boy?" #Brexit #bbcnews 
Today in Parliament Ian Paisley reaped what he sowed.The biggest losers in this scandalous saga are the Brexit voting people of North Antrim who in upcoming crucial votes will now be left without a voice or a vote, because of the antics of Mr Paisley. 
Now this is interesting - snuck out as the Commons winds down it confirms what has been the case - disastrously it has to be said - for a long time ; the PM is steering the #Brexit ship….straight for the rocks …  
SADIST MAY GLOATS as Raab demoted, in the ritual humiliation of Brexiteers  He is now DEPUTY to incompetent May!  Show some guts and resign Dominic!  @borisjohnson #borisjohnson #boris johnson #Brexit…  #borisjohnson #borisjohnson #boris johnson 
Lord Adonis says crisis in Brexit negotiations means Parliament should sit to exercise oversight. 
Everything. Every f*cking thing this Tory Govt do, from now until we kick their arses to the kerb, will be blamed on Brexit. I for one am sick of it. They've had 8 yrs to fuck this country up and have succeeded. Has the #DisabilitySummit had press coverage? No. Says it all. 
I mean, how the hell can you look at your children and somehow explain food rationing to them being a good thing just cos little England wants Brexit based on the back of xenophobia?"You can't eat but blue passports" 
A ‘no deal’ Brexit would have significant ramifications for the UK’s access to new medicines and devices. Read @TheBMA briefing on ‘Medicines and medical devices regulation’ on why it’s so important for the U.K. & EU to reach agreement on this vital issue:  
A no-deal Brexit could make most of us poorer – and Jacob Rees-Mogg richer | Molly Scott Cato  
EU put EU stooges in to run Greece and Italy.Now they have put an EU stooge, Holly Robbins, to stop #Brexit.EU will stop at nothing to get their own way. 
The only reason Theresa May has time to take on the duties of Brexit Secretary is because Jacob Rees Mogg has taken over her duties as Prime Minister. 
“May will take charge of Brexit negotiations”.  Good.  So the failure will have her name all over it.  But why appoint Raab, if she’s doing the job herself?  He should resign — he’ll be no more than the messenger boy. 
.@MattHancock : "The department is working up options with industry for stockpiling medicines, medical devices and substances of human origin in the case of a no-deal Brexit. Obviously there will be a cost for this." 
The closest thing to No Deal we’ve ever experienced is the chaos and shortages we get when it snows: Brexit is like a bad winter; but forever. This plot seems awfully bloody familiar! 
2016: Brexit will solve all of Britain's problems!2018: there will be "adequate food"2019: soylent green is poor people  
"Until we know the truth, there will be a question mark hanging over the legitimacy of the referendum result."Labour MP Ben Bradshaw has been campaigning for an investigation into businessman Arron Banks and his connections to the Brexit campaign. Banks denies any wrongdoing. pic.twitter.com/NB4xTFXeTo 
Study after study has shown that Brexit will create more problems for local businesses, not reduce them. To defend jobs & improve manufacturing, the obvious answer is to stay in the single market. Why is that so difficult? 
Dominic Raab reacts to the news he is no longer in charge of Brexit negotiations.  
The results are in. From an entirely representative sample of the UK population, contrary to Jeremy Hunt's view, 5% would blame the EU for a no deal Brexit. 93% blame the Tories, and/or Rees-Moggski.  
New Health Secretary Matt Hancock tells @CommonsHealth he’s ordered stockpiling of vital medicines & medical equipment for no-deal #Brexit, but doesn’t say for how long & ignores short shelf life & no domestic manufacturing capacity in many areas. #BrexitShambles #PeoplesVote 
Olly Robbins in the #Brexit committee this afternoon [at 15:12] claimed that the #ChequersPlan is entirely consistent with May's Mansion House speech This Remainer sophistry and spin is staggering. We all know that this is simply untrue  
She means Olly Robbins - there is something very underhand going on here!! I do not trust her or her side kicks at all - she will be giving away that many concessions it's become a joke - NO #BREXITEER NOW INVOLVED IN #BREXIT just think about that  
And so it begins. The UK is going to gut Russian influence & money in their country. To that end, countries like Australia have come to Britain's aid by offering free trade agreements to take up the financial slack, post BrexitH/t @MauiMeow00@thespybrief@LouiseMensch 
City council of rural Nebraska city of 857 votes 4-0 to hold a referendum on whether to ban residents from renting homes to unauthorized immigrants, as a nearby community does:  
In 2016 Dominic Raab waxed lyrical about the glorious economic future of #Brexit Britain. Now he's Brexit Secretary & his promises have shrunk:"We will make sure there is adequate food supplies."Thanks, Dominic. We're all very grateful.#PeoplesVote 
Brilliant move Theresa! Now get on with the softest Brexit possible... there’s a good girl   
The Government has "no clue on how to execute Brexit without severe harm" - Airbus Chief Executive Tom Enders  
Brexit Secretary @DominicRaab: “a lot of work has already been done on ‘no-deal’ planning preparation” 
Progress is in danger of being reversed. WE are working to ensure that women's rights are protected and expanded in the UK regardless of the outcome of #Brexit negotiations.  
UK PM May says she will lead Brexit talks from now on  
Brexit is not a policy: it is a sitcom that never ends.   
As Theresa May strips Dominic Raab of responsibility for Brexit, he will in future be known as the ‘Minister For Procurement Of Tinned Food’. 
LIVE: PM takes charge of Brexit and sidelines RaabMore power handed to May's top Brexit civil servant Olly Robbins  
Astonishing how little he knows about the make up of the labour market in Scotland and Scottish population trends....Jeremy Corbyn to highlight economic 'benefit' of Brexit & demands UK stop relying on “cheap labour from abroad' | The Independent  
Can't wait for Live Aid '20. It'll take place in Ethiopia in aid of Brexit Britain. 
As a 74 year old, I hate to say this, but Labour needs a younger, more adept leader able to take advantage of the situation rather than someone wh is stuck in 1974. It’s this regressive thinking by so many Brits that’s got us into this idiotic - longing for the past - Brexit.  
Today's crisis in liberalism began with the fall of the Berlin Wall in 1989. Brexit is just one of the latest manifestations #OpenFuture 
I mean, UK, I don't want to tell you how to do your job, and god knows the US isn't in a position to be smug about any damn thing, and yet: Maybe this Brexit thing is not in your best interest. 
She's moved the goalposts yet again?It's unlikely people will stand for this much longer.@BorisJohnson @Jacob_Rees_Mogg You need to do *something* to get Brexit back on track.Don't leave it too late.  *please*.  
For months it has been claimed that Theresa May has been sidelining the Brexit department. Now, the PM has confirmed that is exactly what she is doing, says @goodenoughtom 
And there’s a relief: “Brexit secretary insists government will ‘make sure there is adequate food supply’ if UK leaves EU with no deal - The Independent  
Isn’t Brexit brilliant? “No-deal Brexit will make it ‘illegal’ to pay pensions to retired British expats living in EU, MPs told - The Independent  
I hope all you remoaners shut up now. Brexit's gonna be so great that we shouldn't need rationing!  
In 2 years since the EU referendum we’ve gone from: “Take back to control”“No downside to Brexit”“Brexit means Brexit”“Red white & blue Brexit”“Soft Brexit”“Hard Brexit”“No deal Brexit”“State of emergency Brexit”And Brexit hasn’t even happened yet. 
Did Dominic Raab really just describe his sidelining as Brexit Secretary as "shuffling the deckchairs"..?Really?That's a Titanic mistake, surely... 
This is @OllyRobbins, the man who is driving #Brexit negotiations and telling the Prime Minister what to do. Olly is a remainer.Olly has been steering the PM for ages and was instrumental is the disregarding of the #Brexit department.Olly is not elected. #MAYMUSTGO 
Theresa May today stripped the Brexit Department of its job being in charge of Brexit talks as she announced the UK will stay under EU laws for 21 more months  
MP fails to declare free holidays & could be forced out if 10% of his constituents sign a petition.But the 158 MPs who voted to stop #Brexit, even though they represent a LEAVE constituency,can't be forced to stand down.Surely overturning the vote of 17.4m is more important? 
"Brexit department downgraded as May says Cabinet Office now in charge of negotiations"Words like "Blimey" and "cluster****" and "farce" come to mind. And Dominic Raab's ego must be a little bruised.   
The Brexit promise really quickly went from ‘Britain will enter a new era of global trade and sovereignty’ to ‘you won’t starve.’  
High Court rules State is entitled to its costs of failed bids by Charles Byrne and Joanna Jordan to challenge abortion referendum result. Costs of State and Refetendum Commission estimated over €200k. Stay applies to Friday on certification of result to allow Ms Jordan appeal. 
Theresa May takes personal charge of Brexit talks  
Hilary Benn - “Is the government considering stockpiling food?”Dominic Raab - “We will make sure there is adequate food supplies.”Brexit means blue ration books?  
May's promise that the Brexit negotiations would be handled by a Leave supporter was never kept. Instead the negotiation / capitulation was handled by a Remainer PM and her Remainer chief civil servant…  #BrexitBetrayal 
Don’t blame the Tories for a Brexit ‘no deal’  
Theresa May thinks she has breathing time now. This is the time for us to come together, decide how we will remove her and get the brexit we voted for. 
How come a Prime Minister who can't negotiate agreement amongst her cabinet, is best person to negotiate a UK/EU deal? #Brexit #BrexitShambles 
Has reached 180,000Whilst an impressive number, need more.If you haven't signed why not? Are you prepared to let them ruin country on basis of illegal, misled, lied to referendum result?Get angry and send a totally clear message   
BREAKING NEWS: Theresa May takes formal charge of the negotiations and now has sidelined Brexit Secretary Dominic Raab.This means more power has been given to May's top remoaner civil servant, Olly Robbins. 
Theresa May takes personal charge of Brexit talks  
Dear @jeremycorbyn May I be the 100th person to point out that the #NHS is kept afloat thanks to doctors and nurses from #EU27 Your support of #Brexit will hugely harm the NHS. #StopBrexitSaveBritain 
May takes charge of Brexit talks as Raab effectively demoted after 15 days  
Great idea Bernie! UKGov to rebrand ‘no deal Brexit’ as ‘anti-obesity strategy’  
Theresa May has seemingly been using her aid Olly Robbins to underpin her #BrexitShambles. She has now taken control of Brexit negotiations from the DExEU team and handed it to Robbins in the Cabinet Office. Tory Party internal politics trumps the national interest again...  
The House of Commons has now unanimously agreed to ban Ian Paisley from Parliament for 30 sitting days - the longest suspension of an MP since at least 1949 and one which could have profound implications for the shape of Brexit.  
There's now a dangerous void where government should be. My latest Brexit Blog post on Raab's 'no payment' threat, Brexiter anger, and the absence of political leadership:  
.@DominicRaab  just sent alarm bells ringing in homes across the country. EU citizens who've built a life in the UK deserve certainty that their basic rights will be protected if this blundering Government fails to reach a #Brexit deal with the EU  
BREAKING:  Downing Street has announced that the Brexit department will no longer be in charge of the Brexit negotiations.  
Brexit secretary insists government will ‘make sure there is adequate food supply’ if UK leaves EU with no deal  
You can’t say we didn’t tell you @DominicRaab your position is just a illusion as @theresa_may and @OllyRobbins try to keep us shackled to the EU. And your have lost a lot of credibility with #Brexiteers now. #Brexit  
2016: “Brexit will improve your lives”2018: “There will be adequate food”  
How Robbins must have felt on hearing MPs say he might as well swap jobs with the Brexit Sec  
A key point. Anyone engaged in the practicalities of 'making Brexit work' will always end up being attacked by Brexit 'purists' because what they want is something which, fundamentally, can't be made to work. So to enact the dream is always to betray the dream.  
If as has been reported May and Robbins Sideline Raab and Dexeu. The new BREXIT Minister should immedately resign if he's worth his salt. If he does not the Electorate should deal with him at the next General Election. D. Davis was a man of honour 
BREAKING NEWS: Theresa May takes formal charge of the negotiations and now has sidelined Brexit Secretary Dominic Raab.This means more power has been given to May's top remoaner civil servant, Olly Robbins. 
You can dismiss it as Project Fear if you want, but Dominic Raab just confirmed that securing food supplies is now an actual part of the British government's Brexit policy.  
Remember the battles over “exit day”? Remember how the govt portrayed these battles as being for the soul of Brexit itself? What a total waste of everyone’s time. How much else will have been futile, or worse, plain wrong...#WhitePaper #ExitDay 
Ahem. The Great Repeal Bill of old Brexit notoriety  has just descended into new levels of farce. It didn’t just copy and paste itself. It, well, repealed itself.... #WhitePaper 
This is beyond hysterical - Theresa 'people skills' May demotes Raab and says she'll negotiate with EU HERSELF!!! Theresa May strips Brexit chief of Brexit talks and extends EU law for 21 months  
Oh do shut up @ChukaUmunna we've had a vote and if it ends up as a no deal brexit I'm sure we'll cope and STOP spouting more project fear rubbish  
1934: Hitler removed my Jewish family's  citizenship2018 Merkel restores it2019 May removes my EU citizenshipThank you Germany! Proud of my new country. Deeply ashamed of UK'Germany to help Brits stay EU citizens during #Brexit transition period'  #fbpe 
Corbyn makes intelligent, forward looking speech about the future of British manufacturing, the neglect of which underlies so much of what's wrong with our country. Reaction: LOOK! LOOK!! HE'S BACKING BREXIT!!!!! 
Who else would like to see this after Brexit?  
So from the 'Nirvana' of Brexit we're now talking about the government making sure there is 'adequate food' ......., #fuckingshambles 
Literally at the same time Dominic Raab is giving evidence to parliament, Downing Street announces he is no longer in charge of the Brexit negotiations. The minister for Brexit is not in charge of Brexit - seriously!   
Theresa May appoints Dominic Raab as #Brexit Secretary and merely days later confirms it will actually be her and Olly Robbins that will lead negotiations in Brussels. Beggars belief at what Brexit department is even for. Raab may well revert to his Hard Brexit stance now 
As MPs break for summer the PM:Announces that the #Brexit deadline will be extendedSidelines the Brexit secretaryGives her unelected adviser @OllyRobbins more power in negotiationsAdvises she we will personally lead Brexit talksShe thinks she is untouchable #MAYMUSTGO 
Nobody voted for a No Deal Brexit and Parliament will not accept one. We need to take power back from Jacob Rees-Mogg's hard Brexit ERG and have a #PeoplesVote on the Brexit deal.  
Pound jumps after Theresa May says she'll take charge of Brexit negotiations  
So not only is the government pushing through with this insane and disastrous Brexit but they can’t even be bothered, themselves, to make sure we can all eat?!#StopBrexit#NoDealNoBrexit 
If this was Brexit-related, they would provide “balance” by finding someone arguing that it’s actually cold despite all the evidence to the contrary.  
Robbins didn't like Peter Bone accusing him of pushing his own form of the Brexit White Paper  
Brexit progress report:“The free trade agreement that we will have to do with the EU should be one of the easiest in human history"- Liam Fox, 20/7/17"We will make sure there's adequate food supplies"- Dominic Raab, 24/7/18, when asked about preparations for 'no deal' scenario 
Really glad Scotland voted ‘No’ in 2014 so we can look forward to being told by Tories we didn’t elect to stockpile food for a ‘no deal’ Brexit we don’t support and didn’t vote for in the first place. 
POWER GRAB: Theresa May has seized control of Brexit negotiations.Yet another example of Brexiteers being sidelined. 
Olly Robbins's immediate reaction after @JWhittingdale's suggested that he should "swap places" with Raab, as he is in fact the real Brexit Sec. Seems rather tickled  
It is wrong to suggest the Govt would stockpile food in the event of no deal Brexit, but we will look at this in the round and, if necessary, stockpile food in the event of no deal Brexit.  
You only get so many chances, @jeremycorbyn . You can't lie to us just because YOU PERSONALLY want Brexit. I'll be emailing re my membership, I know other young Labour members doing the same. You're losing us, and you're accelerating that loss spouting nonsense like this.  
Dominic Raab won't be negotiating with the EU, PM and unelected Civil Servant Olly Robbins will. Robbins is the de facto Brexit Secretary, Raab is essentially in charge of preparations for Brexit.PM humiliated DD & now she humiliates Raab.#MayMustGo 
Either Raab:(1) Doesn't know the basics of how food production operates(2) Thinks factories/farmers/etc can change their whole basis and create space for storage etc in 8 months, on the off-chance of hard Brexit(3) Is knowingly talking total guff 
Which one is the real Brexit Secretary? One makes all the decisions, the other gets held to account for them.  
So put Leavers in charge of delivering the Brexit they promised would be good for Britain - and judge them accordingly. At the moment, Remainers are running the show which seems ridiculous to me given they lost.  
Hilary Benn: "Is the Government considering stockpiling food?"Dominic Raab, Brexit Secretary: "It would be wrong to describe it as the Government doing the stockpiling" 
Raab has just confirmed that there will have to be food stockpiling for a hard Brexit, although he emphasises it would mainly be done by industry rather than government 
BREAKING: Raab promises government will "make sure there is adequate food" in Britain in the event of no Brexit deal. But says it is wrong to say government itself is stockpiling. 
Oh dear.Theresa May, who triggered Art 50 with no plan, needlessly called an election, fought the worst campaign in memory, took 2 yrs to produce a Brexit plan, then binned it in the face of pressure from Rees-Mogg... is taking control of the negotiations.Hold on to your hats  
BREAKING: British PM Theresa May says she will be leading Brexit talks 
Is this any way to treat pensioners who have worked all their lives for retirement? Is there no limit to the lives the government will ruin in the name of Brexit? 
'The only thing that’s changed is he LOST!' Rees-Mogg in BRILLIANT John Major slap-down.#Brexit#Moggmentum 
Can’t find a single mention of Northern Ireland border in this new White Paper, yet Brexit Secretary just confirms in answer to my question that the NI backstop will be included in the new legislation. Pretty big omission from a White Paper on the legislation! ...6/7 
Courts and RAF bases are being sold off, childhood obesity has surged, the Brexit Secretary has been demoted and all the other bad news Theresa May's government just tried to bury.  
Interesting read but he's someone  who I suspect voted Remain (like me..) & now just wants to have the result he voted for (like me..)If Brexit fails then it fails, and we pick up the pieces & start over.But we mustn't try to stop it happening or democracy will die with it.  
Why would Labour send thousands of aerospace and automobile manufacturing jobs abroad when we have the skills and factories right here in Britain?They don't value British workers. That's why @UKLabour is launching a plan to #BrexitYourJob away - it's called "Labour brexit"  
And to cap it all off, the Brexit secretary Dominic Raab has been officially demoted and PM is now the designated driver.  
think officially taking control of the deal away from any Brexit supporting minister and officially handing all control to Oliver Robbins may be the push of anyone still on the fence. No way back now  
PM stages a takeover. Will lead Brexit negotiations from now on. Major power grab from DEXEU.  
Jacob Rees-Mogg says it will take half a century for Britain to reap any rewards from Brexit.Put it on a bus.  
"Personally, I think [Brexit] is a dreadful mistake, and for people’s earning power going forward. We had the biggest GDP [growth] in Europe — now we have the weakest." - @richardbranson. 
BREAKING: Theresa May says she'll take control of Brexit negotiations  
BREAKING: Beachy Head has been chosen as the cliff to fire Britain's economy off after a no-deal Brexit in March 2019Jacob Rees-Mogg has fully supported the decision "Beachy Head offers the best chance of securing the Brexit dividend in 2061 of a trade deal with Costa Rica"  
No-deal Brexit will make it ‘illegal’ to pay pensions to retired British expats living in EU, MPs told Warning comes as leading service industries say they have been 'thrown under the bus' by Theresa May’s Chequers plan 
Quick poll!! Who believes that @theresa_may is unfit for purpose, and will not deliver a Brexit true to the British people’s vote?!!!! 
This is @MollyMEP's indispensable guide to the shadowy right-wing organisations behind #Brexit, a very welcome aid for those trying to understand the complex web of money, power & influence which is trying to take control of our lives.#StopBrexit #FBPE 
Labour's 7 Jobs pledges:Commit to increase UK manufacturingBring Govt contracts back to UKSupport Small & Medium EnterprisesTake public opinion into accountFocus on whole of UK beyond LondonKeep Global Markets OpenBrexit strategy with Customs Union 
With Taoiseach Leo Varadkar @campaignforleo in #Bucharest. We had very good discussions on our bilateral cooperation, as well as on current EU developments, including Brexit, the Romanian Presidency of the EU Council and the future of the European project.  
Is Corbyn part of the Putin conspiracy? Probably not.Is Corbyn extremely USEFUL to the Putin Brexit conspiracy?Undoubtedly. He helpfully splits the progressive opposition keeping them fighting each other instead of the R-wing extremists.So yes the Putin lovers do love Corbyn 
"Nobody knows for sure when the next election will be or where we will be with Brexit when it comes, but one thing is certain the next Labour government is committed to creating high quality jobs in every region and nation of the UK.."Jeremy Corbyn.#JC4PM #BuilditinBritain 
United Kingdom: If the Death Penalty was put to a nationwide referendum, it'd be reinstated with a massive majority. 
Jeremy Corbyn talks of the benefits of Brexit but wants to drag us out of the Single Market and Customs Union. Labour's Brexit policy is as damaging as the Tories'  
It looks like England’s pretty upset about Brexit and the Tories. Christ, imagine how you’d feel if you lived in a country that didn’t vote for either of these things but got lumped with the repercussions of them anyway. 
I was so chuffed to finally meet this wonderful, wonderful man... @PimlicoPlumbers Standing up for #British businesses  #Brexit benefits NOBODY but the elite. If you care about #Britain... then fight alongside us to #StopBrexit!  #BackBritainNotBrexit 
Has it ever occurred to certain members of the Conservative party and others that if they keep going on about what a life-altering disaster Brexit will be, that when they subsequently tell people that a Corbyn govt will be a life-altering disaster, they won’t be believed. 
'John Gray argues that in the Brexit debate, few Remainers seem to have noticed the illiberal and fragmented Europe that has recently come into being'  
Irony of Brexit: The elites are the least effected in almost any area you look. Financial services, for instance, have the time and money to prepare for loss of market access and can move accordingly. 
The Congress Party realises that there a danger of the next election becoming a referendum on Prime Minister Narendra Modi’s performance. The popularity gap between the Prime Minister and his competitors is very wide.  Obviously Congress fearing complete decimation. 
Breaking news: The Clash have been brought in by Theresa May as consultants over brexit -Should I stay or should I go now?Should I stay or should I go now?If I go, there will be troubleAnd if I stay it will be doubleSo come on and let me know......Go May, pleeasee go! 
Am I @UKLabour?As Corbyn's the only MP who seems to care about human rights & wants to make the UK fairer. I guess I am, by default. I honestly don't know enough about railway nationalisation to have an opinion.But Brexit messes all that up so until Labour supports #PeoplesVote 
Brexiters: "Oh, what would the former chairman of Lloyd's of London know about business and Brexit? I spoke with Bob down the boozer and he says everything is going to be fine - it's all project fear!"  
Just a reminder, Jeremy Corbyn: this stuff goes both ways.The train pictured is a regional service in Nordrhein Westfalen  run by  firm National Express.You want that to stop too?#Brexit 
Corbyn to set out 'economic benefit of Brexit', in speech expected to last 14 seconds. 
#Brexit Agreement-"EU will inform UK of required payment amount"David Jones: 'It would appear they are now prepared to write a series of blank cheques EU can continue presenting at their own discretion.Chequers is a Dodo; it's extinct; it can't fly!'#EU 
Germany to help Brits stay EU citizens during Brexit transition period  
A "smooth and orderly" Brexit is in sight, Dominic Raab says, provoking laughter in Parliament  
Some of those who voted Leave believed that life was better in the 1950s. A no deal Brexit might enable them to test this proposition, with the prospect of ration books, very long queues and a Conservative leader with trousers up to his armpits and a poker up his arse.  
Economic nationalism. No better than any other nationalism.Oh and how do you think the rest of EU would react, Corbyn?#Brexit 
MPs were told this morning by Huw Evans Director/General of the ABI said ex pats living in EU countries may not be paid private pensions if we crash out with no deal, you know the same people denied a vote in the referendum, ffs why are we doing this, we must have #PeoplesVote 
"...but even if there is a chaotic hard Brexit, which will be devastating for Scotland, I'll still support the union at all costs. Just because."  
7 pledges Jeremy Corbyn made in his speech on Brexit and bringing manufacturing back to the UK 
Have the bottle to tell the British public what you are really up to with #Brexit Theresa May! You seem to think, leaving the #EU means staying in at all costs! It's time to stop the... 
Dear @Conservatives, we would never have elected you if you had campaigned with "BrExit means legally staying in the EU indefinitely"We won't ever again if you don't kick out your useless REMOAN Prime Minister and put someone like Boris in charge to delver what you promised us 
WATCH: A chaotic hard Brexit will only increase the chances of a second independence referendum. The Conservative Party are a clear danger to the union they claim to defend.  
This account is non-partisan but I will say only this. It's seriously worrying when the "leader of the "opposition" to a hard brexit Tory government is being praised by LeaveEU. Come on Jeremy your membership is massively anti-brexit are you for the many or the few?  
We have reached the point where our only source of comfort, faced with the prospects of a no-deal Brexit, is faith that our political leaders would never be so craven, irresponsible and stupid. These political leaders. We're screwed. 
More lies from #TheresaTheAppeaser as she plans the that the Law that keeps the #UK in #EU will continue to apply after #Brexit.Not acceptable at all. After all those lies about us leaving too She's destroying the Tories.#MAYMUSTGO Now. 
There you go. An EU country that spreads the benefits of an integrated pan-European supply chain across its entire country.Westminster chose not to do that, and so the places that desperately need investment are going to be hit even harder.OOOOOOOORRRRR  #PEOPLESVOTE on Brexit  
Your comment would be better aimed at the UK Gov. It spent 2 entire years bickering with itself about what Brexit is. Then, having decided, a week later it instructed MPs to vote for admendments wrecking that decision.We're back to square one and the clock is ticking. 
My speech on Ireland and Brexit in the House of Lords - 'this could be the greatest failure of British public policy in Ireland since the collapse of the Sunningdale power-sharing agreement in 1974'  
Easy to see in latest YouGov polling why the Tories are so fixated on pursuing Brexit at all costs. Much harder to see why Labour also remains pro-Brexit.Note also North of England now 55% Remain & Scotland 73%HT: @KirstyS_Hughes cc:@Remain_Labour @Labour4EU @LabPeoplesVote 
Welcome Germany's proposal for a generous approach to UK citizens post-Brexit & I hope this will set the tone for other EU27 countries. The EurParliament is committed to scrutinising the preparations of EU countries. People shouldn't be victims of #Brexit  
May:Didn't win a contested leadership election.Lost a majority in the general election.Boris:Won Mayoralty in London - twice.Won the referendum. 
#FBPE Vale of Glamorgan  @ValeforEurope was formed in May before the #PeoplesVote March.We’re increasingly active with street stalls, social events & lobbying on #Brexit We set ourselves an ambitious 1,000 followers target & today we’ll reach 900A huge  to all our followers  
Wonder if Costa del Sol #Brexit voters realised they were voting themselves out of being able to receive their future insurance based pensions. Of course they didn't, none of the downsides were on the ballot paper, despite #Leavers claiming to have known the consequences. 
The reality is that if we have a 'no deal' Brexit, we will lose jobs, and we will lose investment in #Wales and the UK. There is no question about that, which is why I am fighting against a 'no deal' #Brexit, and why I want a #PeoplesVote @peoplesvote_uk 
.@nigelmp 'Bring on No Deal Brexit!'Westmonster speaks to Nigel Evans who talks about the benefits of leaving the European Union.FULL VIDEO HERE:  
Absolutely. The lack on investment outside London has been criminal.Look at Germany. Its economy isn't based in the Capital. Its factories are in the Ruhr, its banking sector is in Frankfurt...They invest in non-metropolitan jobs But that needs resources. Brexit steals ours. 
Looks like the #Brexit delusion continues with no sign of a Plan B to protect access to new drugs for UK patients!  
A new SNP slogan - “ExBrit is better than Brexit” 
What Trump and the Brexit types just don't understand. Thread.  
Add Gibraltar to the list of unsolvable Brexit problems.#stopbrexit 
Last day of term but big news-Brexit white paper this pm will contain plans to extend force of 1972 European Communities Act,  via an amendment to the Withdrawl Act (which passed only last week). This is 1st clause of that act. Might confuse our legal status. Brexiteers=   
Nice to see @BBCScotlandNews headlining the story with the 'UK' legal position in relation to the Holyrood Brexit Bill case I'm sure they'll be along with the Scottish version soon enough. Won't they?  
Robert Courts MP: Why I resigned over May's White Paper...Does it take back control of our laws?No!UK essentially an EU member but without a vote.Paying for the privilege, obeying EU laws & ruled by its Court, but without a veto. #Bino#Brexit #EU 
Labour have a vision for post-Brexit Britain: to have an economy which works for millions, not just millionaires.Bringing UK manufacturing back will create jobs, revive communities that have been left behind and boost our economy.Well in, Corbyn  
And of course british expats in the EU were not given a vote in the referendum. They deserve one now - we all do. None of this was clear at the time of the 2016 referendum #PeoplesVote 
Tommy Sheppard just dismantled the UK Government's claim that they aren't carrying out a Brexit power grab on Scotland. 
Brexit is not a requirement for a plan to #BuildItInBritain: it can be done as a member of the EU and without robbing millions of Britons of their EU citizenship. It is time for you @UKLabour to cut out the spin and tell people the truth about what a Brexit future really means.  
More wisdom from @Jacob_Rees_Mogg - those advocating a second referendum forget we’ve already had three votes! They’re sore losers who just want a different result.Support us at  pic.twitter.com/vV5hPz9Nuf 
in education, skills and lifelong learning ...” Interestingly it does not say the first can now be achieved after Brexit. Instead it notes that other EU countries seem to manage to have their own industries provide public infrastructure while the UK does not, 7/n 
Interesting long-form view on May and Brexit from across the pond. "She has a wide, expressive mouth that cracks into grimaces and betrays an inner tumult, while the sentences that emerge are frequently circular and devoid of clear meaning"  
Here's Dominic Raab claiming that he had 'nothing to do with the money'. But being on the Campaigns Committee of VL meant he had everything to do with strategy. Vote Leave's core Brexit strategy was its outreach groups, Veterans for Britain & BeLeave included.  
The reference to the sterling depreciation is not part of any attempt to talk up Brexit, but rather an attempt to hit at the Conservative's lack of industrial strategy. (In reality, of course, the depreciation was required to offset the negative expected effects of Brexit, 4/n 
What a nonsensical line in Corbyn's speech about Govt putting City ahead of manufacturing in Brexit negs. She's actually foregoing passporting and EU market access for fin servs while making the latter top priority for goods by prioritising reg. alignment with SM product rules 
Here's the full text of the Corbyn speech on Brexit and manufacturing: It's not about migration, but Labour speechwriters should have taken more care to ensure that the speech couldn't be misunderstood. 
No-deal Brexit will make it ‘illegal’ to pay pensions to retired British expats living in EU, MPs told: — I hope this bites Lord Lawson on the posterior. 
PUBLIC SERVICE ANNOUNCEMENT: Migrants do not depress wages of domestic workers. To say they do buys into anti-immigrant rhetoric of Farage and Jacob Rees Mogg.There are no benefits to Brexit for the many, only the few.#PeoplesVote#FFS 
As Steve Bannon fuels the far right around Europe, his thoughts on Brexit: “Dude! You just took the fifth-largest economy in the world out of the EU for £7m!”#VOTELEAVEBROKETHELAW #VoteLeaveCheated 
The EU controls everything.Pensions, cheese, cars, our fishing waters, even the air.We'll die without the EU.#Brexit is a death sentence to everyone in the UK........Or you could simply be an adult & realise the EU is not the world & the world manages fine.Numpties.  
Interesting to hear Adv Gen pedalling the importance of the “UK single market” a concept we never heard about pre #Brexit & whose top down operation bears little resemblance to that of the #EU single market where equals agree terms 
"As Head of Business Dev. at Manchester Airport, I worked on UK govt component of EU Single European Sky (SES) Policy. I can tell you WITHOUT ‘if & buts’ IF there’s NO Brexit deal, UK-EU binary flights will CEASE!"To visit Paris, you’ll have to CONNECT via New York" Y. AGBEBI pic.twitter.com/xwZFmF43dx 
I’ve popped into @UKSupremeCourt between @CommonsEUexit sessions to observe submissions in #ContinuityBill case. Adv Gen for UK Govt currently on feet. Lord Adv for @scotgov yet to speak #Brexit 
The Millennium Bug was fixed in advanced by experts who knew what they were doing.Brexit has been bungled by politicians, mis-sold by shysters and encouraged by cretinous ideologues with no understanding at all beyond absurd sloganeering. All without a single expert in sight.  
Not strictly science related but...This new project looking at the web of powerful and secretive networks behind Brexit is well worth a read  
Must be an Independence Referendum on the way... Peterhead is in line for Carbon Capture Funding from the UK Government (for the third time - first 2 being won and denied)If folk fall for this then Hell mend them.  
So we’re looking at yet another case of this... worth noting this, I agree. But the points stand: the evidence of dog whistling is already significant, eg below, and Brexit does not bring any benefits.  
Brussels sources have told The Telegraph that, if requested by May, the EU would only agree to extend the Article 50 deadline beyond 29 March 2019 to accommodate a second #Brexit referendum or a general electionWe don't want an extension via @Telegraph 
.@CarolineLucas – Time for Jeremy Corbyn to “stop peddling myths” about Brexit  
Plaid Cymru has long argued that Brexit poses a threat to Welsh branding. The British branding on Welsh food at #RWAS2018 proves that to be true. 
I’ve written a speech on the net economic benefits of Brexit but won’t get to speak this afternoon, so I’ve published it here:Good afternoon.Thank you. [ENDS] 
Roger is a tit, don't be like Roger. I and many of my colleagues spent 1000s of hours quietly working to fix millennium issues, so there ended up being no problem.UKIP and the leavers on the other hand never bothered planning for #Brexit but do like to moan about things.  
Nigel Farage isn't mainstream. He's a right-wing extremist who used Nazi-style propaganda during the referendum and now uses his show to platform white supremacists like Steve Bannon.Our media is sliding to the right. Join the campaign to #DUMPFARAGE 
High praise for @jeremycorbyn from the crooked and racist brexit campaign  
Brexit didn’t break Parliament. The @CONservatives did. A General Election can fix it.Time for the people to rise up & vote these nasty, lying, cheating Tories out.A @JeremyCorbyn-led @UKLabour Government can heal the country and fix Parliament.#ChangeIsComing #ForTheMany 
SovereigntyIs brexit worth it? It is time to #stopbrexit - before #brexit stops us.#FBPE #PeoplesVote 
We share the frustrations with the British Public who see May avoiding to properly deliver Brexit. The current negotiating position has been a complete fudge.  
 The uncertainty caused by #Brexit has already caused a 2% dip in British economic output, a think tank says 
I'd be curious to know if other non-British (and indeed British) friends of Britain feel the same as what I describe here. Any insight, twitter? "Brexit lays bare the extremes that define British society"  via @financialtimes 
Oh and first one to come at me with "we need a new remain centrist party like a British En Marche" can go kick rocks. We need Labour to be better at being left wing and the first step to that is opposing Brexit. 
Totnes issues its own passport and declares allegiance to the EU in a lighthearted swipe at Brexit. #joke #brexit  
Wonder if the pro-Brexit 'expats' in my area will read this and still say: 'It'll all be fine.' You have to laugh.No-deal Brexit will make it ‘illegal’ to pay pensions to retired British expats living in EU, MPs told | The Independent  
Scotland does not want this Tory no deal/state of emergency Brexit.  
Our local groups across the country have been asking people in their area what they think of the Brexit negotiations and whether they support a #PeoplesVote - here's what @WandsworthEM found out when they asked people last weekend : 
All those people who said Starmer was going to change Corbyns mind on Brexit (and still tweet him like he will do) give up.He's done sod all for remainers.Even the meaningful vote in Parliament he confirmed wouldn't be used to stop Brexit.Dissapointment is an understatement. 
Now in Bucharest in Romania for the next round of meetings with EU leaders on #Brexit and bilateral relations. First is getting underway with @KlausIohannis who I meet regularly at the @EUCouncil 
Yesterday I managed to speak to @jeremycorbyn sneaking out down a back alley past the bins after the shadow cabinet meeting. I asked him what he was going to say to the people of Sunderland when his Brexit closed Nissan and the economy collapsed in the region. He had no reply. 
If you loved the Blitz you’ll love Brexit, says Piers Morgan 
A Dunkirk-style flotilla consisting of Farage's Thames protest fisherman heading to the Costas to rescue our pensioners would be perhaps the greatest tribute we could pay to our magnificent Brexit fiasco 
Tory Govt is conditioning the electorate for a No Deal Brexit. Media already blaming the EU. Delegates from Whitehall are also trying to circumvent the EC by visiting individual member countries. The NI border is being ignored. UK Govt gambling that EU won't set up a border. 
Yesterday I managed to speak to @Keir_Starmer after the shadow cabinet meeting. I asked him to explain how it would be possible to get a jobs first Brexit that was outside the SM & CU, when it was clear it would devastate business in the UK. He had no reply & obviously no idea. 
Non stop conversations with a majority of Leave voters in #Dover saying #Brexit isn't going well. Several signing #PeoplesVotePetition @Labour4EU @EUThinkingDo1 @EK_EuropeanMove 
No-deal Brexit will make it ‘illegal’ to pay pensions to retired British expats living in EU, MPs told  
The majority of Scottish people are united in their opposition to Brexit.   It's unwanted, completely unnecessary and we know the cost will be astronomic.   Labour support Brexit.  It's time to dump them.  
Government now denies own figures:No deal2,800,000 fewer jobs £158bn loss per yearFTA1,750,000 fewer jobs£99bn loss per yearSoft Brexit 700,000 fewer jobs£39bn loss per year Remain in EU:No [further] impact on jobsNo £ loss per year#VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw 
We should follow Singapore's example & ignore EU - welfare & prosperity of Brits should be primary focus 4Gov,not prosperity or welfare of a potential trading rival!8 'hardball' cards May can play to get Brexit deal UK WANTS    
Iceta, leader of Catalan socialists, who in just a few years has gone from demanding a referendum on the self-determination of Catalonia  to giving his wholehearted support to the removal of its self-rule (art. 155), accuses pro-independence PDeCAT party of becoming radicalised.  
Meet Arron Banks’ friend, Lesotho minister John Maseribane, who received £19,000 from the Brexit-backing businessman in relation to mining investments in Southern Africa. 
I'm no "Expert" but it seems to me that "Brexit" is a genuine Psychosis: ...severe mental illness, derangement, or disorder involving a loss of contact with reality, freq. with hallucinations, delusions, or altered thought processes, with or without a known organic origin. [OED] 
Trending MediaWidespread questions are now being asked about the failed promises made to win votes for the uk union in the 2014 Scottish Independence Referendum.  
Jeremy Hunt can stop worrying that “no deal” will sour the British people’s view of the EU.  Because of the way they’ve already behaved towards us since the referendum, we already hate the EU anyway.  
Every so often you might get the wrong persons following you, so I'm just here to tell you how much I detest all the people who blindly voted for Brexit. Or the Cons. Or if you eat popcorn in the cinema (or any food for that matter) like a horse. Or if you listen to Morrissey... 
A part of me wishes that the Brexit negotiations had until now been led by harder Brexiteers, if only for the sake of dispelling the ludicrous myth that the reason for stifled progress is a lack of belief in the policy. 
“No Deal” Brexit is now odds-on (more likely than not) with both the bookies who offer markets.  
YouGov poll on EU #Brexit. Increased support for the EU among Scots. Will the British Gov finally listen to the people of Scotland? I know it is a silly Question. The answer will be NOScotland:Remain 73%Leave 27% 
Fundamentally undemocratic to impose anti-union ballot thresholds on workers. Teachers, fire, etc couldn’t lawfully take action on a result similar to 37% of the electorate voting for Brexit!  
"It could not be clearer that change is needed" - Labour leader Jeremy Corbyn has said the manufacturing industry needs more support before #Brexit at a speech in Birmingham. For the latest politics stories, head here:  
Take fright on Brexit: even the civil service head is telling us to panic | Polly Toynbee  
Was talking to a man a few months ago about Scotland and brexit ad how it may effect the NHS, saw him again today he said after our talk last time I went home and thought about what we had discussed so I joined the SNP as I believe independence is the only way forward. Hes 68. 
"At this Royal Welsh Show, Welsh food has become British food. We’ve previously warned in Plaid Cymru that Brexit will threaten Welsh branding. This is great Welsh food and should be celebrated as such.” @RhunapIorwerth AM  
A #NoDeal Brexit would be catastrophic for the UK environment.  So why aren't we talking about it?  by @CraigBennett3 
A draft law in Berlin may allow Brits to become German citizens during the #Brexit transition period  
.@thomasbrake blasts the Tory plan to break paired votes on Brexit legislation last week. If you want the final say on Brexit, with the option to remain, add your name:  
I see Jeremy is still fighting the referendum. For Leave  
Jeremy Corbyn echoes Donald Trump as he outlines Brexit 'benefit' at #BuildItInBritain press conference. 
“He's a friend, respect my friendship with Arron.”Lesotho minister John Maseribane admits he received money from Brexit-backing businessman Arron Banks in relation to mining investments in Southern Africa. Both he and Banks deny this money was a bribe or for a mining license.  
It's taken two years to discover this?'No-deal Brexit will make it ‘illegal’ to pay pensions to retired British expats living in EU, MPs told'  
A little excerpt from last night's 'indy vs state of emergency hard Brexit' debate.  
Tax-avoiding Amazon trying to threaten the British Public over Brexit and it isn't going to work! Excellent article by Alex Brummer. 
Dominic Grieve (one of the few sensible and considered Tory MPs on Brexit) issues a dire warning about the consequences of a no-deal Brexit and that it might lead to  “the break-up of the current party system”.Via @BBCNewsnight 
.@thomasbrake has accused Corbyn of living in a world of "alternative facts where Brexit will be a bonanza for British business" as the Labour leader is set to claim in a speech there has already been an economic benefit of Brexit #ExitFromBrexit #FinalSay 
Only fair that I also tweet this. Still think that it’s often hard to tell difference between Corbyn’s Brexit views and those of the Tories.  
Never mind - those with closed minds think their choice was the only right one, and this will never let us come together as a country. Single agenda Brexit politics can never work - and I say that as remainer - we must reach out to those who voted leave (and were often lied to) 
Remind me, who voted for #Brexit?  
But Owen, here’s the problem. They’re allowed to. And no political party can stop them. We live in a global economy. We can’t beat Asia on manufacturing. So I’m at a loss as to why JC is pinning his vision of post brexit Britain on a business model that won’t work. 
Jeremy Corbyn is set to deliver some rare words of common sense today, hailing the more competitive currency created by the Brexit vote. The pro-EU cabal in Labour will be furious - be careful Jeremy, your Euroscepticism is showing! Support us at  
Here’s something for @jeremy_corbyn to ponder: I’d love to see his list of new manufacturing industries that are going to spring up post Brexit. And I’d love him to explain how they’re going to be globally competitive without full scale automation. I’ll wait. 
While Chequers & the new Brexit plan has provided lots of drama, the actual deadlock in the negotiations is over the Irish backstop.Agree the backstop & the withdrawal agreement is basically done. Then the transition is unlocked and UK can head smoothly out.Quick thread  
I'm Irish. I have a PhD and work in the UK university sector. I'm not "cheap EU labour" but HAVE been exploited (zero-hours lecturing contract). Exploitation of labour has NOTHING to do with the EU and everything to do with UK labour conditions. It will get worse after Brexit. 
Imagine the scenes.All the normal people at the wedding having a drink maybe a wee dance whilst 15 weirdos all talk brexit round a table like a big nonce scene oot the Sopranos.  
I've complained about the economic illiteracy in here (already benefits to Brexit?!). I've ranted at the naked xenophobia ("cheap foreign labour", are you trying to get immigrants beaten up in the street?!)Now I want to rant about his vision. It's horrible. 
Labour should under no circumstances be reinforcing the arguments of UKIP and the Tory right when it comes to immigration and supposed 'benefits' of Brexit. (6/6) 
There are minimal benefits from Brexit for the manufacturing sector. Many British manufacturing companies will find their supply chains severed, while the economic hit from Brexit will inevitably mean significant job losses and business closures. (4) 
Opinion Poll: Interesting details from Scottish sub-sample of large Sunday Times @YouGov poll: Remain in EU at 73% and support for @theSNP at 50%. Tables below #YouGov #Scotland #Brexit  
Excellent article here from constitutional expert Vernon Bogdanor. There is no parliamentary majority for any Brexit scenario, and no-deal is self-immolation. There’s only so much deadlock, chaos and humiliation we can bear. Let the people sort this out.  
Is today a bad day to recall that narrative that Labour voters won Brexit is largely false? Higher percentage of labour than SNP voters were remain. In labour seats what happened largely was all the ‘others’ - Ukip, Tory, etc - voted too, and voted Leave.  
Yesterday, at the MacGill Summer School, Tánaiste @simoncoveney spoke on the current state of play in Brexit negotiations and echoed sentiments expressed by Michel Barnier on the need to de-dramatise the backstop. Read the Tánaiste's remarks in full  
Think it makes sense to think of there being multiple IEAs on Brexit now - the Provisional IEA (Singhamites), Official IEA (EEAers), Continuity IEA (tariff-free dealers) and Real IEA (No Dealers).  
Brexit translation gaffe shows deeper cluelessness  via @financialtimes My German Hubby downloaded summary and couldn’t believe how bad translation was. Is it because DExEU got rid of all EU staff? #BrexitShambles 
No-deal Brexit will make it ‘illegal’ to pay pensions to retired British expats living in EU, MPs told  
Lord Wigley - The sensible majority in both houses should take control of #brexit & steer these islands away from the disastrous cliffedge towards which we are heading & for witch it's the ordinary working people of these islands who will most assuredly pay the price.#FBPE 
Part of me wants to find out how Corbyn's acolytes are justifying his wretched support of Brexit and ensuring the survival of the Conservative government, but then the rest of me realises the answers will make me want to tear my face off and stamp on it for infinity. 
There's no way I'll be blaming anyone but the Tories for the mess they're making of Brexit Jeremy Hunt!  
Mundell (May 2016): Leaving the EU would be a disaster for Scotland.Mundell (July 2018): A no deal Brexit is better than breaking up the UK. 
The bankers can fuck off, we don't need their taxes and national insurance payments or the money they spend in their local communities. Airbus can fuck off too, we will travel by ferry to the Isle of Wight instead. Nissan, off you fuck, Jeremy is sorting out the buses. #Brexit 
#Corybn is despicable. He's selling the future of young Britons down the #Brexit river. They benefit hugely from freedom of movement. 
Using tactics pioneered by Goebbels, the Remainiacs relentlessly push Big Lies to try to foment mutual distrust in British society. Now they want a new referendum and this one would be even more vindictive an unpleasant... 
Supreme Court hearing on Holyrood's Brexit bill kicking off now - submissions from UK law officers expected to take up most of today. Might also be time for the start of the Lord Advocate's response, which will continue tomorrow. Live stream here:  
Disappointing to see @jeremycorbyn talk up mythical benefits of #Brexit.Brexit will hurt the poorest hardest.If he wants to represent the many not the few, he should stand up for workers wherever they come from, challenge Govt's chaotic approach and get behind a #PeoplesVote 
I predict all of the Brexeratti will resign on 30th March 2019 & will just leg it with their ill gotten #Brexit windfall. Mrs May @theresa_may will make an impassioned speech outside No10 'You wanted Brexit, here it is, enjoy, I resign, it's all yours' 
Britain faces a grim future after Brexit because of the failure of its politicians to govern responsibly, ex-Lloyd's chairman says  
.@Anna_Soubry conveniently forgets it’s her party who are in power, with a bought majority, “negotiating”.Tories have had majorities every step of the way; Brexit & its ruinous mess belongs to them.She’s also, yet again, spreading lies & misinformation.Nasty @CONservatives. 
So we lose the great deals we've negotiated as part of the most successful trade bloc the World has seen & a marketplace of 500m...to renegotiate c.757 deals at a disadvantage as a market of 65m.We need a #FinalSay on this debased #Brexit that leaves us Poorer & Removes Rights.  
WTAF?Our media are going insane. This is peak Soros stuff.I don’t see gridlock at the US/Canada border, or in Japan.Do people seriously believe this nonsense? I hope not. This is going beyond democracy. This is sinister. It is manipulation.#Brexit 
Corbyn’s no socialist. No socialist would advocate a Brexit policy that would hammer the poor. No socialist would advocate a Brexit policy that would hammer public services.No socialist would advocate a Brexit policy that would hammer the NHS.  
Don’t you know this is the age of the non-expert. A time when dog food salesmen are the go to people on economics and JRM on how Brexit will impact on normal working families (doesn’t care). I’m thinking of marketing myself as the go to on how women feel during childbirth 
"The benefit of Brexit"? Economically outdated ideas plus knee-jerk anti-immigration talk and a dash of Trumpist nativism… what the hell is Corbyn playing at?  
Gibraltar: Spain warns UK over 'cliff-edge' Brexit  
Scotland passses legislation to protect the powers of Holyrood from Brexit mad ToriesBrexit mad Tories take Scotland to the supreme court of England to enable them to remove powers from ScotlandPrecious precious union my ass  
There is no economic benefit of Brexit.  This is fantasy magical thinking.  
A reminder of Rees-Mogg's private meeting with Bannon. Bannon is a fascist who is now working to destroy democracy in Europe. And it is notable that on social media much of Rees-Mogg's support is coming from the extreme-right. #StopBrexit #Brexit 
Gibraltar has been sidelined.For the sake of the thousands of loyal British citizens who live on the Rock – and who voted by 96% to reject #Brexit – we need the govt to crush talk of #NoDealBrexit  
A speech about the benefits of Brexit that will go down in history as: The Trump of Labour fallacy. 
Jeremy Corbyn to highlight economic 'benefit' of Brexit as he demands UK stop relying on 'cheap labour from abroad' : Come on ⁦@UKLabour⁩ MPs and members is this how you want to be represented? Dog whistle politics   
Remember when Jacob Rees-Mogg said that Brexit is going well because Dyson, a billion-dollar multinational corporation was doing OK, and that if other businesses that aren't doing well it's because of their own bad management?  
V. good analysis of Corbyn's "reverse Blairism" from Matt Bolton. The one issue the left cannot triangulate he says - quite rightly  - is Brexit. If Labour governs as a Red Ukip, there won't be enough money for a left wing programme.  Simple, really  
BBC Scotland politics web site is full of 4,5 and 6 day old “news”. Like there is no “Scottish” Tory dark money investigation going on, no debate on union in Westminster yesterday, btw Tommy Shepard won hands down & nothing on the economic impact of Brexit. #shabby 
Who would’ve imagined that we’d see the day when someone could argue that the reinstating of the death penalty would be a positive impact of Brexit.THE FUCKING DEATH PENALTY.  
Hey remember when Corbyn was like "brexit is good bc foreigners are imported wholesale" & we were like "that's p uncool" & you were like "no that's, he didn't mean that, you just don't understand his galaxy levels of woke", well anyway please m i s s  m e with that shit this time 
To help unpack a current debate, here's a quick guide to the difference between a 'hard' Brexit and a 'no-deal' Brexit. And when I say 'highly uncertain' I'm being an academic and mean what others might term 'no-one really knows and will be very much making it up as we go'1/  
Wait, so someone who voted ‘out’ in ‘75, against Maastricht and Lisbon, in favour of a referendum in 2011, and demanded the triggering of A50 the day after the referendum is making a speech in favour of Brexit? 
Whatever criticisms people have of Corbyn over Brexit, it’s worth noting that a fair bit of the commentary about his imminent speech on the subject doesn’t seem to me to completely match the extracts of the speech released in advance. 
We don't like base ten but love state violence. Also the colour of the cover of the document we used to go to Spain is bad. Some of us like huffing darts. The Brexit Story.  
Interesting how brexiters wanted a 2nd referendum if #remain had won, but won't consider a #PeoplesVote now. Do they fear #democracy cld #StopBrexit?  @BrexitBin @acgrayling @emmyzen @spaceangel1964 @fish_in_a_hat @Ferretgrove #FBPE 
‘F**k business’ Brexit could be a gift for Ireland 
Brexit is transforming the UK's political landscape. The parties are change-averse, but the electorate is not:  
Institute of Translation and Interpreting responds on translations of Brexit White Paper. The Institute has offered to assist the Department for Exiting the European Union and the...  
"There is no way that the EU could get away with placing additional arbitrary restrictions on goods imported from the UK after Brexit, either with respect to the content of the regulations, the testing procedures or customs formalities."@davidcollinslaw, 
"There are no flame apparent but there is surely enough smoke to fill the sky."@amcarmichaelMP calls out the Tories' tactics on breaking 'paired' votes on key Brexit legislation last week.Add your name if you want the final say on Brexit: 
Get someone who loves you like Corbyn loves Brexit. 
Translating for Brexit - see the official ITI response to Dominic Raab.  
May's Ministers jet out to EU to Sell a Sell-Out!But should they come back?'No Deal' WTO trading option IS much better than a bad Chequers deal.#Brexit #EU via @MailOnline 
Political red lines from both the UK & EU are making it harder to get a Brexit security deal & putting public safety at risk. Our latest @CommonsHomeAffs report out today 
Appears to me we are actually looking at foreign death penalties as an import/export issues...which pretty much sums Brexit up.  
.@jeremycorbyn please explain to all the young people who risk being denied the right to live, work and study in the EU, the economic 'benefits' of #Brexit #fbpe #OFOC 
Need it confirmed Corbyn is a Trump-style populist determined to offer simple sounding (but unachievable) solutions to complex economic issues? well here it is.He's also determined to insult citizens from the EU27 & irrevocably split Labour over #Brexit. 
God, people are stunned we are worse off now than in the 80s...just wait for what’s coming after Brexit. “Post-war rubble” will pretty much describe how things are after the first few months. We live in an antiquated system of lords and peasants which should have been torn down 
Why are we doing Brexit? “The EU has just passed a law that could end the problems with free movement which led to Brexit in the first place”: 
I have said for two years that I'm not anti-Corbyn or anti-Labour - I am anti-Brexit.Today, that has changed.Corbyn is hell-bent on leaving. I believe that the UK is better, safer & stronger in the EU.We must have a #PeoplesVote.#CorbynOut #ToriesOut #NoFascism 
Here we are again then, in 2018, with a government under fire for bungling Brexit, covertly supporting the death penalty, and the opposition is having an argument about how racist it is.I know this isn’t new, but it bears repeating: #ThisIsNotNormal 
So Corbyn's latest Brexit plan is for wages to fall so low that the UK workers can compete in terms of labour costs with countries like Romania, Slovakia, Bulgaria or Croatia, all of which have full access to the Single Market. 
I may be wrong, but I can't help thinking that if we had a better opposition, then both the Tories and Brexit would be finished by now. #FBPE 
My view is that a) the politics is so broken that a crash-out has become more likely and b) the White Paper shows there’s no real alternative between staying in S Mkt and C Union, and a clean break. So an autumn crisis is likely, w/either an election or a referendum à la Greening  
David Mundell shows how out of touch with reality he is if he’s happy to accept his Tory Government’s own assessment of a 9% hit to Scotland’s GDP by 2030 (if No Deal Brexit happens) as price worth paying to protect political union with rUK.  I fundamentally disagree! #ScotRef 
It isn't a plan, it's pathetic "Britain First" rhetoric. It's worthy of Ukip or Trump. It's isolationist tripe which goes against Labour's internationalist heritage. It dog whistles "we can thrive outside the EU". It's pro Brexit without mentioning the word. 
Yep, the Brexit approach to Y2K would’ve been to scream ‘Project fear’ at the calendar until everything fell over. 
what about non-ethnic over 35's outside London eg. the majority of people in this country Jon?  Does their opinion count? Seems like it did in June 2016 didn't it....... #Brexit 
Second referendum is only way to ensure the hard Brexit that we need. All other hard brexiteers please RT to save our hard Brexit #HardBrexit 
Jeremy Corbyn's plan to revitalise UK manufacturing by boosting exports after #Brexit has a fatal flaw: over 40% of our exports go to EU and we will lose access to markets we can now reach through EU trade deals. Delusional nonsense  
James Dyson declares Brexit will be a disaster for EUROPE as he predicts UK will WALK AWAY  
Just listened to an excellent balanced report on Brexit on BBC World service Business Report.  Such a report could never be broadcast on @BBCr4today .The BBC tells the truth to the world and broadcasts undiluted lies to the British people. 
Words of wisdom, criticism of the government and dire warnings on #Brexit by the ex Chairman of Lloyds of London John Nelson in a letter to @FT.Worth reading. 
'Deliver REAL Brexit or you’re doomed!' Voters' stunning warning to May over Brexit fudge  
And to all the Corbynistas now about to descend on me to defend the indefensible: stop. Corbyn is not looking out for you. He keeps lying to you very day and has consistently enabled the Tories to deliver a monumental act of self-harm. Brexit works only for the few. 2/ 
"When people talk of a no-deal Brexit they usually mean something like Britain “reverting” to World Trade Organisation terms, or a Canada-style free trade agreement. Wrong." Must read column by @iainmacwhirter 
‘Jeremy Corbyn to agree with the Tories on practically everything about their Brexit’.  
If Dominic Raab had been working as Brexit Secretary on a #Brexit white paper & within days before Chequers the PM pulls out Olly Robins pro-EU in name only version would he still be eager sitting there ?? David Davis was given no alternative & was totally justified in resigning. 
FYI. The EU briefings for industry, trade, services, business a#nd citizens on the practical consequences of #Brexit: 
but many foreign workers are employed in services.Ending FoM by Brexit will not help the manufacturing or services sector. Ending decades of under-investment just might. If Brexit (especially with a chaotic premature ejection) hurts the economy, investment will also suffer. 4/4  
Jeremy Corbyn KNOWS his 'Jobs First Brexit' is a complete sham.Here's the proof: just after the Ref he spoke about Sunderland carworkers who voted 'Leave.'"75% of jobs in Sunderland are directly related to sales to the EU. You know... hello? They say it'll carry on. Why? No!"  
“The benefits of Brexit may not be apparent for perhaps 50 years.”~ Jacob Rees-Mogg  
Historians! Come work with us at UCC! There's no Trump, no Brexit, and Cork really is a wonderful city to live and work in. @SHAFRhistorians @HOTCUS @BIHGroup @womnknowhistory 
MUST READ: Vernon Bognador, who once taught David Cameron, argues that a #peoplesvote is the best way to resolve the Brexit dilemma. 
Im not sure why another referendum would be required, we elect politicians to protect the interests of the UK, if those interests would suffer irreparable damage due to the lies told by the leave campaign it is their DUTY to ignore the (advisory) referendum and scrap Brexit ! 
This is truly shocking. Based entirely on swallowing lies discredited by OBR (“Brexit benefit”) and anti-immigrant sentiment unsupported by evidence.So much for the “long game”, eh?Do any Corbyn supporters still claim he is against Brexit?  
"Do you remember the #Brexit end times Grandad?" yes, it was awful, couldn't find a cheap au pare let alone a babysitter on short notice, Pret a Manger went self service, Prosecco went up four pence … and then, then there were the cheese riots  …  
But this in the Times is perhaps why businesses aren’t speaking out. Brexit and the dishonest rhetoric around Brexit has caused such division and anger, we are a nation turning on itself.  
Latest estimates suggest Brexit could cost 3-4000 jobs in the City. Fear not, they’ve just been replaced, and some, by #Facebook  Google,Amazon & Apple.  
In case you missed the press conference of @MichelBarnier after a consensual meeting of EU27 ministers last Friday on #Brexit here are his introductory remarks:  
Brexit's biggest donor denies bribery in securing diamond permit:  
Your periodic reminder that a vote for Labour is a vote for Brexit  
Whilst it would be preferable to avoid a no-deal Brexit, I'm finding the prospect of the nuclear Remainiac meltdown too delicious to describe. If I have to enjoy it from my cave whilst eating rats, so be it. I'll make sure I stock up on popcorn before Armageddon strikes. 
A ‘No Deal’ Brexit was EXACTLY what I voted for.Retweet if it was EXACTLY what YOU voted for. 
100% thisBrexit is a bundle of hot air full of contradictory promises.Therefore it always falls apart when written down as a “plan.”This is why the spirit of Brexit rips up & flees from Chequers.It marches fwd under “no deal” banner. So no plan has to be written down.  
What Brexit means to ethnic urban under 35’s in London -a random insight: BREXIT NEWS - WARGWAN? (What is going on) - LETS GET LITICAL  via @YouTube 
Micheal Martin on @morningireland frantically trying to sound relevant on Brexit! Frightened by opinion polls. #Brexit 
Almost every day, a new voice backing the idea of a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal speaks up - today, Vernon Bogdanor backs our demand. Please RT:  
Mundell: A no deal brexit is a fate worse than death.Gary: and independence?M: worse!G: ah, a fate worse, than a fate worse than death?Blackadder: that's pretty bad. 
The IDA (Irish industrial development authority) says that Brexit has created over 3,000 jobs in Ireland so far. Thanks so much Blighty! 
'Juncker is BULLYING Britain into NO DEAL Brexit!' Nadine Dorries attacks EU  
The Brexit elite who write this letter off as "a letter from the moaning elite" (e.g. @Jacob_Rees_Mogg @DanielJHannan @Nigel_Farage @Arron_banks @johnredwood @patel4witham @OwenPaterson @SteveBakerHW  etc) will all be taking heed of it in deciding how to place their money. 
When @thatginamiller successfully challenged the government's right to implement Brexit without parliamentary approval, it became one of the most significant political events in recent history. Join her for an evening at @cadoganhall 
Supreme Court case over Scottish Brexit bill to begin. The very best of luck to you Scotland.Wales is behind you, including our own FM who bottled out because London told him to but told you to keep going...  
The #brexitdividend, is when your taken to court by your neighbour to reduce your own devolved powers. #BrexitShambles #Brexit @theSNP 
Now Tory Sec of State for Scot Mundell says "No Deal is not and a good deal" and would "damage the Scottish economy" ......this as he plays Brexit Russian Roulette with Scotland, as our choices are made for us by Tories from a neighbour nation. Nobody says #BetterTogether now! 
Best thing you could do ‘to help North-East succeed’ is to junk Brexit & its bedfellow austerity  
Respecting democracy means:People must never have opposing viewsAccepting that referendum campaigns can break the lawLetting huge political shifts be based on liesElections are the only times we get to change our minds if promises are broken#TuesdayThoughts 
The government are playing a shit game of poker. They know they hold no cards, so they can only bluff now.Brexit has already failed. Remain can be the only answer. 
David Mundell won’t say explicitly whether UK govt planning to stockpile food and medicines if there’s no Brexit deal with EU, but says “considering all contingencies” #BBCGMS 
That Corbyn can come out with this a day after the EHRC warned of the huge potential damage to women from Brexit shows again his prioritisation of working class men’s jobs over understanding and tackling the root causes of women’s inequality.  
A strategy for this brexit Lies.Lies.Lies.Lies.Lies.Lies.Lies.Lies.Lies.Lies.Lies.Lies.Lies.Lies.Lies.Lies.Lies.Lies.Lies.Lies.Lies.Lies.Lies.Lies.Lies.Lies.Lies.Lies.Lies.Lies.Lies.Lies.Lies.Lies.Lies.Lies.Lies.Lies.30 March 2019Phew. 
Remember the unemployment of the 70s and 80s?Remember “Auf wiedersehen, pet” where British workers travel to Germany for work?Well, after Brexit trashes automotive and other industries, we will be back thereExcept we’ll have lost the right to move to Germany for work 
Summary:1. Take fright on Brexit.2. Even the civil service head is telling us to panic. 3. And obviously, as a fanatical Remainer, he's totally unbiased.4. A no-deal Brexit will be almost as disastrous as Our Millennium Bug was.5. Talk about terrifying!6. That's all, folks!  
BREXIT SOLUTION: May urged to create WORLD TRADE DEAL with NO divorce payout or EU power  
Another reason why Parliament shouldn’t flee on holiday today & leave Brexit to the steamroller of Rees-Mogg & Arlene Foster. I am proposing in House of Lords today that we come back after a 2 week break  
Pakistan's election on Wednesday will serve as a kind of referendum on some of the most crucial issues facing the country. Here's what's at stake when voters go to the polls.  
Barely a day goes by without a new voice backing the idea of a People's Vote on the final Brexit deal. Today, it's Vernon Bogdanor's turn. 
"I wasted time, and now doth time waste me" -- Richard II on BrexitFintan O’Toole: Ireland should offer UK precious gift of time  via @IrishTimesOpEd 
Rees-Mogg"The problem is, the people who want a second referendum are the Remainers who lost and they want the result reversed.“They want it to be like Denmark and like Ireland and carry on voting until we do what the EU wants." 
Remember Brexit failure and disruption ushers in Jeremy's socialist state. It is naive to believe Jeremy does not want hard Brexit. Both Jeremy and Jacob want Brexit, so they may remodel the UK to their personal political ideology. 
Negotiating away a democratic mandate served by the electorate isn't only foolish but political suicide #Brexit  
What a stupid line of argument this is. It's not for "Leave voters" to explain anything, it's for the politicians and civil service to deliver what they promised voters. The fact they have failed so miserably is the real reason many voters now favour a so-called no deal Brexit.  
Ah I finally watched your programme, you probably didn’t notice but it was solidly anti Brexit! There is a difference between news and student activism ....  
Politics very weird at the moment. Is Corbyn really going to make case that *Brexit* will return high-level manufacturing to UK?! What about all those HLMs on mainland EU? & really, dog-whistling on "cheap migrant labour"?  Both delusion & danger here.  
Long game; softly, softly - no, he's a long-standing Brexiteer. Jeremy Corbyn to highlight economic 'benefit' of Brexit as he demands UK stop relying on 'cheap labour from abroad'   
It’s quite incredible how a political group linked to the UDA, with more scandals than you can imagine and a plethora of homophobic and sectarian rants, can hold the balance of power over Brexit. Normal British people are decent, this lot are far from it. 
.@mrjamesob explained why Leave voters are now so keen on a no-deal Brexit - it is the only way they can avoid having to give detail on how Brexit will look.  
Corbyn is not up to speed with EU requirement that everyone be paid the going rate wherever they work: because, being stuck in 1970, this Tory-Brexit-supporter is not up to speed with anything.  
Take fright on Brexit: even the civil service head is telling us to panic | Polly Toynbee - the guardian  
Key decision which shows DUP want hard Brexit & is their vote in Parliament against a Customs Union last week. Had they supported a Customs Union, it would have had a majority. They voted against because they WANT a trade border with Ireland 
Conservatives got 42.4% of the votes - ie not a majority plus an election is on more than one issue. But even if a majority was in favour of damaging the nation and its future - ie hard brexit (it is not), it would be wrong. Everyone matters, including future generations. 
Corbyn learned his dogma at the knee of Tony Benn & has not changed, learned, or grown up in 50 years: “Jeremy Corbyn to highlight economic 'benefit' of Brexit as he demands UK stop relying on 'cheap labour from abroad' - The Independent  
OLLY (Oily) ROBBINS MAKES A RARE APPEARANCE TODAYat a Commons Brexit committee!As he emerges from the shadows, the architect of Chequers Plan will be questoned by Mogg & the ERG, Andrea Jenkyns & Peter Bone, providing a little political entertainment before airport departures. 
Influence of the DUP over Brexit, & their betrayal of Northern Ireland, is the great untold story of Brexit. People think they ‘went along with it’ in return for £1bn. On the contrary, they want Brexit, as hard as possible, because they want a new Irish border as hard as possible 
Corbyn shows his true colours by pretending there are economic benefits to #brexit despite overwhelming evidence to the contrary  
Theresa May, the Anthony Eden of Brexit, is run by the spirit of UKIP & the bodies of the DUP & ERG. The 3 key people running Brexit are Farage, Rees-Mogg & Arlene Foster. Mrs May has the same relationship to Brexit as the Queen to her Government - purely honorific 
Another brexit disaster looming.If the Scots,Welsh and Irish win this case it will be a major constitutional crisi.probably the end of brexit hopefully. 
Only 1 in 8 of voters back Theresa May's Brexit Plan - a massive embarrassment for the Tories. Brexit is their mess, they own it but we are the ones who will suffer. Utter #BrexitShambles #ShameOnYouTories #r4today 
If you’re really worried about Putin’s agenda to destabilise the EU and undermine democracy you should launch a proper inquiry into Russian involvement in the #Brexit vote  
I have always been keen on the WTO option.It is not 'no deal', but the best deal, which is why 95% of world trade operates under the system.REAL BREXIT WILL BE GREAT !  
Take fright on Brexit: even the civil service head is telling us to panic | Polly Toynbee "Only we can save ourselves" #PeoplesVote 
“Are you an 'ordinary voter'? If so, you probably know as much about the EU as your MP”  The start of our fightback against Remainer MPs.  Will you back this #Brexit campaign? Read about it here:  
This is morally bankrupt position. Corbyn is imposing an illegal Brexit process on the Labour party that members do not want. He is allowing the rise of the far right for which Brexit is a key mechanism. Labour needs to call an end to this madness. #CorbynOut 
Letter of the week on Brexit: a City’s veteran’s explosive verdict.  Worth reading every word. #Brexit  
SO BRECTUMS-please tell ME what the benefits are of brexit and when I may avail myself of them please what are the opportunities who are they with where are they and when are the coming - 50 years will be too late for me - ok for you millionaire leavers with millions in the bank 
“Brexit should be powering an export boom” says dunderhead #Corbyn...exporting what exactly? Says there should have been an industrial ‘plan’. Whaaat? There hasn’t been one of those for five decades and he wouldn’t know where to start! 
Brexiters’ intransigence more than anything has led to current polarised climate. Has moreover pushed many Remainers who previously advocated soft Brexit now to call for Remain. But this is also the nature of Brexit’s beast: compromise position gives nobody what they want  
Quick reminder only just over 20,000 votes needed to get  to 200,000. All nice round figures.Petition: Rescind Art.50 if Vote Leave has broken Electoral Laws regarding 2016 referendum  
Theresa ‘150 cookbook’   May???What kind of alien shapeshifter serves up       ‘chicken lasagna & boiled  potatoes’ As we head         towards the accident of a  Tory Brexit Apocalypse          
Brexit: The government is being warned that Brexit will hurt the poorest hardest, driving them to seek out cheaper, less healthy food. The Food Research Collaboration warns that the poor will be hit hardest from any disruption to the food chain.  
Today is the 162nd day parliament has sat since the general election.The first two Brexit laws came in on 26 June.There are 14 more sitting days before MPs hope to debate the final Brexit deal.Half the Brexit legislation hasn't been introduced yet.#r4today 
Hey @RuthDavidsonMSP This isn't a game, this is peoples lives, jobs, their futures and that of their children you're talking about.How can anyone take you seriously? You've had more stances on the Brexit issue than I've had years on this planet #flipflop #DarkMoneyDavidson 
Theresa May BLOCKED David Davis from planning for no deal Brexit, former advisor reveals  
Corbyn to highlight economic 'benefit' of BrexitDepressing to see leader of the opposition ignoring the clear message of manufacturing that Brexit will damage them deeply with his 1970s message that has no relevance in a globalised world 
Within 2 weeks of a No-Deal Brexit, 'civil unrest' could be sparked, warns Amazon. As prices go up, international trade collapses and motorways become lorry parks unease will spread across the UK! #BrexitShambles #r4today 
I'm so sick of anti brexit and anti trump! If we want to live in a democracy then accept and let's move on to the next chapter - all that's happening is we're stuck in a nasty rut, wasting time, money and the future! 
Take fright on Brexit: even the civil service head is telling us to panic | Polly Toynbee  
#Ireland #NorthernIrelandUK does not want a hard borderIreland does not want a hard borderIreland says EU has told them they do not want a hard border===> So don't have a hard border!This really isn't rocket science!Viva Real Brexit 
Supreme Court case over Scottish Brexit bill to begin - BBC News  
If I understood the once great Telegraph current editorial line it is that they’ve finally found a reason for #brexit.It will enable the British government to kill its own people.  
His supporters claim this, his critics claim that... whether it’s antisemitism or Brexit - the BBC’s MO to strive for balance means it distorts and ultimately misleads. I am a massive Laura fan. But there is a long historical list of context missing here:  
Brexit translation gaffe shows deeper cluelessness  
YouGov poll on EU #Brexit.Scotland:Remain 73%Leave 27%UK wide:Remain 53%Leave 47%  
No ⁦@jeremycorbyn⁩ there will be no industrial renaissance post brexit. Stop supporting the destruction of the U.K., workers rights, human rights, deregulation and shock capitalism.   
Keep a close eye on this - Molly Scott Cato's new website detailing the dark & dirty organisations which are collaborating behind the brexit vote to promote complete free trade.The Brexit Syndicate - exposed  
I agree Brexit has unleashed the worse and the best in Britain and we the sensible mainstream must stand and fight some of the extremism it has sadly normalised.  
The sad death of Brendan O'Neill. #Brexit  
The same lady who cried crocodile tears over the fate of stranded EU citizens like my wife post Brexit when she herself as a German never had to go through any Home Office officious bureaucracy or costs to become British.  
brexit deal unmitigated success  
Our friends across the ditch will soon hold a referendum on changing their drug laws, with legalising cannabis the most popular option. Choice!The world is moving to develop regulated legal markets for cannabis. It’s high time we joined them.  
1/)As Pakistan moves 2 “Soft Brexit”, first time in 20 years #Washigton & #India oriented PPP & PML-N respectively, poised 2 loose. a) #PTI—hot favourite—w/ all minuses likely 2 complete Asian pivot choosing binary (DC vs Beijing). b) Last battle 4 PM tipped IK 2 stand up 2 #IMF. 
Is he actually thick?!“The EU has just passed a law that could end the problems with free movement which led to Brexit in the first place”:#VoteLeaveFraud#VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw#BrexitBetrayal#BrexitShambles#StopBrexit#StopBrexitSaveBritain 
Long said that we are not in a negotiation...the EU are setting terms for our departure...Take it or Leave it...Take it = Pay & Obey No Say Leave it = No Deal WTO = FUBARHeseltine from 2017 seems to agree..There is no reason for #Brexit & now we know ...no legitimacy.  
Chickens leaving home to roost...#Brexit ain't working..if we'd had decent leaders not party hacks & ideologues in charge this self harm #BrexitShambles would have been strangled at birth!#StopBrexit#Reject #Revoke #Remain #Reform 
#JeremyCorbyn "will suggest the crash in the pound that followed the 2016 referendum made sterling more competitive and should have helped UK exporters""...JEZZA will also suggest that sticking a poker up your arse will give you a better posture" 
Supreme Court case over Scottish Brexit bill to begin  
Brexit: arguing back is white - two years ago I wrote that the WTO option is very dangerous and potentially expensive. Nothing has changed except the increasingly frenetic attempts to argue black is white - that we should embrace the disaster..  #Brexinfo. 
#BenedictCumberbatch on #Brexit set!All I can do is NOT stare at his head  
Disingenuous too - there is no benefit to brexit - & of course our friends are not "cheap labour from abroad". 
Great, just what we need from the leader of the official opposition right now. Lies about the economic ‘benefits’ of Brexit, Trumpist slogans, and a bit of anti-immigration rhetoric for good measure.We get enough of them from the ERG and Government FFS. 
Quite aside from pursuing a Brexit policy that will cause untold harm to the North East of England, it is unforgivable to then rock up there and actively troll us by saying “cook book” not once, but twice. 
Yes, Brexit does bring some of the worst barbaric reflexes in the UK to broad daylight.Yesterday an editorial advised politicians to "emulate" dictators.Today we see calls for re-establishment of the death penalty.Tomorrow torture, perhaps? 
No way Jeremy Hunt. You won’t get away with blaming the EU for no deal.Your party created this fiasco. And, unless there’s a true #PeoplesVote, the Brexit fiasco will finish your party.Give the public a say, with an option to stay.   
Since the Brexit vote, the U.K.'s economy is now 2.1% smaller than it would have been if Britain had voted to stay in the EU, according to @CER_EU  
Just when you thought the UK had reached the very depths of stupid, up steps Corbyn to say Brexit a success & adds dog whistle on migrantsSecond EU ref total waste of time to help England Wales change minds to be like Scotland NI. UK is over! #indyref2  
End 'botched' Brexit, Labour's Corbyn calls on Britain to back his vision  
Jeremy Corbyn to highlight economic 'benefit' of Brexit as he demands UK stop relying on 'cheap labour from abroad'  
I smell the stench of BS. If armageddon is coming because of #Brexit, how come countries like the USA, Japan, Australia etc get on just fine? They were not members if the #EU the last time I looked.  
Have you seen this? This is the consequence. @Telegraph publishes a call for reinstatement of UK death penalty post brexit, using the electric chair. The Tory party needs to end. It is destroying this country, economically, morally, rapidly & utterly. 
Well, Labour Party Pro EU member’s.It looks as if JC is still putting two fingers up to you. “The Long Game”. Right.Jeremy Corbyn to highlight economic 'benefit' of Brexit as he demands UK stop relying on 'cheap labour from abroad' - The Independent  
Only 45 Tweets! Deep State Cabel, Celebrities & MSM are all in 'DELETE DELETE DELETE' mode.#Qanon#WWG1WGA#Brexit  
Sorry but if you don’t want Welsh independence after Brexit you’re a fucking thick dickhead. Look at what is going to happen, the absolute state of this fascist island.  
The available Brexit options are what they were 2 years ago: 1) remain, 2) Norway, 3) Canada, 4) no deal. The government has ruled out 1 & 2. Parliament will rule out 3 & 4. Therefore the govt will fall, & the choice will be 1 v 2, remain or be a vassal state and 1 will prevail. 
Sorry but not sorry, we warned the world about Trump, Assange, Russia, UK officials being blackmailed by foreign agents for being pedosadists, etc years before the US, France election, Brexit, Syria (Assad's ISIS), and in general Russia shenanigans. #OpRussia never stopped. 
Over 12,000 signatures and rising.We voted to Leave the #EU@TheSDPUK please support this petition by RT as widely as possibleThank you#Brexit #MayMustGo 
What a clusterfuck this country has turned into - openly discussing the merit of the death penalty and arguing it would be a Brexit benefit. UK rightly so abolished death penalty on 1964, 9 years prior to joining the EU.  
George Soros' US money has been flowing into Europe in a huge way for many years. He's even funding efforts for a second EU referendum.~@Nigel_Farage 
Yes but #brexit has distracted from the real issues we face from within and it’s going to burn much needed cash which should be spent on societal gains.  
Would Channel 4 shut down and stop broadcasting if Brexit is a success?  
This postal votes issue re. 2014 Scottish independence referendum is proving to be a confusing yet murky business. Thanks to all who have contributed so far. I & many others are determined to expose the truth of what went on in Scotland 18th/19th September 2014! 
Always find it so hypocritical that @GiselaStuart came to the UK as an immigrant and yet decided to pull up the ladder to other foreign immigrants.  Why does she deny others the same privilege she enjoys?    Brexit Stinks.   
GCHQ spying on Brits is exactly the kind of privacy breach that, after Brexit, could lead EU Commission to declare UK is no longer a safe country third country for data flows  
I think 17.4 million Brits would be deliriously happy. END IT. We want nothing more to do with EU. 2 years of unadulterated garbage pretending to be "negotiations". We're no longer falling for the lies. We want NO DEAL #BREXIT and #FREEDOM for #UK 
TOMORROW:• Trivial interest in the royals • Unprompted attack on feminism • Dismissal of experts • Obsession with nanny-state • Wilful ignoring of imminent Brexit self-immolation  • Weird thing to be angry and write a front page headline about   
Nuance: Criticism of Israel is not intrinsically antsemitic. Some people call Corbyn a racist, even though he's spent his life fighting it. I want to stay in the EU, but recognise that constantly undermining Labour only helps the Tories, & makes hard Brexit more likely. Simple  
The Scottish Secretary of State saying a 'No Deal' Brexit is better than independence is the only story in town. Ruth Davidson *must* now be pressed to come out of hiding and address this and other issues. This simply *has* to lead BBC Scotland news.  
Brexiteers already struggling trying to pretend leaving the customs union and single market was on the brexit ballot paper. Think even they would admit adding in 'bringing back the death penalty' definitely not there....#brexithaos 
Remember... Brexit was supposed to be a way to fight back against the global elite. Instead it's just given big foreign banks a way to manipulate the government.  
Paul Staines (aka "Guido Fawkes") is an old friend of Vote Leave's Matthew Elliott. Arron Banks & Elliott never liked each other. Banks is likely to have his collar fingered fairly soon. Staines is hoping Banks rather than Elliott will take the fall for #Brexit criminality.  
Anti Brexit activists... liars, stupid, or both??  
Jobs bonanza as economy surges after Brexit vote  
Amazon’s UK boss has warned Britain would face “civil unrest” within weeks if a Brexit deal cannot be reached with the European Union. Can you see this prediction becoming true?  
Vote No for 50 years Brexit austerity and rolled back devolution and you might get a spaceport. Maybe.Hmm... 
Hi @Keir_Starmer very soon it won’t pass for a Brexit policy just to say “we’d get a better deal than the Tories would”.Very soon the @Conservatives are going to drag us out with a terrible deal or no deal at all.What is your plan to stop this from happening? Do you have one? 
Trump has been an economic footnote so far, but unfortunately Brexit has not — he hasn’t made the U.S. economy better, but Brexit has made the U.K. economy worse. 
150% correct from @spikedonline's O'Neill at @SpecCoffeeHouse.The #Brexit decision is rapidly coming down to this stark choice:No-Deal or No Democracy. 
Oxford City Council tonight voted overwhelmingly to call for a People's Vote on the terms of Brexit. @peoplesvote_uk 
2016: "Brexit is NOT about racism, it's about Sovereignty and trade deals, about global Britain"2018: "Brexit means we can legally kill brown people if we want, you know"  
Sounds right. Support for #deathpenalty is the most accurate predictor of support for #Brexit. 
Here's a list of brexit supporter demands. There's nothing on this list I want. The strangest surely is the return of incandescent light bulbs. Interested to know how the twitter bot troll army mobilize to make them fashionable again.#peoplesVote 
Yeah, there's definitely another referendum coming.  
£27m for Origi, £20m for Ings and £15m for Ojo Michael Edwards would have them Brexit negotiations boxed off within 2 days 
Bannon media - distracting from Brexit and moving on to the next phase of Fascism. Resist in real life - write to your MP, talk to your neighbours. #Resist 
A member of The Conservative & Unionist Party who are happy to see 100,000 jobs lost and 50 yrs austerity in Scotland post brexit  thinks we should reject Independence and the chance to choose for ourselves because of a spaceport?  
Katyn Referendum received almost 4,000 signatures approved today by Jersey City clerk's office!  Now we have 10 days to collect additional missing signatures to reach a total of 6,700. The fight is going forward and we will prevail at the end! 4,000 Jersey City residents said NO  
How odd that those who refuse to accept the 2016 referendum result now want another one  
Some posh twat scurrying off like a rat to get his money offshore, while telling the rest of us we'll need to wait 50yrs to see any benefits, is the absolute epitome of Brexit. I can't believe people are falling for this scam. This is fraud on a national scale. #BrexitCon 
So Jacob Rees Mogg admits that it may take 50 years to see the benefit of Brexit. I’m 29 now so there’s a good chance I will be dead before then. Why in the actual fuck do they think I would sacrifice my entire life to their xenophobic ideology? 
someone on the radio comparing brexit to the millenium bug, difference being nothing happened in 2000 because of years of precise planning whereas in 2019 i'll be murdering you with a chair for a tin of beans 
Juncker  & Barnier are the Bully Boys of Brexit 
The EU is negotiating from a rulebook.Britain is negotiating from a wish list.And that's a wish list built on fantasies.What is not to understand?If we end up with a No Deal Brexit it will be catastrophic- but no ones fault but our own.  #bbcnewsten 
Jeremy Hunt in Berlin today: The UK was repeatedly warned before the Brexit referendum that it was taking extreme risks. It ignored those warnings. Now it blames everyone else when it starts to panic #brexit  
Thought Hunt was meant to be sweet-talking the Germans! But blames EU if No-Deal & threatens anti-EU feeling in UK! #BrexitChaos Brexit ohne Abkommen: Reale Gefahr - oder Drohkulisse?  |  
Look at the replies to any Arron Banks tweet. See how many don't make it through Twitter quality filters.That LeaveEU digital army would never translate into the promised street protests when Brexit collapses under the combined weight of reality & criminality 
This article is just so bad 1. Says the choice is between death penalty and release on the streets. Nonsense. Life imprisonment available2. Says we can’t prosecute here cos human rights. Rubbish. 3. Says Brexit means we can leave ECHR. Unrelated.   
Sadly this is true even until this very day. Difference is that we will soon have another chance to rectify this flagrant imbalance once and for all. We must take it this time and grasp it with both hands before Brexit wrecks life for millions. Scotland deserves better.  
Brexit plan going down badly even with @theresa_may’s hand picked audience today - check out their body language: 
#BBCNews New Foreign Sec @Jeremy_Hunt already starting to blame other EU countries for its #Brexit failures. But it’s the UK #Government that chose the timetable, took 2 years to put forward unworkable proposals, split on them, & has no majority for them in Commons. #Newsnight 
These remarks from DUP are ridiculous.Show me where or how the DUP have worked to avoid a hard border? EVERYTHING they've done has brought NI to the brink of no dealNI has opportunity to have best of both worlds and they OPPOSED it Duplicitous Unreliable Party #Brexit  
“36% of the UK population are just one heating bill or a broken washing machine away from hardship”... well we all know someone is going to benefit from this post brexit ... cheap food imports -low standards - say no more .. that’s one big market to corner and get rich from  
The journey to #Brexit - no media coverage of the benefits we get from EU!  
Worth pausing to take this in. A prominent national newspaper is giving column inches to a man suggesting that a benefit of Brexit is that we will be able to put British citizens in the electric chair. Our country is in trouble. 
Plenty of Labour PMs have presided over the UK tax authority and done absolutely nothing of substance to clamp down on the offshore game.There would have been a coup had any of them tried.The EU is trying- and look how far Britain's elite are willing to go. #brexit 
Brexit broke parliament. Now, only the people can fix it | Vernon Bogdanor  
Theresa May blocked David Davis from planning for a no deal Brexit, former adviser reveals:  #BrexitBetrayal 
George Soros' US money has been flowing into Europe in a huge way for many years. He's even funding efforts for a second EU referendum.  
.@GovRicketts says “Nebraska is a pro-life state.” The same Gov. Pete Ricketts who was the primary funder behind a referendum to restart executions. The same Gov. Pete Ricketts who blew taxpayer funds on black market lethal injection drugs. #PeteChoosesDeath #OhForPetesSake 
The Home Sec has spotted that there are many capital punishment fans among Tory & #Brexit voters. It's all about him & his leadership quest. 
“A World Free Trade deal under WTO  rules is not just better than a bad deal. It offers us the unalloyed gains of #Brexit & soon, in a way that no one, EU included, can stop. It’s time this government embraced it firmly as its main Brexit policy” #WTOnow 
You've got to admit Brexit has emboldened the dickheads. Made some real objectionable Daily Mailers think "maybe I can get away with this other terrible fucking opinion I hold". Unfortunately the Telegraph, those click-desperate bellends, aren't classy enough not to publish. pic.twitter.com/ANAa8n7i1s 
Wigmore, Banks and Ashcroft are more than mere citizens of Belize of course. All three have been Belizean diplomats. And Lord Ashcroft owns the biggest bank... but you Brexit guys believe in that fucking sovereignty bullshit if you want hey 
I am also contractually obliged to point out that Arron Banks, Andy Wigmore and "Lord" Ashcroft are all citizens of Belize. Belize benefits massively from Brexit not least since its biggest industries "cane sugar" and "tax avoidance" reap huge benefits from Brexit 
Gisela, you broke the law, you rigged a referendum from which most of those personally affected were barred, you misrepresented a narrow win as decisive, you claimed the result as being for the hardest #Brexit possible when the question was a simple binary.#CriminalBrexit #Remain 
Errrr no - this is factually incorrect. Whilst we remain part of the ECHR (which is not part of the EU) we cannot allow the death penalty. This has nothing to do with Brexit.  And the UK has no jurisdiction over Guantanamo Bay - that is a USA centre. 
"Let's bring back bendy bananas""Yay""And blue passports""Yay brexit""ᴬᶰᵈ ʰᵃᶰᵍᶦᶰᵍ ᵒᵘʳ ᶜᶦᵗᶦᶻᵉᶰˢ ᵇʸ ᵗʰᵉ ᶰᵉᶜᵏ ᵘᶰᵗᶦᶫ ᵗʰᵉʸ'ʳᵉ ᶠᵘᶜᵏᶦᶰᵍ ᵈᵉᵃᵈ""Sorry what was that last one?""You heard"  
 @TommySheppard: "Anyone on the government benches who believes the #Brexit process has done anything to strengthen the union is deluding themselves"There's only one party that stands up for Scotland and that's the SNP.  
1. Ignore Brexit2. Claim Scotland won’t get into EU  3. Compare Scotland to rUK (which is basically London & SE)4. Get out your MEGAPHONE  Job done on showing how Scotland is uniquely incapable of being a normal nation that governs itself 
Perspective: Trump hasn’t made the U.S. economy better, but Brexit has made the U.K. economy worse  
Did somebody say "meddling"?@USAIDMacedonia is giving away money through its Soros line of grants for the upcoming #Macedonia name issue referendum. Grants are clearly meant to increase turnout, while opponents of the Zaev-Tsipras deal are calling for a boycott  
.@JoPlattMP says the debate was a bit too ScottishyIt's OK JoWe are leaving the unionGood luck with your BrexitScotland xx 
1/2 In the Lords I will say that the Br political system is breaking under the weight of Brexit. The White Paper dividing the Tory party is unnegotiable in Bxl without further big concessions. Even if agreed, half in-half out couldn’t be a lasting basis for our relations with EU. 
The Millennium Bug was spotted in advance and thus experts worked to correct the problem. Their work paid off, the foretold time passed without incident.If it had been handled like Brexit, a few months before 1st Jan experts would have said "No more computers, back to abacus!" 
Beginning to think that the costs of Brexit will not be confined to the economy but will damage the fabric of democracy & public institutions.  
Yes before the referendum we were ahead of the rest of the #EU in growth with the ability to invest in technology. Now we’re bottom of the league, and we haven’t even left yet. Falling off a cliff will no doubt be a godsend for most  of the country. Well done @afneil. #stopbrexit 
Today’s hot Brexit take: forget about bendy bananas, forget about blue passports, let’s bring back the death penalty 
The dire consequences of a no-deal Brexit  via @financialtimes. Raab says he is preparing to walk away with no deal. What madness is this. Stop Brexit. #FBPE 
My sandwich looks just like James OB from LBC, Any minute now it's going to start bleating and crying about a hard #Brexit  
The second right wing British newspaper in 24 hours to publish a piece which would have been unthinkable pre Brexit. These people want to leave the Eu and join Iran, Saudi Arabia and North Korea in the executioners  club. Shocking. The aberrant being normalized.  
The dire consequences of a no-deal Brexit  
Exclusive: Theresa May accused of handing EU 'blank cheque' over Brexit divorce bill payments  
The democratically-elected Neb. legislature abolished the death penalty in 2015 by overriding a @GovRicketts veto. How did Gov Ricketts respond? He pumped $300,000+ of his own money into a referendum to restart executions. Now he’s trying to execute prisoners with untested drugs. 
When you’re supposed to be negotiating Brexit but you just can’t wait for that next episode...  
I get that the gov are going to blame it the Eu for NoDeal Brexit.I get that Brexiters are going to blame remainers for not getting behind Brexit.But I’m sick to death of Remainers blaming other Remainers for not being good enough!You know what, there wasn’t a fucking manual. 
the current Big Myth is that independence would somehow mean Scotland would avoid pain of Brexit (ignoring that to keep frictionless UK single market access & currency we couldn’t join EU) and that Joxit would be weirdly painless in comparison to breaking our far deeper UK union 
15-SECOND WARNING ON BREXIT: In just 15-seconds @Theresa_May made promises for #Brexit she can’t deliver. So, Brexit should be called off. Share the video and read @Jon_Danzig’s related article on our Facebook page. Link:  #StopBrexit #PeoplesVote 
Just revoke A50 ffs. Anyone tries to riot in this heat will be dead within ten minutes. #Brexit 
Brexit 'seismic shock' farming warning  
I originally favoured a Canada-style UK-EU free trade agreement on #Brexit. But it is now too late. It's not just the "clock is ticking". The government has made too many concessions and they can't be "unmade".  "No deal" #Brexit under #WTO rules now the obvious choice 
Michael Heseltine, Kenneth Clarke, John Major, Anna Soubry, Dominic Grieve, & others - these are not extremists, they’re actually not people many have voted for in the past, however they have come of ‘their time’, they are standing by their altruistic principles against Brexit.  
Chris at his salient but pugnacious best. All those interested in the Brexit debacle must read his blog.  
The #Tory #FarReich have been working on blaming the #EU for a #NoDealBrexit for over two years!Its THEIR objective, they KNOW the consequences won't be popular with voters, & so they are looking to say when #Brexit goes belly up, "Honestly,it wasn't our fault!"#PEOPLESvote 
Well, if you ever needed an endorsement that after Brexit an Independent Scotland is the best country in the world to build your European Business HubThis is it, Barclays building Business Hub for 5,000 staff and potential future growth for another 2,500 on top.  
Project Fear Mark 1 was a risible failure. Nevertheless the powers that be are determined to orchestrate Project fear Mark 2, if there's a "no deal" #Brexit. Why should we heed this one?  
A no-deal Brexit survival guide: what food to stockpile  #NoDealBrexit #NoDealSurvival 
Does anyone really believe these draft laws will ever be enacted and come into force?  I shall put a pencil at 12th of Never in my post Brexit diary. 
UK govt has been frustrated by the hard negotiating line pursued by the EU and the unusual degree of unity in supporting the EU’s Brexit negotiation strategy. Survey evidence: by and large Europeans support the EU’s negotiating strategy.By @stefwalter__ 
Because it was the EU that called an unnecessary referendum then cheated & lied their way to victory then wasted 2 years arguing among themselves not negotiating then let themselves be dictated to by people who insisted we all get free unicorns or else so we ended up with no deal  
So far we've had claims that Banks' £12m donation to the Brexit campaign was the result of the sale of a law firm, that he has successful insurance businesses and lucrative diamond mines; all claims that appear dubious at best. Now you know why there needs to be an investigation.  
I see "These Islands" has updated the script for "The Germans" episode in Fawlty Towers. It's now called, "The Europeans" and the catchphrase is, "Don't mention the Brexit!". 
We're swimming in a sea of misinformation so it's hard to know what's what these days. But, tell me, when the Tories blame the EU for their Brexit debacle, will you believe them? I certainly won't but I don't know about anyone else. 
Remember when EU had beef moutains and then abolished them...USA have 2.5 billion llbs of Beef ready to flood the UK Market and put British Beef Farmers out of Business #nfu #Farming #Brexit  
After Brexit, we can give Isil terrorists the justice they deserve – and that means the death penalty, writes Col Richard Kemp 
I don't think the Scottish people agree with that, Mr. @DavidMundellDCT especially when 62% voted to remain in the EU. Scotland clearly needs #indyref2No deal Brexit preferable to breaking up union, says David Mundell  
This is the Moment of Truth on #Brexit and Northern Ireland - Speech by @MichealMartinTD, at the MacGillSummer School @MacGillSummerSc 
The @sajidjavid #deathpenalty disaster today shows a freewheeling govt, out of control, out of synch, out of leadership, out of a plan, out of moral compass. Just what we need to navigate Brexit.  
Was informed by a Tory Brexiteer MP that in the Party 'we are all Leavers now' when I protested at HMG's hardBrexit policy. I totally refused to accept it then and haven't repented or rolled in behind Brexit shambles for an instant since as actually like what the EU stands for. 
This is unfair on @Jeremy_Hunt - he’s accepted the referendum result, is not calling for a second referendum - and his comments today were about getting EU leaders to make Barnier see sense. Post the video of his comments today and let your readers decide  
When keyboard warriors tell actual business people to manage Brexit by cheering up and thinking positive .Even Brexiteer-in-Chief, Rees Mogg says it'll be 50 years before we've reasons to be cheerful economically.Why should we grin and bear wjat is completely unnecessary?  
A leading government trade official was paid almost half a million pounds then quit before a single post-Brexit negotiation, it emerged today  
Brexit  
⁦@Channel4News⁩ EXPLOSIVE load of bollox from the usual anti/brexit cabal of unicorn chasers - journalism based on prejudice has hit a new low @Arron_banks 
You somehow managed to miss out £250,000 donated to women’s empowerment projects and Prince Harry’s Sentable AIDS foundation in all the “brexit bashing excitement !” ...  
Remainer Hunt Wants Single Market Membership and Second Referendum  
Do you think a no-deal Brexit is inevitable? Please vote and RT 
Brexit loving @Channel4News ! 
#Brexit: a fucking waste of all of our sodding useful time on Earth. That should have been on a bus. 
reverse Brexit best chnace  
Fed up of Brexit, the way things are going ?Fed up of immigration & Islamic entryism ?Then get of your ass & don’t expect others to do it for you,be their at Windsor castle to Petition the queen. 5 August 2pm Windsor castle Get @theresa_may  OUT 
Scot linked to £425k #darkmoney Brexit donation now facing questions about DUP “champagne networking reception” at Tory conference. More to come on this story. Not looking good for the Tories and there bigoted pals in the DUP 
My economic policies for a post Brexit UK.1. Slash personal tax rates for all people.2. Cut Corporation Tax to 12%3. Abolish Death Duty4. Reduce VAT Tax people less and allow them to decide how to use their money!A smaller state means a greater Britain! 
What's the point of winning a referendum if the government is going to ignore your wishes ? The @conservatives are doomed if they don't replace @theresa_may with a #Brexiteer soon. 
BUREAUCRACY after #Brexit many citizens & business are worried about bureaucracy. We are pleased to announce that there will be a lot more of it, lots of new forms, paperwork and interrogations and thats just at the @PostOffice allow plenty of time#NoDealBrexit #NoDealSurvival 
Two unionists who care not a jot about the impact the economic impact of a No Deal Brexit on Scotland except for how it effects their precious UK and Union Jack suits.   
Channel 4 News has also spoken to the woman who owns the land where the mine is situated. Banks compensates her for that work with 13 sacks of maize meal a year. The value of the diamonds mined to date is £3,000. Banks invested £12m in Brexit. 
BY ME: @HuffPost "A No-Deal Brexit Would Be Catastrophic For The Environment" 
Martin Rowson on Theresa May's Brexit roadshow - Political Cartoon Gallery in Putney  
If Brexit is so bad.....Imagine what a disaster independence would be.  
Mad stuff on #C4News about the dodgy dealings of those driving #Brexit @BenPBradshaw should look at  and  from @MollyMEP - someone IS bringing it all together 
As #brexit bad boy @Arron_banks denies bribery - former minister @BenPBradshaw calls for police to investigate #ArronBanks #C4News 
The LADYBIRD BOOK of RISING PRICES.Part of the 'Learning to Live with #Brexit' series.#LadybirdBrexit #FBPE 
The year is 3018. Britain hasn’t had rain for 1,000 years. Dani and Jack are still winning Love Island, Brexit negotiations are almost complete, Donald Trump is about to cause his 300th war and The Incredibles 3 has just been released. 
Allison Roche from UNISON warns that we can't trust the Tory Government to protect workers' rights after Brexit. Labour must stand up for the workers' rights we have protected in the EU.  
HM @JuanManSantos - the man that turned "peace" into "cocaine" will now settle in #London...yet another infamous Soros puppet...   @realDonaldTrump@RoyalFamily@10DowningStreet@Nigel_Farage#Brexit #UK #England 
Can you help take Brexit to court? Want to get the referendum overturned? This could do it!@BremainInSpain @kyletaylor @BestForBritain 
Why did @Arron_Banks announce a "significant" diamond find in Lesotho?Why have workers at his mine heard nothing about it?Where did Banks get the money he poured into #Brexit?"Found it in a hole in Lesotho" ain't going to work, Arron.#c4news #Brexit #BrexitRussia @MollyMEP 
Brexit broke parliament. Now, only the people can fix it | Vernon Bogdanor  
RESPECTED LABOUR MEMBER Atma Singh warned against @SadiqKhan as Mayor in 2016.  Atma said "He will revert to type"  TRUER WORD never spoken.  @borisjohnson #borisjohnson #borisjohnson #Brexit  
In Jeremy Hunt land, the British public will blame the EU rather than this shambles of a govt, for a no deal Brexit. Steve Bannon really has been giving the boys some hot tips when visiting....#VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw #VoteLeaveCheated 
#Labour #PeoplesVote Listening to @RupaHuq "The clock is ticking, damage is being done, this is the only way out of the leap into the unknown" @EmmaBurnell_ from @OpenLabour "My solidarity with human beings doesn't stop at borders, real or imagined" #Brexit  
‘Brexit is a TREMENDOUS mistake’ Richard Branson's fury over decision to leave the EU. This Parasite, suing NHS & Government over train contract. He doesn’t even live in U.K.! He’s just after himself, not UK!  
Brexit BOMBSHELL: Barnier's FIVE rejections of May's soft Brexit White Paper REVEALED. EU We  want more! Are you surprised? Start No Deal, let them come running! morehttps://www.express.co.uk/news/uk/993040/Brexit-news-Michel-Barnier-Theresa-May-White-Paper-UK-EU-negotiation 
Just watching the section about welsh farmers, I find it amazing that people still talk about opportunities of brexit but nobody can ever name a specific one, it’s just platitudes and generalisations.   #C4News 
OFOC's @tessmillsy brings some calm to the Kate Hoey deselection debate and calls on Labour to agree a Brexit policy which reflects its members  
The loss of our moral authority is in my view the highest price we have paid for Brexit  
Amazon boss says "no deal" Brexit will see civil unrest within 2 weeks.This would be the same Amazon who use EU rules to avoid paying £billions in UK tax on UK profits. How stupid do you have to be to STILL not see through this scaremongering EU propaganda? 
Dear Andrea, please point me to one of the grey spots on the world where the EU has not already  got a FTA or is not in advanced talks to get one that you see as this great opportunity for the UK post Brexit.  
In the Commons, David Lidington continued the Tory Party line of lies protecting Brandon Lewis over the Brexit Customs vote cheating fiasco. He said Lewis "was not at any point aware" that he was paired with Jo Swinson for the votes. He cheated, he should be sacked! #ToryShambles 
Great to see @Channel4News really digging into Arron Banks’s businesses. As @openDemocracy has reported for past year, there’s huge questions over how Banks could afford to pay £8m+ on Brexit. But for many they’re questions don’t want to ask 
Brexit is 5980 hours away. #brexit 
POLL: Brits Overwhelmingly Reject Tory 'Soft Brexit'  
Symptoms: instability (“downturns” every 4-7 years, global crashes); extreme inequality; bitter divisions (Brexit, Trump, anti-immigrant hysteria, dictatorships).Underlying disease: capitalism. 
On 29 MARCH 2019 #Brexit Day, stay in your homes if you leave, you may find yourself without food, water, without accommodation and without protection. Water means life. Don't waste it. Make your food stocks last ration your supply avoid wasting it.#NoDealBrexit #NoDealSurvival 
“A ‘No Deal’ scenario isn’t the disaster that it has always been painted as, we can make the best of the opportunities #Brexit has to offer,” says the IEA’s @nissych5 A report by the IEA Brexit Unit argues that 'No Deal' would not be a disaster →  
Prof Patrick Minford doesn’t do science. — No-deal Brexit screws science.Prof Patrick Minford doesn’t do healthcare. — No-deal Brexit screws health frameworks & cross-border healthcare.Prof Patrick Minford only does trade... & most experts in trade disagree with Minford.  
Tonight @7 more on the Bad Boy of Brexit @Arron_banks he gave millions to brexit- in part 2 of @jrug's investigation - why did he give thousands to an African minister ? @Channel4News @7 
See on the news that farms have fields of soft fruit rotting due to the heat wave & not enough people coming from Europe to pick it. Odd, leading up to the Brexit vote, I read on here from 'experts' that the Brits will get these jobs back from the EU labourWhere are they?   
Slightly unfortunate that Mr rapid eye movement himself, @Jeremy_Hunt, one of the most prolific involuntary blinkers in British politics, has today declared that Britain "will not blink" in Brexit negotiations. 
Brussels REJECTS Brexit plan for London as Barnier admits EU autonomy at RISK  
As we are currently EU citizens, and personally I should very much like to remain one, can we not apply to the EU for legal representation against Brexit and the Tory government for removing our rights and our freedoms against our wishes? 
Putin rejoicing whatever form Brexit takes - he’s paid for it, after all  
Let's put it to the people of Scotland in a referendum and find out.  
Heseltine made the point to me you can’t help anyone if there is no money coming in: Brexit ensures there won’t be.  
Farmers are one of so many groups that were persuaded to believe in Brexit - and it’s now costing them heavily.  
It is a distortion of national thinking, a feature of government propaganda, to present matters as if Remainers -*disappeared after the referendum, *are all now Leavers, *are all proved wrong, *have become transparent, inaudible and invisible.And Kuenssbeg parrots it  
No-deal Brexit matters to those who depend on uninterrupted flow of medical supplies.   
No-deal #Brexit would inflict misery, but the ERG are marching the Govt & the whole country towards the cliff. Point is @Jeremy_Hunt it’s time to set out the consequences & costs for individuals, communities & our economy in plain English & step in to stop it. 
1 in 4 Would Back Right-Wing Party Tackling Radical Islam, Supporting Brexit  
Concerning reports that Trump and  Putin had a private discussion about holding a referendum in Ukraine, McFaul asked the logical question:“By the way, who hired Trump or Putin to speak on behalf of Ukrainians?”  
Ok Scotland, you can have independence, where we make our own decisions, or the magical racist theme park mystery box of Brexit, what’s it gonna be?  
FACT 1: The Tories have wasted 2 years fighting with themselves rather than devising a workable Brexit plan. FACT 2: The EU's stance has remained consistent throughout.Conclusion: Anyone who thinks this farce is the EU's fault is a categorical moron. 
Laura Kuenssberg is still talking about “former Remainers” as if it has become logically impossible for anyone to promote remaining in the EU.We are Remainers. We always have been. We didn’t go away. We WONT GO AWAY IF BREXIT HAPPENS. YOU WILL NOT DISMISS HALF THE POPULATION. 
Brexit is part of a bigger problem. “Former Trump aide Bannon sets up group to undermine EU - Reuters  
Arron Banks was the biggest individual donor to the Brexit cause. But for him diamonds are more than a girl's best friend. Find out why on tonight's Channel Four News! 
There's now a dangerous void where government should be. My latest Brexit Blog post on Raab's 'no payment' threat, Brexiter anger, and the absence of political leadership, just up:  
not saying this is a metaphor but the entire cabinet went to the north-east to boast about the bright post-Brexit future and now the train has stopped and no one is going anywhere because of a fire according to @Steven_Swinford 
Here are the key pro #Brexit propagandists highlighted on #BrexitSyndicate website:  Breitbart The Murdoch EmpireThe Daily Mail The Barclay Brothers BrexitCentral Alt-right social media All have played a part in spreading disinformation: 
The government and BBC still haven't highlighted the effects of Brexit on our overseas territories. So the job is left to foreign media like this German TV report in English. The OSTs also have borders with the EU. And closing them with a #NoDealBrexit will hit these people hard! 
BRITS OVERWHELMINGLY REJECT @Theresa_may soft #Brexit!  Evidence she deceived Brits by using secret Remain dept. to override David Davis not helping, ruled by Remoaner @OllyRobbins!  BROKE PLEDGES.  @borisjohnson #borisjohnson #boris johnson #Brexit  
The British Government announces its intention to initiate free trade talks with the United States, Australia and New Zealand. No mention in its communiqué that these talks will be constrained by the Chequers Plan which locks the UK into adhering to EU rules and regs post-Brexit 
Today, I brought the Cabinet to the heart of Tyne and Wear and the heart of the Northern Powerhouse. And we’re coming with a very simple message: #Brexit is going to stab you through the heart & this Government is going to stand by watch your businesses bleed to death.  
“A no-deal Brexit is the right way to go. The EU is only interested in a deal that keeps us beholden to its imperious diktats, and that would run counter to the democratic vote. To preserve democracy, we must say: No Deal.”Brendan O’Neill in @spectator 
Leading lawyer Martin Howe QC warnsThe common rulebook 'is a killer for trade deals with major partners because it stops us agreeing mutual recognition of standards which deviate in any way from the EU rulebook'Very worrying!This is not #Brexit 
New Foreign Secretary Jeremy Hunt “we are headed towards a Brexit No Deal by accident”Hahahahahahahahaha!!!!!! Unfucknbelievable pic.twitter.com/joWju6PdQ6 
Barnier says May's White Paper is a Recipe for EU Bureaucracy & Fraud!Sounds like a match made in heaven!Mr Barnier also confirmed that Brussels would not be negotiating with the British paper because it was precisely that – a British offer!#Brexit #EU 
. @PeteWishart asks Cabinet Office Minister Chloe Smith how it helps to strengthen the union if a no deal Brexit means potentially a state of emergency with protect & survive leaflets being given to families in Scotland?  No answer from the minister. 
Suspect most don’t get that point. After seeing a leaver say, “if you don’t like #Brexit, go live in EU”, I commented, “well, that’s harder after Brexit”.He replied, “Don’t be silly - the government isn’t going to stop you”.Lots of people don’t get the reciprocal arrangements 
I was a lifelong Tory voter, I joined the @LibDems in 2016 after the #Brexit referendum vote, which by the way was achieved by cheating and breaking the law. Since then I have followed and am followed by many like minded @UKLabour members and voters. I am happy to support this  
So the EU negotiations team have been sat waiting for 2 years for the Tories to actually present a plan, but now Jeremy Hunt says we will blame the EU for a no deal Brexit. Little hint we won't, we'll blame you Hunt, you and your cockwombling inept friends 
Don't forget, she was also happily using AIQ for her organisation @Change_Britain right after the referendum campaign ended. @michaelgove used AIQ too for his leadership campaign...these MPs are all complicit...pic from  
No we will not run out of cheese, medicines, nor cars, post-#Brexit.We've hit peak dumbassery.Business trades, not govtm & business will continue to trade.Sure the paperwork will change but the EU delivered plenty of that anyway,Stop crying bedwetters, I'm embarrassed for you 
Lord Heseltine - It's no surprise to me that growing in volume & in articulation is the demand for another referendum once the people have seen the fact. #PeoplesVote#StopBrexit #FBPE @Andrew_Adonis @Anna_Soubry 
Memo to MPs: You’ll never have to vote for a WTO Brexit: it’s the inevitable default position. 
He helped our Referendum He taught us to communicate avoiding espionage It’s time we help him.The case against Assange is a threat to all Tweeters, publishers, journalists and internet services.This case is a threat to freedom of expression.#FreeAssange 
Risk is measured by two factors. One is the chance of an event happening. The other is the impact of it.Say risk = probability x impact.So even if there's only a 10% chance of No Deal, the huge impact means the risk is still too great.Therefore we must cancel Brexit NOW. 
Its actually quite sinister how Westminster are using Brexit to try and erase Wales and Scotland in their efforts to make "Britain" seem bigger than it really is. Next thing is we will lose our geo-protected labels and that would be a death knell really 
Blame for Brexit ChaosRemainersTheresa MayJudgesMP'sEUBarnierIrishMerkelMacronVaradkarElitesestablishmentGina MillerEnemies of the peopleSaboteursGary LinekerScotlandStrurgeonJohn MajorTony BlairLily AllenNo Blame for Brexit ChaosBrexiters 
The brexit manifesto was essentially blame everyone else, so they continue to do so. Nothing is ever their fault 
Even if that was true, which it isn't, the whole point is that independence AVOIDS Brexit, y'twit.  
I'm not taking any chance there will be a no deal Brexit. I'm stockpiling essentials NOW!  
“The clock is ticking. We need an agreement on the British withdrawal that includes a viable solution for [Northern] Ireland,” says Europe Minister ahead of EU #Brexit talks. Read her statements in English here:  
Ironically, the EU could save us from Mrs May's Brexit disaster, says economist Roger Bootle  
Seems some of these FBPE types just really hate Britain. I get you might not like Brexit. Fine. But why delight in a situation that divides the Continent further? 
If Brexit was a pole vault.  
Maybe the most extraordinary, and reprehensible, comment piece I've seen in a reputable paper. Despite disclaimers, it's a paean to autocracy. And it may well be a harbinger of where the public mood will go if we get a kamikaze Brexit.  
People are wrong to think the Tory Brextremists don't have a #Brexit plan. They have a well worked-out plan which they don't want the public to know about. It's called "We want a #BrexitTaxHaven for the rich and screw everyone else". #StopBrexit #PeoplesVote 
Video: @nickbaines speaking in the Lords Brexit debate today. Full transcript at  
Nigel Farage - "I’ve been saying for over a year that if #Brexit is seen to be betrayed, there will be a backlash the likes of which the political classes in this country simply cannot understand."  
 For all the talk of the UK nations as 'equal partners', the Tory government continues to ignore Scotland on Brexit. Here's what has happened.  
Britain doesn't need a fictional independence from the EU. But it does need independence from the multi-billionaire 'citizen of nowhere' and Trump crony Rupert Murdoch who has been perverting our politics for decades.  #StopBrexit #Brexit #PeoplesVote 
Tory MP Nadine Dorries tells @IainDale EU “bullies” and Remainer MPs could end up forcing Britain into a no-deal Brexit  
This will not help with the Brexit negotiations between the UK and the EU - Member States have clear obligations under the EU's Guidelines on the Death Penalty - the UK Government's actions are incompatible with those guidelines  
IN CASE YOU MISSED IT: Just 1 in 8 voters back Theresa May's Brexit plan according to a new poll published in the Sunday Times. Her deal will not only leave Britain weaker, poorer and less influential but also heavily dissatisfied too. Please share 
Speaking in the Commons, David Lidington insists Brandon Lewis "was not at any point aware" that he was paired with Jo Swinson for crunch Brexit votes last week. She'd tweeted about it four hours earlier..  
I have failed to do a deal with my local gym ‘by accident’ #Brexit 
Selling an already dead vision of Brexit to the general public would be beyond even the Wolf of Wall Street, yet the Terrified Rabbit of Downing Street is giving it a go  
There are still Remain politicians trying to frustrate and delay Brexit. Don't let them get their way - join our campaign today at  
Government's pro-EU publicity blitz gave Remain an unfair advantage in the referendum, report suggests  
The cabmen’s shelters in London have been around since 1875 looking after London’s cabbies. 13 remain open in London and I visited a few this morning. Loved chatting to the cabbies on their take on Brexit & President Trump!  
Apparently #Brexit is worse than people being blown up by the IRA... You can always rely on @theSNP for some perspective!! 
“I just happened to vote for leave”No @lizbilney, you just happened to be the CEO of .You, Farage, Banks & Wigmore ran a huge campaign deliberately based on lies to persuade ppl to vote for #Brexit which will negatively affect them for decades.  
Saw @SODEMAction outside parliament today!The sign reads"brexit as it was promised to the people in 2016 is an unachievable fantasy"Retweet if you agree!#FBPE #StopBrexit 
Lord Archer -close to Mrs T- told me there was no way she’d have wanted Brexit: she’d see outgoings but no incomings  
Seems incredible that the Tories are only just waking up to this!May's Brexit isn't a Brexit which is palatable to either Remainers or Leavers. Best to just #StopBrexit & admit it was never possible to deliver the fantasy promised. #VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw 
Any jihadi who kills should be executed.Most Brits would agree with that.Most MPs would DISAGREE with that.Just shows yet again that most MPs are totally out of touch with the wishes of their constituents#Brexit & scrapping foreign aid are other examples.There are many more. 
Fuck this bargain-basement reactionary, tinpot fascist, no-moral, no-backbone slumlord Brexit government  
Time for the Great British Brexit debate to start. Engage with a Brexit supporters at every opportunity and address concerns and explain implications of leaving. Engage at the Supermarket, Hairdressers, Leisure Centre, Bus Queue, just everywhere. Let’s Stop Brexit together.#FBPE 
Brilliant speech by Michael Heseltine in House of Lords in support of a people’s vote to stop Brexit. After John Major yesterday, real momentum now 
House Republicans, after a word salad of "local civil Tocqueville little volutarism society platoons": "Let us now turn to overruling DC's tipped wage referendum." 
Is that why you dispensed all those threats? And let’s be clear: Brexit is what Putin is rejoicing in — no deal would just be the icing on the Brexit cake.  
The latest preparedness note for no deal Brexit by the @EU_Commission doesn't fill the 3.6m EU citizens in the UK with much confidence. We've been relentlessly campaigning for ring fencing what has been agreed on #citizensrights. Falling on deaf ears on both sides of the channel 
Theresa May still spreading the myth that there will be a #brexit dividend for the NHS..... the lie that won't die. #StopBrexit #FBPE 
Barely a week ago Grieve threatened to "collapse the Government" if he and his Rebels did not get a soft enough Brexit. Now he complains that the Brexiteers will do this. What an expedient, two-faced traitor!   
No .@Jeremy_Hunt , the public won't blame the EU for a No Deal Brexit. They will blame a divided Tory Cabinet which claimed we could have our cake and eat it and instead is delivering a shambolic Tory #Brexit , at the expense of British jobs and livelihoods. 
This sneering tone, personalised abuse, and denigration of a successful business simply sums up the discredited Nationalist Party. Exec believes that Scotland, and our UK, can be better than this.Reconciliation, not referendum.  
New Foreign Secretary Jeremy Hunt as an explanation for why we might be looking at a no deal Brexit, it of course has nothing to do with the shambolic shower of Government which has been negotiating for us  
Brextremist Jacob Rees-Mogg admits that it may be over 50 YEARS before anything he sees as a 'Brexit benefit' may happen.Here's what might happen over the next 50 years. Please RT:  
New Brexit Secretary, same old incompetence. Don’t allow them to throw away our futures. Join  and support a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit Deal. #FFS 
It's not just the Swing to UKIP. It's the people that are joining UKIP on mass & swelling their funds considerably. This will mean the ability to fight every seat up & down our land. Bad news for the Tories. Great news for Brexit. A Theresa May u turn not far away. Mark my words. 
So what? I'm sure the EU27 governments care more about their own public opinion than British opinion, and I'm sure they expect their own publics to blame the UK for a No-Deal Brexit  
Why is @guardian printing letters which allege a Jewish conspiracy to stop Jeremy Corbyn entering government? And how did the conspirators trick Jennie Formby into publishing a new antisemitism definition at the same time as tight Brexit votes in the Commons?   
New Brexit Secretary, same old incompetence - and why we need a #PeoplesVote on the final #Brexit deal @peoplesvote_uk 
The firm co-founded by @Jacob_Rees_Mogg  has set up a 2nd investment fund in Ireland after warnings of dangers of a hard Brexit. Meanwhile, this charlatan expects the rest of us & our children to wait 50 yrs b4 we see some benefits. Are Leave voters beginning to open their eyes?  
It must be satisfying for Dunky that he’s been proved 100% right - just got the wrong referendum.  
EU warns @DominicRaab that #Brexit bill cannot be tied to free trade deal  
Couldn't be bothered to read the whole Brexit White Paper? The government has published a pictogram-heavy Powerpoint version!  
Jeremy Hunt reckon's we'll all blame the EU if no-deal Brexit comes to pass. No Jeremy. We see you. We all see you. You would have to have been comatose for the last two years to not realise whatever mess we end up in after next March, is down to a Tory party at war with itself.  
Ok, but if you accept that, it's astounding that your party makes a "no deal" threat a central part of its Brexit policy.  
Hilariously Jeremy <cough/> Hunt is saying the British people will blame the EU for a no deal Brexit. No we won't <cough/> Hunt. We will blame you and the government of wretched idiots to which you belong. 
Here’s a tip, Jeremy Hunt:If the UK cannot negotiate a #Brexit by 29 March 2019, there are two options other than crashing out:- ask  to extend Article 50or- withdraw Article 50 notification unilaterallyIf you don’t do either,  popn will blame YOU  
How will Brexit affect youEarning1M+ Great opportunity to make some money100k+ You will be fine50k+ Tighten your belts a bit and hope you don’t have a SME20k+ This will really hurt10k+ Check out Tripe recipes and fatten up the family pet<10k Roadkill for you 
Correction: UK public will blame Jeremy Hunt, Michael Gove, Rees-Mogg, Johnson, Farage and Corbyn for no-deal Brexit, says Mr Mayor 
#EU #LeftistSedition #IslamicTerrorism #GlobalismIsCommunism...  UNITED KINGDOM - BRITS OVERWHELMINGLY REJECT 'SOFT BREXIT': Brits Overwhelmingly Reject Leftist/Globalist Attempts to Undermine Firm Brexit with Their BS 'Soft Brexit'. 
Here is @RandomEssexDude who 1st spoke out as a #remainernow less than a week ago. It's concerns for his kids future that has helped contribute to this change and here are his comments following @Jacob_Rees_Mogg admitting it may be 50 yrs for #brexit benefits. agree with this.  
Phew! Multi millionaire Jacob Rees-Mogg is confident post-Brexit chaos, deprivation & poverty will only last three or four generations. Tally-Ho chaps  
My speech on #Brexit shows why Commons won’t vote 4 PM’s options. Govt's approach is like a man who says to his ex “will you be my live-in mistress when the divorce comes through? Unless you agree we can't discuss alimony.” That's why #peoplesvote has support of John Major & Co 
‘Brexit White Paper puts UK on road to nowhere’. Brilliant by @fotoole 
I've been informed a pairing breach took place in 1977, similar to last week's Brexit votes. Then Callaghan and Thatcher agreed to re-run the crucial vote to uphold trust in Parliament. It is now incumbent on Theresa May to do the same. Full statement:  
Brexit is a made up word without a plan. It started as a Tory gamble to stuff UKIP. It wasn’t supposed to happen. The referendum was gerrymandered, manipulated and incorporated electoral fraud and lies. No one can find any benefit. The ending is unwritten #stopbrexit #remain 
I bear good news. It's fine to laugh at the 'leaders' of Brexit debasing themselves talking crap. And it probably does more good than getting cross. And it's pretty much your patriotic duty. 
.@cajardineMP with some pressing questions to @theresa_may on why the Tories broke their pairing agreements on key Brexit votes last week. Are the Conservatives simply running scared on Brexit?  
Brexit is approx 6000 hours away. #StopBrexitLet's see if #Remainers can RT this more than 6000 times... 
I’m actually looking forward to  Twitter when Trump is gone and Brexit is over. Here’s the thing tweeters: It doesn’t matter how much you moan and whine here, it’s not going to change a damn thing. All it does is make this place dull as dishwater to be around at present. 
PM May is going around the Country trying to sell her "Chequers" plan.Why? Because her MPs, Parliament, the EU, big business & Brexiteers see it as a soft BrexitThe biggest reason she's doing it. UKIP are soaring in the polls. Your on a loser Mrs May. Leave & go on WTO rules. 
I saw a Leaver boycott list during the referendum of companies that had backed the UK staying in the EU. Airbus was on the list...because if you are about to spend £80,000,000 you may think twice  Now Airbus may vote with their feet and take all their jobs with them...  
‘Brexit is a TREMENDOUS mistake’ Richard Branson's fury over decision to leave the EU. Nowhere near the mistake his mother made when she did not take the pill. He needs to shut his evil, self serving face. Bollock to him. Britain comes first.  
The only problem here is that a “World Trade Deal” doesn’t exist. Other than that, all fine. (Today’s Brexit nonsense.)  
These muppets deliberately normalised “no deal is better than a bad deal” Brexit, and now they’re calling it an accident?Truly, a sight to behold.  
I am not prepared to wait until my son is 57 for the 'adjustment' period of Brexit to take effect. My son is a European and I want him to have the freedom to work, travel, learn and make friendships from across the continent. #FBPE #PeoplesVote 
Spotted on the M25 following Bannon's revelation that he is setting up a body in Europe to promote fascism. Brexit and Nationalism are very much the same thing. Not our work (not our style) but posted anyway. Debate away!  
BREAKING: DExEU minister @MartinCallanan has just announced in the House of Lords that the Government will publish a White Paper tomorrow on preparations to implement the Withdrawal Agreement, with Brexit Secretary @DominicRaab delivering a statement in the Commons 
NCIS is the show where the lead character defeated a complex computer system that posed a risk to national security by firing a bullet through a computer monitor, just in case you were wondering what lessons this had for managing Brexit.  
the same Minford you said brexit would destroy british manufacturing?  
So of course some Remainers are now slagging off #FBPE! They have no choice! Unlike them, we're non-partisan. We criticise ALL Leavers, including Corbyn. But those who want to make a career in left wing politics after Brexit can't afford to do that. It's sad, but not unexpected. 
People will vote with their feet @AmazonUK in response to your Brexit threats ......  
Torn as to how best to celebrate Brexit Day. Should I be abroad with my family to avoid the riots or would I be better off staying at home to defend my stockpiled food? 
Northern Powerhouse? No investment in Northern Infrastructure. Rail & bus networks have been decimated under the Tories. Wages plummeted.The Northern public sector has been decimated. The appalling Tory Brexit shambles threatens the likes of Nissan pulling out of the NE.  
UK public will blame EU for no-deal Brexit, says Jeremy Hunt>That’s right Jeremy, just like we’ll blame too many people getting old for the collapse of the NHS #ToryNHSCrisis 
According to the House of Commons Brexit Committee Brexit Impact Report, a Hard Brexit will cause an economic downturn that is even worse than the 1931 Great Depression. Put that on a bus.  
After 2 years, the Conservative government has FINALLY revealed its #Brexit plan...BLAME THE EUBLAME THE EUBLAME THE EUBLAME THE EUBLAME THE EUBLAME THE EUBLAME THE EUBLAME THE EUBLAME THE EUBLAME THE EUBLAME THE EUBLAME THE EUBLAME THE EUBLAME THE EUBLAME THE EU  
Silence can be the most painful sound.No vision, no courage, no #Brexit plan and looking at this, no personality at all. What a disaster of a Prime Minister.#MayMustGoNow 
You just couldn’t make it up! A useless Prime Minister assisted by a bunch of sniveling, self serving & incompetent MP’s make a hash of Brexit & then try and convince us we’re looking at a ‘NO DEAL BY ACCIDENT!’  
...because @jeremycorbyn and @johnmcdonnellMP are old style hard left no deal Brexiteers! They will sell out “Remainers” and sensible #Leave voters who  want a #Brexit that protects jobs, prosperity and peace in N Ireland.  
Gateshead has a surprising number of men with southern accents who want to ask very soft questions about Brexit. 
PM in Newcastle says she is delivering on #Brexit vote.She's still lying through her teeth.She's delivering #REMAIN.She has some brass neck to say she is delivering #Brexit when she's doing the oppositeTories need to remove her before she destroys their party.#BrexitBetrayal 
"You have the world's most stressful job how do you cope and unwind?" - @theresa_may says she enjoys walking, cooking and watching US police drama series #NCISFollow the latest Brexit stories here:  
Some MPs value democracy. Can’t say the same about the likes of @DominicRaab (Brexit minister) He was on the Campaign Committee of Vote Leave who met WEEKLY to set the campaigns strategy. BeLeave was Vote Leave’s single largest donation. How could he not have known?  
Sinn Féin President Mary Lou MacDonald and Vice President Michelle O’Neill meeting with Michel Barnier the EU Commission's Chief Brexit negotiator. Speaking before the meeting Mary Lou McDonald called for a "special EU summit on Ireland in September".  
Delighted to back this campaign. Working people & families in Britain and Ireland need to hear honesty about the real implications of #Brexit.@UKLabour should demand a #peoplesvote. 
I welcome @DominicRaab’s principle that people’s views can change--as made clear in his 2016 statement "Tory MPs may push for a second referendum after 2020 if Remain wins". Presumably he will be backing @LibDems calls for a final say on the deal and a chance to #ExitfromBrexit? 
Oh my goodnes !!Theresa May in the North East.She is STILL pedalling that TWADDLE about £300m plus - going into the NHS post #Brexit.Theresa DO keep up !!That myth has been demolished many times . 
.@DavidDavisMP has urged the Prime Minister to tear up her Brexit White Paper and “start again”  
.@theresa_may says she's "had constructive responses so far" from the #EU on the UK's #Brexit proposals.Follow the latest Brexit stories here:  
Why did the Scotland Office change its name to UK Government in Scotland?Why was Mundell publically stated as being at the same level as the First Minister?Answer - Stripping the First Ministers Powers via Emergency Power Acts due to Brexit and handing over power to Mundell 
This is Theresa May's "strategy" to "sell" her version of Brexit around the country. The last time she tried to "sell" anything she accidentally lost a twenty point poll lead. This is properly toe curling. 
Confirming our fears - Brexit chaos being used to argue for tax cuts for big banks and corporations as well as further deregulation.US banks urge UK to cut corporate taxes to stop Brexit exodus  via @financialtimes 
Head of Amazon UK claims no-deal Brexit could spark civil unrest within two weeks, or one week for those with Prime. 
Same will be true of Brexit. The politicians will get away with it & the people will pay the price.  
PM arrives to take questions from workers in the North East as she sells her #Brexit plan. Journalists not allowed to ask any.  
*You* are prepared to burn billions more of taxpayer money on planning a crash-out Brexit... but is the public?  
Ahead of the Royal Welsh Show this week fresh warnings emerge that the UK farming sector could be seriously hit by extra tariffs arising from a 'no deal' Brexit.  
What we need is a common agreement and not a chaotic #Brexit. FM @HeikoMaas talked to @JeremyHunt today about the most urgent priorities. @GermanEmbassy @GermanAmbUK @GermanyintheEU 
Oh, and most Brexit voters. You complete plank.  
A no-deal Brexit would damage British relations with Europe for a generation, Jeremy Hunt warns  
Just read a Guardian 'survival guide' about things to stockpile in the event of a no-deal Brexit. It included capers. I think this is the most Guardian thing I've ever seen. 
Tories are stepping up the rhetoric of blaming the EU for an "accidental" No Deal #Brexit. There is nothing accidental about this, it's entirely deliberate. Propose things they know the EU will refuse & then claim they're being inflexible. The EU didn't want this, England did. 
Don't PanicSix reasons why it is likely there will be a Brexit exit dealAt @JackofKent 
Brexit poses an existential threat to our country. There’s no scenario which does not lose jobs, businesses, revenues, opportunities & rights. Government & Parliament should stop it. But at very least there should be a @PeoplesVote now that there is information: that’s democracy. 
Following reports Amazon’s UK Manager has told the Govt that Britain would face “civil unrest” within weeks of a no-deal Brexit, @thomasbrake warns there is “no returns policy” when it comes to Brexit and called for an #ExitFromBrexit #FinalSay 
Oh dear! Have you seen the projections for Brexit, Dean. You are obsessed with independence but never want to talk about  the cost of Brexit. I wonder why? 
Remainer Hunt Wants Single Market Membership and Second Referendum  
"17.4 million people voted to leave. If we don't deliver that result then as far as I'm concerned, the Conservative party is doomed."Conservative Leave voters discuss what they thought of Theresa May's White Paper on Brexit.  
No, we’ll blame:* Cameron for running an insanely risky referendum* Parliament for voting it through with no plan & no due diligence * Leave campaigners’ lies which conned the public* Theresa May’s idiotic ‘red lines’* Vote Leave’s illegal spendsWho we won’t blame: The EU  
With Mogg admitting it will take 50 years for the UK to see any benefits from #Brexit, how can any #Leavers still support it. The majority will be long dead by then and our children and grandchildren will have lost half a century of opportunities. 
Government trade official pocketed nearly £500,000 then quit before post-Brexit negotiations even started  
Brexit turns the economics of independence inside-out, and therefore K***n conducts his "analysis" by simply pretending that the economic factors of Brexit effectively don't exist. 
Very disappointed how little of a splash my support of Hard Brexit and blaming black lesbians for the failure of my career is making. 
In reality, of course, Scotland WOULD be a member of the EU, and therefore it would be on the EU side of whatever trade situation arises between the EU and Brexit UK. And that is *very* much the side anyone would want to be on. 
If people still don't think the tide is turning then watch this video. This is Doncaster, a town that voted 70% leave. Over 80% of people we spoke to think brexit is going badly and want a #FinalSayForAll On the #peoplesvote @Ed_Miliband over to you now. 
No-deal Brexit would leave households almost £1,000 worse off, new report suggests  
1. You're 1 of the 470 MPs who voted Remain2. in spite of #ProjectTreason, yes Putin, no not "unintended", your constituency voted 59.3% Remain3. NI & Scotland voted RemainNow, what on earth makes you even tweet of a No Deal Brexit?No Deal = No Brexit, dammit! #StopBrexit 
For the life of me, I cannot find a real story in this. "Could..." "at risk..." "may not apply..." There is not a single scintilla of tangible proof women's rights will suffer post-Brexit. Endless Project Fear   
If you had a business plan and went to a lender saying it will take 50 years to realise any benefits, they’d laugh at you hysterically, then say no. Let’s face it, we, as the lenders for Brexit should be doing the same. #StopBrexit 
Jacob Rees-Mogg - "We ought not to be afraid of a World Trade Deal based on a WTO solution which is how we do 60% of our international trade already." #Brexit  
This is now the Brexit bingo full house: "Brexit is sexist"  
There are *70* peers down to speak in today's Lords debate on Brexit negotiations  
'WE Control THEM!'Iain Duncan Smith: "Just say for a second EU didn’t agree to do Open Skies, that means all routes across the Atlantic are shut to them!They can’t fly to New York on Polar routes, on Northern routes because we control them!"#Brexit #EU 
Switching to trading with EU under WTO is the exact opposite of a 'leap to the unknown' --WTO is a well-known system and Britain operates under it quite well with large parts of the world.A #WTOBrexit is the best #Brexit as it offers far greater certainty than an untested deal?  
Apart from the obvious, one of the other losses for me due to #brexit is the BBC News. I always held this institution in high esteem and was always proud that it stood as a beacon for fairness and balance.The poison that is #Brexit has destroyed this too. #FBPE 
Comically, the word "Brexit" appears just NINE times in the 23,300-word document, none of them in the context of any economic analysis. 
This is now Project Reality.Government is making plans to stockpile food and medicinesThis is No Deal Brexit!What can you do? SIGN and then SHARE this! If you haven'y signed it,why not?If you want a say on the final deal Sign it! 
UK Brexit Secretary & Foreign Secretary state 'no deal' is increasingly likely. That means cutting Scottish GDP growth by 9% & putting 80 000 jobs at risk according to UK Gvt impact reports. 
A no-deal Brexit is going to be disastrous for millions of people. Raab doesn't seem to mind though as a small number of hedge fund millionaires will be fine.We can still exit from Brexit - add your name and share today:  
When #Brexit seems hard,just remember how long we have fought.We didn’t come this far,                        to only come this far   #SaveBrexit#MayMustGo#NoBRINO 
Brexit could in theory be negotiated successfully, but it would take hard work and competence. So it’s no surprise this government has failed when its biggest advocates for Brexit are lazy and care more about their footnote in history than improving people’s lives. Bunch of egos  
As Jacob Rees-Mogg says we might not see the benefits of Brexit for fifty years, millennials begin counting down the days until they can pay slightly less for haddock in their mid-70s. 
Dear EU. No we wouldn't. Yours, UK public.  UK public will blame EU for no-deal Brexit, says Jeremy Hunt 
#JacobReesMogg blasts dinosaur #Remoaner, #JohnMajor over his calls for a #secondreferendum: "It's a complete contradiction of what he said before the  #referendum. The only fact that has changed is that he lost the vote!"  #BBC #SKY @LBC #LBC @ConHome 
With Brexit looming, Prime Minister Theresa May is battling Trump, Europe, and her own party:  
When the 1pm TV News puts an argument about the precise wording of a Labour code of conduct above Brexit in the running order and devotes more time to it you know #bbcnews has lost the plot or are pursuing a narrative of their own remote from most people's concerns. 
Jobs bonanza as economy surges after Brexit vote with long-term unemployment second-lowest in the EU  
The Home Secretary's position also raises the question of whether European Arrest Warrants issued by the UK already should be executed, in light of the absence of post Brexit guarantees (see this case sent to the CJEU, point 4.10):  
It’s ok folks, Jacob Rees-Mogg is confident the chaos, poverty & deprivation we shall see from Brexit won’t last more then 50 years, Tally-ho  
If #Brexit ends in a mess, we will blame the UK gov, not the EU.  You started this, not them. When you infer you are speaking for us, more often than not, you are putting your words in our mouths. You don't have that right. No one has. 
#Labour surges in polls thanks to policies reflecting most people as #Tories slump to new lows from in-fighting on Brexit & failure on crucial domestic issues. #Brexit smokescreen + #MSM's #Corbyn smears camouflage one of the most incompetent governments in recent history. #JC4PM 
Jacob Rees-Mogg has suggested it could take 50 years to judge whether Brexit has been an economic success.The dire warning comes as the leading Brexiteer launched a second fund in Ireland.  via @LondonEconomic 
#JacobReesMogg insists we have nothing to fear from #Brexit and from trading with the #EuropeanUnion on #WTO rules, just like the majority of other nations around the #world! ! #BBC #SKY @LBC #LBC @ConHome @CCHQPress @theresa_may @Conservatives @DCBMEP @andreajenkyns #Tory 
These Islands gets on whilst analysis of Dark Money and effects of Brexit on Scotland rarely do. Vote no Borders mark 2. 10 people at most from a PR group and they got on talking about a song whilst Women for Indy were ignored with hundreds meeting in halls. 
Lib Dems have been languishing in the polls at 7-9% for over a year, with no vision to turn this around; Cable and Farron were shamefully absent from key Brexit votes and now Cable is looking to form a new party. Why should anyone be a Lib Dem member or vote for them in future? 
What’s the matter with Drunken Juncker? Populist Derangement Syndrome: Brexit, Austria, Italy, Poland, Hungary, Trump has had the effect of neutering him with no chance of re-appointment.  
#NadineDorries: "Is this some sort of bullying? Do we say to the #British people 'we don't trust you on your last vote, you've got to vote again'?  We had the #referendum. #Leave won & therefore we have to implement  leave!"   #BBC #SKY @LBC #LBC @ConHome 
That’s plainly wrong. I was out on the doorstep for Labour in GE2017 and the brief was: if they’re Leavers say “Jeremy respects the referendum”, if they’re Remainers say “the local MP is a Remainer”. Constructive ambiguity. Labour will turn full Remain or disintegrate. 
'BY ACCIDENT' he says!! the absolute audacity; TWO GODDAMN YEARS you've had to sort us out a deal, there's no accident about it, just sheer incompetence! just admit that you can't deliver a lie which can never become truth, it's impossible. cancel Brexit. 
Putin seems to have suggested a referendum in Donbas. But Minsk agreement calls for an election. To be free and fair it should be organized by international efforts and give voice to all Donetsk and Luhansk 2014 residents. @ecfr 
If Daniel Levy can get £30m for Janssen and Llorente, then send him in for Brexit negotiations; we might end up with France.  
UK public will blame EU for no-deal Brexit, says Jeremy HuntHe seems to have forgotten that the UK started it  
No-deal Brexit risks 'civil unrest', warns AMAZON boss...  
Andrea Jenkyns a decent, democratic MP who wants a clean Brexit as voted for by the British people. The Marxist far left Remainer trolls sending her hate mail should be arrested and prosecuted for hate crime. 
Rees-Mogg accuses the EU of behaving like the Mafia. But as #BrexitSyndicate reveals, it is odious groups like the ERG on the #Brexit side that are driven by a secretive cabal seeking to manipulate our political system to their own advantage.  
Professor Dougan predicted Brexit blame-game in 2016:“An attempt to create a narrative whereby the UK is making reasonable demands and the EU is deliberately thwarting the UK’s wishes, to thrust the blame of inevitable failure to secure a better deal onto the awful foreigners.”  
An inquiry may be beneficial with hindsight, but we are now still in the midst of the Brexit crisis. It risks being used to fudge matters with excuses that illegality will be a matter for the inquiry. TODAY there is no mandate for the unlawful Brexit process #VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw 
'Mogg comes clean - just a brief 50 years until the rest of us see any benefits from Brexit. Perhaps he could stick that on the side of a bus? #CostOfBrexit #IsItWorthIt?' 
How to get off to a disasterous start — Hunt-style.  UK public will blame EU for no-deal Brexit, says Jeremy Hunt  
The EU is not the innocent party in Brexit talks, says Brendan O'Neill: 
Daily Brief: Syria's 'White Helmets' evacuated: Ugandan villagers' sit-in to protest violence; UN "sends alleged war criminals" as peacekeepers;  cost of a 'no-deal' Brexit; UK U-turn on death penalty for alleged ISIS members; and India & women's rights...  
Excellent thread from @GuitarMoog on #citizensrights. People need to understand the effect of #Brexit on the lives of EU27 and EFTA citizens living in the UK. Please retweet and please sign  
So it seems @theresa_may is brazenly lying (again) to rally support for her faux-Brexit plan. GFA says nothing about a seamless border or customs at all. GFA is clear there are 2 jurisdictions with cross-border co-operation. #MayMustGo 
This week's Remainer Rubbish highlights:Amazon Boss - "there will be civil unrest within two weeks of leaving"The Independent - "Butter, Cheese and Yogurt will become an occasional luxury after Brexit"Leo Varadkar (Irish Premier) - "your planes can't fly over Ireland" 
Rees-Mogg 1) Brilliantly slaps down John Major 2) Confirms the EHG compromised “up until Mansion House but [was] not willing to go as far as Chequers3) Reiterates that “the least well off in society will benefit the most” under a no deal #Brexit." 
Explaining the ramifications of #Brexit on @NEEChamber Members to @BBClukewalton @BBCLN - real concerns that political leadership does not understand the realities for businesses and the likely economic impacts. 
Given the tone of the Brexit debate, and the way in the UK government has mishandled the Article 50 process over the last two years, I'm not sure anyone in the rest of Europe is going to think this is their problem.  
We wouldn't for a kick off. The accountability would lie firmly with the home grown liars, cheats and Brexit lunatics who laid down impossible red lines.#PeoplesVote 
If you loved the Blitz you'll love Brexit, says Piers Morgan 
17 million will blame the EU for no-deal Brexit, because they blame the EU for everything. 48 million will blame Brexiters for no-deal Brexit, because it will be their fault.  
The two questions Ministers should ask about any Brexit compromise deal - my full piece on @ConHome  
Conservative MP @heidiallen75 on BBC Daily Politics #BBCdp says that she and many of her colleagues have reached the opinion that as the government cannot decide what Brexit is, another referendum is the way forward.#PeoplesVote 
I and my disabled husband do not have a lot of money at all. It is important enough to us to spend some of it on my being here today. Your prejudice that we are all wealthy is insulting. Brexit is for the few not the many. #FInalSayForAll 
*Just launched*My new website exposing the murky network of powerful and secretive organisations who are rewriting the rules of British democracy on the back of #Brexit#BrexitSyndicate 
In space of 24hrs we have heard from the Brexit Secretary and Foreign Secretary that 'no deal' is increasingly likely. That means cutting Scottish GDP growth by 9% and threatening up to 80,000 jobs. 
No one in Government has even begun to get their heads around what Brexit means for air travel   
Brexit Minister: UK May Not Pay Brexit Bill if EU Fails to Agree Trade Deal   
'UK head of Amazon warns of possibility of “civil unrest” within 2 wks after no-deal exit...2nd Ref might become a more palatable way out.' Whilst Hunt warns of no deal Brexit mess, by accident. No, it's due to infighting & Cons shamble.     via @business 
Ryanair boss: Britain is not taking risks of a no-deal Brexit seriously  
@These_Islands: "focus on Brexit risks neglect of internal issues relating to the UK".Like the captain of the Titanic ignoring the iceberg (external issue) in favour of missing his speed target (internal issue).THAT worked out well. 
The ERG preparing to cash in on a No Deal #Brexit is outrageous Mr Corbyn @jeremycorbyn.Stop respecting a result obtained by cheating & breaking the law, bring your party members together so they work in the best interest of the country, not the few. Support a #PeoplesVote 
In the unlikely event of a no deal brexit, what will you do?Personally I will be closing my business and heading straight in to town and I suspect thousands will be do the same. May knows the consequences of a no deal brexit, they all do and are bluffing. Keep fighting. X 
"Dont worry about #Brexit no-deal because we'll just boost UK production instead of relying on EU imports" is a thoroughly Putin-esque, Trump-style mercantilist approach to trade policy. You dont get to use the free trade moniker if you're resorting to that 
A selection of the Brexitometers we've been running at local stalls - there are dozens more and ALL follow the same pattern: Brexit is not going well, will not benefit us & we want a #PeoplesVote So pls sign the petition & share this! #NorthernPowerhouse 
It is not the responsibility of the EU to solve the UK’s Brexit problems.Repeat as necessary.  
Activists from the North East tell me public opinion there is shifting against Brexit. Time for Corbyn to jump on #PeoplesVote bandwagon 
Have you all got to point at which everything seems like a metaphor for Brexit? I have  
Amazon warning of 'civil unrest' after no deal Brexit is absurd, says @Jacob_Rees_Mogg 
Christian Adams on our new Brexit Secretary Dominic Raab set for talks with the EU as the hot weather continues - Political Cartoon Gallery in Putney  
There is NO doubt in my mind that the FM will call the second indpendence referendum with a short lead time to the actual vote.I believe we will have a 3 month (possibly 6 month) timescale.Lets get this campaign started and let the rUK know we are ready to leave! 
Worst Government since the war. Brexit chaos. Labour down, the Tories up.  
IT MUST BE STOPPED!There is no Brexit Dividend, the Governments OWN watchdog said it was a LIE!There is no £350 million for the NHS, Farage himself said it was a LIE!What is it going to take, we DEMAND a #PeoplesVote !! 
The constant sniping and attempts by remain to damage Britain are working. The pound is being forced down, prices forced up, jobs are being put at risk and the very things they claim brexit will cause are in fact the very things they are making happen. They are traitors. 
Voters won’t forgive politicians who put party politics before the national interest. I talked to @TheNewEuropean about Brexit, cross-party cooperation, and the People's Vote campaign.  
Funny that in December last year, MPs voted on whether to hold a referendum on the outcome of the Brexit negotiations. The #PeoplesVote figureheads Chuka Umunna and Anna Soubry voted No. Share this  Source:  
Yesterday, John Major warned that the poorest would be hit hardest by a no deal Brexit. He's absolutely right. They are already struggling enough and can't afford a further rise in the cost of living or cuts to public services. Please share 
US banks urge UK to cut taxes to stop Brexit exodus  
Protection for dolphins and seabirds will be weaker under government plans for Brexit than if Britain stayed in the EU, according to a new analysis by environmental groups  
.@JLongworthLML: “It is quite astonishing that the Government is rewarding someone for stalling Brexit and obstructing the result of the democratic EU referendum"  
But if the referendum is undermined by illegality, its result cannot be allowed to stand. OF COURSE there is time to stop Brexit!  
So why waste the billions that especially a no-deal Brexit will set back our economy?  Time for HMT to be more explicit on the costs for individuals, families, communities & businesses.  
And why did #DominicGrieve use exactly the same phrases on @SkyNews #SophieRidge? It's the establishment clearly working together to cancel #Brexit  
UK's top polling guru warns May her Brexit deal is driving Tory voter SWING to Ukip. Won´t affect her she's a globalist and merely carrying out the instructions of her masters.  
Good morning. The year is 2018. Career politicians and former cabinet ministers deride the "political class". Former PM David Cameron hides away after losing the Brexit referendum. His speechwriter in No10 promotes the virtues of dictators and would-be dictators. 
Fear not fellow British cheese lovers!Whilst EU HQed @ArlaFoodsUK try to scare British public into accepting remaining in the EUBritish Dairy Crest - @CathedralCity - announces £85 million investment to grow its cheese business#Brexit #ProjectFear 
While the conclusion is worrying and saddening — it really didn’t have to come to this — it’s good to see that the HoC Brexit committee agrees with the points many of us have been making for months: that the rights of @The3Million are not secure. We need ring-fencing now. 1/ 
NEWS! Jacob Rees-Mogg confident post-Brexit dystopian wasteland will only last three or four generations  
This morning, the Government are saying that Foreign Secretary Jeremy Hunt & others will be touring Britain this summer selling the PM’s Chequers plan. Here’s a reminder of Hunt arguing for a #PeoplesVote on the Brexit deal in 2016 - Please RT:  
Businesses should be focusing on how they can make the most of the opportunities Brexit provides, rather than making unsubstantiated claims like "civil unrest" in the event of 'no deal'. This is just Project Fear gone into overdrive.   
1. None of those things would be as a result of Brexit.2. If (very unlikely) they did, it would be down to the dire incompetence of Theresa May’s negotiations and/or bloodymindedness of the EU27.3. As I’m not responsible for either, no, I wouldn’t say I was wrong about Brexit. 
.@Jacob_Rees_Mogg: The Treasury forecasts have been completely discredited. The truth is, the least well-off in society will benefit the most from Brexit because we can cut tariffs on food, clothing & footwear  
LISTEN  | @Jacob_Rees_Mogg blasts dinosaur Remoaner, John Major over his calls for a second referendum: "It's a complete contradiction of what he said before the referendum. The only fact that has changed is that he lost the vote!" Support us at  
That @ScotTories & @scottishlabour are now promoting the Hague "report" whilst still supporting Brexit wins them both a Brass Neck of the year award.  
This is hilarious.“Brexit is so disastrous and all-consuming that we completely ignore and avoid it.”  
There you go. I did say this would be the next stage. Brexiteers: "We must plan for a No Deal Brexit!!!".  Government: "OK. We will. This is what we're preparing for".  Brexiteers: "This is Project Fear 2!!!!". 
.@mrjamesob explains why Leave voters are now so keen on a no-deal Brexit - it is the only way they can avoid having to give detail on how Brexit will look.  
"I'm excited by the fact that collectively with our allies in other parties we're winning the argument for a people's vote." @vincecableWe're making real progress in our fight against this Tory Brexit. If you want to #ExitfromBrexit add your name here:  
Ever since Brexit I've intermittently had the following conversation going on in my head... "they'll bring back the death penalty next .... no they won't... it won't get that mad.... yes they will .... it already has." 
Re my tweet regarding medical supplies after a 'no deal' Brexit - I keep being told 'other countries that aren't in the EU manage to get supplies' - OMG what part of 'THEY HAVE DEALS AND WE WON'T' are you just not understanding? #Imbeciles 
Brexit is Bonkers. With @SODEMAction outside Labour Shadow Cabinet meeting.@BremainInSpain @patanna @nickynoo007 
Jacob Rees-Mogg, whose City firm has just opened a second investment fund in Ireland to avoid the impact of leaving the EU, is now telling ordinary people they'll have to wait 5 decades to see the 'benefits' of Brexit.  
This is now Project Reality.Government is making plans to stockpile food and medicinesThis is No Deal Brexit!What can you do? SIGN and then SHARE this! If you haven'y signed it,why not?If you want a say on the final deal Sign it! 
Was outside speaking to a Tory Councillor at the wedding, slowly more and more people came over to join our conversation on Brexit, Indy etc.The crowd grew to about 15, all of them were against Brexit and for Independence.It was amazing, there is a true ground swell happening 
Vince Cable denies plotting new anti-Brexit centrist party  
We'd rather she get on with delivering a proper Brexit rather than trying to sell the disgrace of a deal she made at Chequers. 
#Brexit trending topic again in London. By now, every Brit hates Brexit, whatever comes out of it. The MP who now stands up to #StopBrexit will be the UK's future PM for years to come.More and more begin to understand that Brexit is a key part of #ProjectTreason. 
The PM has repeatedly said: “No deal is better than a bad deal”.She must be true to her words — and properly start planning for such a scenario. #Brexit  
This is a useful update from @LauraCoryton on the current situation with the #TamponTax - the EU may well abolish it before the UK!(The UK Government hasn't yet been able to negotiate the end of the tampon tax with the EU, so I don't hold out a lot of hope for Brexit.)  
Women in UK risk losing equality & human rights protections, such as employment rights & funding for women’s services, when UK leaves EU, says @EHRC. #Brexit could mean future EU protections not binding in UK law & existing ones may be removed  @LexyTopping 
It’s never ending Brexit bashing morning, noon, & night. Same dweebs out everyday trying to derail Brexit. John Major, Nick Clegg, Tony Blair, Anna Soubry, Chuka Umunna some of the Remoaner bores. Then you got all GUARDIAN journalists as well attacking Brexit everyday.  
What a state we’re in. Even a ‘People’s Vote’ is playing jeopardy with the country’s future. Right-wing media will be absolutely desperate to get their 50.1% & pull out all the mendacious stops. Brexit is so obviously a terrible error that Parliament should do its job and end it.  
Just as a reminder, if you are a journalist covering Brexit and want to hear what no deal means for actual people we do have @BritishInEurope spokespeople available #NoDealBrexit 
A third of companies have shifted their contracts out of English courts' jurisdiction since the Brexit ref, while 40% of those who've not made the move yet say they will do unless significant progress is made in negotiations by March 2019#BrexitBrainDrain 
There could be civil unrest within two weeks in a scorched-earth no deal Brexit scenario according to Doug Gurr, the head of Amazon UK.   From food and medicine shortages to log-jams at Dover, no deal would be a catastrophe for Britain. Spread the word. 
You can listen to Theresa May for several minutes on any subject to realise how uninformed she is. Whether it's foreign policy, the economy, #Brexit , crime, racial relations, education, science, she always talks in PC cliches fed to her by her aides. Absolutely useless woman. 
The #North gets played again:#NorthernPowerhouse (remember that?)#Brexit ....and now this :Yet another scheme from #TheConPeople-@conservatives 
Theresa May’s ‘EU membership by another name’ is no surprise.Since November 2016, we’ve highlighted May’s:• Approval of new military powers for the EU institutions, UK subordinate.• Approval of post-Brexit subordination, despite originally selling involvement as temporary.  
"The central lie of the Leave campaign was not the number on the side of the bus, or the fantastical claim that Turkey was joining the EU. It was the breezy insistence that Brexit would be easy". My blog on "Who Broke Brexit?"  
 Hear ye, hear ye! The end is nigh! Project Fear is back in full swing and more ludicrous than ever! One thing they're right about, there will be civil unrest, but only if democracy is overruled and Brexit isn't delivered.  Support us at  
The EU has rejected the UK’s proposals on how to govern the City of London’s access to the European market after Brexit  
Ex PM John Major is “wrong on almost everything he said!”'The only thing that’s changed is he LOST!'Jacob Rees-Mogg:“The only fact that has changed is he lost the vote and it is very important to implement a vote that has taken place.”#Brexit #EU 
Nelson McCausland's flippancy and dismissive attitude to no deal is reprehensible. It's only republicans & nationalists in his view that are opposed to Brexit- WRONG!! There is wholehearted CROSS-COMMUNITY OPPOSITION TO BREXIT! I will keep saying this until the media repeat it 
Jacob Ress Mogg says it will take 50 year to reap the benefits of Brexit.  Kevin Hague says independence won't work economically.  Brexit guarantees economic decline. Independence offers a chance to revitalise our economy.  I know which route I'd prefer to take. 
Brits reject May’s Brexit plan, want Boris Johnson to hold talks & lead Tories instead – poll  
Dear Clare FogesThere's a large middle ground between being such a weak PM that you lose a referendum you called unnecessarily, and being a dictator. This middle ground is called good politics. Historians sometimes speak of such a thing. 
We don't need a referendum. Both Westminster&Stormont have the power to act. The Supreme Court has commented on the need for change,as has UN CEDAW. Time for  politicians to be courageous and allow for #freesafelegal And local abortion access. #NowForNI #decrimNI @StephenNolan 
So the PM agreed a five figure bonus for her Chief Brexit adviser? That should buy him 2 cans of sweetcorn and a pot noodle the day after we crash out of the EU with no deal.  
Yet to hear of the very same people demonstrating outside @vincecable office, despite the fact he missed the most important vote on #Brexit in Parliament. Still to hear them criticise his abdication of duty. Not a single chant of "Where's Vince Cable" Why?  
Galileo is the EU's own satellite navigation system, which will be independent from the American, Russian or Chinese systems. Brexit Britain will not be part of Galileo because Leavers don't want foreigners living in their country.Let's #StopBrexit and have a #PeoplesVote ASAP 
Just not backing #Brexit though are you? #ChequersMeansCorbyn#MAYMUSTGO 
Another great thread from Daniel who voted remain, but now argues we need a clean brexit  
Project fear round 2. 1. No Cheese2. Stockpile food3. Brexit worse than the IRA4. Brexit worse than Nazi Germany5. No flights6. Motorway truck parks7. Civil unrest8. No Doctors or Nurses9. Won't be allowed travel to Europe.The heat is sending the Remainers mad.#Brexit 
Has anyone ever asked Kevin Hague, how hard Brexit or No-Deal Brexit is going to impact on his company? Because I would love to hear him answer that. 
There needs to be policy making beyond Brexit.  
"No-deal Brexit could spark civil unrest ‘within two weeks’ warns UK head of Amazon"The Tories actually want civil unrest, but not until after brexit day, it will give them the excuse to clampdown, curtail civil liberties, and shut down the internet. 
The reality of our 45 years of integration into the EU economy is only now coming home as we face the catastrophe of no deal #Brexit. The vandalism is criminal. And one of the biggest culprits is our press which - led by @BorisJohnson and Murdoch - has deceived us for 30 years 
The next phase of the EU's Horizon initiative will see €100bn invested in science projects over the next 6 years. Brexit Britain will not have access to these funds because Leavers don't want foreigners living in their country.Let's #StopBrexit and have a #PeoplesVote ASAP! 
Right, I am fed up with this nonsense about an EU Passport giving us all these magical travel rights that will supposedly end after Brexit. So here is a thread with my own personal experiences of why this is total nonsense. #Brexit  
Oh, not @GregHands as well. Spoils a good first half of the article (EU Member States don't understand Brexit - correct) with the 'Commission wants to punish UK' nonsense which is blinding UK politicians.  
Brexit on WTO terms would make doing business in Europe slightly more difficult. But it would make trade with the rest of the world (ROW) easier.  And note: ROW already takes the majority of UK exports, and is where 90% of global growth is expected. 
The government is preparing for a no deal Brexit. Any suggestion we wouldn't have a deal & have full access to the Single Market was shouted down as 'Project Fear' for 6 months before the EU ref, but Theresa May keeps saying "We're honouring the result of the referendum" #AllLies 
On the upside, if Brexit leads to us all ranging in packs, hunting other humans for food (I'm guessing anyone with FBPE in their social media handles gets feasted upon 1st), at least that'll end claims there's a "housing crisis"... 
Morning everyone, hi. Can we all please stop giving credence to a “no deal” scenario? It is not remotely feasible. They’re trying to scare you with something that won’t happen into accepting a still awful outcome as if it was some sort of achievement. There’s no good brexit. 
Brits reject May’s Brexit plan, want BoJo to hold talks & lead Tories instead – poll — RT UK News  
No deal Brexit could lead to RIOTING within two weeks claims boss of internet giant Amazon  
There's a rapidly growing feeling among those who voted remain that the #EU is showing it's true colours over #brexit and that the #UK is certainly better of out of it now .No point doing a deal with something that isn't going to last another 5 years is there ? 
Key reason for Brexit derailing is that it was decided (because ref was 52-48) both Leave and Remain needed to be delivered. This ridiculous contradiction has created this half arsed fudge that pleases no one. Leave won, deliver Brexit. That's it. 
What is more strategically important to us? Trade with EU, percentage of which is falling every year down to 42% or trade with USA, Commonwealth, Middle East, Africa, Asia percentage of which is growing fast 58% & growing fast by volume too. Key factor for #Brexit deal @SkyNews 
With your vast inherited wealth which you are investing in other countries & your total lack of a conscience the Brexit catastrophe won't worry you will it? #UnprincipledLyingWeirdTwat 
Second Brexit vote 'morally justified' as poll shows support for remaining in EU  
.@Jacob_Rees_Mogg ridiculed claims made by former Prime Minister John Major, who called for British people to face a second Brexit referendum  
Man who already leads anti-Brexit party misses chance to vote against Brexit because he's busy discussing creating a new anti-Brexit party. Beyond parody.  
Kevin Hague and his merry band of these islanders are no different than Nigel Farage and his lot. They're so ideologically driven that the UK is the best even in the face of hard Brexit. It's all flags and no knickers... 
Brexit: A Second Referendum or Bust?  
It's too bloody hot. We should withdraw from EU heat waves. Granite Brexit needed. 
This struggle is no longer just Brexit. Not even Left vs Right. It's Nice vs Nasty, Generous vs Selfish, Sane vs Insane, Humanity vs Cruelty, Enlightenment vs a new Dark Age.     This is not a struggle we can afford to lose. 
It is totally irresponsible for anyone to warn about “civil unrest”.But I’ll tell you what will lead to “civil unrest”: overturning Brexit and ignoring the voices of the 17.4million who I speak on behalf of 
ERG now saying that Brexit will stave off fascism. Strange concept. You acquire some aspects of fascism in order to prevent it taking hold. A bit like an immunisation. But Brexit is a live and dangerous pathogen... 
Dear MSM, the country is falling apart, homelessness is rising, Brexit is going to hell, our PM is teetering on the brink of being toppled by her own party, foodbank use through the roof, the economy remains stagnant, but you carry on obsessing about Labour's internal procedures. 
If Amazon think a Brexit no-deal will cause civil unrest, imagine the utter anarchy if democracy is overturned and a second referendum is forced upon us?   
In the world of Brexit there are no strangers, only friends you haven’t insulted and rejected yet. 
Handy summary of how a Brexit No Deal might play out for the UK.  
Right. Let’s see your detailed written down plan for a hard Brexit. Same request to you @andreajenkyns Let’s see it. 
Raab says Britain will thrive even if there is no deal | PM takes Cabinet north for Brexit away-day | May urged to create 'World Trade Deal' with no divorce payout or EU power | Cable missed key Brexit votes to attend 'confidential' anti-Brexit dinner  
When you hear Remainers whine about a "No Deal Brexit" and "crashing out of the EU" remind them we would leave in an orderly manner on WTO terms. The only chaos is in the minds of the sore losers #Brexit 
Time for TV debates: If May’s still confident in her Brexit plan she should sell it to the public 
The country is sick of Brexit discussions. The electorate voted in a referendum over two years ago. I think most people now think it's time we all pulled together and just got on with cancelling it. 
An important article from @GregHands,"EU member states need to realise that their interests are best served by Brexit working as well as possible – not badly, as the Commission likes to think – and that the EU27 have a large economic skin in the game."  
@AMDWaters The #ChequersPlan is a betrayal of #BrexitPlease support this petition by retweeting.Thank you for your support in the past. #LBCLIVE #skynews #bbcdp #Brexit 
Food safety controls could be suspended in the event of a ‘no deal’ Brexit to prevent perishable goods getting delayed at UK borders 
Start stock piling food the Theresa May Tory Doomsday No deal Brexit Apocalypse is upon us!!! 
'In 30 years or so, I believe we will look back and be shocked at what was the accepted way we killed animals en masse for food.' Richard Branson.#r4today #animalcruelty #brexit #meat #vegan #bbc #cnn #nhs 
In the Tory planning for a No-Deal Brexit, food safety standards are to be suspended at UK borders to try and prevent perishable goods being delayed. This opens up the UK to much lower standards goods. Brexit the gift that keeps on giving! #r4today #StopBrexit 
What remainiacs and the people's vote loby conveniently forget besides the unfair £9.3 million pound taxpayer pro-EU pamphlet delivered to every door but the fact that David Cameron also failed miserably at renegotiating our terms of membership.#Brexit  
Segment on BBC GMU citing DUP claim that they don't want hard border, repeating DUP line of "sensible" Brexit. At every, single opportunity the DUP have, by process of elimination and in their rhetoric, RULED out, VOTED DOWN any options that would prevent hard border!! #Brexit 
Thread: Trust in trade negotiationsDue to a recent announcement, @DavidHenigUK, @mrjamesob and others have warned about eroding trust prior to the Brexit negotiations.But why IS trust so important to a trade negotiation?I try to accessibly explain 1/ 
Dear @theresa_may - please will you take notice of the Tory members. Two out of three of us do not support your Brexit plan... If you don't listen, I'm sure @BorisJohnson or someone else will... 
‘Brexit deal: Let’s get on with it, says Theresa May.’  
UK's top polling guru warns May her Brexit deal is driving Tory voter SWING to Ukip 
Ar ddechrau’r Sioe Fawr / at start of one of Europe’s biggest agricultural shows, No Deal brexit looks possible & risks being a disaster for Wales.People deserve a say.Options = no deal or alternatively, to devise a path to stay in.  
It's not even 9 o'clock and I've already found my number 1 reason to hate Brexit for today. 
“With full force, Labour must be prepared to tell the truth to voters: Brexit never has been, nor will it ever be, the answer to the challenges our country faces” Co-founder @Jason_Arthur in @LabourList today calling on @UKLabour to be brave and support a #PeoplesVote 
So now there’ll be riots if we get a No Deal Brexit (Amazon boss) and riots if we have another vote (Farage). Under what specific circumstances are we safe from riots? #stopthreateningpeoplewithviolence 
Thank you to Tim who sent me this vile email last night. (Apologies tweeters for this appauling language). We will not let these people beat us down. Going to keep fighting for Brexit.  
Should Scots use holidays to pick strawbs & rasps rotting in our fields? UK benefits system stops jobless Scots replacing expert East European pickers. And Brexit means next yr will be worse. @keepScotBrand @CommonWealAngus 
The 6 steps of a Brexit coup:1. Massive constitutional change based on a dodgy referendum2. No opposition3. No media control4. Laws to let government bypass parliament5. Imposition of a No Deal Brexit6. Martial Law due to civil unrest when No Deal is delivered#StopBrexit 
new @foodresearchuk rept outlines fragile state of Brexit UK food security  Huge food imports open to disruption. UK govt plans dire actions (suspend food regulations) to keep food flowing. FSA food safety ROF change at same time is risky. Food Plan needed! 
Great news. Let’s now go a W.T.O. Brexit. The EU gets not a penny of our cash.  
The reality is *all* rights and safeguards are up for grabs after Brexit. That's what 'taking back control' means. We liberate ourselves from the need to observe basic, international standards of decency. And can win the race to the bottom.  
This is the man who has his finger on the red button! This is the man we're going to rely on post-Brexit!  Someone in his staff should take his phone away at nght.  
Though we are well past this, people are still stuck on asking how Brexit and Trump happened.It’s because people haven’t had to believe in worst case scenarios for a generation and no longer think it can happen to them.Which is how it happened and why it will still get worse. 
The new Brexit Secretary, Dominic Raab, has just a few short weeks to pull together a Brexit deal that the EU will agree to. Anything other than a 'laser-like focus on the substance' is a dereliction of duty. Hard Brexiter Raab continues the #BrexitShambles #r4today 
If you loved the Blitz you'll love Brexit, says Piers Morgan 
After two years of Brexit chaos, Labour must be brave and back a People’s Vote, says @Jason_Arthur 
EU warns Brexit talks CANNOT be extended unless there is ANOTHER referendum  
The spin this morning is that the Foreign Secretary Jeremy Hunt & others will be touring the EU27 this summer selling the PM’s Chequers plan. Here’s a reminder of Hunt arguing for a #PeoplesVote on the #Brexit deal. Pls RT so he doesn’t forget this  
If the illegality of the referendum doesn't discredit the result, then by any objective analysis, it doesn't matter if the referendum was illegal.I do understand... it's hard to admit that your great victory was a criminal act, and it's easier to accuse others of fake news. 
Dominic Grieve describes Brexit as a failure that threatens the economic wellbeing and the future “of every single man, woman and child in Britain”. A second referendum “may be the only solution”. 
“It took us 15 years to recover” from John Major. Superb stuff!  Watch as Nadine Dorries MP, from a sun chair in her back garden, savages former PM John Major for his latest idiotic intervention on Brexit.  What a disaster he was.  
This will not happen on my watch. We've spent decades building up our rights & there is no way #Brexit will tear them up. @Anna_Soubry @CarolineLucas @natalieben @NicolaSturgeon @LeanneWood @Women_4_Europe #StopBrexit 
Serious demos should greet her wherever she goes. “Theresa May to take her Brexit roadshow to the north-east  
The crucial hearing on whether the Scottish Parliament will keep devolved powers after Brexit begins tomorrow - here's what you need to know. 
Brother: I'm strongly #Remain but we must respect the result. We can't just keep having votes until we get the result we want.Me: But what about the illegal activity of Vote Leave? *Explains*Brother: What! I didn't know!  #Brexit HAS to be stopped!#StopBrexitSaveDemocracy 
Please, please ⁦@theresa_may⁩ take note - we have been campaigning to protect Women’s rights since we left and the story is getting bleaker and bleaker. Brexit is fundamentally detrimental to women and minority rights.   
1/ "EU citizens will automatically be granted indefinite leave to remain in the UK and will be treated no less favourably than they are at present." Vote Leave promised during the referendum in June 2016.  
Dear Sir John Major, it's ridiculous suggesting a 2nd referendum, so then do we have a 3rd if people don't like the result again? Sorry John you are yesterday's man and nobody is taking you seriously... 
WORLD TRADE BREXITMogg: “We ought not to be afraid of a World Trade Deal based on a World Trade Organisation solution which is how we do 60% of our international trade already.”Minford: ‘Time government embraced it firmly as main Brexit policy.’  
Whereas the government in power and carrying Brexit out are what? The unpolitical class?  
You would need to be a fucking magician with a time machine. Rewind two fucking years, wave your magic fucking wand, acknowledge the fucking referendum was advisory, #Remain and then fix the fucking causes of #Brexit. That's how you could have brought the country together.  
I’m looking forward to receiving my blue ration book.#Brexit 
MPs head off for their summer holidays this week, with a recent YouGov poll showing a third of voters would back a new centrist, anti-Brexit party. On this evidence, the conditions look perfect for a fundamental realignment of the British party system. #renewbritain 
The Tories have planned to turn the M26 into a 10 mile long lorry park in the case of a No Deal Brexit. This madness has to stop - the UK has shot itself in the foot with Brexit, it can't keep reloading and pulling the trigger... #StopBrexit #r4today 
Project fear reaches its pinnacle with Andrew Adonis now claiming #Brexit will fund paramilitary activity on the island of Ireland, last time I checked N.Ireland uses a £ & the rep €. The 499 km land border is being exploited by an EU, our PM & Civil Servants to defy the will. 
This is an irresponsible comment. It’s fear driven and the MO? Amazon’s worried its VAT will increase by coming under UK legislation.|No-deal Brexit could spark civil unrest ‘within two weeks’ warns UK head of Amazon  
Look forward to receiving my ration book as part of ‘no deal Brexit planning.’ I don’t have a car, so I’m offering to swap my fuel coupons for more milk and fish 
If booking a holiday for next year, will a visa be required for travel to all 27 EU destinations? Will it have to be retrospectively done & hope you get one after you’ve paid your holiday before we Brexit? Asking for 65million people. 
‘No deal Brexit planning.’ Do Mrs May & Mr Raab seriously think the French & Germans are going to be alarmed about our stockpiling tinned food? They just think it’s a new series of Dad’s Army 
We must be brave enough to give the people a final say on any Brexit deal. My piece in the @standardnews on who really runs Britain and why our campaign for a #PeoplesVote is gaining momentum. 
That's him there. Just behind & to the right of Cameron. @EastRenTories Richard Crook, I mean Cook. Surely @PoliceScotland have been at his door before now. @ScotToriesScots Tory faces renewed scrutiny amid row over £425,000 'dark money' Brexit donation  
Amazon’s U.K. chief says there could be “civil unrest” within two weeks if Britain leaves EU with no deal, Times reports  
My piece for @ConHome on how voters will judge whether Brexit means Brexit - and the two questions ministers should ask themselves about any compromise deal  
On @LBC just now - as quoted by the amazon boss at a meeting “ brexit will bring civil unrest “ 
Irresponsible tweet from an MP. Implies a major company is breaking the law, and blackmailing the country over Brexit.  
Members include: "Ronald MacDonald and Jim Gallagher, Strathclyde’s Professor Brian Ashcroft and Brian Quinn, the former acting deputy governor of the Bank of England."Like the 'Soldier Tax' nonsense, this is yet another 'Brexit Diversion' being given oxygen by the BBC.  
Did anybody vote for this?According to Equality and Human Rights Commission, although the Government has said protections in the Equality Act will continue after Brexit, “this political commitment is not included” in the EU Withdrawal Bill.#StopBrexit 
Four years on from Scotland's referendum, in 2014 it was all about hoping for a result. Now I'm actually starting to to believe  
Crashing out of the EU? The head of Amazon UK has warned of 'civil unrest' if the UK doesn't come to a trade deal with the EU ahead of #Brexit. Nigel Evans MP says the EU will still want to sell to us and that global trade deals will happen. Are you worried about #Brexit?  
The EU are aiming for one of the following 1) A complete capitulation by May 2) The clock ticking down so they can force May into a last minute deal on their terms3) A second referendum or general election that they hope reverses #Brexit 
Britain will 'thrive' even if there is no #Brexit deal, minister @DominicRaab says, as @DavidDavisMP calls on @theresa_may to 'reset' her plan. 
David Davis the former #Brexit Secretary has launched a scathing attack on Chancellor Philip Hammond and the Treasury for using 'nonsensical forecasts' and 'mathematical mumbo jumbo' in a bid to undermine a clean break from Brussels. 
Analysis: "She said '#Brexit means Brexit' and 'no deal is better than a bad deal' - but now those words are coming back to haunt her"  
Women's rights under threat after Brexit, warns EHCR report  
I would like to know how Brexit-supporting politicians - and with that I now also mean those still sitting on the fence for their inaction also supports Brexit - can look at this and just shrug their shoulders. Read the following tweets too.  
#Spain heads the #European Union on six shameful political indicators. Plus >1000 voters treated by medical services after police attacks on referendum day.#1Oct 
We're being told that Brexit must happen or far right will be emboldened. They were emboldened the moment the stupid referendum was voted for, leading one of their number to kill an MP in cold blood.The far right have owned the UK these past 2 years. The argument doesn't wash. 
New Brexit Sec., Dominic Raab, has failed to deny that the Government are stockpiling food in case the UK crashes out of the EU without a trade deal. If they are preparing for doomsday like this, then it says a lot about what types of scenarios they can see happening! #r4today 
I didn't tweet the whole weekend. I was hiding in a bunker for 48 hrs testing my No Deal #brexit emergency action safety plan for Civil Unrest #NoDealBrexit #MondayMotivation 
Breaking news: Cameron’s £9.3m Referendum booklet gave a unfair advantage to Remain. I think we all knew that when it was delivered, but good for it to be official. The booklet should have contained both sides of the argument.   
Theresa May to send ministers across EU to sell Brexit planDo they think EU politicians will give up their summer holiday to be told that they should give us a bespoke deal? via @financialtimes 
BREXIT SOLUTION: May urged to create WORLD TRADE DEAL with NO divorce payout or EU power  
Dominic Grieve claims a 'no deal' Brexit would see the UK 'in a state of emergency'; @TomSwarbrick1 asks: are you happy to leave without a deal? 
Ironically, I think its only chance of survival is to engineer its own defeat in an election within the next nine months to let a Corbyn-led Labour deliver Brexit (or not). Tories survive as the “we’d have done it properly” party. People have short memories. 
Brexit Britain  
Apparently there is no majority for #Brexit in Parliament. So why are we letting the stupid loud people take control of our nation and opposition? Why aren't the silent majority standing up in defiance of this #Brexit madness. It is a time for British heroes, not liars and fools. 
It’s right that Amazon warn of a no-deal Brexit. Imagine a nightmare scenario. All of us struggling to survive on a pittance. No job security. Rapacious management taking advantage, removing terms and conditions of employment. Do I really have to type “side eye to camera” here? 
Labour duplicity They won't publicly admit they want to remain in the EU and to have a second referendum They want full access to [i.e. remain in] the single marketThey want to remain in a [i.e. the] customs union 
A third of companies have shifted contracts out of English courts' jurisdiction since Brexit vote. London & the UK are becoming less significant on the world stage by the day. 
About to go on GMB to support John Major’s call for people’s vote. Poorest hardest by Brexit; the claims made by Johnson 2 years ago have turned out to be fantasy; there will be new border in Ireland; 53 trade deals beyond EU about to be axed, as well as huge trade with EU 
#Brexit Stop putting these 3 muppets on TV all the time. Spreading doom & gloom, slagging of Brexit & Donald Trump all the time. Tony Blair, John Major, & Nick Clegg. No one gives a monkeys what all 3 say about anything. There yesterday’s men  all  IDIOTS.     
In this grim age of Trump and Brexit, online fury is a dead end for the left | John Harris  
Every disaster movie begins with a news report no one is listening to playing in the background. #Brexit  
Beware!! beware Theresa May’s bacon mincing Tory Gammonati’  plotting a doomsday no deal pigs Brexit stock pile food get ready for the bonehead Tory apocalypse!!!!  
UK, You Gov poll:ScenariosBrexit party: 38%Stop-Brexit party: 33%Brexit and anti-Islam party: 24%Sample Size: 1,668Field work: 29/07/17-20/07/18#Brexit  
So now some knob tory says we must get behind the PM and support their Manifesto AND the referendum result to leave the EU leave the SM leave the CU and leave the ECJ etc etc etc NO FUCKING WAY 
News Daily: Toronto shooting and May's Brexit demand  
May's 'no deal is better than a bad deal' lie is going to bite her on the backside. Here silly soundbite could well toss the UK off the #Brexit cliff and into an economic abyss. The public will pay the price for her folly. Time to start stockpiling food. 
The PM has said “ lets get on with it “ as she attempts to sell her plan ( what plan ) for brexit . “ we want a deal in place by October “ .. it would take me longer to negoatiate a contract delivering carpets !!! She’s out of time and knows it . #peoples_vote only way out now 
Dominic Grieve is the man who threatened to "collapse the Government" to prevent a "catastrophic" Brexit. One of the leading advocates of a soft Brexit, he clearly thinks he knows better than 17.4 million Referundum voters. Full Brexit NOW please!  
Brexit: How much more do we need to hear before we consign it to the dustbin of history?  
Big thanks to Coogee locals for a very warm response to the People's Referendum on Coal and Gas yesterday! Please get behind the campaign. Vote online and share on social media:  @bnotleysmith @MarjSpooner #time2choose 
The EU DICTATORS warn Brexit talks CANNOT be extended unless there is ANOTHER referendum  
Remember, most EU member states are also NATO allies, and all are security partners. Brexit strains relationships - that is inevitable - but a government unable to cooperate properly without hostility could strain these to breaking point. 10/ 
Brexit continues to do its work, splitting the most successful political party in Britain.  Far from being democracy in action it seems to me it is a major threat to democracy 
4 days of total immersion - just sorry I didn’t get to Derry. Back in Belfast soon to meet large group of young people passionate about stopping Brexit and want to form a Northern Ireland @OFOCBrexit to campaign for @peoplesvote_uk. Big rally in the autumn 
But at an international level, it may be yet more damaging. You can imagine a post-Brexit world where, as a result of the animosity, mistrust, and hatred bred towards it, even simple agreements on cooperation are impossible to conclude with the EU. 7/ 
BREXIT BOMBSHELL: Remain had 'unfair advantage' with Cameron's £9.3m leaflet  
The reason I harp on about the emerging Brexit ‘blame myth’ is not because I don’t like people criticising the EU. It can, I’m sure, take it. It’s because this myth-that everything going wrong is the EU’s fault-will be very damaging for the UK and Europe if it takes hold. 1/  
One of the main reasons that the UK needs to trade with the EU under WTO is to take disputes away from the EU. The EU is a protectionist organisation, and they will obstruct our trade after Brexit with forced regulations. We need out completely 
Theresa May must start planning for a ‘no deal’ Brexit fast and not keep giving to the EU  
No Brexit is the best deal on the table and I hope that people turn out and telll her as she travels the country.  #StopBrexit #FBPE #PeoplesVote 
Subject of my speech in House of Lords Brexit debate today  
Bully boys at it again, We do NOT need another referendum, we have had one and we are leaving whether you like it or not.EU warns Brexit talks CANNOT be extended unless there is ANOTHER referendum  
Nobody asked Anguillans what they think about #Brexit.But they, too, are fearing the consequences.#DWStories 
This is Bernard.Bernard is a rabid Brexiteer.Bernard doesn't give 2 shits that Brexit would make you indescribably poorer.Don't be like Bernard.He's a fucking moron.  
Safety controls on food imports at risk from no-deal Brexit, says report  
The United Kingdom will only pay its EU divorce bill if the bloc agrees the framework for a future trade deal, the new #Brexit Secretary warned in an interview. 
'The idea of a no-deal Brexit might be easier to swallow if we all had our own personal stockpile – like Brexiteers do'  
Disaster For Theresa May: Brits Overwhelmingly Reject New Brexit Plan; Turn To Boris, Farage  
The Water demonstrations weren’t just about charges.It was clear from the outset that @IrishWater was created purely to enable privatisation, per IMF diktat.We must ensure, by referendum, that our water remains forever in public ownership.Otherwise, this is where we’re headed.  
British embassies in EU are hopelessly conflicted over Brexit and are betraying UK expats. Consulates aren't looking after our interests, as they are meant to. So I call upon the EU, of which we are also citizens, to substitute itself for our embassies and protect our interests. 
Can we drop the idea that it's the "establishment" questioning Brexit.With a few exceptions, the "Political Class" have been total cowards in standing up to a Brexit they know will harm their constituents. It's mainly the PEOPLE who are saying this is going badly.#PeoplesVote 
Today, being the 70th anniversary of the final referendum which led to Newfoundland joining Canada, I figured some Joan Morrissey was in order  
50 years of austerity chained up to a Brexit England run by ToriesOr Independence for Scotland #DissolveTheUnion 
Brexit deal: Let's get on with it, says Theresa May  
Gina Miller is now threatening the FCA, the City watchdog, for not making clear how it is enforcing the EU’s Mifid 2 regulations. These impose 1.4 million paragraphs of unnecessary red tape on the City. The lady also wants a second referendum. Real bonus having her around. 
Kerr ching for Brexit posh boy! 'Second investment fund set up in Ireland, warned earlier this year.. Uncertainty over UK’s stance on withdrawal from EU has led asset managers to establish new financial products in European financial hubs.' #Brexit #Tory 
WARNING TO EU: UK won't pay £39billion Brexit bill if bloc rejects trade deal, says Raab  
If Ozil had a picture taken with Theresa May do you think the meeting would involve  sorting out a deal for Brexit? 
Powerful stuff from Ireland's Taoiseach: 'One hundred years ago this country was forced to accept partition. We can never go back to the borders that followed.' 'We will stay calm and negotiate alongside our European allies.' #Brexit #Irish #independence 
Hollywood is being exposed for such a sadistic form of Pedophilia...they are literally molesting and raping babies in diapers. #BoycottHollywood #ShutItDown#QAnon #GoodbyeDemocrats #WhatIsQ #GreatAwakening #Brexit #Treason #PresidentTrump pic.twitter.com/T2mDIjAkG9 
In tribute to Jacob Rees-Mogg and his "50 years to reap the benefits of Brexit", I will be tweeting this in 2067:Dad, that rat tasted funnyOf course it did son, it's been dead for 49 yearsIt'll knock his tweed socks off. 
If the whole Brexit thing is getting too much for you, don’t worry. It’s going to get much worse. 
Tell Mama, a watchdog which measures anti-Muslim incidents in UK recorded a 30 % rise in street incidents and  a 16 % rise in 2017, taking the number of verified reports to a record of 1,201 of anti muslim attacks post brexit.  
We've been helping Tesco with their labelling to help educate their customers about the negative effects of brexit. You're welcome. X #fbpe 
Guys. I am not talking theoretically here. This is happening... not will or might. It’s happening now. Smes are being negatively impacted by the prospect let alone the actual #Brexit  
On the BBC Andrew Marr Show former Prime Minister #SirJohnMajor put forward a compelling case for another referendum on the final #Brexit deal when the negotiations are completed. Read more and watch the clip on the @Reasons2Remain #Facebook page. Link:  
No voters, you do realise the only way to get rid of the SNP, is to vote Yes in the next Independence referendum?Otherwise we'll just keep voting them in till we get it!  #DissolveTheUnion #youyesyet #scotref 
Poll: If another referendum regarding the EU was held , How do you would vote? Vote and retweet for a big sample please 
This is why I think the entire conversation about the Dems’ “message” is silly. Midterms are a referendum on the party in power. The only thing Dems really have to “unite” around right now is a shared commitment to win seats in the House, Senate, gov mansions & state legislatures 
The EU has rejected the UK’s proposals on how to govern the City of London’s access to the European market after Brexit, saying Theresa May’s latest financial services plan would rob the EU of its “decision-making autonomy”.  
Three months from today is Kingston's historic referendum on ranked ballots.  On October 22nd, Kingston can become the first city in Canada to embrace ranked ballots through a referendum. 
Anyone who has idiotically said things like: "Invoke Article 50 NOW!""Brexit is easy""Just walk away now!" and"The country is FULL UP!" should be made to do the tough agricultural, care and factory work many of our EU guests have been doing day in day out for years  
Let's have referendum on bringing back the death sentence for knife/acid attack crimes, sod the do gooders. 
The Brexit People Voted For  
Nothing says safeguarding against the rise of authoritarianism at home like supporting abroad. Lay the causes for democratic malaise, get rich from blood money and lecture from the sidelines. Maybe he can donate some of that Saudi cash for that second referendum  
Taoiseach Leo Varadkar @campaignforleo on #Brexit & the border - “our overriding policy is to ensure that Ireland & the Irish people do not once again become collateral damage in a British policy decision” @Independent_ie 
Found: the person who will actually benefit from Brexit  
You know that a no deal would be catastrophic for most Britons and would profit only Putin, Trump, fascists, speculators, disaster capitalists and rich people who hate paying taxes. A no deal #Brexit would be a crime against the British people. #PeoplesVote #StopBrexit 
"I think he's wrong on almost everything he said."@Jacob_Rees_Mogg hits out at Sir John Major's latest #Brexit intervention.Full programme  #WestminsterHour 
#Russia showed the world true democracy when the people of #Crimea VOTED in a referendum when 90% of the population spoke their voice! No one got killed, attacked by police. During the Euromaidan in #Ukraine, 100 people were killed in "Revolution of Dignity"! 
At this point I'm pretty sure the government's Brexit plan depends mostly on the general population being too concerned with their dysentery to concentrate on the politics  
Not just scientists. What nations, businesses and individuals will trust a government that so casually reneges on a deal it has signed? Trust built up over many decades is being thrown away. The price we will pay for this will be immense.#Brexit #PeoplesVote #StopBrexit 
I'm not a @liverpool fan, but i know one thing, Bill Shankley would have not just condemned the tories (he was a socialist) he'd have condemned Brexit, and so i think would Bob Paisley, decent men who knew the value of people, never mind money. 
My latest piece on @BrexitCentral - how so called ‘progressive Europeans’ are using the Belfast Agreement to try and derail Brexit @JimAllister @KateHoeyMP @darrengrimes_ @OwenPaterson 
Signing off with just one thought: during the week, please remind yourselves that @Jacob_Rees_Mogg admitted that it may take 50 years for Brexit's "benefits" to be clear. Have a great week... 
Remember when everybody was freaking out over our food being smothered in chlorine after Brexit? Ah, simpler times  
Actually, @AmazonUK, it’s NO BREXIT that would lead to civil unrest. Stop threatening us and start respecting our vote.  
Tony Blair, John Major and Nick Clegg are spearheading the anti-Brexit campaign. It's no coincidence that they are also the three least successful politicians Britain has ever elected.  
Because David Cameron exaggerated how soon the damage from Brexit would hit us, the UK has given up on experts, and is willing to let today's politicans make life even harder for ordinary British people, despite constant warning signs.Cameron deserved to lose.. THE UK DOESN'T!! 
BREXIT SOLUTION: May urged to create WORLD TRADE BILL with NO divorce payout or EU power  
It’s like he’s on another bloody planet. 25% of U.K. farms are forecast to go under thanks to Brexit.  
Brexit won with the largest vote in UK history.   If you are fighting Brexit you are fighting democracy and you are not fit to be in government.  
I still like where JRM refused to answer your question because it was a 'simple question on a complex set of issues'. Brexit referendum in a nutshell. 
Brexit:I’ve now completed my Brexit plan, it satisfies the key criteria, won’t cost us a penny more and we won’t have to wait 50 years to find out if it was a good idea.#RemainSimples. #FBPE 
Folks! Say Hi to EU Commissioner Cecilia Malmstrom!She determines EU (and hence UK's) trade policy.She is Swedish and has never had a job outside politics or academe. She has NO trading/business experience.We did not elect her and cannot get rid of her.Viva Brexit!  
I'm a remainer but sweet mother of god, this is hilarious...I'm crying. #Brexit  
Brexit is 6000 hours away. #brexit 
Quote of the Day : “Forgive me if I don’t keep a laser-like focus on the substance.” - Dominic Raab, UK Brexit Secretary to Andrew Marr. There are 250 days to Brexit. 
I work with over 50 SME’s across a range of sectors and sizes. Only one of them voted for Brexit and they all agree that the net impact of leaving will be negative - not a good time for privately owned companies 
Canna wait for the new post Brexit cars to be produced.........  
People say that the votes of the Scottish people in the EU referendum have been ignored. My understanding is the Scottish votes were added to the votes in the rest of the UK to deliver the final result. This was the published process. This was what happened. Seems fair to me.  
So a no deal Brexit will ground flights, lead to a food shortage, no medicine and no dairy products.  
More rubbish from corporates. The civil unrest will come if Brexit is frustrated - as that destroys democracy. No one wants that  
Like Farage, @Jacob_Rees_Mogg didn't say that #Brexit would be.. a success! Like #Farage, all he said was that it would give the nation back its #sovereignty.  Plus it might take 50 years to see the benefits..But #JacobReesMogg has mouths to feed.Now!#PrepareForANoDealBrexit 
Amazon says they are preparing for civil unrest in UK within weeks, if it is a No Deal Brexit outcome. It is that serious, reflecting amongst other things, the complete lack of any meaningful contingency planning by HMG.  
Heath took this Country into the European Economic Community. Then Major signed the Maastricht treaty that paved the way for the EU. Do we really believe that the Tories want to destroy that legacy completely?No, they're going for a soft option. They are not the party of Brexit. 
All coming out of the non-existent #Brexit ‘dividend’. Imagine if we could spend this on the NHS instead. Time for a #PeoplesVote to stop this avoidable misery 
Watching this government deal with Brexit is like being locked outside your house while you can see people inside setting fire to the furniture as the law’s telling you you can’t go in and stop them. 
Of course it would once supermarket shelves are empty, medicines missing, travel is impossible, fuel runs out etc, and the glorious uplands are nowhere to be seen. And who are people likely to turn against? We must do all we can to prevent this: Brexit must be stopped.  
If it transpires that two years of establishment dithering conspired to frustrate #Brexit to the extent that the decision were U-turned under the pretext of political complexity, I fear the consequences for British democracy and Parliamentary credibility would be irreparable.  
The government’s Brexit negotiation strategy.  
A poll has said 1/3 of voters would support a new right wing party committed to Brexit. @iancollinsuk asks: would you back a new party? 
10pmExclusive: In Friday’s government summit with business at Chevening, the UK head of Amazon suggested that under Brexit “no deal”, there could be “civil unrest” within 2 week’s  
Dominic Raab says Britain can achieve a Brexit deal if Brussels has ambition. What a patronising, arrogant prick. It's not their problem. 
Serious questions for @Conservatives: 1) What have you done to win over the 48%?2) Why should anyone who voted to remain support you (other than in constituencies like @Anna_Soubry's)?3) If (when) brexit turns out badly, what will you say to those who lose their jobs? 
Stop worrying about no-deal Brexit. You'll be fine*.*excludes people who need food, medicine, cancer treatment, want to fly anywhere, work in manufacturing/farming, have a job with a company that exports or imports, aren’t rich, or don’t run a hedge fund hoping for Brexit chaos 
Great work @krishgm @Channel4News again.Meanwhile, also getting Mogg to admit Brexit, that easy-as-pie source of sunny uplands - is a 50 year project. Write that on the side of a bus.  
Tomorrow's front page: No deal on Brexit risks civil unrest, says Amazon #tomorrowspapertoday 
300 Labour CLPs are backing a #peoplesvote ahead of their conference in Liverpool.Labour members can see first hand how Brexit will affect local jobs, communities and public services. That's why they must have the chance to reject the government's deal. 
#NoDealBrexit Gosh. In the event of a 'No Deal' Brexit we'd be just like the7,000,000,000 people (92%  of the world), 168 countries and 85% of World Trade that have nothing to do with the EU Empire.Sound good to me. Bring it on!Viva Real Brexit!  
Dominic Raab is under fire after partially retracting a claim that the Bank of England believes the EU will be hit harder than the UK by a no-deal Brexit  
Apparently Raab's happy to toss over a million UK citizens living in the EU under the wheels of the #Brexit bus. Arsehole 
Because of Brexit, Britain is already losing £440 million a week. This far exceeds the weekly budget payments to the EU. It’s £90 million a week more than what that lying red bus said we’d save by leaving the EU - and we haven’t even left the EU yet. 
BREXIT SOLUTION: May urged to create WORLD TRADE BILL with NO divorce payout or EU power  
Can't stop laughing, this is hilarious. Barnier inadvertently outs himself as having 'Brexit tendencies' saying:May's plan would rob the EU of its "decision-making autonomy" in financial services.  
“If a fake referendum can transfer Crimea from Ukraine to Russia, and that’s OK with Matteo Salvini, then he could have no objection to a fake referendum transferring Trieste from Italy to Austria.” #CrimeaIsUkraine 
Post-Brexit Minister of Agriculture, Fisheries and Food revealed:  
Brussels rejects UK’s financial services Brexit plan @FTAnd much more.  The EU and UK are _not_ equal partners in this negotiation. Ah well.  
Someone said of the Vietnam War that having made tragically mistaken decisions, the US thought it best to ‘keep on muddling through.’ If we can’t learn from this that we must stop Brexit now, no lesson of history will ever teach our politicians wisdom. We the people must do it. 
Visiting the Allied Museum celebrating the @RoyalAirForce role in the Berlin airlift - Britain and Germany were friends long before the EU and we should not let Brexit change that #RAF100 #Freundship 
Hands up all those 18 year olds who want to wait until they're 70 (yes, you read that correctly) before they know for sure whether Brexit was a success.. 
Quote  from a tweet on here : “ brexit is like watching your library burn down by people who never learned  to read “ 
Imagine life in the year 2068...THAT'S HOW LONG Brexiteers think it'll take before we know if Brexit has been a success... I'll be 99 by then (no comments!)18 yr old voters in the Brexit Referendum will be SEVENTY!And we're really going through with this?!?It's insane  
Brexit means botulism.  
If like us, you’re a Labour Member gutted by Brexit and feel @UKLabour needs to change Policy, please propose our Contemporary Motion in your CLP.With @Remain_Labour, we're in contact with Members in300 CLP’s with 79 Motions in process.Brexit is not inevitable #PeoplesVote 
2016: Brexit means Brexit2018: Brexit means you might shit yourself to death pic.twitter.com/oQAqQcK9fO 
Dominic Grieve added to list of Tories now telling us it’s perfectly acceptable, indeed logical, to have a 2nd referendum if circumstances radically change. #scotref 
Again. The referendum just said leave the EU. That's it. The moment you start adding conditions to it, then you've got to add in everything that the campaigns promised. Where's the 350 million, for example. Now if you don't like where Brexit's going, let's have a vote on it. 
1. All of this was predicted by some 2yrs ago & #Brexit lost when May backed by Corbyn invoked A50 w/o a clue what they were doing.Gross negligence & a lack of due diligence. The deceitful party political game play since then is a travesty of Democracy.  
It shouldn't need saying that national paranoia is scarcely a secure basis for a confident UK in the future. It might be comforting to blame the EU for e.g. Irish border, Brexit bill, failure to reach a trade deal, EU citizens in the EU. But it isn't going to help 
My twitter feed today suggests we're in danger of a new type of Brexit - Paranoid Brexit - where everything is the fault of the evil EU, and presumably continues to be for many years to come 
The EU fears the UK will become an Atlantic version of Singapore:  #Brexit 
Monday’s i- “No checks on food safety under Brexit plan” #bbcpapers #tomorrowspaperstoday 
The EU saying they would only agree to an extension of Article 50 IF we agree to further Referendum We want neither  
Jacob Rees-Mogg's financial investment firm has set up a second investment fund in Ireland, the EU zone. His hypocrisy knows no bounds as he pushes the UK into a disastrous Hard Brexit while protecting his own assets against it. Do not trust this man! #StopBrexit 
UK, YouGov poll:  Scenarios with CON (ECR) leader XBoris JohnsonLAB (S&D) 38%CON 38%Rees-MoggLAB 40%CON 35%Michael GoveLAB 40%CON 30%Sajid JavidLAB 40%CON 29%Jeremy HuntLAB 41%CON 29%Sample size: 1,668Field work: 19/07/18-20/07/18#Brexit  
If another referendum regarding the EU was held how would you vote :Please retweet for purposes of increased accuracy. Ta! 
EU and Japan sign trade deal covering a third of the world's economy: Brexit makes no sense! ⁦@CBItweets⁩ 
While the Prime Minister maintains a baffling silence as to the effects of obvious illegality on the referendum, then I am unsure whether there will be repercussions. Will it take a change of government? 
According to @Jacob_Rees_Mogg it may take up to 50 years to see any benefit from #brexit.Ill probably be dead by then. Guess I have 50 years to try and help people with the fallout then.Cheers Jacob. 
"If UK voters had been similarly informed about the importance of the EU, as is now happening, it is likely they would have voted to reject Brexit"  
Top Japanese official issues ominous warning to Theresa May's Government, saying 'no-deal' Brexit would be 'impossible for us to accept'   
With two months until Labour Conference, supporters of grassroots @Labour4EU @Remain_Labour launch a drive to change Party policy on Brexit.We have 79 motions progressing in our CLP’s and contacts in300 others. Today we launch our #PeoplesVote Contemporary Motion.Please RT 
Looking forward to appearing on @daily_politics tomorrow to discuss naturally.....Government’s #Brexit strategy options 
The question has to asked but why didn't our intelligence services flag   Arron banks dealings with Russia considering the money  he poured into the leave campaign?  #Brexit 
No one voted for food shortages. We demand a #PeoplesVote as Brexit won’t be enable us to #EatWellForLess please sign and Retweet. If you don’t receive a Government reply in your inbox check your junk folder 
Changing @UKLabour’s stance is crucial to securing #PeoplesVote and stopping Brexit. Most Labour people are pro-European and internationalist - vital they make themselves heard at Annual Conference. #Lab18If you’re a Labour member, *please* ask your CLP to support this motion. 
The people have spoken in #Sandbach yesterday & this part of #Cheshire was emphatic in rejecting #Brexit! Lots of leaflets were distributed & more signatures gathered by @EUmoveMACC for the petition on a #PeoplesVote! @euromove @peoplesvote_uk pic.twitter.com/Cu5j3COck9 
Major. Heseltine. Clarke. Soubry. Valiant Tory voices for democracy and against the harm being wrought by Brexit. Does this not shame the silent Labour leadership? It should 
The Hobsons choice of a damaging Tory Brexit or adevastating ‘No Deal’ satisfies all but a fraction of people in our Party.Today, with @Remain_Labour we launch our campaign for Labour members to change policy through adopting our #PeoplesVote Motion in our CLP’s.Please RT 
Lots of polls.around at the moment and here's another one. After the total shambles of the last 2 years the choice is coming down to no deal or no #Brexit. Please RT. #peoplesvote #fbpe 
In light of Vote Leave cheating in the referendum we are lodging a legal challenge into the EU referendum since it was won by cheating. Please support here   
The interesting point to note is that a new referendum would be a good & valid reason for #Art50 to be extended. Whereas unicorns, cake & threatening tantrums are not. #PeoplesVote 
The first MP I remember clearly pointing out these basic facts about the referendum, instead of just going along for the ride.  
John Major of Edwina fame is still moaning about brexit. Rather galling bearing in mind he knew Heath had taken us into the EU illegally. The worm has got more front than Blackpool. Globalists should be kept out of parliament on the grounds they serve no interests but their own. 
@carolecadwalla Funny how they squeal when they get caught red-handed in their criminal chicanery, isn't it, Shahmir. "Brexit" is obviously criminal corruption on a truly grandiose scale , and the astonishing arrogance of the "brexit" politicians will certainly be their undoing 
Stand up now for Brexit and Britain, says FREDERICK FORSYTH  
I am hearing from a normally reliable source that HMRC are sitting on a commissioned #Brexit report they have been told not to publish as it would scare the natives.  Would be good if someone like @ScotNational or @FerretScot investigated. @Feorlean @DerekMackaySNP 
The PM could suffer a worse fate than John Major if she betrays Brexit with her 'Nixonian' secrecy  
Remoaners like Dominic Grieve want the British taxpayer to fork out an extortionate exit bill even in the case of a no deal Brexit. These saboteurs will say anything to deter us from leaving. Sad! Support us at  
John Major really doesn't get that he's responsible for the mess our country is in ... #Brexit is a direct result of us not being polled about #Maastricht. 
More appalling and unknown effects of Brexit: research collaboration on rare disease care now being rolled back. Vote Brexit, threaten sick kids’ medical care. Didn’t see that on the side of a sodding bus did you? #StopBrexitSaveBritain 
This is so true. I'm genuinely scared now. Brexit is going to destroy this country and many people just can't see it happening. Which i find unbelievable. And quite sad.   
Former Brussel's diplomat says planes won't fly and people will be out of work in a "catastrophic' no-deal Brexit.  
Remember the story about Jacob Rees-Mogg's investment setting up in Ireland because of Brexit?Well that firm, founded by the hardest of hard-Brexiteers, has only gone and set up another fund.  
**Our grassroots campaign for @UKLabour to back a #PeoplesVote steps up tonight**  At #Lab18 in Liverpool, we must debate #Brexit and win the argument for a change in policy. Join @Remain_Labour & @Labour4EU and please support our new conference motion 
This can be applied to Arsenal as well over the years I’ve seen a lot of fans love and treat Jack Wilshere like a legend yet think Özil’s not as good and under-appreciate him. Is it because Özil’s Muslim and you probably voted Brexit? Crackheads.  
N Ireland have different income tax, VAT and a different currency than the Rep of Ireland. Works fine! But different regulations on milk, beef and cars will bring back the IRA? EVERYONE agrees there will NOT hard border even under WTO Brexit. Enough of this non issue.#Brexit  
Absolute pish talk. The Scottish people are owed a second independence referendum. The rest of the UK can sort our their Brexit as best they see fit. No shame in Scotland putting itself first, that's what every other country in the entire world does.  
This was so obviously going to happen. No way Brussels could take May’s speech - and particularly the hardline rhetoric - as anything other than bad faith. Hubristically saying EU had to come up w/workable solution likely straw that will break Brexit deal’s back  
"The EU is putting its own interests and the interests of the EU 27 ahead of the interests of the UK"(The UK CHOSE to hold a referendum, the UK CHOSE to leave the EU, which shockingly means no longer being in the EU and meaning the EU will prioritise the EU27 over the UK...) 
"The EU isn't taking our brexit white paper seriously"(The UK govt ORDERED its OWN MPs to vote AGAINST their own brexit white paper in order to keep the ERG / Jacob-Rees Mogg happy rendering our white paper useless and yet we expect the EU to somehow take us seriously) 
#Ridge, good grief, Dominic is incredulous! How do the Americans, Chinese, Japanese, etc, fly into Rome after Brexit? Oh, of course, there aren’t members of the EU!  
@yagbebi:As Head of Business Development @ Manchester Airports Group, I worked on UK govt component of EU Single European Sky (SES) PolicyI can tell you WITHOUT ‘if & buts’ IF there’s NO #Brexit deal, UK-EU binary flights will CEASE!To visit Paris you’ll have to CONNECT via NY 
Theresa May is facing an unprecedented political crisis, according to a new poll that reveals voters are implacably opposed to her Brexit plan and are prepared to turn to Ukip or parties of the far right.  May is a DISASTER and must be SACKED!    #fo2eu 
'No deal' Brexit would see UK state of emergency, warns Dominic Grieve. Whose paying these Prophets of Doom, EU or George Soros?  
 Govt notices sent to businesses  Back up generators sourced Stockpile tinned food  Civil society contingency plans Restricted air travelNo, this isn't preparation for a war. This is preparation for Brexit. A war tories, DUP,UKIP are inflicting on us #Brexit 
Boss of Airbus, Tom Enders, is confusing me.First he said he’d switch loads of jobs out of U.K. if hard Brexit.Now, after UK govt announced £10bn for U.K. built next generation fighter, he wants a merger with BAE???  
What makes us think we should have another referendum when we so obviously failed to police the first one correctly?  
According to @LiamFox, "the beauty of a referendum is that every voter has an equal voice & every vote has equal weight".The ugliness of First Past the Post is that voters have unequal voices and some votes are worth many times more than others.#MakeElectionsBeautiful 
Stockpiling food and still they go selling Brexit to the English public - does this nonsense still have support there?  
I suspect that suspending Holyrood through Emergency Powers after a Brexit No Deal will not be so much as a Red Line they have crossed but more like a red rag to  a Bull!!! 
Politicians don't understand the kind of backlash they'll face in a Brexit betrayal, says Nigel Farage.  
Something very satisfying that poll after poll shows the British people just want to get on with Brexit. The political and media establishment's increasingly hysterical warnings of doom are just being ignored. People just don't believe them. Rightly so. 
There can be no doubt that there will be a second Scottish referendum. The campaign starts now. Don't wait for the announcement.  
Govt plans show 'no deal' #Brexit will plunge UK into a state of emergency with shortages of medicines, interruption of food supplies & planes grounded. JRM says 'no Brexit benefit for 50yrs'.All this on the back of a Ref won 'cos #VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw? 
Brexit The Movie - Dirty Rotten Scoundrels  
So folks I am now 7 followers away from 7000. For comment about Democracy, Sport, Trump, Catalonia, Brexit isn’t it about time you followed me. Go on! 
A recent YouGov poll shows that if voters were offered a new vote they would overturn the referendum result, with remaining in the EU beating leaving with no deal by 54% to 46%. The argument for a @peoplesvote_uk grows stronger by the day. 
Tory Brexit gets worse by the day. A No Deal Brexit was once unthinkable but is now talked about on all sides as a likely conclusion - despite the huge damage this would do jobs, wages and the NHS. Join us tomorrow to plan the fight back. Sign up here:  
In tomorrow's National, Carolyn Leckie on why the SNP ought to lead the way in pushing for a second EU referendum.  
What would you prefer? #EU #Brexit 
Brussels rejects UK’s financial services Brexit plan  
Jacob Rees-Mogg has said that the "overwhelming opportunity for Brexit is over the next 50 years". So,there's going to be a benefit but we may have to wait 50yrs. We'll have to lay down our prosperity & that of our children to reach a possible up-side! (no guarantees) #StopBrexit 
.@iaindale really doesn't understand how international trade works or what leaving the Single Market & Customs Union means for the volume of trade between the UK and EU.He actually told #bbcsp this morning that EU-UK trade will "stay the same" after Brexit.What a prune.@lbc 
There are no benefits from Brexit Owen. It’s a shambles.  
E-V-E-R-Y-T-H-I-N-G Is about SANCTIONS. Proposed referendum on Ukraine leads to removal of sanctions — and it’s quite likely trump has agreed privately, and in a quid pro quo manner during election, to lift them. Trump OWES putin for his EXTENSIVE election assistance #MAGA 
A senior Tory welcomes the idea of drastic tax cuts in the event of a no-deal Brexit. 
Things that are really boring: 1. Prince Adam 2. Golf3. He-Man4. Brexit4. People on twitter that constantly reply to tweets using the same 4 gifs because they don't have the wit or intelligence to use actual words5. Emptying the dishwasher 6. He-Man again  
Actually once a #brexit Withdrawal Agreement is reached they can’t as they’d be in breach of Intl law. Not forgetting this Bill actually just covers UK commitments to 2020 that the UK gets a return on: CAP, Horizon 2020, Intereg etc  
#Leavers were told that #Brexit and the negotiations would be the easiest deal in history and that there would be no downsides, as these were just #ProjectFearA no deal #Brexit, crashing out of the EU wasn't on the ballot paper.There's no mandate for it @theresa_may. 
What can we expect from Tory England heading into Hard Brexit?NothingWhat can we expect from Scottish Independence?A leap into an uncertain future that's for sureBut that future will be oursSuccesses and failures will be ours and ours onlySaor Alba gu bràth 
1) Aylesbury is a place that voted in the EU referendum in line with the national average. 2) Based on this snap poll, most people in Aylesbury consider that Theresa May is on the side of Remainers, rather than Leavers3) Big clue: May's Cabinet is chock-full of Remainers  
So what about the 45m people who didn’t vote for Brexit.  What about them Andrea.  So you promised the people stockpiled medicines or did you.  You promised them that welching on a deal is what the U.K. was good for. Jeez  
Perhaps #TonyBlair will help modernize Saudi Arabia by calling for a referendum to end its absolute monarchy?    
If brexit is as bad as we think/no deal/ government fail to pay what they owe and the Le Touquet treaty is scrapped ( Le Pen territory - French Govt under pressure )- would the treaty of Canterbury also be under threat in relation to the eurotunnel and the border under the sea ? 
This chart is a rather elegant attempt to summarize the UK’s Brexit options. Do you think anything is missing? Source:  
Just did @LBC interview explaining the dangers of No Deal #Brexit. This is like declaring economic war on our neighbours - and ourselves. Demanding the impossible, is not negotiating in good faith. Compromise is needed, not threats 
Duncan Smith, the man who introduced the disaster that is #UniversalCredit (and resigned when he saw it coming off the rails), is now touring the studios telling us a No Deal #Brexit would be absolutely fine. I wouldn't trust him to post a letter.  
Vince Cable denies plotting new anti-Brexit centrist party  
Ben Jennings on Jacob Rees Mogg and a no-deal Brexit – political cartoon gallery in Putney  
Why do you hate Britain? Why do you want Britain to become more isolated, poorer, detached and alone? Diplomatically: we lose. Economically: we lose. There's not a single benefit to Brexit, (feel free to give me a list of I'm wrong).We need to stop this disaster.#PeoplesVote 
"The Commission is concerned the current restrictions on govt during referendum campaigns permit potentially unlimited spending of public money in favour of one side of the debate"- How Cameron misused taxpayer funds for Remain. And it is Leave groups that get fined?  
Of all the Brexit lies, “No deal is better than a bad deal” is by far the most dangerous. 
France, Germany, Spain & others tempt Airbus to move production out of the UK because of Brexit and loss of CU & SM.Can't blame them...we'd do the same if it was some other country shooting itself in the foot.Not too late to turn back. #PeoplesVote 
The UK is in chaos and you rabbit on about fair pay and working conditions which will be diminished if we leave the EU.  Get real and start fighting Brexit. 
Twitter this week:1. Trump2. Brexit3. Piers Morgan is a dick 4. A dog did something funny5. A baby did something adorable6. A celebrity I’ve never heard of did something I don’t care about7. Someone is upset8. Everyone is angry9. No one cares10.  Food 
In charge but not in power ….chaos reigns. #Brexit  
So even the brexiteers are now saying that we probably won’t see any positive effects of Brexit for 50 or so years...and even then there are no guarantees. So basically most of the people who voted for it won’t even be alive? Cool gamble with young people’s lives people... 
John Major's behaviour during and after the EU referendum has been absolute disgraceful, how low can a former British Prime Minister sink.#Brexit  
Poorest will be hit hardest by 'catastrophic' no deal Brexit, warns John Major. #PeoplesVote us morally justified. 
Dominic Grieve says a 'no deal' Brexit would lead the UK into a state of emergency. @CliveBull asks: is he right? 
As one of the 1.4 million uk citizens living aboard I wake up each morning feeling sick each time I hear the Brexit word.I feel I'm staring down the barrel of a gun that's about to go off..Ps. didn't even get a vote! 
So..an incentive to ditch the Govt & rump of ERG, on the basis of giving the Ppl a #FinalSay with a #StopBrexit option.#Brexit can't be decided in a multi issue GE unlessLabour stands for #Remain.So come on let's do it. But let's just #Revoke not Extend 
I've never been part of the FBPE brigade - some have trolled me mercilessly.However - it was extremely duplicitous of Vince Cable to skip important #Brexit votes & to attempt to conceal what he was really up to.Probably down to the LDs to deal with it.  
Breaking: Independent Commission on Referendums finds that rules used on campaign spending in the EU Referendum gave the Government backed Remain campaign an unfair advantage.Current rules :"permit potentially unlimited spending of public money in favour of one side."  
Politics became so much easier to teach and assess after we decided that all key terms like Communism and Brexit mean whatever you want them to mean. First class degrees for everyone. 
The frog is getting close to boiling point.Two+ years ago, we had people promising a Brexit that'd keep us in the Single Market and Customs Union, along with US and China trade deals.Now those same people are talking up No Deal and WTO-only trade. And the public STILL sleeps. 
BREXIT BOMBSHELL: Remain had 'unfair advantage' with Cameron's £9.3m leaflet  
let everyone who beilieves in remain,  comment as often as you can, to show your support when the true facts are coming out into the public domain - stop brexit!  
Fmr PM John Major, who played instrumental role in NI with Downing St Declaration, who stood up to Tory bullies over Maastricht knows a thing or two. He's right. Brexit will impact on poorest. It will decimate NE Eng & NI. Impact on GFA. At what cost Brexit? Who gains? #Brexit 
Jacob Rees Mogg puts his clients money somewhere other than where his #Brexit mouth is   
Our president, Venki Ramakrishnan, has written to @theresa_may regarding the Brexit White Paper. Read the full letter here -  
250 days to Brexit.To get a withdrawal agreement & transition we need to solve the Irish border.There is no tech solution. We have ruled out a backstop after agreeing itWe have ruled out SM & CUA No Deal is catastrophic The EU won’t extend Art50 without new attitude from us 
“The choice for the British people is pretty grim if it’s a Brexit-dominated Tory party versus a Corbyn-led Labour Party” says Tony Blair  
Anna, since the overwhelming majority of Conservative MPs voted for these (perfectly sensible) amendments, have you ever considered that the extremist might be....well.....YOU?!#Brexit #Chequersplan 
#EURef was to determine if the #British People wish to #Remain or #Leave the #EU.Majority voted to #Leave!All MPs obligated to support the Government in honouring the result of the #EURef.Mutual self interest will secure #UK - #EU post #Brexit trade deal!#AllAboutTrust 
Iain Macwhirter: No Deal Brexit would mean no more UK  
Very sad indeed, and many more grandfathers across the country will be feeling the same way. It's not too late, Brexit is not inevitable, the campaign for a #PeoplesVote gets stronger by the day. 
"We would run out of medicines, we would probably run out of food fairly quickly..."Dominic Grieve tells @DanielHewittITV a 'no deal' Brexit would be "catastrophic" and says the new Brexit secretary is wrong to claim the UK can refuse to pay divorce bill  
A cross-party group of MPs have written to the speaker to demand changes to electoral regulation after it emerged Vote Leave acted illegally to win the referendum. We must never let our democracy be undermined in this way again. Agree? Please share …? 
Of course @Jacob_Rees_Mogg's fund is doing this...while he mouths off and falsely calls people "airheads" for telling the truth about the mess that is #brexit  
Former Brexit Secretary tells Remain PM to rip up Brexit Plan and start again. EIGHT MONTHS BEFORE WE LEAVE! We've waited TWENTY FIVE MONTHS for these fools to get their act together, and to be honest, patience has run out. 
In any General Election against the background of a no deal #Brexit we can expect the SNP to return another super-landslide even greater than in 2015 (...) That could mean curtains for the Union, as Scots realise that they made a mistake in 2014  
You idiot Lammy. It’s not the rich or the middle classes who voted in droves for Brexit. It’s the very people you patronisingly claim will lose out - Ie those whose who have lost out the most from EU membership.  
So if you are 40 plus you are unlikely to see the upside of #Brexit and if you are under 40 your opportunities diminish although your children may or may not see the upside? Don’t remember that in the vote leave campaign? #backsidecovering 
It’s looking like no deal or no brexit.The full horror of a conservative civil war we are all strapped in for.May’s ministry has the stench of death. 
A very sad day for me as I watched my father, a proud man, saying sorry to his grandchildren after finally realising what his vote for Brexit will do to them. #50yearsofHell 
An unmitigated mess. Arguments about the benefits of membership of the EU have been simply not heard. We and our #raredisease patients are the victims of an ill thought out vote and consequences far beyond a sensible interpretation of #Brexit.  
The media's presentation of Corbyn:IRA sympathiserfriend of HamasHezbollah & IranCzech-spyRussian stoogeanti-Semiteracistcommiecause of Brexit...Come on, you must hate him for one of them! 
The fact that our underground nuclear protected #Brexit control centre, with large food, water and fuel reserves, is located in Somerset, where Jacob Rees-Mogg lives, is purely a coincidence.#NoDealBrexit #NoDealSurvival 
Great first meeting with Italian Finance Minister Giovanni Tria. We discussed #Brexit, trade and reaffirmed the importance of the bilateral relationship between the U.S. and Italy.   
The Great Northern Stop #Brexit Conference is proud to announce that @mikegalsworthy of @Scientists4EU is joining us on 8 September in #Leeds for the must see event of the summer, adding to the 7 eminent speakers already announced. Tickets on sale now:  
Interpreting this as a ‘soundbite to hand to Remain movement’ is symptomatic of a general myopia in UK journalism AFM - Raab’s comments suggest he doesn’t understand his brief, which should be concern for whole Uk as he is the Brexit minister.  
There must come a point when the MPs who are backing brexit, begin to wonder if they will ever get elected again if brexit happens. They can't seriously think that claiming they were backing  the will of the people, will impress an angry mob. #Marr 
Lib Dem ultra hypocrisy.1. Why did Jo Swinson attend the Trump "carnival of hate" but not turn up for a Crucial Brexit vote?2. Why did Vince Cable fail to turn up at a crucial Brexit vote?3. Why did Tim Farron fail to turn up at a crucial Brexit vote? 
Leadsom said:1 Hated Chequers proposals2 as breached own red lines3 Not true to 17.4 million who voted  BrexitAND4 Brexit voters knew what they were voting for and government could not just congratulate itself on knowing better than them. 
Dominic Grieve thinks that the UK will be in a state of emergency because of Brexit. That gives Tory Cabinet extra powers to bypass parliament. Don't be fooled by their motives! 
Why can’t you be a Stop Brexit leftist? Some of us are outraged that Brexit’s economic costs will be borne by the most deprived communities and the societal costs (read racism!) are being borne by the most marginalized minorities.  
The core question about Chuka Umunna: Is he principled or just an opportunist? For instance a people's vote, another referendum on #Brexit. He's pushing for one now but only a short while ago not only was he against it, he voted against a vote!  
Dominic Raab is wrong to call the final #Brexit bill £39 billion.  We are never going to be told what it is.  
Chuka Umunna is the media's go to person when they want a Labour comment on many things especially Brexit, even though he's not a front bencher and doesn't support Labour Brexit position. For fairness the media should be truthful about his history as covered on the Thread below:  
During the Referendum I shared a platform with Mr Grieve near Amersham in a rock solid Tory area. I won the debate hands down. He is a top lawyer so how come? Because his Remain arguments didn’t stack up and my Leave arguments did. All the have is fear!  
Indeed. If Brexit fan @Jacob_Rees_Mogg can’t ‘get behind Brexit’ why should anyone else back it? If he thinks ‘benefits’ won’t be seen for 50 years what do I tell my brilliant 22 year old daughter about her future life? #BrexitIsNotWorthIt #DemandASayOptionToStay 
Message to the 17.4 million voters and 65% of constituencies that voted leave:The @Conservatives have sold you out. Theresa May has folded under pressure from the remainers in her party.Only Jeremy Corbyn can and will deliver #Brexit.#VoteLabour 
Bad day when John Major makes more of a case against Brexit than we’ve  heard from Corbyn 
SIGN UP  | Keep up to date with our campaign by registering for our newsletter. With the Establishment continuing to frustrate Brexit, we're not going anywhere just yet...   
A neighbour hates Corbyn re the IRA, foodbank colleague re Brexit, family member for being a "commie"... the right-wing like to cover all their bases. It's like "pick a card, any card... we'll have your pet-hate in stock" 
I’m speaking in Oxford next Thursday at 6.30pm on how we can and must stop Brexit. All welcome! Book here.   
Think sensibly about THIS for one minute. If you refused to pay for your meal at a Restaurant; how many restaurants would want YOU as their customer?If we don’t pay the #Brexit bill EU & most of the world will stop trading with us. 
NEWSFLASH @Anna_Soubry. The Tories succumbed to the dark side long before the Brexit referendum, and judging by your voting record, that includes you!   
1) Boris won two Mayoral elections in left-leaning London2) Boris was instrumental in Leave winning the 2016 referendum3) Hammond has never won any contest4) Hammond would have been ditched by May if she had not messed up the 2017 election 
Has anybody stopped to consider the scale of civil unrest that would surely follow Brexit being overturned? I’d expect aggro that made the Poll Tax riots look like a tea party. Everybody else is allowed to protest. We are expected to soak it up  
Dear @BBC,For The Attention of Brexit Propaganda Dept Please be advised that the accusations against Leave are no longer ‘alleged’ but are now confirmed as illegal by a statutory body. So be a good sort, finish your cup of Tokyo Rose tea & check it out - no hurry #BrexitBias 
@thecatreviewer Dolly lives around the corner10/10 for coming to us for fuss & vocal range-1.5 for bad fur management 10/10 for political acumen - remain sign in window during #Brexit referendum  
Dominic Grieve confirms no deal #Brexit would lead to a state of emergency with food and medicine shortages, flights being cancelled and motorway to Dover turned into lorry park.#ProjectReality 
Hammond having got caught using the civil service to damage brexit is now making "finger down throat speeches" about how wonderful they are and trying to justify their behaviour. Together with May, the sooner this gormless pinocchio goes the better it will be for Britain. 
Dear UK. Here is just a little reminder of what you are about to sacrifice - the unprecedented right for your 65 million citizens and their families and partners to travel, study, work, live, retire and fall ill anywhere across 28 European countries.#EUcitizensChampion #Brexit  
We don’t all that was discussed in Helsinki, but everything we think we know — referendum in Ukraine , US commitment to NATO (Montenegro) and offering up Americans to be interrogated by Kremlin as suspected criminals— was horrible for US interests. #NoMoreSummits. 
Great to see a load of rich people saying “a no deal Brexit will be fine”. By which they mean “many poor people will have their lives ruined but I literally couldn’t give a shit and I want a blue passport”. 
“Brexit is great!” say Brexiters able to get around Brexit.  
LBC now tell me there was a mix up and now I am not on at 4pm. They wanted to talk about UKIP’s surge in support. Andrew Castle just said that they will be discussing what happens if Brexit is not delivered, and “people will turn to the far right”. Which UKIP & I are not.   
Just listened to the whole of JC's speech. Surrounded by EU flags and the majority wearing 'bollocks to brexit' badges he mentions #BrexitShambles only in passing, telling us to remember the forgotten communities. I do Jeremy. That's why I want to stop brexit. #PeoplesVote 
V logical from EU: extension of A50 perhaps if in face of new UK govt or 2nd referendum but more time for imploding tory party to disagree not in EU's interests. 
So is Brexit the first time a country will deliberately put itself into a recession? And if the government's own forecasts are correct a really bad one. 
Desperate Brexit deadlock triggers the search for a miraculous escape, after govt plan is already being read the last rites. It is too soft for the hard Brexiters. It is too hard for those who want a soft Brexit. It is being picked apart by a disdainful EU 
Wow. According to a @thesundaytimes  poll voters think Donald Trump would be better at negotiating Brexit than Jeremy Corbyn.  
In 2015 Cameron gained a small majority after promising an EU referendumIn 2017 May's would have lost the election if it were not for #Brexiteers who trusted her to deliverNow if May executes her non-#Brexit #ChequersPlan - the Tories will be out of power for a very long time 
Jacob Rees-Mogg, the stupid person's idea of a clever person, features in numerous articles in BREITBART : Fascism doesn't always wear jackboots & a snarling face, but it always has the same vile ideology. #Brexit #Brexitsyndicate #JacobReesMogg 
We’re really going to go through with a no deal Brexit because our government is too embarrassed to say it doesn’t work.Going through with terrible things out of embarrassment is true British culture.  
So the government is stockpiling food due to the risk of No-Deal Brexit?Political tip: If your preparations for Brexit are similar to what you would do in a zombie apocalypse, maybe Brexit isn't the way to go...#marr 
Seems that way. It would be nice if MP's just got down to giving our UK a real Brexit, I mean they did ask UK what it wanted and UK gave them an answer in a democratic vote. Why do we have to fight on just to get what we voted for?  
Because like so many politicians, he knew that the British people would do what they were told by the elites, and would vote Remain in the referendum. His comments here were trying to reinforce the Remain message.  
Sir Vince Cable ‘missed key Commons vote to attend meeting on new anti-Brexit party’  
Jacob Rees-Mogg insists we have nothing to fear from Brexit and from trading with the European Union on WTO rules, just like the majority of other nations around the world! Support us at  
There's literally nobody to vote for who will protect Britain from ruinous Brexit. The Tories are a lost cause. Labour followed them into the abyss. LibDem MPs can't even be bothered to turn up to vote. All the others too small to make jot of difference. #WeAreDoomed 
This, incredibly, is how a DUP MP responds to deep concern in Northern Ireland that she & DUP colleagues are voting for hard Brexit which is likely to result in a new Irish border  
Of course we know how many customs officers we have. It's about 10 full time split between the airports and channel tunnel and a couple of old ladies part time at Dover. We're more than ready for #Brexit 
I'm confused 2 years ago the majority of the people gave our government an order YES that's right an ORDER! That's the point of a referendum. To leave the e.u. And now we got @DominicRaab coming back from the e.u saying don't worry I'm positive I can make a deal.?  CAN YOU SEE  
A hard-Brexit encouraged by a pie-in-the-sky deal with Dirty Donald Trump is akin to running away from a loving family because you can't have chips for tea and getting into a car with a volatile sociopath who temps you with sweets. 
Obviously right. But interesting mostly for its obverse: that the EU *would* create time and space for the UK to explore whether it really wanted to continue down this path, for example via a referendum.  
I’ve never heard such bluff and bluster in a long time, Theresa May will never walk away with a “No Deal Brexit” she’s just  trying to come across all Billy Hard Balls, the Woman is afraid of her own shadow  
I demand a live TV debate between this Femi bloke and Raab & Rees Mogg. The latter two would go down in flames. Femi for Shadow Brexit Secretary!  
WikiLeaks was never the bastion of transparency they pretended to be. If they had been, they would have released the Mountain of evidence regarding Russia’s interference in our election or in Brexit. They were partisan hacks feigning altruism. 
Guardian reports that EU sources say that the UK will not be saved from crashing out of the EU via an extension of the article 50 negotiations unless there is a major realignment in UK politics, most likely through a second referendum or general election   
We have a winner! This person is beyond stupid. #Brexit  
Labour ARE gearing up for a drive against Scottish independence and aiming to win back key seats for Labour success in now SNP-held areas.This is according to Labours John Mcdonell. It appears Labour have learned nothing since the Scottish Independence referendum. #REDTORIES 
Absolutely incredible. With the Commons breaking for its long summer holiday with the nation facing national crisis, and maybe even state of emergency conditions with their crazy no deal Brexit, what do they chose to debate? The union.... They are totally obsessed.  
Who is Dominic Grieve working for? It certainly isn't the UK.We need to clear these undemocratic wasters from Westminster, next time we get a vote (before voting is rendered totally meaningless by these usurpers of democracy).#Brexit is merely step 1.  
Poorest will be hit hardest by 'catastrophic' no deal Brexit, warns John Major, who says about a fresh referendum: “Is it morally justified? I think it is.” 
Big support in Northern Ireland for a people’s vote to stop Brexit, in the 4 days I have spent travelling & meeting people here. More than 4 to 1 support in a straw poll of 250 after my lecture at Queen’s University. Deep concern about the Irish border 
Chuka is increasingly indistinguishable from other Remaniacs who have sadly contracted LADS (Lord Adonis Derangement Syndrome). It’s a truly terrible condition that makes previously sane politicians lose control of all sense of proportion & reality when speaking about Brexit.  
Good news that Brexit Secretary Raab vows UK will NOT pay £40billion ‘divorce’ bill without trade deal @MailOnline @DominicRaab @BrexitCentral @Jacob_Rees_Mogg 
Tory's Slam PMs #Brexit Betrayal80 Tory chiefs gave PM’s sidekicks a piece of their mind at No.10.'It was very tense throughout presentation but once finished all hell broke loose.There were cries of betrayal & snorts of derision.People were angry'#EU 
#Brexit #BrexitChaos E.R.G.D.U.P.2 sets of seemingly harmless initials.Except these initials refer to the extremist minority groups currently directing the political agenda in the UK.Do you belong to either of these groups? No?Then you should be asking lots of questions. 
John Major joins growing movement for @peoplesvote_uk & warns that the poorest will be hit hardest by Brexit  
The self-proclaimed protectors of Brexit  (L - R) : caught on camera agreeing with a racist, guilty of accepting luxury holidays in return for lobbying, director of overspending Vote Leave campaign and minister in charge during RHI scandal !#IntroducingTheDUP 
This is why no one trusts #Remain. They lied before the #EUref, they lied about honouring the #Brexit result & now they’re lying about not trying to stop it. Then there’s the £9.4 MILLION they spent of our money on leaflets. But yes let’s all talk about #Leave’s 200K overspend. 
Pity then for Mr Bowie, given his quote, that Dominic Raab (Brexit Sec of State) on Marr said: “Forgive me if I don’t have a laser-like focus on the substance”, given Mr Raab is now the UK Govt lead on the negotiations, & its supposed to be his focus, isn’t it? Incompetent. 
Do you remember "and we will make a success of it" Mrs May @theresa_may? How does crashing out with a no deal #Brexit in any way measure up to any level of success? You have failed and are being held to ransom by the #ERGmafia, admit it and call it off. #Remain 
#Brexit and Trump: It's Putin who keeps on winning! - 'The British Russia Collusion Scandal is Breaking Wide Open' -  #SundayMorning #TrumpRussia #AMJoy 
There's 3 months left and we're headed for a destructive Tory Brexit or a 'No Deal' destroying jobs, living standards and the economy.A few dozen brave MP's and MEP's isn't enough to reverse this calamity to our aims and values.We needs you to fight @jeremycorbyn. Right now. 
Very much welcome @DominicRaab setting the record straight. Brussels, should not get the £39bn divorce bill if we don’t sign a trade deal. #Brexit is an opportunity for the UK, and should not be a punishment for wishing to leave in a democratic vote. 
Am loving this new theory that not delivering Brexit is somehow going to cause an upright surge...project fear anyone? Also, didn’t Nadine suggest we need a leader like Tommy Robinson or Trump   
To the point - we live in a corrupt Tory Dictatorship where the rich get richer every day and Jacob Rees Mogg is the leader of the right wing pack - his personal and family wealth protects him - unlike working people, he would be still alright post  BREXIT 
Looking at today's papers, "Project Fear 2, No Deal" is off & running. Did anyone spot the article reporting a suggested merger between Airbus & BAE? Would this be the same Airbus threatening to pull future investment in the UK, post #Brexit ? - Money talks and politics walks. 
SNP councillor Moira Shemilt says #brexit is worse than the IRA bombings.Innocent men, women & children in my country were blown to pieces in those bombs, Moira. No matter what you think of brexit, to say it is worse than THAT is just sick. You totally disgust me  
There may be little blood-letting, but the kleptonationalist assault on democracy is arguably a graver threat than either the Nazis or the USSR. If we lose this struggle democracy could be history by the time those who are young today reach their middle years.#Brexit #StopBrexit 
A lot more than 38% would vote for a new party if it was not only committed to Brexit, but generally to a genuine ‘change’ message: investment outside London, econ rebalancing with a weaker currency, high skill immigration policy, decentralised politics, Civil Service reform etc  
Amen. He's a guy who would like a chance to change his vote, to put it right because he can now see the damage it is gonna do.  We're getting the message across. Keep pushing everyone. We're winning.  #brexit must be stopped #peoplesvote let's support MPs who want it #unify 
There is no such thing as a “good” #Brexit.  Consequently  it doesn’t matter how many lasers are focused by the Tory Government, it just doesn’t and cannot exist.  Degrees of badness is all we are talking about.  
. @BBCNewsnight providing a platform for a far-right extremist praising a criminal fascist thug, and thus helping normalise fascism as part of British politics.The fight against #Brexit is a fight for democracy!#PeoplesVote #StopBrexit 
Great #Brexit letter to The Times from Prof Stephen Bush: 
Absolutely. Let's have a GE and let the voters decide who they want to deal with Brexit.  
Is the WTO a "barrier" to world trade?If not, why is "No Deal" #Brexit seen as such a bad thing?Oh yeah......it hurts the EU (in finances & in control), which Remoaners love so much.  
Brexit: UK could refuse to pay divorce bill without EU trade deal, says Dominic Raab  Stuff the divorce bill. Time to walk and go onto W.T.O Trading rules which the rest of the World uses very happily. Nothing to be scared of. 
For two years the government, the opposition and most of the media have been behind Brexit. Yet in so far as public opinion has moved it has moved against it. Which is why @peoplesvote_uk momentum is building 
The Referendum vote was not for 'No Deal'. If Brexiters keep threatening No Deal then they let down most of the 17.4m Leave voters (who were promised the easiest trade deal in history) and all the 16.8m Remain voters. How can Parliament pander to a few extremists?  
This is the first time I’ve seen a programme by broadcasting Scotland. I’m certainly going to watch again. The discussion was great though with both @glasgowcathcart and Ian Fraser talking plainly and honestly about a range of issues  inc Brexit. #FullScottish for me! 
Just met with @bankofengland Governor, Mark Carney at the #G20Argentina. Productive conversation on #Brexit negotiations as well as cryptocurrency. 
A second independence referendum is "morally justified" because the Better Together campaign made great number of "fantasy promises", former PM John Major didn’t say. #marr #Brexit  
Rees-Mogg's admission that the UK may not see any of the "Brexit benefits" for FIFTY YEARS means he anticipates the UK (i.e. you) will suffer 50 years of decline & poverty IF BREXIT GOES WELL.If it goes badly, IT WILL BE WORSE.#StopBrexit 
UK, YouGov pollEU membership referendum (three-way question)First preference:Remain: 50%Leave with Chequers deal: 11%Leave with no deal: 38%Second preference:Remain: 54%Leave with no deal: 46%Field work: 19/07/18 – 20/07/18Sample size: 1668  
Yes, suicide for our international credibility, our debt rating and reputation. Entirely congruent with referendum won by cheating and chicanery, however. 
The Brexit deal may well be done by October, but I really doubt it will be the Chequers Deal - it’ll have to be an FTA  
As for me, I remain an unapologetic conservative, a passionate supporter of Brexit and a big fan of our party grassroots!  
How odd that those who refuse to accept the 2016 referendum result now want another one   
I knew Nadine Dorries was rabidly pro Brexit from day one, so back in June 2016 I wrote to Labour MPs of closest constituencies to express my Brexit concerns. For my trouble, just told me they can't talk to me and take them to Dorries.And people wonder why I street protest. 
Kate Hoey hits back at Brexit attack: 'Why would I vote for something I disagree with!'  
so @DominicRaab tells @AndrewMarr9  re: the Brexit talks - "Forgive me if I don't keep a laser-like focus on the substance".  That;s OK Dom; you just keep a laser-like focus on your extreme ideology. Bugger the substance - it just gets in the way.... 
Fun fact: after Brexit, the primary working language of the EU will be the native language of only ~1% of the EU population. 
“Corbynistas tweet and meme about revolution. Yet when Britain’s first true revolt in decades — Brexit — rocked the political status quo, they soiled their pants. Calm down, everyone: these people are squares, not radicals”, says Brendan O’Neill  
Chequers showed that any attempt to put anything in writing poses an immediate threat to the very existence of the Tory party. There is no lowest common denominator, no plan around which all Tories can unite because any form of #Brexit will harms us. Only question is by how much 
WATER after #Brexit fill all containers with drinking water after the fires have been put out mains water supply may not be available. It must not be used for flushing lavatories until you are told. Water is only for drinking and cooking purposes.#NoDealBrexit #NoDealSurvival 
In any other financial sphere he would be arrested for insider trading. He has manipulated both the political and media narratives on brexit for his own gain. This is all about how much money he can make by manipulating and undermining ordinary British people #investigateMogg 
Postal votes were counted at the ingleston referendum counting centre in Edinburgh and taken away by van in 2014,and the tories were celebrating at 21.15 before the official count ended, very mysterious  
#Brexit is one of the worse idea ever. It won’t solve any of the UK’s problems nor bring peace and prosperity. Brexiters know it but can’t backtrack because if they do they won’t end up with an egg on their faces but the whole chicken. 
Desperate men – and Jacob Rees-Mogg and his gang are mainly men – resort to desperate measures. They have three schemes to get their way: 1. Use May as a puppet2. Kick her out3. Rip up the deal post-Brexit. We must fight them all the way.  
YOU'RE AN MP, YOU LITERALLY ARE THE POLITICAL CLASS! The whole machinery of Government, i.e. the political elite, controlled by your own Party, is currently dedicated to Brexit! If it's a mess (and it is) THAT'S YOUR FAULT!!! Take some responsibility, this is pathetic.  
Please throw in the towel, Theresa - we need a Brexit champion with real vision  
Excellent intervention from Jeremy Corbyn. A hard right faction in the Tory Party are the real power behind Theresa May & they're forcing a no-deal Brexit. The worst of all outcomes. She should call an election & let voters decide the way forward.  
"The tail is wagging the dog" - @jeremycorbyn says Tory MPs who want a no deal #Brexit are "ruling the roost" and that negotiations need to be stepped upRead the latest politics stories here:  
How are you all getting on with #brexit wasn't it a great Idea of mine, to give the racist morons a vote on the EU  
"We must pay £39bn divorce bill, regardless of deal"Nothing is on the table unless everything is on the table. Plain from the start."We need a 2nd referendum"No, you want to con us out of delivering on the 1st one."But but the EU...."Screw the EU, #Brexit is about the UK. 
Yes, there is something so obviously stupid and dishonest about brexit, that even after two solid years of their combined efforts, they have still completely failed to convince a majority of the Electorate !Bravo, people !  Let's keep it up, and #StopBrexit once and for all ! 
Three steps to Indy.1. Highlight *relentlessly* just how catastrophic Brexit will be for Scotland.2. Argue for a Scottish 'People's Vote'.3. Present Indyref2 as *our* 'People's Vote' with either Independence or May's Brexit [No]Deal as the two options. or  
7) I think unfortunately many people will not change their minds on #Brexit until it hits them personally - many never will be and therefore will *never* change their mind no matter how bad the news gets, they'll simply screen it outEnd 
A second independence referendum is “morally justified “ because Better together campaign made a great number of “fantasy promises “ each and everyone broken. #DissolveTheUnion 
BREXIT BOMBSHELL: Remain had 'unfair advantage' with Cameron's £9.3m leaflet  
'No deal' Brexit would see UK state of emergency, warns Dominic Grieve:  
Rees-Mogg described state school pupils as "potted plants" and food banks as "uplifting". He gave a speech at the annual dinner of a sect that wants to return black people to "their natural homelands". He's against abortion even in cases of rape. He's a complete maniac. #Brexit 
This has got nothing to do with ‘Brussels’ or the ‘elite’. This is about a person admitting Brexit was not was he was promised and changing his mind. It’s take a lot of courage to say that in the current political environment  
5) one said "I don't really follow Brexit now" and "nothing you can say will persuade me I was wrong"This I think is the real challenge - many Leave voters may simply have not informed themselves and are not interested in how Brexit is progressing 
Of course it’s all just Brussels scare-mongering hyped by the media Remoaners...or is it?    My column on the week Brexit broke bad.   
You believed all #ProjectFear bullshitYou voted #RemainYou lostNow, #ProjectFear 2 is up & running. Do you:Believe all the new crapCry, whine & bitchGet hystericalContinue to talk down BritainAbuse anyone who voted #BrexitYou’re still a Remoaner. And an #FBPE idiot pic.twitter.com/BPEj1Q9dzq 
Farage warns 'dishonest' May: Brexit betrayal to spark backlash ‘like nothing before'  
You must be wearing your trousers front to back everyday because you have absolutely no clue of how the Tories one policy of austerity brought us to #Brexit  
John Major now saying the complete opposite to what he said before Brexit referendum. This is why the British public is so sick of politicians. Do they think we just won’t remember what they said before the first one?  
1) #Brexit challenge - Leaver belief systemSpoke to 3 colleagues who I discovered were leave voters on a work trip.All good people, all intelligent, all professionalsThey did however illustrate some common (and fairly depressing) characteristics which show we have a challenge 
It's not that we don't trust the British people...it's more we don't trust you Nadine!  Nor Jacob Rees Mogg, or Farage, or Boris Johnson...who all conned their way through the referendum with ludicrous claims and promises they can't deliver. Let's vote on reality, not fantasy.  
The evidence is clear now, even Mr Mogg is pushing the possible positive outcome of #Brexit to 2069. If you are an MP and still claiming to respect a vote that was obtained by cheating and breaking the law then you are a puppet of the ERG mafia. Time to stand up and be counted. 
Met with Theresa May and SOS on Friday, to represent the young people of the north. Disappointment is an understatement. Completely and disrespectfully dismissed our views regarding Brexit, The Irish Language Act, LGBTQ Rights and the Confidence and Supply pact with the DUP.  
.@Nigel_Farage: "If Brexit is seen to be betrayed, there will be a backlash the likes of which the political classes in this country simply can not understand." 
The most striking thing in this YouGov poll isn’t the 54%-46% polling in favour of Remain. It’s the 38% in favour of a no-deal #Brexit. Jaw-dropping that so many people don’t get how disastrous this would be  
Theresa May has finally succeeded in uniting the UK ... We now all think that she must resign #GoTheresaGo #Brexit #LeaveEU @Conservatives @UKLabour @theSNP @LibDems @duponline @UKIP 
ICYMI: Britain's Prime Minister vows to 'build a leading aerospace nation' after #Brexit  
I would like to know why only nearly 40? Surely those who haven't signed cannot still be clinging to respecting the outcome of the Referendum vote obtained by breaking the law and by cheating?  
It’s almost as if Brexit was a really bad idea isn’t it? 
There are times when a politician's actions speak louder than their words, @Jacob_Rees_Mogg.  In public, you say Brexit will be a roaring success. But in the privacy of your investment firm board meetings, you bet against Britain, again and again. 
Almost 40 MPs have signed our open letter calling for a #peoplesvote on the final Brexit deal -with the explicit option to stay and lead in Europe.Are you with them? Join our campaign today:  
@JMPSimor @VesperUK Mr Raab would appear to be in breach of both the Ministerial Code, AND the MPs Code of Conduct . There is already a Report to the Parliamentary Commissioner for Standards re lawbreaking in the Referendum, reference 184 . Anyone who wishes to join us, send a DM 
On radio, John Major laying forth about a 2nd referendum on Brexit being a fair reprise because of events and we deserve the chance to change or mind. Took a minute or so while working to realise "we" mean England over leaving the EU, not Scotland over leaving Westminster. 
So with a #NoDeal A real possibility and let's face it a better option than Mays white flag it begs the question why didn't we just leave by WTO rules the day after the referendum and save all this bloody time wasting 
SAT NAV after #Brexit we will not have access to Galileo sat nav will not work. We are going to build our own this will take years, go massively over budget & get cancelled before it's finished. You may wish to learn map reading and get some OS maps#NoDealBrexit #NoDealSurvival 
The Tories will be sending leaflets to every household telling us what to do in the event of a no deal Brexit  
'No deal' Brexit would see UK state of emergency, warns Dominic Grieve   
Second Brexit vote 'morally justified' as poll shows support for remaining in EU  
This is my #FBSIParty I support Scottish Independence & am calling for a second referendum. I am looking to connect with others who agree.Please:  1 Like 2 Retweet 3 Follow I will follow backCopy this tweet to your own.#ScotRef #IndyRef #IndyRef2 
Raab promises to publish risks of no Brexit deal soon. The EU publishes risks of a no deal. Raab accuses the EU of irresponsible scare-mongering #Igiveup 
They say Putin isn't Hitler, Trump & Brexit aren't Mussolini, so we should stop the hysterical comparisons with the 1930s. But history doesn't repeat itself exactly, by cloning. There are enough similarities to make me feel sick. The dozy response to impending danger is one. 
It’s become irrefutably clear that the only way our country can resolve the current huge Brexit divisions, is a 2nd Referendum. The sooner Theresa May accepts this, the better. Let’s just get on and do it for goodness sake. #BrexitChaos 
Dominic Raab and all of the hardline Brexiteers know exactly what the consequences of a No Deal Brexit will be. What is truly terrible is that they do not care about its consequences for the poor, the relatively poor and all but the extremely rich.  
Remoaners seem terribly upset at the suggestion UK doesn't pay the £39bn #Brexit divorce bill.Upset that the EU doesn't get UK taxpayers cash for nothing?One could almost feel they aren't batting for the UK at all, but for another.  
Theresa the Tinkerer no longer speaks for the 52% who wanted #BrexitShe now represents the meagre 12% who want her non-Brexit plans to be implemented 
Important: Vote Leave directors must answer to parliament. Growing pressure from MPs to force Cummings & others to answer vital questions on illegal referendum activities. Today’s front page story from @Tobyhelm 
"Don't worry about Brexit" they said. "The Dunkirk spirit will see us through...." "You know Dunkirk was a defeat? " we  said....  
For the love of God, why is @theresa_may still PM ? Brazen lying, underhand skullduggery, collusion with Brussels and still pushing her faux-Brexit Chequers plan that everybody hates & Brussels has rejected. What more does she have to do to get the boot ? 
1. Nadine Dorries doesn’t care about national interests, her energy goes in to looking after her own.2. Tory PartyMembership is NOT the country, why allow 150k predominantly old & wealthy dictate Brexit?3. The electoral chances of Tories is not relevant.#bbcsp 
Later today the @Remain_Labour & @Labour4EU campaign for #Labour Party Conference (#Lab18) will launch.Want to help us fight #Brexit and fight for a #PeoplesVote? Please sign up and share. The stakes for our country and party could not be higher.  
Incredible! @DominicRaab was on the campaign committee of Vote Leave. He is actually implicated in the breaking of multiple laws. Yet he has audacity to suggest these offences are being ‘used’ to discredit the result of the referendum. No, Dominic. Breaking the law discredits you  
MPs discuss the idea of a cross-party alliance to avoid a hard Brexit: Labour's @PaulJSweeney and SNP's @Dr_PhilippaW says they would be open to supporting that, Conservative MP @AndrewBowieMP insists the Government have a "laser-like focus" on delivering a good Brexit #bbcsp 
Brussels 'irresponsible' for flagging up risks of no-deal Brexit, says Raab THE SO CALLED *DIVORCE BILL* IS TO COVER THE UK COMMITTMENTS & LIABILITIES IN THE CURRENT BUDGET CYCLE.RAAB IS MISLEADING PEOPLE - AGAIN !!! 
Scots Tory faces renewed scrutiny amid row over £425,000 'dark money' Brexit donation @heraldscotland  
Is there any other way to spin this other than “millionaire protects his millions from Brexit whilst telling the poor to wait 50 years to see if they *might* be better off”?  
The poorest voters tended to vote for Brexit. Lammy is essentially saying that anti-democrats like him must save the poor from themselves and their stupid decisions. This is what elitism looks like.  
Jimmy Durmaz was racially abused by Swedish fans for conceding a late free kick against German. Like in Politics (i.e #Brexit) footballers like Ozil, Durmaz, Sterling etc., become the convenient scapegoat when things don't go well. 
Brussels 'irresponsible' for flagging up risks of no-deal Brexit, says Raab  
Brits reject May's Brexit plan, some turn to Boris and far right - poll  
Throw in the Towel, Please!Theresa May - Determined, Stubborn & completely insane to carry on!PM permanently on the ropes.Blow after blow rains down on her authority.Battered & Bruised by her own party yet refuses to realise her time is up!#Brexit #EU 
WATCH | @NadineDorries: "Is this some sort of bullying? Do we say to the British people 'we don't trust you on your last vote, you've got to vote again'?We had the referendum. Leave won & therefore we have to implement leave!" Support us at  
Theresa May and the Brexiters are using the "Will of the People" in exactly the same way as Goebbels did after a Nazi referendum victory in 1933, as a rhetorical tool to discredit and delegitimise political opposition and deny the democratic right to oppose. #StopBrexit #FBPE 
Has anyone else NOTICED ? ;The media wheel out former Leaders like John Major, Nick Clegg, and Tony Blair.But NOT a squeak from David Cameron - who was the architect of the entire #Brexit fiasco via a EuRef - intended as a Party management tool#JustAsking 
A second EU referendum is 'morally justified' says Sir John Major #marr 
Jacob Rees Mogg to public:"Brexit will be good for business"Jacob Rees Mogg to his business:"Protect me from the consequences of Brexit or you're all fucking fired"  
It’s obvious why #government cannot agree about #Brexit and never will #bbcsp 
Former PM Sir John Major says a #PeoplesVote on the final #Brexit deal is justified:  
If the DUP had its own #Brexit bus.  
Our NHS is in crisis, our railways are chaos and #Brexit is a shambles. But it doesn’t have to be this way.Tag someone who needs to join our movement  
What do you think needs to be done to end the violence in Southern Cameroon? Many are saying they want a referendum. If you are in Cameroon, do you agree? Comment below #AJNewsGrid #Cameroon #SouthernCameroons 
Sun 22nd July it is now a LEGAL FACT that both Leave campaigns deliberately broke the law to win Brexit referendum@BorisJohnson @michaelgove should be in jail#VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw #VoteLeaveCheatedPlease Sign Please Sign 
It’s the whole point, though. Brexit is a faith position being pursued as an ideological crusade. Of COURSE its staunchest advocates don’t concern themselves with the details, much as religious devotees don’t deconstruct or examine scripture. They just *believe*.  
I & many others have said this:  since the day the result of the EU referendum was announced. We are living in historic times. Scotland is about to become an independent nation again! 
Shameless celebrity culture infecting Sunday Politics Scotland now, with Harry Potter called up to discuss Brexit.  
Hi Malcolm.  Regrettably, there’s going to be a hard EU border somewhere - but it’s the Brexit bunch who’ve made it so.  In the chaos of No Deal,  and Ireland, May will fall.  Can’t see Scots voting Labour after last week. 
.@IainDale shameless >"no one will be forced to eat chlorinated chicken" the EU takes a “farm to fork” approach eliminating bacteria at every stage. US tolerates dirty meat until the very end & it will be on our shop shelves bc of Brexit probably unmarked. #BBCSP @pollytoynbee 
My finance lead has been working hard to complete the THREE YEAR budget projection that the ESFA is demanding (that is beyond the Brexit deadline!) but @DamianHinds can’t tell us what our budget demands are in 6 weeks time. His words yday were encouraging but we need action 
.@stellacreasy on @daily_politics says #Brexit is too big to leave to 650 MPs. We need a #PeoplesVote to give the public control 
Theresa May has reneged on the backstop agreement she signed up to. Why should the EU or any other country trust the UK to respect any agreement. Our country is heading towards pariah status. #StopBrexit #Brexit #PeoplesVote 
Poorest will be hit hardest by 'catastrophic' no deal Brexit, warns John Major  
'@NadineDorries: "We had a referendum, it was decisive, the Leave vote won and therefore we have to implement Leave.  
If a no-deal #Brexit is forced on the British people those responsible must be punished for inflicting this crime on the British people. We must press opposition politicians to commit to the criminal prosecution of the no-deal orchestrators. #StopBrexit #FBPE 
Time really for the @theSNP at all levels to get daily independence messaging going - we tried to limit Brexit damage but Westmin Lab and Tory intent on damage ... #MoveOn 
Grandfather to me at tea yesterday, discussing work, LBC etc: "That @mrjamesob is VERY anti-Brexit isn't he?"I hadn't noticed, personally. 
"How a no-deal Brexit could cause 17 mile tailbacks at ports, increase the price of wine and affect everything from medicine, alcohol, pets to restaurants and even orchestras" - Mail on Sunday readers at least getting the truth 
Brexit is already killing the current party system. That’s good. It’s the only silver lining of the whole mess. “No-deal Brexit could ‘break up current party system’ – BBC Newsnight - B...  via @YouTube 
Chester activists signing people up for the People's Vote - great turnout. Shop behind us closed due to...brexit. #peoplesvote a national campaign offering a way out from the #BrexitChaos It's democratic to change our minds @RemainerNow @BBCNews @AndrewMarr9 @Andrew_Adonis 
Nadine Dorries on Sunday Politics once again talking up a ‘no deal’ Brexit. It can’t be said often enough: exiting the EU without a deal would be the hardest of all departures and it would be catastrophic for our country. There is no mandate for it. 
This was always obvious. Imho the main reason the DUP agreed to the confidence & supply arrangement was so it could use Brexit to wreck the GFA and end power sharing. Money was a smokescreen.  
It is blatantly clear that the most important action we can take to protect and secure the long-term future of the NHS is to stop Brexit. If we fail to #ExitfromBrexit, any proposed plans for improvement will be thrown aside. 
As time as gone on , I am more and more convinced that brexit is a right wing coupThe danger posed to our society is realWe cannot allow thisWe need a #PeoplesVote to give the country a chance to reverse this and remain in the EUSIGN the petition 
Two thirds of Conservative Party members oppose Theresa May's Brexit-in-name-only plan:  #BrexitBetrayal 
#NadineDorries @daily_politics confirms the Ppl can't have a #FinalSay & do not have the Right to change their minds, given that 26.5% of the Ppl have decided we must go ahead with the ERG version of #Brexit.#PeoplesVote #Remain optionLet's Thwart the will of the ERG. 
 this article shows 2400 trucks per day travel through the Sweden / Norway customs border ( which is landlocked ).. 12,000 pass Folkestone and Dover ** this will NOT work in the uk ** ( brexit MPs claim this is frictionless ) 
I'm just gonna say it again. I support MPs of all colours who oppose #brexit.  I do not support Corbyn on brexit because he is a #brexiter.  Brexit is THE defining moment for our future. It will ruin the country and it is being done to the country by a coup of fanatics #FBPE 
Rees-Mogg makes an interesting point about the long range nature of Brexit. Ardent Remain has not upped its game if the best it can do is point out medium term pain. As a staunchly anti-Brexit type I am dismayed by the failure of Remain to make stronger arguments 
Put another way: John Major wouldn't even let us have 1 referendum on the Maastricht Treaty, that created the EU, let alone 2. All of his promises and assurances turned out to be false. But we had to wait almost a quarter century before we were asked our opinion #marr #brexit  
John Major confirms Brexit and Scottish Independence are never once in a generation!"When circumstances change, you can change your mind""and if promises made are not going to be met, there is a justification for changing your mind". 
Ah, the "Brexit is going badly so I think I'll just be balls out racist now" crowd is rather large.   
Brextremist Iain Duncan Smith redefines crashing out of EU as "not a no-deal Brexit, It's a Brexit on WTO terms."This is a dangerous LIE and exactly the sort of dilution tactic they've used throughout.It's a disastrous, emergency backstop, if nothing better can be agreed. 
The petition is close to hitting a key milestone which could transform Corbyn's position on Brexit.  
So I swear a lot on Twitter to raise awareness of the hideous #Brexit, that's my thing. Others like @albawhitewolf& @nickynoo007 get out there and do significant, awesome stuff. This guy, @ConsultantRogue is starting an epic journey on Tuesday embracing the concept of free 2 
Jacob Rees-Mogg: "benefits of Brexit won't be apparent for 50 years"The only pro-Brexit majority demographic are over-60s. And every single one of them will be dead before Brexit does anything good.This is not Project Fear. This is your entire life. Sure you voted for this?  
John McDonnell: "It's not our policy to have another referendum, our preference is for another General Election.""When your negotiating in Brussels, you negotiate on the basis of mutual interest & respect. What you don't do is bang the table & threaten to walk away"#Ridge #Marr 
DAVID DAVIS has urged the Prime Minister to tear up her Brexit White Paper and “start again” in an explosive interview in which he lays bare the inside story of Britain’s fraught negotiations with the EU. 
Archaic German used. Estonian, Dutch, & Finnish mistranslated. The word Croatia wrong in Croatian. And the Maltese was a mess apparently. All so very Brexit...(Apparently the Welsh version was excellent. Shame they’re leaving.) More on @talkRADIO at 4pm. 
The Pound to euro exchange is on its ass well done you brexit shagging nonces 
This is my #FBSIParty I support Scottish Independence & am calling for a second referendum. I am looking to connect with others who agree.Please:  1 Like 2 Retweet 3 Follow I will follow backCopy this tweet to your own.#ScotRef #IndyRef #IndyRef2 
The point is: just because @Jacob_Rees_Mogg seems to be whispering in the ear of every decision-maker in Westminster, doesn't mean that all Brexit voters are as extremist as he is.Most were pragmatic about wanting a better future. Now if that's no longer on the cards...#Marr 
The stench of corruption continues to engulf the Tories in Scotland, and the Tory #Brexit in the UK. It's surely time for both clear answers and decisive action. #DarkMoney #DarkMoneyDavidson 
Except from his fathers book: The Sovereign Individual.  This may help you understand the real Jacob Rees-Mogg.   A withering, egregious, and venal man with a hidden agenda for personal gain from Brexit.  
Brexit, right there. Jobs, security, imports, exports, travel, your rights and your neighbours, just details when there’s sport to be had in the Tory parlour games.  
Second #Brexit vote 'morally justified' as poll shows support for remaining in EU  
Some people seem to be focusing on the 2% figure as if that's the crux of the point I'm making here.The point is that if 51.9% of voters vote Brexit after being promised a better deal, if they'd known it was a bad deal or no deal, that would have easily shaven off 5..10 even 15% 
John Major on the radio there saying a 2nd referendum is completely fair because everything has changed and people deserve the chance to change their mindOf course don’t be stupid to think that should apply to Scotland and Independence  
All bluster from another useful idiot of the Vote Leave posse. No10 controls Brexit negotiations nowadays anyway.   
Again, I could go on and on with this, but can we please all accept that the argument "It was leave or remain; We voted leave" does not hold up if we end up with a bad deal or no deal at all.A #PeoplesVote on whatever Brexit ends up as, is the only democratic way forward.#Marr 
John Major is being dishonest and morally reprehensible here; the lies in the Referendum came from the Remain campaign:Punishment budgetRecession starting Sep 2016500k-800k job lossesp.s. BEFORE the Referendum Major said you couldn't have a second one!#Marr #Brexit  
There has been a decrease in the number of foreign students studying in England, Wales. In Scotland, European students have doubled since 2016. It is clear Brexit is scaring away European students thankfully the Scottish gov commitment to EU students post-Brexit keep them in Sco 
What the Russian-backed, law breaking liars who supported Brexit called 'Project Fear' now means the Government is having to stockpile food.  
Dominic Raab refuses to deny Britain plans to STOCKPILE FOOD in case of no deal Brexit. Also refused to deny M26 could be turned into lorry park to cope with tailbacks at border. On brighter note multi millionaires Like Mogg can sit it out in their castles  
“Vince Cable is the leader of the only anti-Brexit party,” says pundit on #Ridge and goes uncorrected. The SNP have 3rd largest number of WM seats and are anti-Brexit – yet Scotland’s main party counts for nothing?  
Dominic Grieve - #Brexit is a failure & it's so high risk.. it threatens economic well-being, it threatens our future of every single man, woman & child in Britain. Having a #PeoplesVote is perfectly acceptable & may indeed be the right thing to do.#ridge #FBPE #marr 
This is my #FBSIParty I support Scottish Independence & am calling for a second referendum. I am looking to connect with others who agree.Please:  1 Like 2 Retweet 3 Follow I will follow backCopy this tweet to your own.#ScotRef #IndyRef #IndyRef2 
If he's right, and it takes 50 years to feel the benefits of Brexit, then we've basically just voted for something that fucks over a generation who didn't even vote for it. That just doesn't seem fair somehow.  
Great news for many Leave voters who will be able to reap the full benefits of Brexit as early as their 120th Birthday.  
How to survive Brexit. Pity this option isn’t available to all of us.  
“The big divide now is between the public and politicians. Most of the public are democrats and they want Brexit to happen. But politicians just cannot or will not deliver it.”@Tom_Slater_ on the new political divide 
Let’s say it out loud: Brexit on WTO/global terms is better for Britain than EU membership, and better than the Chequers Yellow Paper. 
Our Political masters are the new comedy culture sweeping the planet. The world is looking at them and laughing uncontrollably. Brexit is a mess, May is a disaster, Corbyn is a buffoon. All they do is bicker and manoeuver for self interest. We need to clear them ALL out!#Marr 
So @thesundaytimes poll shows that 38% would support right-wing Brexit party, 24% an explicitly anti-Islam, anti-immigration one. Now. Prepare for a renewed onslaught of demonization, attacks and attempts at control from the media and political class. They learn nothing. 
This Spectator article by our Professor Gwythian Prins describes how post-Brexit defence policy is cleverly being given away to the EU by Theresa May and her clutch of unelected advisers. It’s now in the #ChequersPlan. 
If you're unfamiliar with Raab this informative video thread will help you deduce that being put in charge of the Brexit negotiations isn't going to end well for normal people - Rees-Mogg, Bone and Redwood on the other hand are over the moon. 
The Cabinet’s fudged compromise is already proving unworkable. Neither side is satisfied with the PM’s plan, and with a Government so badly divided, it is now time to go back to the British people to ask them if they want an exit from this chaotic Conservative Brexit. 
‘The people who have least will be hurt most.’ Why is it taking a former Tory PM to say what Labour should be screaming from the rooftops about the hard right hard Brexit being pushed by a Tory minority?  
Enough Project Fear – let’s trade on WTO terms after Brexit  
Sensible people on all sides now coming to inevitable conclusion that parliament can't sort this out and we need a referendum on Brexit reality as opposed Brexit fantasy. Three choices: 1. No Deal Brexit2. May Chequers deal3. Stay in the EU.#Marr #Raab #Ridge #PeoplesVote 
Raab on the report that found Vote Leave guilty of breaking the law and overspending in violation of Venice Commission guidelines - "I wasn't part of that" except he was, he was its Campaign Director who now wants to 'respect the law' and 'take back control' of it by ignoring it. 
It really is a sad state of affairs when John Major is talking more sense on #Brexit and sounding more concerned about what it’ll do to the poorest in our country than the leader of the #Labour Party#Marr  #MARRSHOW #BrexitShambles 
About time we made it clear- no deal on trade, no Brexit bill! If the EU doesn’t want a huge hole in their spending, let’s have a far reaching free trade deal.  
Brexit minister @DominicRaab did not deny a report that claimed the government was planning to stockpile food in the event of the UK leaving the EU without a deal. #marr 
John Major on the #MarrShow called for a second referendum. Here's what he said last time he was on the #MarrShow 
John Major: “If we fall out of the EU without a deal it will be catastrophic...and it will be the people who have least who will end up being hurt most.”Exactly. Millions of Brexit voters appear to be suffering from Stockholm Syndrome.#Brexit #Marr 
"It's about democracy"You mean like the non-binding gerrymandered referendum won through breaking the law and colluding with foreign powers? That kind of Democracy? Yeah right. We have different definitions of democracy I see. 
Remainers who said Brexit might add 10p to the price of chocolate bars were called dystopian fear merchants. By the very same people now blithely saying meds will be distributed by the RAF and the M26 will be a carpark for stranded lorries (from The Times via @rachelshabi) 
LYING JOHN MAJOR pretends EU helps poorest, reverse is true, EU helps richest, at expense of poor #Marr .  Ask Salvini Mr. Major, how EU benefit poor!  @Anna_Soubry Ask #Sweden!  HOW CAN U LIE? Read IDS #borisjohnson #boris johnson  @BorisJohnson #Brexit  
We can still step back from the hard Brexit cliff edge. Join our campaign to #ExitfromBrexit today:  
Conservative MP Dominic Grieve says a second #Brexit referendum may be "the only solution" #Ridge 
The more the likes of Major & Blair say that a second referendum is justified, the more I am sure that leaving the eu, completely and unequivocally, is the right thing to do. 
43% of voters totally reject the Chequers deal and only 12% back it. No deal/hard Brexit here we come? 
Of all the has-been failures the Establishment could bring out to back another referendum, Major is probably the least credible of them all... Just like Blair, the more he publicity he gets, the better! Support us at  
Fantastic to see that my own Conservative Association chairman is also standing up for #Brexit. He is quoted in The Times today. #ProudToryBrexiteers 
Jacob Rees-Mogg (49) would like it if you agreed to judge Brexit over a time period that would make it impossible for him ever to be held personally responsible for its failings.  
This is kind of remarkable. The UK’s leading Brexit MP spends 3 mornings a week working at a hedge fund where he owns more than 15%, which is expanding investments in Ireland and elsewhere just as Brexit starts to threaten the City  
Labour has some good policies. But they mean nothing because of Brexit. Corbyn promising to dish out the sweeties to distract from that huge fact just looks weak & shifty.  
On #Marr Brexit Secretary @DominicRaab sets out how we're making progress on delivering the best Brexit deal.  
Chilling interview on BBCTV. With Sir John Major on the dire consequences of BREXIT for the UK. A referendum without a model was utterly irresponsible and a bitter legacy for David Cameron 
Brexit, for tax avoiders, by tax avoiders.#StopBrexit 
Central argument here is quite right: a referendum is the worst Brexit idea, apart from all the others.  
Dear Nicola SturgeonIn view of gross corruption contaminating the Brexit referendum, our next plebiscite on Scotland's constitutional rights must impose a water-tight process for postal votes, each retained for 5 years, not destroyed same month@NicolaSturgeon 
A lack of food is the least of it. If anyone blocks us at the WTO after a No Deal Brexit, we won't be able to trade at all!  
DISGRACEFUL: Philip Hammond calls Boris Johnson and David Davis 'bogeymen' for their Brexit beliefs.This just shows the level of disrespect running through the establishment. 
.@DominicRaab lost for words when shown this prediction by IMF of the impact of WTO Brexit on EU's economies. Who stands to lose the most? Oh look, it's the UK! What a surprise! #PeoplesVote #StopBrexitSaveBritain #marr 
"We know what we voted for, you lost, get over it.""What did you vote for then?""To leave EU & to take back control.""How's that going to work?""Brexit means Brexit mate! Stop talking the country down, we'll have the whole world to do deals with!""But how will it work?" 
Thread: Scot linked to £425k #darkmoney Brexit donation now facing questions about DUP “champagne networking reception” at Tory conference  
Raab is a member of a private Facebook group that called for the return of workhouses for the poor. John Major said of brexit that "The people who have least will be hurt most". How can they be in the same party? The Tories have been taken over by Major's "bastards" #marr 
to make case for Chequers, Government needs to emphasise, believe, & warn on the impact of hard Brexit on factories, companies, and people (eg stockpiling).But then in trying to claim No Deal is an option it then simultaneously has to downplay all the same.Not sustainable. 
This is the worst government since WW2. Tories can't negotiate for toffee. They have to go. They could have had an EEA Efta deal worth £240bn in the bag by now. The stupid, arrogant clowns thought they could get a better deal and now they're walking away with nothing. #Brexit 
A no deal #Brexit would be the act of a wealthy, foreign linked elite faction inflicting massive harm on the British people in order to profit from speculation and get itself a #BrexitTaxHaven. This is not politics it is crime on a massive scale.#PeoplesVote #StopBrexit 
John Major tells Marr the UK isn't particularly on China's radar when it comes to trade deals. But little Switzerland has a trade deal with China. Nothing wrong with Major hating everything about Brexit, but ...  
John Major 'It is those who have the least who will be those most badly affected with a no deal Brexit'Boris 'Fuck 'em' Jacob Rees-Mogg 'irrumabo illis'And John Redwood 'I will be moving my business out of the UK so fuck them'.#marr 
John Major sneering at the reasons Leave voters backed Brexit: “It’s possible the earth is flat.” 
Stockpiling food, using motorways as lorry parks, EU citizens including Brits overseas in limbo. The Brexit calamity is unfolding before our eyes. Time to think again...  
One of the worst PMs we’ve ever had, whose undemocratic refusal to allow a referendum on the Maastricht Treaty split his party and ushered in a decade of catastrophic Labour rule which ruined Britain, now says there should be another referendum. What a stinking hypocrite.  
For those who missed it, I'll summarise  Dominic Raab's performance on #marr"I've had a sight of the top job and I'll do or say anything about Europe, no matter how dangerous or bad for Britain, if it keeps the Brexit headbangers on my side. I am the cleverest man in the world" 
John Major says a second referendum would be "morally justifiable". Tells @MarrShow : "Frankly a second vote has democratic downsides. But is it morally justified? I think it is... Many of the things they [Leave] said were absolutely pie in the sky." Says he wouldn't rule it out 
#MarrBrexit sec, Dominic Raab wants to ‘Take back control of our laws’... but he sees the calling out of law-breaking over the referendum campaign funding as a desperate attempt to stop Brexit. Aaah, so ‘Taking back control of laws that can be ignored whenever it suits’ then!   
Marr never stopped interrupting Raab. Major is getting away blue murder. He says people matter, those are the people who voted for Brexit. Major thinks the MPs more important. Scaremongering from Major, putting EU before UK. No challenges from Marr. Project fear continues. 
No deal with the EU after #Brexit "should not be an option", says Labour's Rebecca Long-Bailey #marr 
John Major urges Tories, Labour, SNP, not to let the "hard care" hard line anti-Europe MPs to determine what happens in Brexit. They will stop every compromise and it "will be damaging for EU" "catastrophic" for us. "People who have least will end up being hurt most" #andrewmarr 
Say what you like about "grey man", Y-fronts etc, but John Major is a towering statesman in comparison to the cabal of crooks, charlatans and fantasists who have now taken control of his party.Refreshing to hear a Tory telling the truth about #Brexit.#PeoplesVote #Marr 
‘There ought to be a second referendum’, says Major, who refused to give the electorate even a first referendum on the Maastricht Treaty.Steaming hypocrite. #Marr 
The man in charge of Brexit, Dominic Raab, says it doesn't matter if the main Brexit campaign, Vote Leave, broke the law to illegally influence voters. #Marr 
UNBELIEVABLY Andrew Marr just failed to challenge Brexit Secretary Dominic Raab on his Sunday Telegraph interview that Britain will refuse to pay its £39bn divorce bill if the EU fails to agree a trade deal so I’VE DONE IT FOR HIM  
Don't forget what John Major said before the EU referendum: "there won't be another referendum on Europe. This is it." #RightTheFirstTime #Marr 
If #Marr was remotely interested in covering the Vote Leave fraud propely he would have used this graph showing an astonishing spike to Brexit at the exact time it is believed they cheated. @RobBurl @AdamBoultonSky @faisalislam @BethRigby @tamcohen @Peston @ChukaUmunna @Maitlis 
Are stories about UK plans to stockpile food for a no deal scenario true? #Brexit Secretary Dominic Raab says it's an unhelpful "selective snippet that's made it into the press"  #marr 
Labour’s positions on Brexit. “No deal is not an option. The Tory deal is not an option. Remain is not an option.”“So what do you suggest” “No deal is not an option. The....” #ChequersMeansCorbyn #Marr 
I keep flitting between the view that Brexit, Trump etc is just the last gasp of an old, white male dominated world order, and the view that the far right is a very real and permanent threat. Doesn't help that I'm in the middle of reading @J_amesp 's Alternative War. 
Wait. Vince Cable missed a vote to oppose Brexit to attend a meeting about setting up a party to oppose Brexit?That might be the most Liberal Democrat thing I ever heard of... 
Labour's done nearly as good a job of rubbishing Dominic Raab as the Brexit Secretary did undermining his own reputation on Marr  
Imagine Adolf Hitler re-imagined as a sexually-repressed Antiques Roadshow expert and you basically get Jacob Rees-Mogg. That's your Brexit poster boy now lads. 
#FinalSayForAllRees-Mogg says it'll be 50 years before we reap the benefits of Brexit. He's lying. Some of us will have to wait 50 years. he will reap benefits immediately. I'll be 111 years old. So basically he saying the rest of my life is f**ked. 
No wonder Dominic Raab can talk so casually about a No Deal Brexit on #marr.People like him will be fine. It's the poorest - those he has belittled so many times in the past - who will be financially crippled. 
Scots Tory faces renewed scrutiny amid row over £425,000 'dark money' Brexit donation  
So in accordance with Brexit I have just informed HMRC that I dont like the direction they are going in so I'm stopping all tax payments. Its only fair that if WM doesnt want to pay their bill why as a taxpayer should I pay a Government thats fucking it up for me 
David Davis: “You won’t find a bigger idiot for the Brexit negotiations than me.”Dominic Raab: “Hold my chlorinated chicken...”#marr 
Our plan for Brexit delivers on the referendum result, whilst also protecting jobs and our prosperity.Find out more: #Marr 
#Marr now pushing the angle that a No Deal Brexit means no flights coming in or out of the UK. Remarkable trash, even for the BBC. 
Dominic Raab, the new Brexit secretary, just told #Marr: "Forgive me if I don’t keep a laser-like focus on the substance." Not a great soundbite to hand to Remain movement. 
Please explain: Why can’t we use VAR on Brexit? Now it’s been proven that the Leave Team lied and cheated, why can’t the referee (US!) rule the goal offside? 
The master negotiators of Brexit double down on their killer tactic of proving to the other side that you can’t trust a fucking word the British government says. #PeoplesVoteNow 
Brexit fan #Marr mentioning polls supporting Boris Johnson. Do you remember when he quoted positive Remain polls? No me neither! 
Let’s get back to Plan A: agree Chequers Agreement is dead and accept Tusk offer of SuperCanada/CETA++ trade deal of 7th March. My article in Sunday Express today: ‘Plan A is still Brexit gold’ @Daily_Express 
Never let a good lie get in the way of facts.Especially if you are a Tory and member of the ERG group.#brexit #PeoplesVote 
New boy #Raab threatens to refuse paying #Brexit bill ... where did he learn such idiocy? ...#StopBrexit #DavidDavis #Remain #Brexitshambles #Marr #FBPE #ABTV #WATON #PeoplesVote #FinalSay 
"In order to bring the 52 per cent and the 48 per cent of this country together, and indeed forge the win-win deal with our EU friends, we would need to be pragmatic", says @DominicRaab in the @Telegraph. "The White Paper delivers that" #Brexit 
Happy birthday my little Prince George.We’ve decided to give him a difficult puzzle for his 5th birthday... Brexit.As no one else can figure it out, and parliament is full of children, we thought George might finally get us somewhere. 
Before the referendum  it was £4,300. Now its £1,000. Project Fear forecasting nonsense at its finest! How much will it be next month? Support us at  
Spoke to a Tory Councillor of 10 years last night at a wedding.He said that they are hoping the Brexit chaos will stop independence because people won't want the chaos of Scotland's independence too.Straight from the horses mouth - using Brexit to stop independence. 
The difference beween English voters and Scottish is breathtaking Let's separate from this nasty empire nostalgic right-wing neighbour before it is too late #IndyRef2Brexit: no 'divorce' payment without trade deal, says Dominic Raab  
This will, of course, win few friends. But as parliamentary positions on Brexit get ever more binary, here's why compromise shouldn't be a dirty word...   via @MailOnline 
38 MPs sign letter calling for a #PeoplesVote on the #Brexit deal. Momentum is building to give the public control:  
What’s your preferred option for #Brexit? Please RT for a wide sample. 
Brexit Secretary Dominic Raab needs to remember that EU under no legal obligation to negotiate a trade deal but UK’s financial liabilities are legal obligations.  
Anyone still fantasising about a #Brexit ‘dividend’ needs to wake up to the reality. As no-deal becomes ever more likely we need a #PeoplesVote because there is no mandate to inflict this kind of misery 
We must campaign to reform politics after Brexit is stopped.  
Last time John Major appeared on @MarrShow to talk about a second referendum, he was against it. Of course that was before his side lost, so now he's in favour of it. Voters got it #RightTheFirstTime - so did he. 
"All hell broke loose" when the PM's chief of staff explained May's #Brexit blueprint to grassroots Tories“There were cries of betrayal and snorts of derision. People were volubly angryNobody likes this plan and nobody was falling for the spin”  
Memo to Anna Soubry: It’s the EU & the €uro that have cost “thousands of jobs” (indeed hundreds of thousands) — not Brexit.  
As @Jon_Danzig writes in his blog today about #Brexit, ‘We will be poorer, and with less sovereignty, fewer rights and protections, restricted trade, and diminished power after we’ve left. What’s the point? There’s no point.’ Please RT.  #ExitBrexit 
Independent commission wants to change referendum rules which permit the government to campaign with “unlimited spending of public money in favour of one side.”It finds Dodgy Dave’s £9.3m Pro-EU leaflet gave Remain too much of an unfair advantage, (and they still lost!).  
If the Left wants to prioritise  tackling fascism over infighting it needs to agree a unified position on Brexit. Let me repeat my offers to take part in a public conversation about what that should look like.  
No Deal #Brexit means no more UK, via @iainmacwhirter in today's @newsundayherald 
Please please please @SkyNews if you are going to have contributors on to talk about Irish border and Brexit can you please make sure they are adequately versed in all aspects of its complexity both historically and presently 
The Tory Brexit Minister @DominicRaab is on #Marr this morning. Please retweet this if you don’t trust him with Britain’s future. 
Today on #Marr for the Tories is Brexit Minister Dominic Raab. He doesn't like disabled people, women and spoke up for press freedom, until the press went for him.  
Watch the PM’s policy guru Jacob Rees-Mogg refuse to say if he will resign if Brexit goes wrong. “You don’t seem to be prepared to put your own future on the line when you’re prepared to put everybody else’s futures on the line.”Nailed it. #Marr 
I’m sure this plays well with the Brexit jihadis, but it is astonishingly foolish for three reasons:1. It doesn’t just misread where the bargaining power lies, it goes so far as to assume the EU27 has none;/1  
 here’s an interesting link ... ONLINE SHOPPING into Norway .... buy a bed for 1000 GBP - by the time it arrives you’ll pay 1300.00 GBP !! Jacob rees mogg promised “ cheap food clothes and furniture “ post brexit ..... that’s not cheap .. see for yourself 
EXCLUSIVE: The Home Office doesn't know how many customs officers it has despite a looming Brexit 'no deal'  
The Sunday Times - once again -mocking its readers for voting the way it told them to vote on Brexit...  
Referendum reminder.By constituency. 406 Leave 242 remainBY voting area  263 Leave 119 remainBy party. Labour 84 remain 148 LeaveTory  80 remain 247 leave.By MP 400 Remain 248 Leave The Problem -MPs simply not in tune with the electorate and out to thwart their decision. 
Good to know I’ll be 93 by the time we know whether Brexit has been a success.  
ANDREA JENKYNS: The PM's Chequers proposal for Brexit is flawed  @MailOnline 
The politicians have blown it. The only people who get us out of this Brexit mess are the British people  > Mail On Sunday  >   
Britain could refuse to pay its divorce bill to Brussels if it does not get a trade deal on #Brexit  
'No £39 billion divorce payment without trade deal agreement', new Brexit Secretary warns EU  
How can we conceivably manage #Brexit? The govt lacks capacity even for simple arrangements: "Home office only asked the Metropolitan Police to come up with a “technical solution” to joining Prüm as recently as March this year."  
How are Brexit negotiations going?We look at the results from a YouGov/The Times survey of 1732 British Adults. #Brexit  
According to Rees-Mogg we won’t know whether Brexit has been a success for 50 years. When he’ll be 100  
Annunciata is my Brexit conscience who ensures I do not go soft. As I cannot even persuade her to spell her name correctly the chance of brainwashing her is slim.  
If the UK government is no longer capable of negotiating in a disciplined and constructive manner that makes an outcome possible there is a strong argument for the EU to suspend Brexit negotiations until the UK demonstrates it has a realistic appreciation of what Brexit means 
From the country that brought you cricket & queues, Brexit Britain is now:-Breaking agreements;-Breaking pacts;-Reneging on obligations;-Demonising its institutions;-Taking a break with sanity. But do make new trading agreements with us, world!  
Japanese Trade Official representing over 1000 companies warned Theresa May this week that a no deal Brexit would be unacceptable to them. This is the third warning. For the Japanese to be so direct is unusual and shows how serious this is. This Brexit insanity must be stopped. 
Why indeed, and let's not forget, the other Leave campaign was also found guilty over overspending by an amount the Electoral Commission have been unable to determine, although Arron Banks has admitted to donating £12m to the Leave campaign groups. 
Two years in, we've got to get serious about our children's futures.Brexit will leave us poorer, less sovereign and diplomatically neutered.None of this is what was promised. None of this is necessary. None of this should happen before a #PeoplesVote. 
Cable missed vote to discuss anti-Brexit partyStupid pointless man! 
Only TEN PERCENT of UK population support Theresa May’s soft Brexit Chequers plan  
And via @thesundaytimes,“By more than two to one, voters do not believe her plan keeps faith with the referendum result.”It’s time to change tack, as I set out in the Commons on Wednesday.  
Tory Austerity has made us all poorer. With the Brexit disaster in full flow, we will need to tighten our belts by a few more notches. What an absolute Tory clusterf**k!!! #ShameOnYouTories #marr #ridge 
“Patriotic“ #brexit people are saying we must carry out a brexit backed by Russia otherwise we won’t get a trade deal with Trump currently under investigation for Russian collusion - otherwise voters will turn to far right parties which are backed by Russia. 
Don’t hand Britain over to Rees-Mogg, Farage, Trump, Putin & the DUP - Will Hutton and I explain that this is the purpose of Brexit & how it can be stopped  
I wish the EU would launch an EU Citizenship available at a price to citizens of third countries, that would allow FoM throughout the EU. I (and I suspect millions of other UK citizens) would willingly pay an annual fee for that post #Brexit 
"We also heard from our U.K. colleagues about the role that Russian interference played in support of the Brexit campaign"So, lying, cheating, criminality and interference leads to mayhem but, you know, 'will of the people' so that's okay then! 
1st of Labour or conservatives to adopt a #peoplesvote (or cut to the chase by stopping Brexit) wins the next election  
My job is to negotiate and train people to negotiate. Novice Brexit Secretary @DominicRaab 's kick-off position - threatening to refuse to pay UK's agreed contribution for current EU financial period - is text-book wrong. Not because it's tough. But because it's illegal. 
What do they want, these Stop Brexit centrists? They want to stop Brexit obv. But then what? Does anyone honestly think they have the ambition, vision or the inclination to address the urgent social & environmental problems we face? 
The other day Jean-Claude Juncker said something very interesting.He said, "I think Brexit will happen. I don't think the UK will change its mind."Read between the lines.Yep. That's right.Juncker's view is that the UK CAN change its mind if it wants to.We can Remain. 
Further polling indicates the country is #remainernow as #brexitreality dawns.brexit is not only damaging bbith economically and socially for the UK it's Alos not the will of the oeiple. The leadership of the two main parties need to wake up & act in the country's interests.  
Scots Tory faces renewed scrutiny amid row over £425,000 'dark money' Brexit donation  
Theresa May is facing an unprecedented political crisis, according to a new poll that reveals voters are implacably opposed to her Brexit plan and are prepared to turn to Ukip or parties of the far right  
The new Brexit Secretary says Britain could refuse to pay its divorce bill to Brussels if it does not get a trade deal. 
So, according to @thesundaytimes, Vince Cable missed Tuesday's knife-edge Brexit vote on a customs union because he was in a meeting discussing the creation of a new centrist party. Seriously, what is the point of the Liberal Democrats? 
Wake up call to those who think Trump’s core vote notices, let alone cares, that he’s a dangerous fool and fraud. A lesson here for Brexit: “ tell them what they want to hear & they’ll believe it.”   
Remember the Scottish referendum? Scots were told if Scots refused to pay a share of the UKs debt they would be shunned by the World economic community.  
Remain MPs and establishment, in persistent attempts to thwart #Brexit and deny British people their democratic right are driving voters into the arms of the far right.  
Government’s £9.3million pro-EU ad blitz gave Remain unfair boost in Brexit referendum  
Things are improving. Digby Jones said it would take 100 years for the benefits of Brexit to become apparent. @Jacob_Rees_Mogg says 50. So that's all right then. 
In my line of work I meet people from many different EU Countries. Not one has failed to mention that "Are the British stupid enough to want to leave the EU" my reply has to be 'it would appear so'.  #Brexit #stupidity 
There will be many more who will want to rectify the historic mistake brought about by a massive deceit foisted on the public. That's why the Brextremists populist nationalist leadership clings to 'one vote once and never again' policy for justified fear Brexit might be reversed.  
Beware the coming of Jacob Rees-Mogg and his Brexit apocalypse | Kevin McKenna  
Having seen his C4 intereview, it seems that JRM's money has decided that it is nor prepared to wait 50 years to see the benefits of Brexit and has decided to apply for Irish citizenship.  
Oh look, "No Brexit deal, no €39bn divorce bill" from May's stooge Raab.Hang on. We don't know what the deal will comprise and thus what the "value" of the deal will be to us, but we've ALREADY agreed the size of the bill?! A bloody chimp could have negotiated this better... 
Remain 54%, Leave 46% - Sunday Times poll today. Here in Northern Ireland it’s now +70% Remain wih only the DUP pro-Leave - on a false prospectus which claims to be in  favour of soft Brexit in Belfast while voting hard Brexit at Westminster 
With Theresa May instructing MP’s to vote against her own white paper, Rees-Mogg calling the EU the Mafia &new Brexit Secretary Dominic Raab’s first act breaking an agreement the UK has already made is it any wonder Brexit is going to hell in a hand basket  
How inconsistent.They want a second referendum to kill the Brexit dragon, but they opposed the first one on the grounds that the blessings of EU membership is too serious to be decided by the hoi polloi, writes @AVMitchell2010 
... say but Labour's failure to present any coherent alternative. I am increasingly convinced this is a deliberate strategy - appearing to oppose without actually presenting any viable alternative that opposition to Brexit might cohere around. 
What a good job the UK did not join the euro.It would have made #Brexit even more difficult.  
Protection for dolphins and seabirds ‘weaker under Brexit plans’  
Why long-dead revolutionary is key in Brexit's trickiest riddle  
The Labour party's attempt to keep all sides happy on Brexit ultimately saved Theresa May from a potentially catastrophic defeat this week  
I agree. Brexit was a Russia intrusion part of their destruction of western democracies....same peeps who want to split CA into 3 states to weaken our economic ranking in the world... CA is 3 rd if it were a country... so Russia hates that!! They want us weak!!!  
Well a good start would be for the party to officially speak out about the illegality now shown to surround the referendum. It's totally egregious that it hasn't been already except by a few individuals, It's not even about brexit, it's about the fabric of our fraying democracy. 
"Bollox To Brexit" @boltobre stickers are all over #Pitsea in #Basildon tonight. Our team put them up on lamp posts, street signs and bus shelters under cover of darkness! We are La Resistance of Basildon! #brexit 
Britain is about to get a kick in the complacency#Brexit  
When a voted for Brexit there was no box for hard or soft or in customs union or out it was leave or stay we voted leave so get on with it 
UK could refuse to pay Brexit bill EU fails to agree trade deal - Raab  
Brexit: Court documents claim new Arron Banks links with Russia || via; Channel4News  
While the Tories tear themselves apart on Brexit LAB’s new antisemitism policy threatens a divide between the NEC and the party at Westminster  
Lying to people that there is such a thing as a “jobs first Brexit” when the government’s own department has said there will be massive job losses, is seeking to capitalise on the devastation.  
ATTENTION EVERYONE: ME AND ALEX HAVE A NEW FICTIONAL BAND CALLED BREXIT AT TIFFANY’S 
Soubry is not interested in “jobs and prosperity for her constituents”; only in pushing the elites’ anti-Brexit agenda & denying democracy to the people of this country. She knows better than the voters.   
Hi Esther McVey; @EstherMcVey1 still waiting a responseMinisterial Code. paragraph 1.3c states:"Ministers who knowingly mislead Parliament will be expected to offer their resignation to the Prime Minister"Expecting your resignationBestThe #UK#brexit #GE2018 #Tories 
And yet the uninformed and dumb swallow it - along with every other #Brexit high-command lie - hook, line and sinker. I guess we probably need less-dumb voters. What're the chances of getting some of those?  
50 years folks 50 years until ‘maybe’ Brexit is worthwhile. According to JRM.  Hope that’s ok. 
BREAKING: As PM Malcolm Turnbull claimed that this would be referendum on his leadership, he will be resigning immediately after the by-election loss. #auspol #Mayo 
My latest@annmarlowe @ZarinaZabrisky @dcpoll @carolecadwalla @profcarroll @brexit_sham @peterjukes @J_amesp @EmmaLBriant @RVAwonk @leahmcelrath @WriteSmitty @funder @grantstern @Delavegalaw @NatashaBertrand @maddow @submergingmkt @dfriedman33 @KevinGHall 
Dear @theresa_may@Jacob_Rees_Mogg has just admitted there might not be ANY #economic #brexit benefits for 50 years...NO BENEFIT FOR FIFTY YEARS !!! He's now distancing himself from the #BrexitShambles c.c. Any sane @Conservatives MPs out there 
50 years before we know the success or failure of #Brexit. Mr Mogg gambles with our lives and those of our children. He is more slippery than an eel in a bucket of swarfega. He will be OK, you will not.  
I lived in the UK & if you go outside of London or Cardiff, you will see why Brexit prevailed. It was a wave like Trump in 2016. Those protesters last week in London were not the people you see elsewhere.  
Cabinet still being persuaded over Brexit - Dominic Raab  
Brexit: dog days -  the last days of July were known to the ancient world as the "Dog Days", associated with oppressive heat and drought, causing human affairs to become feverishly unreal and men (and dogs) to lose their marbles...  #Brexinfo. 
This is Jacob Rees Mogg.  A reactionary extreme brexit right winger. According to many in the Tory party he is running the country. Are you happy with this reactionary throw back dictating what happens in our country?Time for change.Time for #JC4PM 
This is why there will be No Trade Deals for ERG wannabe facists to sign after Brexit no matter how much swanning off around the world on the Royal Yacht appeals to them. No one will trust the Uk.#StopBrexitSaveBritain 
Sorry, but who the f—- votes for a no-deal Brexit? No deal means no deal on:Cross-border healthcare, citizens’ rights, travel, flights, science collab, medicines, nuclear, defence & security, services... and dozens of other frameworks the WTO does not cover.   
@V_of_Europe #TheresaMay attitude towards #Brexit is nothing short of treachery.The British people voted for #BrexitPlease show support for this petition by retweeting.Thank you #LBCLIVE #skynews #Conservatives #bbcqt #bbcdp #MayMustGoNow 
There is only one way to establish how much popular support there is for an independant Catalonia, and that's a referendum. So far there's been one referendum and independence won with a 90-10 margin. 
In Nairn today the locals were railing against Westminster, Brexit & their threat to Scotland the Brand. With a wee leaflet run on the Tory powergrab thrown in as well. #keepScotlandtheBrand #indyref2  
Voters turn to far right, Boris — and Remain, via @thesundaytimes If voters were offered a new vote they would overturn the referendum result, with remaining in the EU beating leaving with no deal by 54% to 46%  
50 yrs from now, when we've finally perfected the art of making clothes from turnips & live in homes powered by our own, turnip-induced, flatulence, while dreaming of finally getting a trade deal with Tuvalu, those of us still alive will think: F*** brexit!No tagging/debate/smut 
Remain would win big majority in new referendum, latest poll shows.Remain would lead 54% to 46% - an 8 point lead - in a three way vote.And Remain 12 points ahead of a no-deal Brexit, @YouGov poll for @thesundaytimes shows.Please RT and keep campaigning for a #PeoplesVote. 
Britain will only pay its EU divorce bill if the bloc agrees to the framework for a future trade deal, warns new Brexit Secretary Dominic Raab  
Michael FarbicantBoris JohnsonMichael GoveVote Leave MPsEsther McVeyBrandon LewisJulian SmithThey have all been worthy of dismissal in the last month, but their offences have been like farts in the wind because No Deal needs them. Imagine what post Brexit UK/.. #Indyref2 
They are really pushing for a no deal #Brexit which would be devastating for all but the very rich, and would be very good for Trump, Putin and disaster capitalists. Let us be clear that if they do this they will rightly be regarded as traitors.#StopBrexit #FBPE 
Peter Schrank on are we heading for a no-deal Brexit? – political cartoon gallery in Putney  
Brexit could effectively be like us hitting ourselves with trade sanctions. Just crazy. #StopBrexit. 
A @yougov poll for the @thesundaytimes on the Brexit deal  
Digby-Jones said Brexit will triumph in 100 years, Rees-Mogg reckons 50, what a buzz. It's like Play Your Cards Right, but with people's lives. How exciting. 
Yeah, I can just see the berry pickers coming from America and Australia to do manual labour. For what? And where will they get visas after Brexit? Total screwball politics!  
The vast majority of people who voted for #Brexit will be dead before its far-from-assured 'benefits' materialise in 50 years time.Let's have a #PeoplesVote now & let those who are alive now decide the future for themselves, their children & their grandchildren. 
self-confidence isn't enough to make brexit a success, no matter what leavers say. my @scotonsunday column on this common delusion: 
No Deal #Brexit was always the Tory plan, crash out of Europe & blame the big bad EU. No more pesky EU rules & regulations protecting worker's right, access to healthcare & the environment...it's Brexaggedon 
Vince Cable's new centrist party. First photo emerges of historic meeting that led to him missing crucial brexit vote.  
BBC advertising another program on Gisela Stuart. More blatant anti eu propaganda. The write up makes her sound like a heroine, for campaigning against her friends, colleagues & family.The BBC just don’t know when enough is enough. Shameful programming. Stop Brexit. #FBPE 
Remember that the EU has instructed the political elite to issue project fear warnings every week. Here’s this week’s... How a no deal Brexit could affect roads, medicine and even orchestras   
Well...Here IS a forecast.OBR says austerity measures would have to continue for over 50 years to undo the damage to public finances caused by Brexit.  17 July 2017 
This is my #FBSIParty I support Scottish Independence & am calling for a second referendum. I am looking to connect with others who agree.Please:  1 Like 2 Retweet 3 Follow I will follow backCopy this tweet to your own.#ScotRef #IndyRef #IndyRef2 
Hi Femi. Could support this petition in support of EU27 and EFTA citizens' rights? Obviously we are all  working to stop #Brexit but meantime many people are living with horrible uncertainty. Thankyou.  
I understand that John Major, ex-Tory PM will appear on #marr tomorrow to reiterate his concerns about his party's handling of #Brexit. And I'll be nodding along. This is the darkest place that I've ever been in support of what I believe. #LeftAgainstBrexit #Remain 
To those who think we should not stop Brexit because of the resulting Far Right backlash:Fascists never stop. They will not stop at Brexit. They will not stop till Britain has kicked out every Muslim. 1  
The Tory Brexiteers better believe it.  No deal Brexit means no more U.K.   My @newsundayherald column. 
Oh that’s okay then, because I’m sure we’ve all got enough money squirrelled away to see us through the next half century just in case Brexit turns out to be a titanic fuckup of epic proportions. pic.twitter.com/diC6R98AMu 
Newspaper headlines: 'Voters turn to far right' over Brexit  
Okay, that’s it: I’ve seen enough Labour Party tweets to call it - it will be the Conservatives who save us from Brexit. I know, it’s madness; but that’s the reality. Well done Jeremy: you feckin’ eejit! 
You're absolutely right. The majority in Britain don't want Brexit, and the tide is turning. Criminal activity will not go unpunished.Bear with us, we will stop this madness, but all countries in Europe need to learn the lessons we are now learning, too. The far right's active. 
If I had a pound for every time a real life person had said to me, “I’m worried Brexit might not actually happen”, I’d have...................no pounds. 
I, as a German, don't understand, what's going on in Britain. #Brexit campaign was definitely a fraud. You WILL await poverty and unemployment after Brexit. If not today, there will be no 2nd chance to fight, to demonstrate, to #StopBrexit. Cluelessly ...Jörg 
This brexit nonsense has confirmed one thing - there is NOTHING the  Tories won't do to cling on to power. Screw you and screw your family and friends. Wee Right Wing Johnny, who has nothing, still thinks they're on his side. That's their greatest achievement. 
I sincerely hope someone has told the new Brexit Secretary that the formal trade negotiations don’t even start until after the UK has left the EU.  
So. Brexit. Tories charge, demand unicorns. Labour let them. Lib Dems worry about gayness. Tories realise unicorns will ruin them for decades. Labour wait. Lib Dems worry. Repeat. Endlessly. No party wants to be holding Brexit when the music stops. So the rest of us are screwed. 
So Rees Mogg thinks it reasonable for not 1 but 2 generations of Brits to be guinea pigs in his #Brexit experiment. Note also his opposition here to simple binary questions on complex issues - new since 2016 clearly...  
That pledge was ignored by Govt after the referendum as they flirted with not honouring payments. Then finally made good in the December 2017 agreement -which agreed the divorce bill and agreed FoM, etc until 2020.That in turn facilitated Horizon 2020 participation until 2020. 
So glad I left the Liberal Democrats ... what a joke ... Vince Cable has gone from banking crisis visionary to selling the Post Office off for a pittance ... to the leader of the anti-Brexit party who failed to vote against Brexit because he was setting up a new anti-Brexit party  
For a start, there's Vote Leave's pledge during the referendum:"Ministers campaigning to leave the European Union say that they will “continue to fund EU programmes in the UK until 2020” in the event of a Brexit, including research funding."See:  
Dominic Raab reveals his first initiative as new Brexit Minister.  
. @vincecable didn't vote against a hard Brexit because he was at a shady meeting to start a new centrist party@LibDems disasterclass 
Exactly*when* are the "political elite" going to register that they can't bully, scare or browbeat Brits into submission. We all knew Brexit might be a bit of a bumpy road. But Brits pull together when the chips are down. However bad things get, we'll cope. And come out stronger.  
Considering Mogg has moved his investment firm to the Republic of Ireland, it’s quite clear he’s unwilling to gamble his own money on a Brexit economy.  
Astonishing. Why did this team fail to call out the PM and UKGov for spreading the demonstrably fake news of a Brexit dividend, one wonders?  
Brexit latest:Raab says the UK won’t pay the divorce bill if the EU doesn’t agree a trade deal.So we’re back to December in one step.If I were the EU, I’d tell us to take a walk as early as Monday.See ya!#FBPE@MichelBarnier 
A very important election is 2 weeks away: on Aug. 7, Missouri holds a labor-organized veto referendum on "Right to Work" legislation.Missouri residents: you can volunteer, phone bank, canvas with the @AFLCIO at one of these dozens of events & locations: 
Leavers voted against something that Brexit can't fix.Therein lies the real danger. 
Former Brexit special adviser reveals how senior civil servants in Downing Street circumvented his old department to stop Britain leaving the EU properly:  #BrexitBetrayal 
David Davis: "It's time to start again with Brexit"  
FOOD SAFETY After #Brexit in order to get a trade deal with the USA we will have to dispense with food safety & produce chlorinated chicken. Meat will be rationed. Now may be a good time to consider becoming vegetarian, if you can get food that is.#NoDealSurvival #NoDealBrexit 
Brexit campaign chief must be hauled before Commons, say MPs  
Bristol today. Gathering signatures for a People's  Vote on the final Brexit deal. Huge support from a wide range of people.  
He won the Brexit ref and he got Trump elected. Also, he's not a paid actor like Trump & Farage, he's a true ideologue, he *believes* in what he says. DO NOT underestimate him. Complacency is why we are here now. 
You don’t know what leavers voted for any more than I do. What they DIDN’T vote for was hard, bordered, friction-full, job-costing Brexit. They rejected that at the election. 
Amazing how our political class has seen the UK's right-wing:•Drag the country into austerity;•Collaborate with outside actors like Le Pen, Wilders, and Trump; •Deliver the fuck-up that is Brexit;Yet act shocked when Stephen Harper's motives are questioned#cdnpoli 
The Independent Commission on Referendums, whose members include Dominic Grieve, the pro-Remain former attorney general, and Gisela Stuart...Government's pro-EU publicity blitz gave Remain an unfair advantage in the referendum, report suggests 
The BBC deserves plenty of brickbats but this investigation into the DUP Dark Money and Brexit is pure magic.Don’t go out to the cinema.Stay in and watch this.Richard Cook, ex Tory Candidate (fail) with links to crooked large scale illegal dumping too  
TRANSPORT after #Brexit the @Port_of_Dover and @Eurotunnel will be closed. This will cause some delays and tail backs as far as Doncaster. This will disperse after the petrol has run out we anticipate around the end of April 2018.#NoDealSurvival #NoDealBrexit 
JRM says what so many other Brexiters have also said, that any opportunities that arise from Brexit will be over the next 50 years.  Like the rest of them, they're willing to sacrifice a generation.  
Our new Brexit Secretary has already shown he does not understand the difference between the withdrawal agreement and the future relationship  
What is the naughtiest thing @Theresa_May has ever done? Deporting elderly people who have lived in the UK all their lives bc they're black, Taking 65m people out of the EU after a criminal referendum bc it keeps Rees-Mogg happy & her in No 10 or Running through fields of wheat? 
This is a fantastic #remainernow call (from a postman from Chester) into @LBC explaining clearly how he feels he has been played by #brexiteers. He explains how #brexit is not worth it & makes a clear case for an informed #peoplesvote on the deal.  
Brilliant proposal from Patrick O'Flynn @oflynnmep for non Ukippers to put pressure on the govt by temporarily supporting UKIP in polls and local electionsWorth a read, please RT its a great proposal to rid us of #May#BrexitPls #RT 
Brexit minister hints at reducing rights of @The3Million if "no deal" - not what the Leave campaigns promised, of course... 
something poignant one of the young people i spoke to at today's #PeoplesVote event said about Brexit: "we're exhausted, but we're still so angry." i think he speaks for most of us! we've seen how responsive young people are to our campaign; we must bring the campaign to them!  
Brexit will potentially devastate the North. Please retweet. We have to stop Brexit before it’s too late.  
45 MPs write to the Speaker demanding @ElectoralCommUK reform and say “we cannot in good conscience have another election or referendum without ensuring our polls are free and fair.” #VoteLeaveCheated @SKinnock 
On Capitalism and Power.  Theresa May part of a Tory Govt that blew up an entire country Libya and walked away, watch drowning people dying in the sea and walk away, then use through their media people’s deaths people’s struggle for life as a tool for power, Brexit.  
MPs demand public are given new vote on Brexit in impassioned open letter 
NUCLEAR after #Brexit there may be problems with nuclear safety as our nuclear power stations belong to @edfenergy and they're French! We anticipate some kind of armed stand off at stations and inevitable power cuts will follow. Stay inside.#NoDealSurvival #NoDealBrexit 
It's 3:35am. The morning after the EU referendum. Sterling is in freefall. And Nigel Farage is beaming?!   
J Rees Mogg says it could take 50 years to see the benefits of Brexit.Think about it, if your baby is born this year, it will see some Brexit bonus by 2068.Can this actually be happening? 
Your a disgrace putting your full weight behind triggering article 50 with no amendments No impact studies No risk assessments No plan Nothing now happening is in isolation Tories were not scrutinised because pro Brexit Labour front bench wanted to watch them struggle  
The "Miniature Europe Park" in Brussels now features a permanent anti-Brexit demo outside Westminster !!!@SODEMAction and the #PeoplesVoteMarch are immortalised !!! 
This Tory MP refused to vote in the EU referendum because she found the decision "too difficult". Her party have created the greatest crisis the UK has faced since WW2 yet she has the audacity to tweet this:  You could not make it up! 
You need to face down the Brexiters in your own party Keir. You know Brexit will be a catastrophe for our country and for ordinary people. Please join the opposition or at least back a #PeoplesVote 
So, according to Jacob Rees-Mogg, my teenage son will be collecting his pension before we feel the benefits of Brexit. That wasn’t on the side of the bus...  
A £9.3m pro-#EU publicity blitz by David Cameron's government in the run-up to the #Brexit referendum gave the #Remain side an unfair advantage, the like of which should be outlawed in future votes, an independent commission has suggested. 
INDEPENDENT DIGITAL: So, how many customs officers does UK have to cope with Brexit? #tomorrowspaperstoday 
+ @ConHome snap survey. Tory member support for May’s Brexit plan falls.  Two in three are now opposed to it.  
“Explain why the referendum wasn’t a people’s vote?” Watch as Labour’s smarmy former head of “communications” Tom Baldwin is ridiculed over his people’s vote drivel.  
Brexit campaign chief must be hauled before Commons, say MPs  
UK:  PATRIOTIC YOUTHQUAKE CONTINUES: UKIP Youth Membership Up 83% After Brexit Betrayal.  If UKIP got their act together under Nigel Farage and actually got some credible candidates, the Conservatives and Labour would be in serious trouble!        #fo2eu 
Rees-Mogg now extending the timeframe for Brexit success to 50 years; complete charlatan.  
*Brexit Explained*  
Problem: The majority  of the folks who voted for #Brexit ....they won't be here in 50 years. While the folks who weren't allowed to vote...they'll still be here.Or somewhere. #PrepareForANoDealBrexit 
Are you still "respecting" the criminally procured 2016 UK EU Referendum leave vote, Mr Starmer? If so, could you explain, given the findings of the EC and the ICO , why you are not now in breach of section 5 of the MPs Code of Conduct ? Same goes for JC and some other Labour MPs 
The way Brexiters have continually moved the goalposts since the referendum - no customs union! No single market! No deal is fine! - is like if Remain had won and suddenly announced everyone in Britain had to use the euro and speak Belgian 
This is a timely thread.We are on full alert this time.  Much slower before the referendum.I like Denis McShane’s reflection.  “Appeasing the far right is like feeding the gangrene in your leg”. 
Farage WARNS 'dishonest' May: Brexit betrayal to spark backlash ‘like nothing before'  
AVIATION If you are on a connecting flight in the EU,  perhaps going via Charles de Gaul or Schipol then you and your bags are going to have to get off the plane and be re-searched whilst, embarrassingly, the rest of the plane wait for you.#Brexit #NoDealBrexit #NoDealSurvival pic.twitter.com/DTfofWnkXr 
Classic - says ‘you’re asking a very simple question about a very complex set of circumstances’ and so refuses to answer.What was the referendum? A very simple question about the same complex set of circumstances.Yet that becomes ‘the Will of the People’ and sacrosanct. 
1/ We want to address something now which is key to the entire Brexit debate. It takes the form of two questions with one answer:  
MIst6r @QuintinOliver you were from 16.07 to 20.07 in #Macedonia where you can not hide. Very confident that you will succeed in your assessment of the referendum.. Except bribing [£] and hacking opponents, you have expressed interest in #Бојкотирам. Can we help you? 
The Home Office doesn't know how many customs officers it has despite a looming Brexit 'no deal'  
The man is Brexit. The wave is reality. The dolphins are facts.  
Try telling someone who loses their job in the next year or so that Brexit will be good for him and the nation in 50 years time. This privileged arse cares nothing for the common man. #WakeUpPeople 
Mansion dwelling multi-millionaire sociopath @Jacob_Rees_Mogg says Britain is heading for a no-deal #Brexit, insisting it is “nothing to be frightened of”, but failing to add "unless you're not a Mansion dwelling multi-millionaire sociopath".Pick a side.  
SNP -the party of austerity? Get back to us John when Labour has cancelled Brexit, you clueless charlatans.  
Or maybe you don't care how much you lose from Brexit... 
Brilliant day in Dartford today at our street stall. Great to speak to Dartford residents who are furious with the conservatives Brexit Betrayal. Dartford voted 64.2% to leave & people feel the main stream parties have completely forgot about them. Vote UKIP #Dartford #ukip 
One of the sickening things about the EU referendum campaign was the government called in foreign leaders, big business, every state department, the state broadcaster and a £9m propaganda leaflet, which has now been proved to have given an unfair advantage. And still lost. 
“We’ll only find out if brexit worked long after everyone who proposed it has fucking died” is a surprisingly effective get out clause from the Brexiters. pic.twitter.com/tZ6cdasUnK 
Petition: Rescind Art.50 if Vote Leave has broken Electoral Laws regarding 2016 referendum  
The best NHS in the UK the SNP are always telling us.Seemingly not.As the SNP fixate on another divisive independence referendum, Scotland is in the midst of a GP staffing crisis.  
So...quote: "the overwhelming opportunity for Brexit is over the next 50 years". WTF?! Dear fellow Scots.. We can, and will, succeed as an independent country. And it won't take 50 years to prove it..!! Absolutely no doubt about that. #indyref2 
Jacob Rees-mogg to be cryogenically frozen and thawed out once the benefits of Brexit occur 
Never thought of it like that but #Brexit really makes us the first country in the world daft enough to impose trade sanctions on ourself. 
Brits thrown post-Brexit EU citizenship lifeline by Commission  #Brexit50 
The new highbrow conspiracy theory about the UK economic slowdown...It’s a deliberate sabotage by a Remoaner government looking to discredit the Brexit they are pursuing. Nothing to do with uncertainty or that businesses think it’s nuts, obvs...  
We were promised by Leave campaigners ALL the advantages of the Single Market at little or no cost.If @theresa_may cannot deliver that, her #ToryGangsters have NO mandate at all for #Brexit and a #PeoplesVote is essential 
I hope we're putting every effort into preparing for WTO Deal Brexit. Pointless negotiating with supercilious Barnier now. We can see how EU feels about FTA once we've left  
Caller tells Rees-Mogg the American Ambassador says all flights will be grounded in a 'no deal' #Brexit, as per international law, Rees-Mogg says trust Chris Grayling.Chris Grayling who screwed up prisons & can't run trains, THAT Chris Grayling? via @LBC 
BREXIT: Britain experiences boom in tourism thanks to weak pound. Good news for Mail readers, right? NO. GET THE FOREIGNERS OUT. JUST GET THEM OUT. THEY’RE ALL ILLEGAL. LEAVE US ALONE.  
No mention of a "second" EU Referendum until Remain lost the plebiscite on 23 June 2016. They call a "second" EU Referendum a 'people's' vote. Who on earth voted in the one in 2016... insects? Of course, the first Referendum was held in '75, the second in 2016. We've said Leave. 
Thanks to these Labour groups. Ourselves and @Remain_Labour are campaigning to add many more, we have 79 motions in process.If @UKLabour supported a #PeoplesVote the dynamic changes over night. We'd be outlining the damage of Brexit, promoting an alternative.Watch this space.  
I for one hope we get a fair & balanced #Brexit - If we don’t we’ll need to start making and inventing things again. Such as Antibiotics, TVs,Telephones, Chocolate Bars, Cement, World Wide Web, Jet Engines, Refrigerators, Toothpaste, Lightbulbs, Tin Cans, Photography etc  
No mention of 'soft Brexit' prior to the EU Referendum on 23 June 2016. It was a matter of Leave or Remain. Even a small child understands the difference between leave and stay, and certainly adult voters were voting on that basis. As instructed by then PM David Cameron. 
During His UK Visit, Trump Interviewed With The Sun Newspaper...who reported Trump criticized Prime Minister Theresa May’s Handling Of Brexit, And Said A May Critic, Boris Johnson, Would Make A “great prime minister.”Trump Then Called It “fake news” 
I believe in the principle of democracy & respecting the result of an election or referendum.  
Which means Scotland should be asserting our independence regardless of what England's poxy Brexit deal looks like. While we still can in a legal & democratic way.  #DissolvetheUnion 
“When will we get the benefits of Brexit? Instantly?”“No”“Soon?”“No”“In 10 years or-““We’ll find out if it was beneficial when most of you who voted for it are fucking dead, that’s when.” pic.twitter.com/iuzgONoNfr 
“A soft Brexit will make it much more difficult to conclude a comprehensive US-UK FTA. And it would almost certainly represent a lost opportunity for the US to forge an important alliance with the UK on vital issues related to digital trade and policies”  
We stop Brexit, then we stop the corrupt BBC, RT if you're with me!!! 
A caller who voted for Brexit says he should be given a second vote to allow him to 'put things right' by voting to Remain.  
Two problems with a 2nd referendum. 1.  What question or questions would be asked?  It can’t be too complicated. 2.   Does anyone seriously trust that the questions would be fair and not manipulated to give the answer the Establishment wanted?This is political Novichok. 
I pick the first.The second is also true. But it’s not sovereignty issues that make Brexit undeliverable. Rather, it’s due to there being no majority support for any one plan, either in parliament or public.It’s undeliverable because we’ve snookered ourselves internally.  
The people DID decide. I’m sorry you didn’t get the result you (and me) wanted but that’s politics. Any attempt to stop Brexit happening will kill democracy in Britain.  
Today @Neighbors35th kicked off our petition drive to put a referendum question on the November ballot in the 35th Ward in support of housing justice and rent control. We declare housing is a human right! Join us at our next canvass:  
Ever wondered how we got into this mess? Here's one of the BBC's so-called 'fact-check' reports during the referendum campaign.  
Theresa May is preparing to go down fighting for her Chequers Brexit plan  
Away from #Brexit, the Labour Party is now being sued over its antisemitism  #bbcsp #marr 
The referendum should no longer be pretended to be a mandate for Brexit, it can no longer be said to represent the will of the people. #Brexit #StopBrexit #PeoplesVote 
Government's pro-EU publicity blitz gave Remain an unfair advantage in the referendum, bipartisan report suggests  
Theresa May could do worse than look to a much less glamorous time - the 1970s - for instruction on how to handle Brexit, says @steverichards14 
So @theresa_may comes visit Ireland and cements herself as a DUP PM. DUP chasing a hard brexit just to get “one over on the taigs”, GFA close to tatters, British Government no longer an honest broker, previous agreements being broken. We need to #Think32 and get out of this mess. 
Brextreemists want a No deal hard Brexit so they can deregulate everything  
My grandsons will be in their 60s by then. Why should their whole working lives be overshadowed or damaged by Brexit? 
Lammy’s tweet below was written 2 days after the referendum in 2016 and as we gravitate towards the insanity of No Deal is more relevant now than it was 2 years ago. Worth bearing in mind before supermarkets start rationing what’s on their shelves.  
Russia was involved in Brexit- was that also through Assange?If I were the UK, I wouldn't want to give up possession of Assange to the U.S. until after Trump is out of office.With or without a pardon, Assange is a serious threat to Trump. 
EXCLUSIVE: UKIP Leader @GerardBattenMEP Slams ‘Two Faced’ Tory Leadsom for Backing ‘Betrayal’ Brexit Deal She ‘Hates’  
EU Campaign Team in Chester today listening to brexit fears on the street. They know all about brexit cheats, illegal funding, and want the chance to stop this nonsense. #Stopbrexit #Chester @BBCBreaking @Labour4EU @Women_4_Europe 
Rees-Mogg: "the overwhelming opportunity for Brexit is over the next 50 years"But in the meantime his investment outfit set up in Dublin. The risk is for the little people.  
So Jacob Rees Mogg is prepared to put your future, and the future of your children, on the line, but not his own... which is no doubt why his firm set up a fund in Ireland ahead of a possible 'hard Brexit'. What a toerag this man is!#BrexitShambles 
Thanks to Brexit?We need Wagon Wheels to revert to original size. Galaxy to go back to tasting different to every other chocolate.Baked Beans to taste of something, anything again. & PC removed from Maltesers adverts#MakeBritainGreatAgain 
Jacob Rees-Mogg says the UK is now heading toward a 'no-deal' Brexit. Of course, nothing could be further from reality. The UK has the prospect of sealing free trade agreements with more than 40 countries worldwide, includingUSAChinaJapanIndiaBrazilCanadaAustraliaS Korea 
Out and about today, just leisurely walking around Edinburgh and noticing what a very European city, I live in. I stopped off at a local Polish shop and as I left I sadly wondered if it would still be there in a year. I hate Brexit! 
The desperation to push a deranged hard Brexit, stop Mueller and get far-right thug Tommy Robinson out of jail are related. The first large-scale far-right coup since the 1930s is in progress but they think could fail. They are right on that. We WILL stop their insane plot 
The two main parties cannot oppose Brexit without breaking key manifesto pledges.Also:The two main parties cannot support Brexit without breaking key manifesto pledges.The only solution:#PeoplesVote 
After Brexit though, and particularly after a harmful, chaotic one, EU27 do not even need to enter into negotiations unless they wish to. They ‘may’ well wish to in certain areas, but that will be their exclusive choice 3/ 
I voted Remain & would do the same tomorrow. But Brexit is going to happen & we will have to make it work.  
We need to wake up to the American alt-right's continued plans to capture Britain and Europe. They are organising and we all just sit and watch. Brexit was just the beginning. We need to organise. We need to fight back.  
Brexit is, literally, a far-right agenda taking over the future of the country. It’s about the sovereign right to throw foreigners out. If we don’t manage to stop it we won’t need to worry about a right wing “backlash”, because they’ll own the place. 
After standing in Northern Ireland in GE2015 I've seen first hand how DUP are a key stakeholder in Northern Ireland's hard-won peace and stability.Continuity Remainer Lord Adonis should stop with his Brexit fearmongering, trying to stoke tension and trouble. Deeply divisive.  
No flights in March with a no-deal Brexit. That’s it. No debate. It cannot be done. The EU is not punishing anyone. Read the thread. Brexit is astonishingly stupid. It ignores fact, rules, law, economics, truth & our welfare. Brexit: Why? ... Why? #StopBrexit #PeoplesVote #FBPE 
.@SteveReedMP We were in Croydon for 3 hours today asking people what they thought of Brexit. Overwhelmed by the overwhelming response! #PeoplesVote 
The sound of a very large #Brexit penny dropping.  
Rees-Mogg update.Good news: there’s going to be a Brexit dividend! Yay! Go us!Bad news: it may take 50 years.  
When will someone have the balls to say Brexit was an honest mistake. 
Did I mention I hate Brexit? 
Man on ledge: “I believe I can fly....” Man jumps.Paramedic: “Yeah, a shovel and a bin bag will do.” 
Unfortunately it's true and I am a great supporter of the BBC as an institution but they are getting Brexit coverage wrong as they did the referendum  
Mogg now says “The overwhelming opportunity for Brexit is over the next 50 yrs!”How many more millions of people will be plunged into poverty &despair as multi millionaires like him sit it out in their castles whilst kids go hungry?Thankfully a General Election won´t take so long  
A NO DEAL #Brexit would only cause very brief disruption when the UK left the European Union, a leading European economist said 
Brexit means Mayhem!!!Theresa MayhemIt was an ‘honest mistake’Theresa Trump captain of the shipwreck HMS Lordfcknhelpus lying like an arsonist dripping in kerosene holding a zippo with the ERG screaming “do it do it do it do it”  
Jacob Rees Mogg will know in 50 years whether or not Brexit has been a success.At that point he might consider resigning.I’ll be dead by thenMeanwhile his company Somerset Capital has opened an EU Dublin office with warnings re Brexit risks.Not what was on that red bus.  
Leave Voter explains why he wants a #PeoplesVote to correct his position and vote Remain. He thinks Brexit isn’t worth it - and says a vote on the deal would be a vote by a much better informed population:   
She’ll still be young enough to enjoy the Brexit bonanza  My children will be 71 and 73 so I kind of feel like I have to oppose this madness with all the strength that I have. For them. 
The day after whatever form of Brexit we opt for...Uk Planes will fly over the EU, lorries will pass through the Chunnel, ships will sail from Dover 2 Calais, there will be no hard Irish border and we won’t run out of food or medicine. 
Having set up remainers, civil servants, judges, the EU, the opposition, his own government, companies and the people to take the blame for the consequences of Brexit, Rees-Moog now sets up time itself. If we’d just wait until half of us are dead, we’ll see the benefits.  
I am sick of all these lying politicians. The PM is a liar most of her Cabinet are liars, the leader of the opposition is a liar. We got all them fucking liars in Europe, the only one's at the moment who are standing up for Brexit is JRM and Peter Bone and the so called rebels. 
Jacob Rees-Mogg: “It's a question of timescale... The overwhelming opportunity for #Brexit is over the next 50 years."He's already making excuses for the impending disaster.And, as Keynes remarked: "In the long run, we're all dead."#PeoplesVote 
#Brexit GlossaryTo "Crash Out":To Leave the #EU & go back to World Trade Organisation rules to trade in the same way we did before we were a member of the European Union & in the same way as we trade with American imports in the UK at the moment & in other parts of the world. 
Alf Dubs fans: I’m at a hotel in Newry which he opened 20 yrs ago, 2 weeks before Good Friday Agreement! Discussing Irish border & how Brexit will inevitably bring it back & jeopardise GFA, to universal opposition in this border community  
Indeed. It seems rather simple to me. 1. The EC and ICO have found the leave vote was procured by breaking the law 2.  MPs have a duty to "uphold the law" .  3. It follows that MPs breach their Code of Conduct if they support "brexit" 
The anti-expert attitude behind Brexit has a long history. This is from Hungarian-born George Mikes’ excellent ‘How to be an Alien’, about being foreign in England, in 1946... Note the last sentence...  
Pakistan's elections Wednesday are shaping up to be a referendum on the military & its interference in democracy. Some see a soft coup: unfavorable candidates disqualified, news outlets censored & peaceful political movements persecuted.Our take:  #Pakistan 
Jacob Rees-Mogg won't be affected by a no Deal Brexit. He's very rich. Negative impacts are for the little people.  
Brexit Basics part 5 #PeoplesVote 
For the record, Andrew 'Brillo' Neil is chairman of Press Holdings which owns the Telegraph and the Spectator. Press Holdings is owned by the Tory Brexit supporting Barclay brothers. Twins with disaster capitalist ambitions. Neil is unbiased? Of course he's not. @carolecadwalla 
Kenyan businesses' first response to a customer complaint: "But no one else has complained". All of them. Restaurants, banks, fuel stations. Sometimes even mama mboga. Why is this?Do you need a referendum to be dissatisfied by the product/service? 
My daughter won Brexit at the fair today!  
No-deal Brexit would leave households almost £1,000 worse off, new report says  
Britain has decided to leave a European orbit to embrace a global one. It is an exciting time that we should approach with confidence and optimism. #Brexit  
"Because you're proposing a very simple question on a very complex set of circumstances" - You do realise @Jacob_Rees_Mogg that you have very succinctly outlined one of the fundamental reasons why #Brexit should not be happening. #StopBrexit 
"We won't know the economic consequences of #Brexit for 50 years" according to @Jacob_Rees_Mogg You might not, given your inherited wealth & off-shore investments, Mr Grease-Smug, but us 'little people' will. #StopBrexit before Brexit wrecks Britain. 
I often get the feeling that the reason for the way the Tories are handling brexit (very badly) is only to scupper any future Indyref 
In a lovely little place in Galway for the second day running. They do great pasta.The staff are all lovely cheerful Polish youngsters.No Brexit anxieties amongst them.They're very welcome here and they make the place better.Proper order. 
What Rees-Mogg is really saying here is:'You lot might struggle for the next 50 years. But I won't.'By most standards, I will probably only live for another 50 years. So thanks Jacob, you've decided the rest of my life is worth pissing away for no benefit. #fbpe #brexit  
Sacrifices will have to be made, some will have to give up their jobs, food and lives for the greater good of the #Brexit cause, but for those that survive, they will be free from the tyranny of Brussels and free (almost) to enjoy a new utopian global Britain.  
Hi @RobBurl as editor of BBC live political programmes how about showing that @Theresa_May doesn't understand her own Brexit plan? #JustAsking 
WARNING perhaps the biggest threat to the success of #Brexit is remainer sabatours and @EU_Commission sympathisers, they can be anyone, a friend, a relative, a neighbour, report any suspicious activities now to your local #Brexit authority.#NoDealBrexit #NoDealSurvival 
This charlatan covers his back by saying that it’ll take 50 years for us to reap the benefits of Brexit. A) I won’t be around in 50 years’ time, and B) I don’t want the country to suffer untold damage in the hope of some mythical benefit in five decades’ time #PeoplesVote 
Disgusting. Wait 50 yrs to see benefit of brexit he says. Easy to say that when you are born into unimaginable wealth like him. These are the cunts who decide our future. #indyref2 
Jacob Rees Mogg is asked if he'll resign if Brexit is disastrous.He says: "You're asking a very simple question about a very complex set of circumstances..."Er, bit like the referendum question Jacob...from which you claim to know exactly what 'the people' want. #PeoplesVote 
Here's more up to date data. Exports of goods and services have performed v strongly since post-referendum slide of sterling -- now over £50bn/month (see chart). But propensity to import has remained strong too 
A Brexiteer caller tells @AndrewCastle63 how he wants an opportunity to 'put his vote right' by voting Remain in a people's vote on Brexit.  
Remember when Tilda rice claimed Brexit would take a heavy toll & hosted continuity  Remainers Clegg, Morgan & Miliband launched Project Fear 2.1?Genuine question How does Tilda successfully sell basmati rice to Indians without  being in EU...? 
Could everyone screaming at me about Trump & Brexit please just shut up? It’s Saturday, I’m watching @TigerWoods light up The Open, and I just don’t have the patience today for your incessant, foul-mouthed, ill-informed echo chamber hysteria. Sorry. X 
So there we have it, folks! Fifty years before we see a benefit from Brexit. In other words, Brexit has no known benefits because nobody, but nobody, can forecast fifty years ahead.Rees-Mogg is further out than Andrew Lilico, who said 45yrs, but not as far as Digby Jones, 100.  
Making comparisons between Brexit and WWII is essentially admitting it’s going to be prolonged, bloody, and Russia is heavily involved.  
Rees-Mogg: *the overwhelming opportunity for Brexit is over the next 50 years....* I‘m surprised he‘s admitted the benefits of Brexit (if any) will take years to materialize. This has to be stopped through a #PeoplesVote 
Resounding results from our #Brexitometer in #Truro today:Is #Brexit going well? >> NO!Will it be good for the NHS? >> NO!For jobs? >> NO!Do you trust Westminster to make up lost EU funding for #Cornwall? >> NO!Would you like a #PeoplesVote on any final deal? >>YES! 
We’ve been lucky enough in Scotland to have quality home grown grass-fed beef, but post-Brexit we could well have hormone and growth promoters injected into our beef thanks to any trade deal with the US. They never put that on the side of a big red bus!  
#brexit Conservative party & The Labour Party trying to stop Brexit everyday. PATHETIC both parties. 17 million voted  BREXIT. Leave The Customs Union, & The Single Market. Then you got GUARDIAN journalists, on TV everyday slagging off Brexit as well. Get on with it FFS.  
ATTENTION amateur radio hams your county needs you, in the run up to #Brexit we expect the UK to be flooded with spies from the @EU_Commission of course @GCHQ will be tracking them, but due to austerity cuts they could do with a hand. Sign up now!#NoDealBrexit #NoDealSurvival 
I think I’m about 100% done with liberals who’ve only discovered antiracism because of Brexit’s (very real) threat to the rights and conditions of Europeans. 
An extra guest for #marr tomorrow: former Prime Minister Sir John Major. We'll also be joined by Brexit Sec @DominicRaab and Shadow Business Secretary @RLong_Bailey. The news review from @PaulGoodmanCH and @MirrorAlison. Plus Gemma Arterton and #marrmusic from @CharleyCrockett 
Jacob Rees-Mogg says UK is heading for no-deal BrexitI'm sure Jacob isn't concerned about WTO trade terms but what about the 1000s of people whose jobs will go because their businesses are no longer competitive? 
Spotted at @CheltForEurope stall today - my local MP @AlexChalkChelt! He signed letter to @theresa_may along w 45 Tories demanding she listen to biz leaders re her #Brexit negotiating position. Here he is admiring the Brexitometer. When will he see sense and back a #PeoplesVote? 
It could take 50 years that find out if Brexit is a success! Listen to this snake !! So people that are teenagers now,  go on to have none of the affluence we have enjoyed . Non of the freedom of movement throughout Europe. Nor do their kids . He and his ilk will be ok of course  
Rees-Mogg: "The overwhelming opportunity for Brexit is over the next 50 years."WTF !!!? So no tangible benefit of Brexit until around 2068!#LeaversAreLoonies#PeoplesVote 
PETROL will be in short supply after #Brexit and prices may rise to £3.50 per litre, where available. Do not stock pile, it's dangerous, but instead try walking. Essential users MPs, local councillors & rich people will be given a priority supply.#NoDealBrexit #NoDealSurvival 
And those Brexiters who are already typing “Don’t be ridiculous, it’s not the EU that’s maintained peace in Europe, it’s NATO” well guess what?The same Russian-funded right wing populist bullshit which brought us Brexit is fucking NATO up too.So yeah, still your fault. 
Eton elites have spent their whole life getting what they want through confidently bullshitting. They’re struggling to see why that tactic can’t work for brexit 
Former Canadian PM makes important corrective to Piers Morgan’s idiotic nonsense about ‘prevailing’ over Brexit. John Donne has been right that ‘no man is an island’ for 400 years - and we won’t prove him wrong now  
Seems like Jacob Rees-Mogg wasn't quite telling the truth to a caller on LBC this morning, about flying after a No Deal BrexitCommission to EU27: Prepare airports for a 'no-deal' Brexit @jamesob @LBC 
Out on the streets of Macclesfield this morning with @EUmoveMACC the people were unanimous in believing that Brexit is going very badly indeed.#PeoplesVote#Brexitometer 
Rees Mogg is TELLING you you won’t benefit from #Brexit. People MIGHT do in 50 years. I am certain you didn’t vote to make your children poorer or to have to just get through as best they can. I’m not saying this. The chief Brexiteer is. Shouldn’t we have a say now #PeoplesVote 
TELEPHONES after #Brexit mobile phones will no longer work and only those with a @bt_uk landline will be able to make and receive calls within the UK mainland only. Overseas calls (inc Ireland & the Channel Islands and the IOM) will be restricted.#NoDealBrexit #NoDealSurvival 
This should have everyone on high alert: alt-right boss Steve Bannon is moving to Brussels to infiltrate #EU politics more effectively. #brexit is part of his plan. we must #stopBrexit #FBPE  @BrexitBin @spaceangel1964 @uaf  
JOB LOSSES there will be inevitable job losses after #Brexit but do not despair those without jobs will be offered places in Labour Camps to work for 50p an hour plus basic rations on cheap goods to sell overseas with our new free trade deals.#NoDealBrexit #NoDealSurvival 
....and a significant number of Brexit voters will have met their demise many decades earlier than this! 
Talk about hedging!  Essentially he is saying “the benefits of Brexit, if they exist, might happen sometime in the next 50 years... but i admit i could be wrong.”  
Prime MInister must find another approach to Brexit  
The Brexit-o-meter from Shrewsbury town centre today...Pretty conclusive that people would like a vote on the final deal. If you agree, you can sign here: @AtStalls @CCHQPress @OFOCBrexit @Women_4_Europe @16MillionRising @OpenBritainShrp @bbclaurak 
"A SECOND referendum on Brexit would be “a betrayal on the first vote” a historian has warned as Prime Minister Theresa May faces opposition from Remainers and Brexiteers over her Brexit proposals. " 
If you left a 40 year marriage and your partner kept the house, the money, your job and all your friends...you would find yourself standing on the wrong side of your front door with nowhere to go and only the clothes you are wearing.See also No Deal Brexit 
FOREIGNERS after 29th March 2018 it will be illegal to be a foreigner in the UK. All foreigners must report to their local detention camp. Those that need help getting there will be collected. Register now to save time #Brexit #NoDealBrexit #NoDealSurvival 
Remember the EU referendum campaign when all the Brexiters said we would end up crashing out on WTO terms?Nor me.#PeoplesVote 
Influential Brexiters are trying to deflect blame onto the EU and Remainers for the shambles of Brexit.Let me cut to the chase here. The blame is all on the Brexiters. You campaigned for it. You voted for it. Now where’s your fucking plan for it? 
Resignations, knife-edge votes and dire warnings from business: With just 13 weeks before a Brexit deal should be reached with the EU, Jane Merrick says Donald Trump is right, Britain IS in turmoil.  
Yet, in the whole scheme of things Brexit, this question is very, very simple!  *And -We are to wait 50 years to see the benefits of Brexit???.... Yeah? Right!... F***Off!!! 
Post-Brexit registration process for EU citizens to be trialled in August  
A few opinions on Brexit from a market place in the North of England @peoplesvote_uk @LancasterForEU #peoplesvote #lancaster #Brexitometer How well do you think Brexit is going?  
I know its a weekend and everyone is probably relaxing, however, the legitimacy of the Brexit result has been called into question and this could permanently change the course of our democracy for the worse...if you haven't signed please do.. 
I'm not sure whether it's time to laugh or cry. In 2014 the 3 unionist factions, Labour, the Tories & the Lib-Dems all promised a poor, isolated Scotland outside the EU if it went independent. Now, still in the Union, we're getting articles on what food to stockpile for Brexit. 
2016: Brexit will make Britain stronger and more prosperous2018: Food shortages will do Britain a lot of good  
Doomsday planning for no-deal Brexit—after 45 years of integration, a sudden rupture would affect all British life, with companies already stockpiling food and medicine, the govt looking at whether it needs to use the military to keep the country running. 
JRB "your proposing a very simple question on a complex set of circumstances" and refuses to give an answer. Yet this was the very same situation that was put to people in the referendum. 
So Reesmogg is saying that there might be benefits resulting from #Brexit within 50 years. But he's not sure. We don't need to worry, then.  
It's quite remarkable how they're not even bothering to try to sell brexit anymore. Entire rhetoric is about damage limitation. It's all pure, self-inflicted madness. 
Petition: Rescind Art.50 if Vote Leave has broken Electoral Laws regarding 2016 referendum  
Finally, the English are getting it!  For the DUP, Brexit has always been about getting the border reinstated no matter what they said publicly  
Brexit was a protest vote. It was an 'up yours' to-The ToriesRich pplIntelligent pplFranceGermanyImmigrantsChangeProgressHave I missed any? 
Everyone watching Brexit unfold like  
To harness the opportunities of Brexit – including free trade agreements with countries outside the EU – the UK must have regulatory autonomy such that it is able to be a credible trading partner and can improve its own domestic system.Our report:  
Treason May paid Olly Robbins £20k Bonus, to oust David Davis from negotiations and water down #Brexit into #Brino#MAYMUSTGO Controversial Brexit civil servant handed big bonus by PM  
After 3 days in Northern Ireland I now understand DUP mindset. They WANT hardest possible Brexit because they want new hard border with Ireland for cultural/political reasons. But essential they can blame UK govt, so they claim publicly not to want ‘hard border.’ Deeply dishonest 
A Second Referendum Is Possible  
Harry Burton’s Brexit Open - Political Cartoon Gallery in Putney  
READ: why as a Muslim, @BashOIbrahim believes its time for  their voice to be heard through a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal. Please RT: 
What might a second Brexit referendum ask? According to Tony Blair, Britons could choose between staying in the EU, a soft Brexit, or a hard one  
Petition: Rescind Art.50 if Vote Leave has broken Electoral Laws regarding 2016 referendum  
Andrew Bridgen MP - “The Irish border issue is actually a complete construct to prevent the UK from having a free trade agreement that we want, a Canada++.”"The EU have done a free trade deal with Canada. Canada or Japan didn’t pay for the free trade deal." #Brexit  
Two years on from the referendum, as the facts continue to emerge, it is painfully clear that #Brexit will make us poorer both financially, and in terms of much needed EU health workers. There is no chance of the post-Brexit bonanza promised by the Cabinet joker, @BorisJohnson. 
Everyone here in Northern Ireland - Belfast, Newry, Londonderry - says how life is transformed for the better in last 20 years. Anger that DUP ‘selling Ulster down the river over Brexit because they are stuck in the 1920s,’ as one young farmer put it to me 
WOW! This poll is amazing! Number one issue American’s care about is immigration. Which @TheDemocrats are underestimating again! @POTUS will get a referendum in 2018 to secure our borders! Funny enough the ‘Russia situation’ doesn’t even rate, it’s an *!  
"FOOTIE luvvie Gary Lineker risked a massive backlash today as he went on a Twitter rant about Brexit.The BBC presenter called for a second EU referendum and blasted the Government's plans for Brexit as "bonkers"."Don't be like Gary.  
I wrote about the threat that Brexit posed to pluralist democracy a few months ago:  As @Freedland points out  the treatment of the Electoral Commission's verdict as political by the BBC is quite shocking. 
#imwithmay is basically the hashtag if you are myopically loyal to the point of you sacrificing your #Brexit and general political viewpoints because of fanaticism. Just saying #imnotwithmay#MAYMUSTGO#ChequersMeansCorbyn 
An EU referendum rerun would be as unwanted as it would be divisive. @GiselaStuart is also right to point out it would create delay and further uncertainty #RightTheFirstTime 
Seriously stop this all of you. "I voted Brexit cos I looove immigrants" yeah piss off. Brexit is an anti-migrant movement & if you voted for it that's what you've done. No one cares about what you intended. That's what you have *done*  
Come on Brits, sign & share this petition. Don't let #TrumpPutin's attack on the EU, which Brexit is, take away your influence in Europe, your EU citizenship, your freedom and protections.Brexit is not for Britain, only its cost will be. Putin loves it. 
Nadine Dorries MP - "When you let your core vote down, when you don’t deliver for your core vote. If we don’t deliver for the UKIP vote that is coming back home, they will punish us badly at the polls."I’ve predicted that it will probably be like ’97 or even worse.” #Brexit  
The #EUreferendum vote was unsafe. Nobody gave informed consent for #Brexit. We didn’t have FULL KNOWLEDGE of all the RISKS; we didn't know about all the CONSEQUENCES; we were not given any choices on the Brexit ALTERNATIVES. We cannot proceed on this basis. Please RT.  
Australian Any Questions panellist Sharon something or other claimed, unchallenged, that Brexit would cause twenty years of privation, and asked “Where will the jobs come from?”. Doesn’t she know that the UK has about the lowest unemployment in the EU? 
India now eyes post-Brexit UK trade agreement with EU deal almost dead  
Huge disused ‘customs facilitation centre’ at Newry, by the Irish border, built in 1988. They don’t want it to return to use after Brexit. All that space in the foreground is where trucks used to queue  
Great story. How could Arron Banks afford to give millions to the Leave campaign when he was short of cash for his South African diamond mines? Spoiler: it has something to do with Russia. #Brexit  
I spoke to the Guardian about tackling antisemitism, stopping a hard and vicious Brexit, and my campaign to be re-elected to Labour’s NEC  
People tell me that at my age I shouldn't get so worked up about Brexit as I'll not have to put up with it for long. But that's the whole point. I want to spend the time I have left inside an enlightened Europe, not in some decaying Third World US annexe. 
A clean Brexit would bring massive economic benefits by freeing the UK from hugely costly EU red tape and trade barriers:  #BrexitBetrayal 
3. How can Leavers speak about Brexit trade arrangements when they don’t even understand such very basic stuff? 
Why do I applaud, admire & respect @anna_soubry? Here’s why. And brave, too, considering the abuse & threats she receives. This clip crystallises the real crux of Brexit. ‘Sovereignty’ v jobs, trade, influence.  
1. @timothy_stanley Why can’t Leavers ever get their facts right? Tim Stanley just said on BBC AQ that the UK can’t choose the Norway option for Brexit because Norway can’t do its own free trade agreements. Fact  through Efta, Norway has FTAs in force with 16 countries and is 
Yep. And got rejected first time round. Joining was a huge priviledge, and then becoming as powerful in the EU as the UK was (until Brexit), over a market of 350m people, a huge achievement. I'll always be proud of that - and ashamed of how flippantly we threw it away. 
Brexit has made me absolutely certain of two things: 1) The UK ought to have had by now and is in desperate need of having a serious, sober conversation about our place/significance in the world. This should have preceded Brexit. 2) We shouldn't have any more referenda. 
EU yes-man Hammond says Britain should be ready to give preferential treatment to all EU citizens in the future as the only way to secure a trade deal with EU.Has he forgotten the British people voted to be an independent nation capable of controlling our Borders after #Brexit?  
Well perhaps it's time to reevaluate your position then Rob; promoting a fact as an allegation is not perspective and let's not pretend this is an isolated occurrence.... there's an easily identifiable pattern here. 
#Brexitometer result after two hours on the @ValeforEurope #PeoplesVote Day of Action stall in Barry this morning showing strong support for a People's Vote on the final #Brexit deal and many @AlunCairns constituents unhappy with the ongoing #brexitshambles. 
Could this be the trigger that turns the tide? “Makers of the Swiss chocolate bar, Toblerone, are to scrap its latest incarnation which saw wide gaps between its distinctive triangular chunks.” We just need to get rid of Trump and scrap Brexit and we are back to normal. 
Wee walk to focus the thoughts. It's all about a unity referendum. Partition failed Ireland 100 years ago and Brexit will only serve to make it worse. We need to protect our children, the future generations from this Tory madness. #Brexit  
Vladimir Putin has told Russian diplomats that he made a proposal to Donald Trump at the Helsinki Summit to hold a referendum to help resolve the conflict in eastern Ukraine 
You tweet or retweet something pro Brexit for example, and then hundreds of Trolls come out of the woodwork. They don’t follow me, but they must be monitoring me closely. It’s a job to them. Paid. Or forced. But they are all ugly, swearing low intellects. I block. 
Wetherspoons promising lower post-Brexit prices on Kopparberg cider...from, er, Sweden  
The idea that politics is about serving the people - and doing what’s best for them - is irreconcilable with Brexit.  
Today @Cardiff4EU were out campaigning on Queen Street. Plenty of support for a #PeoplesVote even from some Leave supporters. Almost nobody we spoke to thought the government are doing a good job of Brexit.  
Thinking some more about this, I only really eat carbs as a vehicle for dairy products anyway. Brexit is gonna make me thin, R.I.P. Virgin Active membership.  
Second referendum would be a BETRAYAL of the first Brexit vote, warns historian  
@MarrShow @BBCNews @BBC stands accused of serial and systemic Pro-Brexit, pro-Tory and pro-UKIP/ Leave.E U / Vote Leave bias. The sound of complaint on social media is deafening. Time for OFCOM to act - the BBC is in breach of it’s Charter. 
Significant step in preparing for Brexit on WTO terms as the Haulage Permits and Trailer Registration Act - providing for any outcome of the negotiations - receives Royal Assent.  
Have just been with the Kippers in Bedford High Street polling No Deal Brexit versus May’s Brexit.Result,astonishing 7-1 No Deal/No€40 Billion get us out now!Half a dozen UKIP membership application forms!Punters have had enough!We’re on the way back alright!  
We had a fantastic @EastwoodSNP SNP stall today in Clarkston.  Loads of good conversations with local residents and people are very unhappy with Brexit and what they are seeing from Westminster right now. #activeSNP 
Top Eurocrat Jean-Claude Juncker ‘swigs gin instead of water and lets his aide run the EU’:  #Brexit 
RETURN OF FARAGE: Ukip Membership soars after May’s ‘TREASONOUS’ Brexit strategy  
Tony Blair @InstituteGC is advocating for a second Brexit referendum. But what should the question be? pic.twitter.com/KlTOW4MapK 
No deal Brexit huh? Honda Swindon receives 2m components a day through free movement of goods. A no deal Brexit, to store the minimum 9 days' worth of components on site they need to erect the 3rd-largest building on Earth: 300,000 sq m = 42 football pitches. (source: FT 26.6.18) 
The #voters got it RIGHT THE FIRST TIME. #JohnMajor also got it right the first time, when he said "there won't be another #referendum on #Europe."  #RightTheFirstTime!  #BBC #SKY #LBC @ConHome @CCHQPress @theresa_may @Conservatives @DCBMEP @andreajenkyns 
I think a nascent love of an institution I grew up with has probably made me give the BBC far too much benefit of the doubt on Brexit (and #indyref before it). This exchange has pushed me over the edge though. It’s own actions have discredited it comprehensively. 
Jacob Rees-Mogg says UK is heading for no-deal Brexit SO ! ARE YOU CLAIMING *MISSION ACCOMPLISHED*  JAKEY ? 
Out in #Barrhead this afternoon, great to chat to many people who are angry about the Tories plans (or lack thereof) for Brexit. #activeSNP 
Theresa May is promising a Brexit that "works for every part of the UK"Except...(a) Brexit will NOT work for every part of the UK(b) It will hit Scotland the hardestIt's time we stopped being led down the garden path by liars, cheats & charlatansIt's time for independence  
And when the post #Brexit landscape doesn’t deliver what we want we will blame the Govt for not delivering when what we were expecting is impossible ... because it’s up to us (uk )not them (eu) 
I wasn't looking forward to 2019 for a lot of reasons - Brexit being the biggest - but then I realised that Star Trek Discovery returns then, so I'm now hyped as fuck for it. pic.twitter.com/FIuxJXLKLr 
#Brexit won't stop you travelling to and settling in a EU country.  
We're here in #Eltham talking to passers-by about the need for a #PeoplesVote on #Brexit and collecting signatures for the #PeoplesVotePetition.Come and say hello!Here until 2pm Volunteers from @OB_Greenwich @euromove @GreenwichInEU @_Britain4Europe @peoplesvote_uk @Open_Britain 
PRO EU HAMMOND now trying to force open borders on Britain,  absolute anathema to the British people, in open contradiction of what we voted for!  TO SATISFY MERKEL!     RESIGN!  @borisjohnson #borisjohnson #boris johnson   #Brexit @theresa_may 
Here's Elliott, shortly after the #EURef explaining how ex-#VoteLeave staff and MPs 'are now at the heart of Government.' 
Australia is about to overtake Britain as the second most popular destination for international students. The UK’s spot as the leading destination for European students is “about to be decimated by Brexit”. A huge export business being wrecked. by #Brexit. 
The Chequers Agreement would leave 80% of our economy exposed after Brexit. The only way to protect jobs and businesses is to remain in the EU. That is why the public must be given a final say on the Brexit deal, with the option to remain. 
Leavers have now abandoned all their #Brexit myths except “global free trade opportunities”. There is no deal which is better than the status quo, with all the UK’s opt-outs. The rest is suicide#PeoplesVote #FBPE @thetimes 
The voters got it RIGHT THE FIRST TIME. John Major also got it right the first time, when he said "there won't be another referendum on Europe." #RightTheFirstTime 
Brexit is a scam to crash the GDP of the UK so that certain monied interests can buy up the country's assets on the cheap.Christopher Chandler bought up tons of Russian assets after the fall of the USSR, wants to do the same with the UK, backed Brexit through Legatum Institute.  
I’ve signed this all party letter calling for tougher election laws given what we already know about the subversion of the EU Referendum. #BrexitShambles #Peoplesvote 
#PeoplesVote Leafleting, talking and asking people of Stockport to indicate their views on Brexit on our Brexitometer  
Pitch for a terrible B-movie: a Jane Austen-esque take on a Brit trying to find an EU27 spouse to marry before No Deal Brexit."It is a truth universally acknowledged, that a single man in possession of an EU27 passport must be in want of a husband." 
Exhibit 2 on the BBC's failure over #Brexit coverage - especially recent revelations of law breaking and Russian influence When Lord Reith said the BBC should 'inform and entertain' he still expected the News to be distinguishable from Light Entertainment  
And we will be able to trade post Brexit but as we wil be competing against countries that have preferential deals it’s going to be hard to compete both in terms of process and price.  
Sweetheart it wasn’t scaremongering it is fact.  It is fact that the U.K. credit rating has been slashed, that we had the highest rate of growth in the G7 before the referendum, that the pound has been slashed meaning you are paying more for everything, jobs are moving to the EU  
1) Job destruction caused by Brexit will boost far-right too. 2) Far-left saying this to help Corbyn. 3) Fine to have this opinion but she doesn't represent ALL non-white voice. So, disagreeing doesn't make you racist, as some are claiming.  
1/. Wow, Rob Burley.You allowed Vote Leave to have a big slot to dispute a then unpublished EC Report ...a report that clarifies that the EC has made A FINDING that Vote Leave broke the very laws that are designed by Parliament to ensure fair referendum. 
Brexit is looking more and more like the naked Emperor.  MPs are too scared of being the child and saying that the Emperor has no clothes because of being called unpatriotic. But everyone now surely knows that the Emperor is stark bollock naked. 
An incomplete list of things have divided our fanbase:PulisLambertHughesScholes SJWSNZGlenn WhelanBrexitTeam selection every weekSo please don't tell me we shouldn't sign James McClean because it divides the fanbase ! #SCFC 
Anyone who says spending £600,000 cannot swing a referendum is lying.Reach 14M - 25.4M. If you were not angry before, get angry and engage.*BOOM*#FBPE #PeoplesVote #ExitFromBrexit 
So, instead of the sunlit uplands of Brexit we’re now down to this….  
Even Doncaster thinks brexit is a shambles. #PeoplesVote 
Clear what #Whitstable residents think about #Brexit it's going badly & we need #PeoplesVote Sparkly magnetic buttons working brilliantly @Labour4EU @EK_EuropeanMove @ct4europe @euromove 
The line-up for the Great Northern Stop #Brexit Conference just gets better & better! @albawhitewolf @alexsobel @natalieben @RCorbettMEP @Femi_Sorry @eloisetodd & many more now confirmed speakers. Get your tickets here at the special early price of £10:  
Brussels officials say May's Brexit white paper left them feeling as if they are in a time warp  
World War 2 was to stop Hitler from taking over the continent and murdering millions of people. Brexit is about making passports blue. Not really sure the projects are of equal merit to be honest. Just because we can survive something unnecessary doesn’t mean we should do it.  
This is what the Irish border communities think of Brexit  
The most honest and correct assessment of Brexit yet.  
1/ #Brexit and Trump are instances of a primitive tribalist politics, in which the strength of the tribe is the supreme value, overriding other values such as truthfulness, reason, human rights and lawfulness. #PeoplesVote #StopBrexit 
We're starting to get an idea of the shape of #Brexit now.Government, not parliament are seeking to make laws that will affect your every day life. With no higher court to appeal to. When will you wake up? 
Today’s addition to the panel for the Great Northern Stop #Brexit Conference is none other than Young European of the Year, @YEM_UK Ambassador & EU Supergirl, Madeleina Kay! @albawhitewolf. Fresh from last night’s appearance on @Channel4News Maddie will have plenty to say. #gnsbc 
Ohmigod. After all the Shire & hobbit Brexit references, this is what it is: Saruman in Bag End.  
I recall Lineker, on the eve of the referendum, calling for unity and respect "whatever the result" (because he expected Remain to win).  Since they lost he has spent two years relentlessly moaning about it and insulting those that voted Leave.  
You're seriously going with, "We're planning for WW2-type disruption of medical supplies, transport & food shortages, but hey, electing JC would be worse," to defend your asinine decision to pursue #Brexit, despite EURef failing the test in ENGLISH LAW for a democratic vote?MAD 
fucking gammon. this one reckons we should aim for no deal, because then we don't have to pay the 'Brexit bill' what the fuck do you think everyone will think of that when we go to make trade deals and they all know the UK runs away without paying?? 
The wonderful team are on Northumberland Street in Newcastle now ready to answer questions about @peoplesvote_uk and what Brexit will mean door the North East. @angelsforeurope @NewEuropeans @ChronicleLive @OpenBritainNE @_Britain4Europe 
Remember: Brexit is not a cult based in faith not facts. I repeat: it is not a cult.  
Jacob Rees-Mogg had an entertaining exchange with a caller who says the EU Referendum was "not democratic and not honest". 
.@LibDems are proposing a 1% income tax increase, dedicated to priority areas of healthcare, such as social, primary and mental health. Read my full article on what will happen to our NHS post-Brexit if we don’t take action 
Highly recommended read on current state of play. It won’t cheer you up, but it is excellent insight. In my view @tconnellyRTE is one of the best Brexit commentators around. Well informed, detailed, cogent and accessible, especially - not surprisingly - on the Irish implications.  
One should note that Angela Merkel was speaking on the anniversary of the failed attempt to assassinate Hitler in 1944. As far as her remarks are concerned, populism raises its ugly head again and again. We have not yet learnt how to resist it as #Trump and Brexit demonstrate 
According to government economic assessments on Brexit, up to 2 million jobs could be lost.Jeremy Corbyn claims to be a champion for the workers, yet he sits on the fence over Brexit. Right now he needs to show leadership, protect jobs, and call for a #peoplesvote on Brexit. 
Where to even start? That we still haven't learnt after 2 years that the Commission runs negotiations for Member States? That they have many other issues to deal with and don't wish to expend their capital on Brexit?  
Farage WARNS 'dishonest' May: Brexit betrayal to spark backlash ‘like nothing before'  
Police in Ireland & Northern Ireland very worried about Brexit - ‘a perfect storm’  
So Brexit isn't a disaster because we're getting lots of tourists?  I wonder if Andrew has considered that they're coming here while they're still able and that they want to see the chimps hurling faeces at each other?  
If it helps your discussion I would add that my mother will be 102 this year and regards Brexit as a betrayal of her generation. She has always been ardently pro-EU seeing it as an instrument to preserve peace in Europe. God bless her! 
WATCH | "If May had put a quarter of the energy into stitching up the Europeans the way she stitched up David Davis, Brexit would be done by now and we'd have Calais back"He has a point! Support us at  
Shut your hole cunty, you set up your investment firm in Dublin because Brexit is a collective shart  
After 2008 recession, suicide in England rose by 700 deaths/yr - reminder of how remote & reckless economic decisions track into lives of vulnerable people. #Brexit 
Literally NOBODY knew what they were voting for. Brexit can mean a million different things, and was explained by Leave campaigners in countless different ways.  
We should’ve taken Juncker at his word when he told Varadkar and the Irish Parliament that physical infrastructure and customs checks wouldn't be needed if the UK left the EU on WTO terms.Instead we’ve allowed the EU to use the Irish border to bounce the UK into a bad Brexit. 
In Folkestone supporting today's @EK_EuropeanMove street stall. We have been talking to people about #Brexit, the #NHS, and why the country needs a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal.Sign the #PeoplesVotePetition today at  
I completely agree, over the last couple of years the BBC has just let the Gov't get away with complete lies "Brexit Dividend for the NHS" for example.  It's treatment of @carolecadwalla when she was on was also disgraceful. 
Do you want to be part of the Brexit resistance? Get your summer campaign pack here:  
RUSSIA FUNDED BREXIT! Oh yes it did! Do you think Arron Banks had £10 million to Brexit? Really? He didn't have enough money to fund his dormant diamond mines in South Africa...so he went to the Russians, who saw an opportunity. Dot joining...amazing where it gets you. 
"We may well hold Irish passports but as we no longer live in an EU jurisdiction we will no longer be EU rights holders. And ironically by extension will not be equal Irish citizens on any level. In March. Next year."-- On Irish citizens in North & Brexit 
Michael Heseltine: ‘Unthinkable that the biggest peacetime political disaster of my life is being forced through the House of Commons with any device, threat or chicanery that the government can turn its hand to.’And the referendum was won by criminal methods.#ThisIsACoup 
If you think #Brexit is bad, worse is to come: Steve Bannon, Trump’s former chief advisor, has told The Daily Beast that he is setting up a foundation in Europe called The Movement which he hopes will lead a right-wing populist revolt across the continent  
They should put the guy in charge of McDonald’s breakfast cut off time in charge of Brexit negotiations. He doesn’t fuck about. 
Did you vote #Brexit to ‘give the establishment a kick up the backside’? Wholly reasonable! Meet your new ‘leader’ #Eton educated, former President of the Oxford University Conservative Association, net worth estimated at more than £100 million! Time to Rethink? #FinalSay 
The argument the BBC should be covering here is not about whether the  Leave campaign broke the law (they did, it has been proved), but whether  this effectively delegitimises the referendum - and if so, what the  consequences should be... @carolecadwalla @JolyonMaugham 
BBC fat cat Gary Lineker goes on massive anti-Brexit rant calling for a second referendum – a week after hitting out at politicians who talk about football:  
Are you privately schooled but always thought you were a rebel?Are you well off but enjoy the idea of forcing other people to give up their views?Do you dream of disaster capitalism because you want to start a tractor collective?If so Labour Brexit is perfect for you.. 
The only way to stop Brexit is if enough people who voted for it, accept that they were misled - that could lead to an unprecedented class action to the Administrative Court challenging the Government's authority to bring us out of the EU without a deal. I want to hear from them. 
Brexit: poorer, fewer trade deals, worse NHS, slashed sovereignty, reduced control, increased redtape, reduced security, reduced democracy, higher inflation, increased wasted management time, reduced workers’ & human rights, reduced freedoms,lower environmental and food safety 
At Whitstable Street Stall, asking the big question of the day: Brexit is it worth it?@peoplesvote_uk #PeoplesVotePetition #peoplesvote 
The Queen’s accountants have warned that Brexit could pose a risk to her finances as income from her private estate jumped £1 million to a record £20 million  
It is folly to regard Theresa May as a beleaguered moderate trying to restrain the extremists. Her track record shows very clearly that she is an authoritarian nationalist. She is an extremist pretending to be a moderate to keep the moderates on board.#StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE 
Unbelievable.  I've asked him to DM me and suggested we  speak on the phone. Staggering that a man in this position can get this this wrong.  Explains a lot in terms of BBC political coverage of Brexit if they can't understand this - scary. 
Stark post #brexit warning for Scotland's farmers at event organised by @JimFairlieLogie, with @keepScotBrand & @scotfoodjames highlighting disaster unfolding if Scot Ag & Food forced to follow race to the bottom by UKGov's desperate US trade deal strategy #KeepScotlandTheBrand 
A no deal #Brexit would be nothing other than an attack on the nation by a tiny foreign-linked minority seeking to make profits out of the suffering of the British people. It should not be regarded as normal politics, it should be regarded as crime/treason/war.#StopBrexit #FBPE 
Why is Brexit happening?  This cartoon may help explain ...#Brexit #StopBrexit #DavidDavis #Remain #Brexitshambles #ERG #FBPE #ABTV #WATON #PeoplesVote #FinalSay #ReesMogg 
The PM’s new deal gives control to Brussels and takes away all the UK's current power. No one voted for this in 2016. If this arrangement is accepted by the Cabinet then both sides of the Brexit debate will be outraged. #ExitfromBrexit 
16/ Brexit means that all of the legal infrastructure comes to an end. There are those that think the EU will cave in at the last minute and allow access to air space. It doesn't work like that, there is no legal frame work to do so. 
15/ Then there is international flights to the US for example. EASA has a cross agreement with America about standards. After Brexit these cross agreements come to an end and need to be replaced with something else. There is nothing else to fall back on. 
9/ No maintenance staff are qualified to do routine work. No planes are certified as air worth. They all expire on date of Brexit. 
Remember how Neil also ignored the fantasy Vote Leave overspending narrative? Remember how Neil helped @arron_banks fundraise for Brexit via his Addison club? Remember how @LordAshcroft implicated in "fantasy Russian narrative" also a founding member? 
May’s Belfast Speech is another step on the wrong road to Brexit  
You can't just stop Brexit. It would be a disaster. There needs to be a second referendum on the deal and that is not undemocratic. Suggesting that you just "give up" on fighting the insanity because you're afraid of upsetting Tommy Robinson fans is pathetic 
How Barnier described Chequers: "unfair" and unlikely to be 'workable' and possibly even 'legal'.As we already knew, the govt's Brexit plans have no chance. We need to start talking about meaningful alternatives beyond the No Deal apocalypse.  
I was trying to cut dairy out anyways. #brexit Butter, yoghurt and cheese could become ‘occasional luxuries’ after Brexit  
Cons are relying on the threat of a Corbyn Gov't to get away with their Brexit sell out. They forget, unlike many politicians, some voters have integrity, and if that results in Corbyn's clowns in office, so be it. 
It is Saturday morning on the border, and the border people are tea-and-coffeeing, and reading about their border in the toiletpapery press, and not recognizing their lives in the guff-and-spun lies of the Brexit-bile, and contemplating their futures here in the all-lovely real 
I’m sorry Prime Minister but your plan doesn’t deliver the Brexit that I voted for. You had a golden opportunity to deliver a #GlobalBritain but you have squandered this once in a generation moment to make our country great again. 
Rees-Mogg on #LBC: "We are the Saxon and the EU are the Norman."Fuck me, he wants to re-fight the Battle of Hastings!#Brexit 
Hi @CaroleCadwalla what chance do you think there is of @RobBurl (Editor of BBC Live Political Programmes) making sure BBC viewers see this graph showing how criminal cheating very likely swung the EU ref & also showing most people don't want Brexit now!  
@anneapplebaum @DamianCollins @UKParliament If anything Carole, Trump-Brexit is bigger than Watergate. It is a massively-funded criminal right wing conspiracy to steal both US democracy AND UK democracy - and you should be extremely proud of the role you have taken in exposing it 
You leave that really difficult job until the last minute. You keep putting it off and you start kidding yourself that it will be fine. Then you realise that you haven't got a clue how to do it and you’ve left it too late. That’s when you realise you are Theresa May.#Brexit 
Well, about 20% of us did - yay Brexit!  
Andrea Leadsom will experience more collective responsibility when the Tories are trashed at the next GE. This is not the Brexit we all voted for, it's a fudge to placate Remainers.  
I think much of the confusion inherent to the British internal Brexit debate stems from a concerted unwillingness to grasp the concept of sequencing. 
Wow!!! Andrea Leadsom told Theresa May to her face.. your Chequers plan ‘betrays’ Brexit referendum result..Absolutely extraordinary cabinet minister calls the Prime Minister a betrayer!!!!  
Hi @PiersMorgan could you please RT this graph showing how criminal cheating corrupted the EU ref and how the British people don't want Brexit. #StopBrexitSaveBritain 
The increasing flouting of laws & outright cheating by the political class, aided by a complicit media, is pushing us toward reaction... a reaction they can use as a pretext for a state of emergency no-deal Brexit... under the ERG. Are you very afraid yet? 
Leaked minutes reveal #Leadsom said she "hated" @Theresa_May's #Brexit compromise  
DISGUSTING: Philip Hammond ‘pushing for EU migrants to get preferential access post-Brexit'.That’s the exact opposite of what 17.4 million Leavers voted for!  
Those proposing the UK settles for the "Norway" model post Brexit casually dismiss that would mean continued unlimited movement of people across our borders. 
Farmer at Merthyr Food Festival who voted to leave: "I'm thinking about it now... we didn't have enough info at the time of the referendum, and I'm worried about my Slovakian sister in law" Time for a #PeoplesVote 
End to Free Movement into UK and complete control of our borders is an Absolute in the Referendum. So why is Hammond trying to keep Open Borders and Free movement into UK.? 
I really don’t understand this line. If these fools actually opened their eyes, they’d realise the far right had already been emboldened by Brexit. The only way we can stop this idiocy is by having a second referendum.  
What's next for Brexit? “Basically nobody has the faintest idea," says @CER_Grant 
Today’s Brexit cliche “loves Europe but not the EU.” Like saying you love children just not the ones you actually have. How sad.  
‘Labour would win if Blair was leader now!’He understood the mood in the 90s and 2000s, but he admits 'I'm not sure I fully understand politics right now' (referring to Trump, Corbyn and Brexit).Blair has -60% approvals and is disliked by every demographic.How would he win?  
Reminder.1.The uk is the only country to ever vote to impose Severe Economic Sanctions on itself. 2. Brexit only ends Freedom of Movement for BRITISH people.The rest of the Eu will continue to avoid this great privilege.Brexit. One monumental act of self Harm.#StopBrexit 
The PM could suffer a worse fate than John Major if she betrays Brexit with her 'Nixonian' secrecy 
"May's Chequers plan has been rejected by the EU's Brexit chief – partly because it would give UK firms a competitive edge."LOVE that the EU accept that leaving the EU & lowering tax/regulatory burden would make UK businesses more competitive  
This country's politicians are mired in a monumental shit-show of their own making without a clue how to polish the stinking Brexit turd.....a column  
The establishment lost the EU referendum on June 23rd 2016 and has been campaigning incessantly ever since to re-run it, on their terms. Project Fear has continued as has the contempt for the 17.4m who said LEAVE. 
Five on a Brexit Adventure  
Yet again the @BBCWeekendGMS programme ignores the Scottish dimension to the Westminster Brexit chaos. It's as though they don't want to cover the Scottish Tory splits and the undermining of Ruth Davidson's authority. 
Brexit is worse than terrorists indiscriminately blowing up innocent people, writes the SNP Cllr for Livingston South. Utterly bonkers   
'We don't have to do this.' Six of the sanest words ever uttered about Brexit. The most wicked thing of all about this act of self harm is that we are choosing not just to cause pain to ourselves, but those who will follow us, including those not yet even born.  
Achilles heel of Brexit going septic  
I’m bitterly disappointed by the leak of Cabinet minutes. @andrealeadsom is right to uphold collective responsibility as she sees through her determination to get the Brexit we all voted for. Her loyalty to the PM is admirable.  
Graeme Bandeira on Theresa May’s Brexit strategy with acknowledgements to Abba  - Political Cartoon Gallery in Putney  
David Attenborough says that counting butterflies takes his mind off "the woes of Brexit".We'll do the #bigbutterflycount , enjoy the "precious breathing space" from modern life, recharge batteries and then get back to campaigning to #StopBrexit 
All set up and ready to go! The people of Stamford deserve a say on the final Brexit deal #peoplesvote 
For now, this affects just some smaller suppliers from the UK, but unless no-deal Brexit is abandoned soon, things will escalate. Large companies won't hesitate to get rid of any supplier which cant guarantee that their logistics will continue to work with JIT manufacturing. 
Ask your MP to support musicians working the EU post-Brexit! It’s not too late to have a say on your right to tour, collaborate & sustain a viable career >  #WorkingInTheEU 
.⁦@andrealeadsom⁩ said she “hated” the PM’s #Brexit compromise & said it betrayed the referendum result, leaked minutes reveal.So the cabinet unity is all a lie. We are absolutely sick of the lies.#ChequersMeansCorbyn#MAYMUSTGO 
Tim. I am sad to say that you are wasting your time trying to explain to these Brexit zealots with facts. Brexit is a religion; no amount of logic or sound argument will influence them. As Michael Gove said, they are tired of expert opinion. 
What's the difference between the devastation of the  blitz of WW2 and the devastation of #Brexit? The blitz wasn't self inflicted and couldn't have been avoided. 
How can a Labour Government be a bigger threat to our economy than a no deal Brexit? Your Government's own forecasts suggest that it will deflate our economy by 8% and cost 2.8 million jobs. If you oversee that calamity, you'll be out of Government for 50 years. #BrexitShambles 
Follow the data. I wrote this more than a year ago when we first detailed Cambridge Analytica's relationship to AIQ - the company at the heart of Brexit. Data is money. The data trail is every bit as important as the money trail. Follow the data 
Nice to see that Piers is admitting that Brexit is a disaster on a par with World War.  
SENIOR civil servants in Downing Street bypassed #Brexit secretary David Davis in a bid to stop Britain leaving the EU, a former MP and senior aide has claimed.  
That’s the most important point. We had no choice over WWII it was fight or die. We are doing Brexit to ourselves. The government could literally stop Brexit tomorrow if they wanted. 
Very good question. When I asked a senior representative this at a hearing the European Parliament he said it was because it would contravene their privacy rules! *Ironic laughter* If they can do it for the Irish referendum why not for Brexit?#Brexitgate #Faecebook 
I really don't like Corbyn. I've voted for Conservatives several times in the past. And I would definitely vote Labour over you lot. You're a shower, a sham, a joke. You've made a Conservative problem a country problem. & the party will be dead for decades. Brexit is your fault. 
Brexit; ANY brexit, is a stupid and corrupt Policy, being foisted upon us by stupid and corrupt people.It and they deserve nothing but Contemp, Defeat and Ignominy.  
Jesus Christ. Essentially:"We mustn't have a 2nd referendum because it might upset the racists."If you are too scared of the tiny far right then go home, lock your door and hide under the duvet.  
What will the impact of no deal planning be - for businesses, individuals, EU citizens in UK and vice versa, and the politics of Brexit? My latest Brexit Blog post:  
Barnier has rejected May’s plan. From the start I said the Remainer & EU strategy would be to delay & impede the process, & then overturn the Referendum. We are now at the third stage. Will May betray? Doesn’t have to be like this. See my leaving plan:  
Leaver, Remainer, Inbetweener, or a tourist- doesn't matter. If you wish to know who's #Brexit it is & whom to 'thank' for it listen to this. Then follow @carolecadwalla's work & buy @J_amesp's #TheAlternativeWar. If not for self, your children, family & friends deserve the truth 
This seems to be either a big gaffe  by the PM or a major change of Government policy: Theresa May claimed the Belfast (Good Friday) Agreement is built on a "seamless" Irish border, which the Agreement doesn't say. Big implications for Brexit across the UK  
Food expert warns #Brexit could lead to rationing ... and the UK is 'less prepared than in 1939'.Nobody voted for poverty and starvation.  
How does it feel @ScotTories that so many people now know how corrupt you are?Not to mention-Farcical WM Tory government-Disgraceful Tory farce BREXIT-Utter Tory failure in trade-Disgrace of Tory National Debt-Tory perversion & pathological lies-Worst PM in UK historyEtc  
A lot has happened in the last 48 hours in regards to Brexit, and Jacob Rees-Mogg is here to answer your questions. He's taking your calls live from 10am. 
Andrea Leadsom said that she “hated” the prime minister’s Brexit compromise and claimed that it betrayed the referendum result, according to minutes of the Chequers cabinet meeting leaked to The Times  
If the UK Gov is issuing guidelines to people on how to prepare for a No Deal #Brexit , I think @NicolaSturgeon and the @scotgov should be writing to Scottish business and households with what we’re going to do to protect ourselves. It’s time to show some leadership. 
A lunacy. If both parties persist in trying to ruin Britain, the people must act. No, I'm not being alarmist, we can't allow the country to be trashed, and trashed it is going to be with ANY type of Brexit.  
Trump = Brexit = RussiaAnd if you want to know how, PLEASE listen to this. NPR's Terri Gross is a genius who distilled 2 years' reporting on Cambridge Analytica, Steve Bannon, @nigel_farage, Russia & more into a 30-minute blockbuster. No idea how she did it but thank you Terri! 
This negotiation would have a gone a whole lot better to date if we'd set out no deal as the default, immediately ended payments into the #EU budget & let them do the running#Brexit #MayMustGo 
“The roll out of smart meters is over budget and uses obsolete technology “‘according to MPs .. sounds like the max fac headlines regarding magical customs cameras post brexit .. 
This was the first and only time May visited the Irish border since Referendum. Typical of the complacency of the whole Government  
So Brexit now requires comparison to *two world wars* to make a kind of positive point? Wow. Do you have any idea, @piersmorgan, how destructive Brexit has already been to millions of lives? Plus: Leave was achieved only by lies, hate and manipulations. Respect that? Never. Why?  
If we Brexit with no deal1% of the population would be apoplectic with rage at the betrayal 29% would be pretty pissed off at the waste of everyone's time 70% would be extremely relieved And after a few weeks of national debate we'd all move on, apart from the 1% 
Brexit WAKE-UP CALL: Australia urges UK politicians to STOP 'sounding like the EU'  
Jesus this is infuriating. From Brexit’s easily predictable no deal ending to the continued failure of the security services to grip maskirovka, to the endless cycle of faux surprise and general stupidity of the media which is killing people softly. Freefall of freedom. 
Nobody knew what Brexit meant in 2016. Perhaps the time has come for a second referendum  via @bopinion 
May: “...a government I lead will never be neutral in our support for the Union”. Do Scotland and NI face a ‘normal rules do not apply’ scenario under any new election or referendum? GE2015, EUref & GE2017 already delegitimised  due to #ToryElectionFraud #DarkMoney 
Says the man whose investment firm is moving to Ireland to avoid the Brexit fallout  
Very important that we on the left work for @Another_Europe and stay in the EU to work alongside our progressive bothers and sisters from other left parties. Brexit is an abandonment of solidarity so join us!  
TimesExclusive - Leak of the minutes of Chequers Brexit meeting: Andrea Leadsom’s contributions.Read in full her comments including how she “hated” the PM’s Brexit plan 
EU is not playing anything. They just defend their principles.Tired of seeing brexiters victimising themselves when they realize they won’t be able to cherrypick. TBH, no one really talks about brexit on the continent; they’re already moved on. Grow up ffs  
So it's come to comparing #Brexit to 2 tragic world wars. Just over two years ago we were finally recovering from a long economic recession. A leading member of the EU, we had every opportunity to forge a better future for our citizens & to be a force for good in the world.Sad! 
@AMDWaters @2tweetaboutitWe must fight for #Brexit#ChequersPlan is not #BrexitPlease support this petition by retweeting as widely as possibleOur voices must be heard #brexit #MayMustGoNow 
The BBC have made changes to their brexit advert .....  
May's #Brexit proposals died in Brussels in eight short minutes.Does it, maybe, kind of feel like the risk that #Leavers have taken with our children and our children’s children’s futures might not be paying off. 
@realDonaldTrump offered PM a list of his favourite lawyers when discussing Brexit.He advised PM to sue EU rather than negotiate.£58,000,000,000 of EU assets belong to the UK.Why are we not even asking for that money?Tory Gov are useless at negotiating 
Well yeah. What’s particularly galling about these throwaway jingoistic invocations of the war is that the entire point of the EU is to make that kind of sacrifice unnecessary. To compare Brexit to the heroic war effort is… is…   
When it comes to the referendum, voters got it RIGHT THE FIRST TIME. So did Justine Greening when she said "there's no re-doing it if we change our minds".   #RightTheFirstTime 
You may be missing the point, Latimer.  It seems to me that Olly planned for it to fail — maybe discussed it in advance with Barnier. He wants to create a situation where Brexit becomes impossible, and we all despair and give up.  
We Enjoy being cruel to poor peopleS so we want a #brexit that will create a lot more of them  SelfServatives for a SadoBrexit  
I don't want a no deal Brexit and will do anything to stop it 
Australia set to overtake UK in luring foreign students, showing how Theresa May's hardline stance on immigration and then Brexit undermined one of Britain's most successful global sectors. Then they talk about 'Global Britain'  
Labour takes commanding poll leads as Tory vote slumps amid Brexit chaos |  - who trusts polls? But still better to be ahead rather than behind 
Amongst others, @Anna_Soubry is calling for a Unity Government - "a broad coalition gov't consisting of all parties, usually formed during a time of war or other national emergency". @Plaid_Cymru are open to it. Pls vote & RT.Do you support a Unity Gov't to sort out #Brexit? 
Incredible that ideas such as stockpiling vital drugs and shutting a motorway to turn it into a giant lorry park are even being discussed. Underlines again the tragedy of #Brexit and appalling damage caused by nationalist fanatics  
Brexit means Mayhem!!!Theresa MayhemIt was an ‘honest mistake’Theresa Trump captain of the shipwreck HMS Lordfcknhelpus lying like an arsonist dripping in kerosene holding a zippo with the ERG screaming “do it do it do it”  
Here’s my latest take on another tumultuous week...Brexit: White Paper, Westminster chaos and few choices via @RTENewsNow  
By ⁦@IanDunt⁩: “The people who do not know the consequences of the UK's current course of action have chosen not to know.” Unfortunately for us, those people are our government. #Brexit  
The State we are in...Putin  is not only rubbing his hands at Britain and The US after destabilising both...But he is causing Economic damage and Peace in Europe is very unstable.Brexit is total madness It's The Will of Vladimir.#FBPE 
Great to see so many MPs calling for more robust campaign rules in the wake of Vote Leave cheatingWe need a future people’s vote on the terms of Brexit to be very different from 2016: it must be free and fair  #peoplesvote ⁦@BestForBritain⁩ 
So in other words Brexit backers and the Russians bought her off. The Tories really are a vile bunch of money grabbing scum bags, not a shred of decency incany of them.#StopBrexitRevealed: Tory donors who paid £7m to socialise with May 
I’m just picking my jaw off the floor. @BBCr4today interviewed an actual expert, @CSBarnard24 , about the impact of no-deal #Brexit, without insisting she debate the topic with a believer in unicorns. We got clear, non-sensational, fact-based information. Hopefully not a one-off. 
Leaked minutes from Theresa May's Chequers summit reveal Andrea Leadsom said she "hated" the Prime Minister's Brexit proposal because it "breached the government's red lines". 
With Brexit and the Tories in crisis dominating the news agenda, things like this go easily unnoticed...Tory MP questioned by police over claims he forged £700 worth of expenses  
Prof Christopher Rootes Leave voters not stupid but misled & misinformed on #Brexit so "If a democracy cannot change its mind, it ceases to be a democracy" - David Davis we need @peoplesvote_uk @Labour4EU @EK_EuropeanMove @ct4europe 
I doubt Quislings like Terry will be remembered fondly in years to come. People thought he was a prick even before his Brexit Derangement Syndrome took hold.  
May's #Brexit proposals have been two years in the making. They were killed off in Brussels within eight minutes  
'Why haven't we left YET!' MP REVEALS angry demands from Brexit backing constituents  
Keep digging: Fresh revelations about Arron Banks and the Russia connection #Brexit @carolecadwalla 
Is that what is called collective Cabinet responsibility? Telling the truth in private, losing the vote, then lying in public to support the majority. A bit like Brexit generally?  
Remember the public outrage at the MPs' Expenses Scandal? Back then MPs were guilty of stealing just over a million quid from us, yet they will be costing us billions with #Brexit - where's your anger now? We didn't let them get away with it in 2009, time to stop #BrexitFraud now 
We can get to 200,000 today. Please sign or retweet. Let's make news too.  Cannot ignore 200,000 people with a concern over the legality of the referendum.Petition: Rescind Art.50 if Vote Leave has broken Electoral Laws regarding 2016 referendum  
remember the promises that were made at the time of the referendum, because that's all the govt has a mandate for. If the deal is not "as good as the deal we have now" (as promised by the Brexiters), then it should be rejected in favour of Remain.  
White House rejects Russian proposal for Ukrainian referendum  
May’s Belfast Speech is another step on the wrong road to Brexit, says @HughRBennett 
Leadsom: Chequers plan betrays referendum resultWhy did she not resign than? 
Parties don't have to merge to stop #Brexit.They just have to form a temporary #BrexitCoalition to ensure the 17.4m have just ONE candidate to vote for in each constituency.If we can mobilise the 17.4m to vote for #Brexit one more timewe can change politics in the UK forever.  
Good news if true.... 
It looks like Project Fear actually underestimated how catastrophic Brexit will be!!! #StopBrexit #PeoplesVote#BrexitShambles#VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw 
BREXIT REALITY -- IT WAS AND STILL IS ILLEGAL -- - - 
EU's Brexit chief scorns Theresa May's Chequers customs plan. It will create Red Tape, that’s rich from EU.It’s a No then! We have to Leave!  
The ideologues driving Brexit are trashing our democracy ⁦@Freedland⁩ 
“Easiest deal in history”: details of all those eager global partners - including much-vaunted CANZ white knights - objecting to the UK’s post-Brexit “WTO rules” arrangements. Messy doesn’t even begin to describe it.  
 Wanting the benefits of EU membership without the responsibilities is Cakeist. Expecting the EU27 to solve problems that we've created is Cakeist. Supporting Corbyn whilst opposing Brexit is Cakeist. The UK has a serious Cakism problem, and it's time to grow up!#FBPE 
'Theresa May's Brexit proposals died in Brussels in eight short minutes'  
Putin knew Trump would silently go along with Russia’s proposal for a fake ‘referendum’ in Donbas because …… Trump is too dim-witted to know where Donbas is, and …… the ‘kompromat’ Russia’s intel services have on Trump means he’ll agree to anything. 
The 3Rs of fighting ConAss and Chacha : RESIST  REJECT RENOUNCE. Tell your Congressman that his constituency is AGAINST ConAss and he won’t win them if he votes for it; If it ever gets to referendum, vote a resounding NO; use all available platforms to SHOUT #JUNKCHACHA 
I fought for and helped pass the last school funding referendum, and I’m excited to suit up again for this one. Let’s go! #VoteYesForKids #VoteYesForSPPS 
I refer back to this interview I gave a year and a half before the ill-fated Brexit referendum. I said both major political parties were wrong to compete with UKIP and not condemn them relating to the perception of immigration by “the working classes”.  
The life cycle of a hard line Leaver2016 - "they need us more than we need them, #Brexit deal is easy"2018 - "we don't need a deal, WTO is brilliant"2020 - "those bastards in the EU, the UK is in a mess & I've lost my job because *they* punished us"  
Trump Slams Door On Putin's Offer For Referendum In Eastern Ukraine  
Forget #Brexit, count butterflies, says David Attenborough  
Top #campaigner for a so-called "#PeoplesVote" finds out we already had one - it was to #Leave the #EU! #RightTheFirstTime!  #BBC #SKY @LBC #LBC @ConHome @CCHQPress @theresa_may @Conservatives @DCBMEP @andreajenkyns #Tory #Tories #ConservativeParty #Brexit 
We chose to fight against an aggressor who would have invaded and subjected our country. There is no comparison to the self inflicted #Brexit disaster that is unfolding because some disaster capitalists wanted to throw of the yoke of EU regulation 3/ 
Those dismissing #Iranian monarchists: there’s nothing wrong with wishing for a return of monarchy. A constitutional monarchy makes sense for #Iran & the idea has many supporters both within & outside #Iran. What u should support is a post-regime referendum so people can choose. 
Two possible explanations for Putin’s ridiculous #HelsinkiSummit proposals (McFaul, Ukraine referendum)1. He doesn't think much of Trump's savvy, was testing how far he could move the marker w/out Trump rejecting his ideas outright.2. Trump can't refuse any offers (#Kompromat). 
If we'd had a referendum on the Esplanade Riel it wouldn't be here. If we'd had a referendum on the CMHR it wouldn't be here. If we'd had a referendum on the Bell MTS Centre it wouldn't be here. The #Winnipeg of the future deserves better #wpg18 
Breaking Brexit News: Another day of the same old shit from the mainstream media. Anti-Semitism to deflect from the real issues.In Other News:May’s senior #Brexit official, Olly Robbins, gets a bonus of almost £20,000 for a good  performance.You can't make this shit up! pic.twitter.com/chD8vqp4VD 
It's at the stage that the Irish media is doing the job the British media should be doing on brexit. Big shout out to @tconnellyRTE & f**k the @BBC utterly useless 
37% of the electorate... (which didn't include @the3million or UK expats)26% of the UK population... 1 quarter voted for some  vague idea of #Brexit that wasn't defined#TheresaMay's Chequers deal is not the will of the majorityNeither is crashing out with a #NoDealBrexit 
If you would support Nigel Return to frontline politics Retweet 
The PM could suffer a worse fate than John Major if she betrays Brexit with her 'Nixonian' secrecy  via @Telegraph 
Do you agree with Justine Greening, the solution is a straightforward vote for people on final Brexit options, and between three clear paths?1. Final Chequers deal2. No Deal and leaving on WTO rules3. Remain in the EU.Let's test this with a pollWhich would you vote for? 
Philip Hammond has reportedly said that EU workers should be given "preferential treatment" when entering the UK post-Brexit. @MatthewStadlen asks: is this ignoring the wealth of talent from the rest of the world? 
'No deal" is not the same as "hard brexit". It is not "stay in the EU after all". It is a disorderly exit and national chaos, with  HMG most likely having to impose a state of emergency.  And it happens *automatically* next March unless HMG either agrees a deal or rescinds A50.  
My very talented daughter is a budding artist (as all kids) but she LOVES creating characters. She was so inspired by the story of our Brexit thwarting EU supergirl  @albawhitewolf she made this for her! Hope you like EU-nicorn self! Seren sends Lots of love! See u @BylineFest ? 
Michel Barnier questions Theresa May's Brexit White Paper.He’s not the only one. May's latest Brexit plan didn’t even survive a discussion with her own party.The EU and the British people should reject May’s plan and #StopBrexit. 
Mike trying push labour to the centre is what started this whole problem in the first place. People don't want watered down Tories. They want a socialist alternative. Also running another referendum isn't the magic answer to a divided country. Get out of your liberal bubble. 
When twats say we need to 'get behind' and 'make a success of' Brexit, what they REALLY by that is keep quiet. It's code for 'shut up'.So keep calling them twats. Very loudly. 
The government sees the armed forces as a trivial bargaining chip in their Brexit capitulation. It would be less of an insult to our fighting men if they were attempting to stand up to the EU in other areas.  
Brexit-backer Arron Banks denies fresh allegation of Russia links  
I can’t help but compare.Five months ago, I was in Almetyevsk, a much smaller city that built 50 kilometers of protected bike lane in a year......now here I am in Winnipeg, a city which apparently needs a referendum to put in 4 crosswalks. See this:  
I'm not a conspiracy theorist, but ffs, I listened to radio 4 all day, and it was complete propaganda, all day, completely biased and so obviously propaganda.... Brexit Broadcasting Company for sure now. Brexit will fail. Especially if it happens. Remember I said that. X 
It’s time to consider civil or criminal prosecutions of @BBCNews executives for their part in deliberately covering up and propagating the Russian funded #Brexit fraud.  The establishment is fatally corrupted  
Tougher powers needed to prevent election 'tampering and manipulation' after Brexit campaign fined, MPs demand And watch the video of Shahmir. 
The UK Is Holding The Peace Process As A Political Hostage In Its Brexit Negotiations  
Brexit has been defined throwing away everything you have to get back something that you never lost. 
Your strength and resilience to fight Brexit is what motivates me and thousands of others to do the same.Thank you @albawhitewolf, you are a true inspiration!#StopBrexit #PeoplesVote #PeoplesVotePetition 
OMG how the hell were the folk of Aberdeen South fooled into voting for this lying dod of Shite. Its his party with their Brexit farce that is breaking up his precious farce of a union. A union that uses Scotland as an open purse while abusing our citizens  
Just catching up with the Brexit white paper translation fiasco. Estonia and Finland mistranslated. Invented German words. Dutch words in German version. French told that Brexit is moral issue. And this was all meant to be part of a charm offensive. Sack Google Translate 
TM continues to proceed on the basis that she is obliged to deliver on the referendum result when we now know it was was obtained by corrupt and illegal practices - ie was by definition not a democratic vote.  
RT the hell out of this one...the #Brexit cheats can't be allowed to get away with it...  
Jess @jessphillips, you represent a community that would be devastated by a ‘No Deal’ Brexit.No one knows better than you the jobs and livelihoods linked to the EU. With 3 months to go, where is your outrage? Why aren't you going berserk?#AnythingToSay 
We strongly recommend all businesses should plan for the possibility of a no deal #Brexit. It is not certain, but it is, in our view, more likely than when we published our recent report.  
A no deal #Brexit would serve Putin, Trump & a transatlantic faction of the super-rich who see taxes as theft & democratic states as thieves. A no deal #Brexit by grossly harming the nation to the advantage of foreign powers would surely be an act of treason. #StopBrexit #FBPE 
These Autocrats must be stopped...there is no basis for any valid #Brexit let alone this one..it has nothing to do with the Will of the Ppl & everything to do with the will of a handful of ideologues allowed to get away with it by craven MPs. #PeoplesVote 
I voted to Leave the EU but the absolute shambles that this bunch of lying and deceitful charlatans has brought us to has changed my mind due to their total incompetence. If there were another referendum I would vote to remain. This government has no clue how to negotiate Brexit.  
Newspaper headlines: Britain's Brexit plan 'savaged by EU'  
A no deal #Brexit would cause unprecedentedly violent fluctuations in the value of Sterling. A paradise for speculators and even better for those tipped-off about political announcements. Almost everyone else would suffer. #PeoplesVote #StopBrexit 
The will of the people? These #Brexit ideologues are destroying democracy  
Why do we need to set money aside?  Brexit was sold as something with no downsides and no economic ill effects.  You don’t need to set money aside to move to a new job, with better pay.   
Kate Howie the #brexit femme Farage  
Labour’s shadow sports minister has suggested that the St George’s Cross has been tainted by Brexit and has become associated with “far-right ideology”Do they ever do anything that actually attracts voters? 
As a bloke who’s worked in politics for to many years now I have never called one of my female colleagues stupid. Even when I’ve disagreed with them! It is only right that @andreajenkyns stands on her convictions on brexit and I would hope others would as well!  
But Wee Jeffrey O'Donaldson said traffic cameras would do the job. Are you telling us that the DUP went into this Brexit thing with no fucking idea how to implement it? 
This is my #FBSIParty I support Scottish Independence & am calling for a second referendum. I am looking to connect with others who agree Please:  1 Like 2 Retweet 3 Follow I will follow backCopy this tweet to your own.#ScotRef #YellowWave #FBSI #IndyRef #Indyref2 #aye 
Ok, let's be clear about this: schools have broken up for summer not knowing how they're going to fund the teachers' pay round, there's no money for the NHS, record numbers are using foodbanks, and living on the streets. But you say there's a bottomless pit of money for brexit..  
Who else should we invite to speak at the Great Northern Stop #Brexit Conference? Tweet us your suggestions! #gnsbc  
Late to this unstartling news that the exit from Brexit party continues to gain ground   
.@CPhilpOfficial on @Channel4News claims the outcome of the referendum was legitimate despite the fact that #VoteLeaveBroketheLawClaiming that illegal over spending did not affect the outcome of the vote is FALSE. £600000 could reach 25.4m Facebook users! @Andrew_lilico 
Hysteria over Varadkar aviation comments doesn’t fly  @bbcnewsnight #brexit 
Any politicians who conspire to inflict a no deal #Brexit on the British people should be regarded as criminals and in due course the law should impose a fittingly harsh punishment on them. There must be no impunity for such a crime.#StopBrexit #PeoplesVote 
No, what they show is this; Mr Mogg’s fellow travellers, despite their much trumpeted Unionism, had given not one moment’s thought to the consequences in Northern Ireland of their Brexit obsession. Wiser heads are now confronting them with reality. #BrexitChaos 
Theresa May is preparing Britain for a no-deal Brexit, and it's terrifying | The Canary  
Self-described communist @AyoCaesar fears a remain victory in a second referendum would lead to a “renewed and emboldened far-right” #newsnight 
The treachery!  BREXIT BETRAYAL: David Davis ally reveals Downing Street 'CONSPIRACY' - 'This is SERIOUS'  
The will of the people? These Brexit ideologues are destroying democracy 
My rule of thumb: If the wealthy privileged elite want something this badly, it must be bad for my family. Rees-Mogg will have arranged his affairs to profit from Brexit and cares little if millions of plebs lose.  
Publicly Andrea Leadsom here says we are leaving the EULeaked minutes from #Chequers reveal she complained in private that the #ChequersPlan is not #BrexitLike May - say one thing in public, another in privateRT if you are a Leave supporter who has lost faith in Ms Leadsom  
A woman from a free country unfettered by the EU blob speaks. #brexit  
‘Do not go gentle into job losses.Rage, rage against crazy Brexit..’imagine what it must feel like to be a Brexiteer like Carswell, Farage, Mogg, IDS to watch your life’s work dying in front of you as the British people realise it’s a complete con.I think of that constantly  
"I think if Theresa May had put a quarter of the energy into stitching up the Europeans the way she stitched up @DavidDavisMP Brexit would have been done by now and we would have taken back Calais" argues former Vote Leave director Chris Montgomery #newsnight 
#Brexit in a nutshell on #newsnight. A condescending, ignorant bod from Vote Leave mansplaining Irish border to MEP @MaireadMcGMEP, then talking over her. 
The Brextremists are blaming "Remoaners" & the EU for Brexit being a crock of shit! Not themselves of course! Who do you blame? 
These people are going to be really disappointed in the near future when they realise that post brexit Britain is still a diverse & welcoming place with a fine selection of cheese options still on offer.  
"Whether Canada ends up as o­ne national government or two national governments or several national governments, or some other kind of arrangement is, quite frankly, secondary in my opinion" ~ Stephen Harper, 1995, discussing Quebec Referendum. A real patriot. #cdnpoli #cdnmedia 
All these idiots hero worshipping Soubry when, apart from Brexit, her voting record is just as right wing as Rees Mogg #thelastleg 
Ok so @British_Airways update. 6/7 hour delay we are now about to take off but there is no food. All food has been taken off as it went off. If this plane journey is a sign of Brexit and our Proud UK  Future -I’m shitting it. 
Theresa May's Brexit proposals have been two years in the making. They were killed off in Brussels within eight minutes. via @tompeck 
Our president, Venki Ramakrishnan, has written to @theresa_may regarding the Brexit White Paper. Read the full letter here -  
Saturday's Express: "Brexit plan savaged  by EU 'mafia'" #tomorrowspaperstoday #bbcpapers (via @hendopolis) 
Breaking : Leaked tweets from Barniers phone between him and Theresa May! | #Brexit #Scotref #Indyref. 
Brexit in a nutshell, courtesy of @BigTomD#TheLastLeg 
Anna Soubry is part of the reason my mother (who worked as long as she physically could) effectively has her benefits cut every year. If you feel like trying to rehabilitate Soubry's image because she says some sassy shit about Brexit, please go and fuck yourselves. #TheLastLeg 
The EU's chief negotiator has hinted Brussels is anticipating further changes to Theresa May's Brexit blueprint  
If Watford get £50M for Richarlison then they should automatically be put in charge of Brexit negotiations. 
“BREXIT is like a fight in a pub!” @BigTomD 
Theresa May is preparing Britain for a no-deal Brexit, and it’s terrifyingBy @Undercoverinfo1 
Price of annual subscription to the Heather Small Fan Club to increase from £27 to £84 next year “due to Brexit”  
Anna Soubry may talk some sense on Brexit but she has still consistently voted for austerity, privatisation of public services and the rest of the Conservatives' right-wing agenda so I'll keep my excitement under control, ta. #TheLastLeg #isitok 
Coming up shortly @BBCNewsnight live from Dublin on #Brexit state of play @FineGael @EPPGroup @yfg 
60 British MPs - the far right Brexiteers - are holding 500 million people to ransom. That is the true state of #Brexit.It should and must be stopped.#bbcnewsten 
EXC: Guto Bebb - the Minister who dramatically quit over Brexit on Monday is under secret investigation by Tory HQ for multiple complaints of bad baviour:  
We can’t afford to Brexit. It doesn’t matter what the opinion poll said or what was on the bus or what I think or you think. It’s like taking a family vote to move out of your street & discovering it’ll cost 100 billion. It doesn’t matter what your racist little brother wants. 
Handy exhibit of how different parts of Fleet Street view Brexit:- Express and Mail says the plan has been savaged/scorned by Michel Barnier.- FT says he’s adopted a conciliatory tone.  
Being an immigrant, I think I see Brexit with a dispassionate clarity that is difficult for Brits. From where I sit, the UK has the best deal of any EU state but wants to risk job security, prosperity and peace for “sovereignty”. You are sovereign, I don’t get it. 
It's been a tough week with the Brexit madness getting madder, driving my already low mood lower.If same for you here's something that cheered me up.They make a new plane to transport wings. They call it the Beluga. So they make it look like one   
Nationalists keep asking "why can't Scotland be an Independent country?" Because 2 001 926 people said No in a once in a lifetime referendum in 2014. After all the effort they put in you would have thought they would have checked out the result.  
10pm exclusive Andrea Leadsom told the Chequers cabinet Theresa May’s brexit deal breaks Brexit red lines, minutes reveal........ but said in public straight after that it complies with them  
“Good morning and welcome to Brexit update 293.”  
10pm Exclusive: Leaked minutes from Chequers Brexit cabinet meeting reveal Andrea Leadsom made clear she “hated” the PM’s Brexit deal - which she now supports She attacked “remainer tendencies” of most ministers and officials and attacked Treasury  
EU tears up Theresa May’s hopeless Brexit plan  
In a swipe to British politicians, Ms Bishop said she "looked forward to a time when the UK feels free to make statements beyond those issued by the European Union". #Brexit 
What post-Brexit UK can learn from the blockade of Qatar  
Very timely & powerful column by @maggieNYT. I've never known @Twitter be such a vile, intolerant & abusive cesspit - fuelled especially by total derangement over Trump & Brexit. Twitter will die if it becomes a platform dominated by rage-filled people spewing disgusting filth.  
Is that a joke? We'll be spending out far more than we send to the EU, after brexit. There will be less money for the #NHS.The amount we send currently is tiny, less than 1% of GDP. We stand to lose 10% GDP. Do the maths 
Reading about all the exciting plans for a hard, stiff Brexit, I reflect that vanishingly few took up arms against Charles I in the expectation that they’d end up chopping off his head. 
‘Exclusive: Court documents claim new Arron Banks links with Russia’Banks apparently raised cash in Russia for his mines, which he used to fund Brexit, according to his ex business partner.  @Channel4News outstanding reporting. 
I voted No last time, it's Yes this time.  And I can confidently say that it is thanks to Brexit and corrupt Tory Westminster.  Hope you're happy? 
In terms of damage done May might out-achieve Thatcher in industrial devastation with her NO DEAL #Brexit ! #politics 
Lies and delusion are all they have left. Theresa May insists chief whip was not 'trying to steal votes' in knife-edge Brexit showdowns  
Sky News is claiming that Leo Varadkar threatened to bar UK flights from Irish airspace in retaliation for Irish fishermen not being able to fish in UK waters. Is there any point saying that Varadkar said no such thing? @SkyNews #brexit 
Years of austerity, Tory slease, Labour impotence, LibDem irrelevence, idiotic Brexit referendum, self-serving Unionist politicians, Tory Powergrab,Scottish Tory Liars, EVEL, #DarkMoney, rape clause, bedroom tax, sanctions, foodbanks, re-branding Scotland, DUP.Enough is Enough. 
We've undoubtedly moved towards a 'No Deal' Brexit this week. Just like the far right planned.An outcome that means the North East, North West, Midlands are devastated with untold poverty and unemployment.The lack of rage, or anything from our front bench, fails our movement.  
Utter arrogance of @trussliz telling over 17.4 million #British voters, that a majority of only 650 MPs will deny them the #Brexit they voted for.All #Con & #Lab MPs are honour bound to deliver the promise each of them made to the #British electorate in their 2017GE manifestos! 
Brexit: EU chief negotiator Michel Barnier takes apart Theresa May’s Chequers white paper plan  
My Op Ed piece on Mrs May's diminishing options in delivering a good #Brexit via tomorrow's @Telegraph 
“...this throws up yet more questions about the nature of his businesses, where the money has come from to pay for Brexit, given that a number of his businesses, by different reports, didn’t seem to be making much money at that time.”  
Welcome to a one-man, one-year, higher-stakes-than-ever referendum on Toronto, Canada, and most of all, Masai Ujiri.  
EXCLUSIVE: How the Chancellor is 'KILLING the economy on purpose' just to sabotage Brexit . And we are letting him do it. May and Hammond must go and go now.  
How droll it will be when Brexitons discover that Brexit actually means having no cake, eating no cake, and surrendering all utensils that might enable you to bake a cake at some point in the future. 
But such as you can apprehend it from the ghostly silences and the outline responses, the UK government's legal response to Holyrood's Brexit Bill sounds reliably mad. Blunderbuss incompetence. 
Trying to work out how May is asking the EU not to fall back on unworkable positions? Does she mean the Single Market & Customs Union?Both seem to be working rather well for the EU as they do for us.The unworkable position is held by the Govt & anyone backing #Brexit.#Remain 
BREXIT BETRAYAL: David Davis ally reveals Downing Street 'CONSPIRACY' - 'This is SERIOUS'  
Exactly!  They can lower their standards all they like, I will oppose Brexit until I see evidence it’s going to provide all the benefits the Leave campaign said it would, i.e. all the benefits of EU membership with none of the obligations. 
People are flocking to the SNP as Tory Brexit feels more like a Westminster power-grab  via @leftfootfwd 
The country is facing a genuine state of emergency with the reality of No-Deal Brexit, and the idiotic Labour Party are still fighting over who is the most anti-Semitic. Honestly, these people are so utterly useless. 
Very telling though, WW2 we didn’t have any choice over, Leavers are adopting a victim mentality about Brexit but they must always be reminded that they chose to do this.  All the things they whine about the EU punishing us etc. would only be valid if we were being expelled. 
Ill-informed and arrogant, Leo Varadkar is not up to the task when it comes to Brexit:  
His rampant disloyalty & repeated outrageous comments made him one of the least fit people ever to hold high office, said f**k business on Brexit, promised to ‘lie in front of bulldozers’ at Heathrow & then ran away & even lied in his resignation letter, so of course you do Jacob  
By cheering #Brexit, dissing the #EU, suggesting #NATO is obsolete, departing #Syria, trying to get on with #Putin, #Trump is threatening the entire U.S. foreign policy establishment.  For if there is no war on and no war wanted, what does a War Party do? 
Brussels says its #Brexit red lines are clearly incompatible with Theresa May’s proposal  
Jonathan Freedland: The will of the people? These Brexit ideologues are destroying democracy   
I’ve fucking had enough of them Why the hell should my family together with the rest of the country have to suffer because a large minority of of this country is too ignorant to know how the EU works FFS  #Brexit 
Faith? Belief? Sounds more like a cult than a coherent political plan. Our great country is actually crying out for a return to sanity - which means many more politicians being brave enough to admit that Brexit would do us immeasurable harm.  
Yeah but how many of them also voted to remain in the EU. In my family that includes my Aunt, brother and sister in law. All now want Independence due to brexit. So as a life long indy supporter who tried everything to change their minds 4 years ago I now no longer have to.Thanks 
‘JRM doesn't just share RT appearances with Farage, nor his social calendar, but his bot accounts and sock puppets: the same Russian backed accounts which have switched from Brexit to Trump and back again, now reappearing with #Moggmentum in mind. 
But it starts for me - getting clean Brexit  and starting a new exciting conversation - one that I never thought I would suggest we have - its strange how life changes you along the way - strange the way important things fade and new ones emerge 28/ 
Rescind Art.50 if Vote Leave has broken Electoral Laws regarding 2016 referendumTop 5 constituencies:Bristol West @ThangamMP 1,220 Brighton Pavilion @CarolineLucas 1,116Cambridge @DanielZeichner 934Hornsey & Wood Green @CatSmithMP 903Edinburgh South & Leith @DeidreBrock 890 
Brexit WAKE-UP CALL: Australia urges UK politicians to STOP 'sounding like the EU'  
During WWII, tripe was never rationed and was eaten widely. After rationing ended in the 1950s, there were those who rashly predicted it meant the end for tripe.But we hung on in there. We never gave up. So, if there's post-Brexit rationing, remember - we're here for you. 
On Brexit you see the weaponisation of the Irish border - the contempt for the UKs democratic process - the total disregard for what people wanted and more than the myopic short termism - attempting to crush the UK because it dared argue regardless of the broader signals 19 
If an outright mandate for independence is sought: The SNP's job is to protect Scotland from Brexit, not let it happen and try and clear up the mess. The referendum has to be held before the end of March 2019.  
It’s slowly becoming obvious to more and more people that after the Brexit Cabinet’s failure to agree a sensible negotiating position, the only workable Brexit solution for next spring is EFTA+...... the European Free Trade Area plus special terms reflecting our 40yr membership.  
Appeaser Theresa Exposed: Barnier Confirms Chequers Brexit Plan Leaves EU Court in Control   
You could, just about, imagine a Brexit undertaken with grace, generosity, reason and magnaminity towards both remain voters and the EU that might not have been *that* awful. But the way Brexiters/govt approached it put paid to that slim possibility. 
And Brexit came - I remember sitting talking to my mum - and her asking how I would vote and me saying 'I just don't know after Greece I am just so angry' and she agreed - but on the day I voted remain because I thought it would be better economically and easier for me 12/ 
We finally have a website! AFB is staffed by a network of dedicated volunteers so- unlike many who oppose Brexit- we are fully independent + can therefore speak freely!If u are glad we around then please consider making a donation through our website:  
Theresa May's Brexit proposals have been called into question by Europe's chief negotiator, who raised a whole string of objections to her new white paper.@MichaelLCrick reports. 
This organisation did not give a shit about the south - it was their fault - and I thought but that is economically illiterate but by then I had realised they didn't care - and so we wandered on towards Brexit 11/ 
Brexit WAKE-UP CALL: Australia urges UK politicians to STOP 'sounding like the EU'  
UNWORKABLE.  Barnier shoots down May's pathetic dead and buried sellout, because they want to dig up the bones and gnaw on them.  He then lies that May fudge is "too competitive"   OUTRIGHT LIE.  EU set on our outright ruin.  @borisjohnson #borisjohnson #boris johnson  #Brexit  
Today's aggressive comments by Messrs Varadkar and Barnier show why we are right to be leaving the mafia-like European Union.- 20 Jul 2018#Moggmentum#Brexit  
Yeah, looks like these diamond mines provided £12m to LeaveEU doesn't it? 
Brexit: EU chief negotiator Michel Barnier takes apart Theresa May’s Chequers white paper plan  Walk PM May on behalf of the people of UK stop cringing and tell the EU. UK leaves totally on March 2019. 
Hard Brexit is going to make the UK into the world's biggest tax haven. The rich will be even richer & everyone else will be a slave to those people. That's what Jacob Rees-Mogg wants and is so happy about. If he wants Brexit bet your bottom dollar it won't be good for you #bbcaq 
READ | @Arron_banks responds to the latest hit of anti-Brexit fake news from @Channel4News. The Remainer establishment is getting desperate!Support us at  
It depends if you want your planes to fly in accordance with the legal treaties that protect sovereign airspace and underpin safety legislation in relation to air travel and legal frameworks that cover travel insurance......... #Brexit 
BREXIT BETRAYAL: David Davis ally reveals Downing Street 'CONSPIRACY' - 'This is SERIOUS'  
 Don’t cry for brie Brexit Britain  
May is collapsing.The government is collapsing.Brexit is collapsing.And it's ALL based on lies and cheating.Revoke Article 50 NOW.160,000 signatures, and rising. 
Outrageous that on Channel 4 @ChrisPhilpMP should try and dismiss law-breaking by Vote Leave by saying the Govt spent more on leaflets legally than Vote Leave spent illegally. So breaking the law doesn't matter anymore? #Brexit #FBPE 
Unless @theresa_may abandons #ChequersPlan the #Conservatives face a wipe out at next General Election.17,410,742 voted for #BrexitGovt must honour the result.#Brexit #Conservatives #bbcqt #bbcdp#MayMustGo 
Dear people who voted Brexit & still have reservations. Please read about Robert Mercer & his electoral scam machines (like Cambridge Analytica) and he & Steve Bannon's far-right propaganda. Read about Arron Banks and his links to them and Russia. Consider why Putin hates the EU 
When @Anna_Soubrytalks about 'forces of darkness' her explicit reference is to Tory #BrexiteersShe is also implicitly insulting every single one of the 17.4 million who voted for #Brexit -  including the majority in her Broxtowe constituency 
What will the impact of no deal planning be - for businesses, individuals, EU citizens in UK and vice versa, and the politics of Brexit? My latest Brexit Blog post, just up:  
Did your friend Steve Bannon provide a few more tips on language when he was over Jacob? #Brexit #VoteLeaveBroketheLaw 
As some people are having difficulty in understanding & need help with numbers. Please take part in this poll I am a unionist ....but I am considering a UI because of Brexit. 
FFS. Tories on Channel 4 news arguing that a referendum that was tainted by illegal meddling is legal because no one knows if the meddling influenced voters! I honestly give up. #ScotRef and YES, and get us away from this fuckin' utter madness. 
Varadkar has just been screwed by the EU and they didn't even buy him dinnerIll-informed and arrogant, Leo Varadkar is not up to the task when it comes to Brexit  via @Telegraph 
@Rachael_Swindon @UKDemockery  And that dark money story just keeps growing. Seems Mr Brexit Banks was mixed up in some insider scheme of diamond mines, Russian dark money and even Trump's porky presence. Yet still May pursues this lunacy.Something illegal happened. This STINKS  
Top issues priorities for Lab/Con voters. More evidence that Labour will not lose votes if we oppose this chaotic and damaging Tory Brexit  
BREXIT BETRAYAL: David Davis ally reveals Downing Street 'CONSPIRACY' - 'This is SERIOUS'  
Varadkar/Barnier are just being assertive - no aggression at all. Mogg however is trying to direct extreme right wing hate to the EU to justify hard Brexit -then after next March when it all goes horribly wrong he’ll say “this is what the EU have done to us” #BrexitManipulation 
“It has recently become apparent that the funds were in fact raised but were used by Arron Banks in other interests that he has including but not limited to the his participation in the funding of #Brexit.”  
I was one of them , until I woke up to brexit Britain , colonial rule over Scotland , parasitism of North sea oil , then being called a parasite for getting 8% returned of what should have been 100%.Even Tories are now thinking unionism is dead - and all you have is sectarians 
History records that WW2 resulted in millions of deaths, over 10 years of rationing, economic ruin and massive debts.This is what is being compared to Brexit. Still a good idea?  
If you were given a #FInalSayForAll #PeoplesVote - how would you vote?  #Leave #Remain #EU #BrexitPlease RT after you vote for a larger sample. 
Given what we know already about Arron Banks,  Russia, Cambridge Analytica,  Steve Bannon and Robert Mercer,  I propose we put Brexit on hold until we know what the hell is going on. #BrexitCanWait#C4news 
If your sick friend is ignoring the serious warnings from doctors, then all you can do is hope that the bad symptoms will eventually convince him something needs to change. You don't want him to get sicker, you just want him to realise how bad it is, before it's too late.#Brexit 
#C4News unearths South African court documents that may shed light on the origin of the mystery millions that @Arron_Banks poured into #LeaveEU and #Brexit.Who'd have guessed?#BrexitRussia #PeoplesVote 
@CllrBSilvester thanks for your previous support.Now over 11000 signatures and rising.Govt must respond.Let's push onPlease support this petition by retweeting.Thank you #Brexit #bbcqt #bbcdp #ChequersPlan #MayMustGoNow 
After 4 days of not even admitting, Putin offered a referendum for E Ukraine ...Seems our research has raised the bells today.  
RE: Brexit discussions with the PM today we raised concerns about a hard border, freedom of movement, protecting the GFA & rights and protections for Irish citizenship/identity in post-Brexit NI. Frustrations from yp at lack of answers we recieved.  
Let me get this straight: A hard-right white African called Arron Banks CLAIMED to have lucrative diamond mines which actually do fuck all and claimed to NOT meet with Russians, which he DID meet repeatedly and ask for MONEY from, helped scam Brexit. #C4news#PeoplesVote 
The effects of #Brexit on the Irish border have been absolutely clear for a very very long time. Ireland and the EU have stated it as clearly as it is possible to state anything - over and over again. Why is this only just sinking in to Theresa May?  #C4news 
Damian Collins - “Some people would say, if he's so rich that he can afford to spend millions on Brexit why does he have to go running around the world trying to raise money through a bond issue to support his mining so where does Banks’s money come from?" 
Labour’s shadow sports minister has suggested that the St George’s Cross has been tainted by Brexit and has become associated with “far-right ideology” 
Doesn't Tony Blair realise that he is one of the chief arcitects of the world that led to Brexit and Trump? 
Channel 4 suggesting Banks might have raised money via mines to pay for Brexit. How Banks afforded £8m+ on Brexit has long been a huge question, as @openDemocracy showed 
C4 news reveals new, undeclared, Russian financial links by Arron Banks. The murky story of Brexit's Russian links grows more dubious. 
Logically, only one of these #Brexit statements can be true. 1. We are deeply enmeshed in the systems of the EU and we have lost control of our country.2. It's not that big a deal if we leave without a withdrawal agreement, trade will carry on as normal. 
WATCH NOW ON 4: An exclusive report from South Africa with allegations that Brexit backing businessman Arron Banks sought financial help for his diamond mines from Russia. The claims are made in court documents filed by his former business partner and obtained by Channel 4 News. 
Fears of a no-deal Brexit grow dramatically as EU's Barnier tears up Theresa May’s offer line by line. It came as more details were revealed of Gov’t preparations for doomsday no-deal scenario which include turning M26 motorway into 10 mile long lorry park  
Didn't get the right result last time. 90% one way changed to 67% the other in the last few minutes of the poll being open. So what we should do now is have another vote. Isn't that normal EU practice ? May is now angling for a referendum to decide Britain's future. Should it be: 
Australian Foreign Affairs Minister, @JulieBishopMP, has confirmed that the #UK and #Australia are ready to agree a free trade deal as soon as the UK leaves the #EU in 2019.#CANZUK #cdnpoli #auspol #nzpol #ukpoli #Brexit 
"By cheering Brexit, dissing the EU, suggesting NATO is obsolete, departing Syria, trying to get on with Putin, Trump is threatening the entire U.S. foreign policy establishment .... For if there is no war on, no war imminent, and no war wanted, what does a War Party do?"  
To be clear: The Administration is not considering supporting a referendum in E Ukraine - A “referendum” would have no legitimacy. We continue to support #Minsk agreements for solving the conflict in #Donbas #ukraine @statedept 
It’s interesting that shortly before campaigning for Brexit, Liam Halligan was shilling for Russia and minimising the annexation of Crimea.   
The reasons these #Brexit negotiations are doomed isn't due to a lack of trying or our weak leadership. The UK has bent over backwards to accommodate the EU, but ultimately the European Union craves power & not a deal. They'll put their political project above all. 
The only thing I ask is, when brexit does cause unnecessary deaths due to lack of food, goods, services and medicine, when there is a resurgence in violence in Ireland, when the UK is on it's very knees, those in government today, are not allowed to just walk away unpunished. 
More preparations need to be in place for a no deal Brexit.And to those who say “no deal is better than a bad deal”: no deal is a bad deal - it’s the worst possible deal.It could mean ripping up the Good Friday Agreement and ruining our economy.We need an election, now.  
'Theresa May's Brexit proposals died in Brussels in eight short minutes'  
Sheffield City Region Mayor @DanJarvisMP is upbeat about Brexit - let's make the most of the opportunities it presents. #BackBritain 
#DarkStateCoupTHE GIG IS UP... FANTASTIC NEWS IF CONFIRMED..Putin Gives Trump 160 Terabytes of Intercepts; NAMES ALL People Behind Fake “Russia Collusion,” False Flag Chemical Attacks in Syria, Brexit Sabotage, Clinton Criminal Activities & Much More  
[1 minute before the deadline for negotiating Brexit] UK: "WE'VE DONE IT! WE'VE NEGOTIATED A SOLUTION TO THE IRISH BORDER PROBLEM!"Spain: "So, about Gibraltar..." 
Brexiters have positioned Brexit as Britain fighting a war. But we have no enemy. Brexit is biblical in its arrogance and madness. 
The people won. The Establishment can't accept it. @PhilipHammondUK should be ashamed of himself for insulting patriotic @andreajenkyns simply because she called out him and @theresa_may about Govt  #Brexit meaning RemainWhat a fool Hammond is! 
This is the brexit bonus. We knew this all along and were met with the bleatings of "Project fear!". Nobody has damaged this country so much since Hitler, and that it's our own government that's deliberately doing it through pride, vanity and greed! Shameful! #BrexitShambles 
Brendan O’Neill on how Brexit made the chattering classes lose their minds  
How is it fanatical to want HM Government to honour:A. The result of a referendum;B. The terms of their own party manifesto?Surely the fanatics, and, indeed, extremists, are those who would oppose such things? 
British fatalities in both world wars ran to about... one and a half million, give or takeAced it, sure we'll ace brexit  
This careful analysis of Theresa May's speech leads inexorably to the conclusion that unless May is removed as PM, she will deliver a "Brexit" that keeps Britain inside all the main EU institutions (but without voting rights) indefinitely. A Tory defeat will follow, then Corbyn.  
That can’t be right. Alastair Campbell has proved the BBC is a Brexit bastion.  
Why did May make trip to Northern Ireland? Her speech upset nationalists and her hardline on Brexit irish border was arguable unnecessary at this time. Answer I hear - under pressure from DUP concerned about next week’s British Irish inter government conference, first since 07. 
Rees-Mogg’s hard Brexit mob is holding the country hostage  
Brexit: What would a 'no deal' look like?  
What brilliant journalism from @carolecadwalla following the Cambridge Analytica story from Trump to Russia to Brexit-With revelations @BylineFest 2017 then again in our NYC Festival with @frontlineclub & now @BylineFest 24-27/8-don’t miss her book now  
Whatever you think of Tony Blair I think we can all agree with him on this one:- "This #Brexit agenda is being driven by a Government in more chronic disarray than any Government I've literally ever seen in my lifetime in the western world.."#StopBrexit #FBPE 
The will of the people? These Brexit ideologues are destroying democracy | Jonathan Freedland  
Steve, both the Lib Dems (£18,000) & @Open_Britain (£1,250) were fined for breaching campaign finance rules during the EU #Referendum. I guess that doesn’t fit the Remoaner agenda? #Brexit  
Brexit has divided my circle of friends. For some, Brexit is a needlessly self-inflicted economic and social disaster, while for others it is a needlessly self-inflicted economic and social disaster with knobs on. Terrible how politics splits groups right down the middle. 
Because it struck a chord.  Well done for a magnificent speech.Ignore those twits in this thread that says your constituents voted for a “clean” Brexit. (That means the dirtiest of all Brexits build on a foundation of massive porkies)They have been found out. 
How long before there’s no EU left to leave?  via @theconwomExactly what I have been sayingBrexit (or lack of it) has been almost a false flag to stop us noticing the increasing Is isation of our Country imoWake up people!! 
If there HAS to be "a winner and a loser" from #Brexit, who's your heart rooting for (& why, in comments)?: (Please RT). 
We are seeing come true what I’ve said from the start SF collapsed Stormont not for RHI not for Irish langaue act not for equality They collapsed Stormont to bring instability in the run up to Brexit They see Brexit as the back door to an all Ireland And screw everyone else 
Bob Moran on Theresa May’s Brexit White Paper - Political Cartoon Gallery in Putney  
It really is quite simple:May has to walk away. No more wasting our or their time. Clean break. Simple as Michel Barnier questions Theresa May's Brexit White Paper -  
Hey ho Brexiteer holiday makers! Feeling rich are you? Well you shouldn't be. The pound has effectively been devalued by 14%. The pound in your pocket ain't worth much. Your cost of living has skyrocketed. Noticed? Petrol? it would be £1.13 a litre instead of £1.32.Luv Brexit eh? 
After youth & community groups earlier today, great discussions this afternoon in Belfast with CBI Chair David Gavaghan and other business leaders on Brexit. Looking forward to meeting border communities tomorrow!  
I'm not sure the EU negotiators would be too happy at being compared to the Mafia ?BTW - what description would you attach to the ERG ?You know who I mean - the *cabal* that's calling the shots for a hard #Brexit Funded I believe from the member MPs individual allowances.  
After all the drama, resignations, non-existent rebellions, threats, demands and dodgy dealing the Tory white paper falls at the first hurdle. Theresa May might just as well have said, "Oh do what you like, the country's screwed anyway." #Brexit #ToriesOut 
Why not ruin your whole "woo-hoo #Friyay" scene with the latest profoundly depressing edition of #Remainiacs? Hard Brexit! Incipient fascism! Guest @davidallengreen's sobering talk about #PeoplesVote! It's all here so listen with care: 
Putin reportedly suggested a referendum to help resolve Ukraine conflict in Trump meeting. Four days later, the White House says Trump doesn’t support the idea  
The EU's chief Brexit negotiator effectively cut down Theresa May's proposals for customs arrangements today  
Furthermore, to organize a so-called referendum in a part of Ukraine which is not under government control would have no legitimacy. (2/2) 
The Administration is not considering supporting a referendum in eastern Ukraine. The Minsk Agreements are the process for resolving the conflict in the Donbas, and these agreements do not include any option for referendum. (1/2) 
Michel Barnier's unhappy with the latest pathetic Brexit plan. End this humiliation, do what we should've done two years ago, offer a (take it or leave it) FTA (no money) and then get on with setting up deals with the ROW. 
Don't be fooled people all this crap that's gone on with Brexit was planed 2 years ago to make us think we got a victory in the end for something we didn't even want anyway. This is why may has to go. she's not only a threat to Brexit she's a threat to our society. cant trust her 
The choice is either: We remain in the EU and prosper or, we leave the EU and spend decades trying to recover our economy.That is the choice we face. There is no other.I say remain. #FBPE #StopBrexit #Brexit 
1,661,191 people in Scotland voted remain. That’s every single constituency. It’s time May respected the views of the majority and dropped he plans for Brexit #DissolveTheUnion 
The Yookay imports 30 percent of its food from the EU. A further 11 percent comes through EU treaties. On average the Yookay has 3 to 5 days worth of food supplies. A no-deal Brexit would disrupt 41 percent of the food supplies. Another Brexit "dividend" 
Confused by this week's goings on at Westminster over Brexit? BBC Scotland's political correspondent @nickeardleybbc makes sense of it. 
John Major and Tony Blair told the truth when they went to NI and warned of the dangers of Brexit to peace and prosperity. People didn’t want to listen.  
Reporter Shows The Links Between The Men Behind Brexit And The Trump Campaign  
The White House said it “is not considering supporting” a Putin-backed call for a referendum in E. #Ukraine in the aftermath of Trump-Putin summit. NSC Spokes Garrett Marquis said any effort to organize a “so-called referendum” would have “no legitimacy.” 
Huge challenge for broadcasters over next 3 months to abide by impartiality & accuracy rules. Brexit hardliners + strident right-wing press will be desperate to blame Brussels for impasse. @BBCNews, @itvnews, @Channel4News, @SkyNews MUST resist their political agenda. 
Another absolutely grovelling ("fast-talking, fiercely competent") profile of Ruth Davidson in the London press. It doesn't raise a single criticism of her - nothing on her contortions over Brexit & austerity.  
Ah, Brexit because “poofs ruined Britain” according to some mindless cunt.  
My take on May's speech and debunking some fake news on the backstop #Brexit #backstop #FactCheck 
Grow Up Jacob. This type of immaturity might still work on the gullible... but the majority now see through you. #Brexit #PeoplesVote 
Although strangely, it didn't stop Somerset Capital Management, a firm that you helped to found, establish an investment fund in Ireland ahead of #Brexit. You hypocritical little shit. 
'Not Our MASTERS!': Bulldog Batten BLASTS MPs After Brexit Sellout  via @kippercentral 
This has been doing the rounds in the UK, regarding the BBC's woeful coverage of Brexit illegailty. Holds true for the US media.  
'It's a whole mess': expats on #Brexit @SkyNews. [Editorial note: 'expats' = British in Europe; 'immigrants' = Europeans in the UK] 
“The Brexit World Trade Organization (WTO) option, sometimes described as the ‘no deal’ scenario should not be feared...Far from crashing out of the EU or falling off the ‘cliff edge’, dealing with the EU on WTO terms is realistic and workable”  
He hasn't saved us a penny. We are under no obligation to pay it! If our Europhile parliament weren't all wetting themselves at the thought of having to actually run the country we'd be out without the current capitulation and focusing on the opportunities Brexit will bring.  
EU & Irish PM are playing a dangerous gameThey're using #Brexit as a way to split off N Ireland from rest of the UK.40 non-EU countries have a land border with EU without any problems.Irish border issue is a fake issue with a sinister aim.N Ireland will always  be part of UK. 
Mafia-like?He heads up a wholly unelected organisation currently that is calling the shots on Brexit. An organisation for whom threats are second nature and one that hasn't even got the courage, let alone integrity, to show their faces.Now that what I call Mafia-like. 
In theory*, pigs can fly. In practice, they can’t. Brexit in a nutshell. That’s it from me this week, folks. Enjoy the weekend.(*the theory of someone who has no interest in evidence-based science, or, well, facts.) 
Barnier sums up why Brexit absolutely has to happen, why the EU is holding us back and why the EU is running scared:"A plan to exclude UK services from following EU rules could give a “significant competitive advantage to Britain” 
What do Brexit and the Leeds United transfer window have in common? Both going to end in no deal thanks I'll be here all week 
Theresa May's Chequers plan for Brexit breaches core EU principles, Michel Barnier has declared.Brexiters will deflect blame onto the EU, but the fault lies with Theresa May for still having no feasible plan for Brexit 2 years after the EU referendum. 
Abortion referendum challenges rejected by High Court  
Varadkar - Va-rad-karBarnier - Bar-nee-ai(r)Banc Ceannais na hEireann - Ban-kh Can-ass nah hair-in (that's the Irish central bank, in the mafia-like EU, which regulates your Somerset capital vehicle which you established in Ireland in May 2018 to protect you against #Brexit)  
Only thing you need to know about Brexit right now is @Anna_Soubry smashing Leavers in her only party down a peg 
Theresa May’s government is complicit in covering up the fact that Vote Leave broke the law. 10 Downing Street didn’t just ignore it, they actively tried to shut the story down. To them, Brexit is more important than democracy. This is so dangerous. 
I hope the millions of Labour voters who voted for #Brexit across the country with real passion and sincerity realise the lengths to which Labour are trying to prevent #Brexit from happening. Daniel 
David Davis: "There will be no downside to Brexit..."  
Two years ago Brexit was all about golden opportunities. Now people are actively having to prepare for what happens if the power goes off. Who among us voted for this? #PeoplesVoteNow 
The Lib Dems are the only party committed to giving YOU the final say on Brexit. If you want to be part of the fight against Brexit, join us at Autumn Conference: 
So Vote Leave being investigated by the police for electoral fraud, and Brexit squeezing through Parliament with Conservative whips lying to a woman MP who was having a baby, then cheating by voting behind her back. It's not a good look for you is it, Brexitteers ? 
BREAKING: White House says Trump administration `is not considering supporting' Putin-backed call for referendum in eastern Ukraine 
'Theresa May's Brexit proposals died in Brussels in eight short minutes'  
John Major - We voted for a pig in a poke. If we get a #brexit agreement it'll be interesting to lay out what was promised & what the agreement looks like & see how different it is & that's where the case for the HoC intervening or there being a #PeoplesVote most arise.#FBPE 
There can be no democratic choice against European treaties.The United Kingdom belongs to the European Union.#Brexit  
White House now says it "is not considering supporting a referendum in eastern Ukraine," despite Putin offer. Statement from NSC spokesman Garrett Marquis:  
Those two wasted years could have been usefully employed by everyone concerned, especially businesses, to prepare for Brexit. Most irresponsible.  
A shout out to all/any decent, moral, aware even, politicians.From any party.We are now faced with NoDeal Brexit or No Brexit.You must now understand what this means.Step up, your country needs you.PleaseHistory will not be kind.A concerned citizen.#StopBrexit 
Didn't see 'clean' #Brexit on the ballot paper - what about #Brexit supporting MPs whose constituents voted #Remain #peoplesvote 
The UK is considering turning a motorway in south-east England into a lorry park to ease gridlock into Channel ports under a doomsday Brexit plan  
Appeaser Theresa Exposed: Barnier Confirms Chequers Brexit Plan Leaves EU Court in Control   
Anna Soubry you should be our prime minister, on Brexit you talk sense I don,t usually support the Tories, but if we have to have this Brexit I would vote for you and you,r version 
.@PiersMorgan FT analysis show all the Brexit forecasts are coming true, except, 'Economist for Brexit' The UK is already 2% smaller than had we not voted to Leave. A smaller economy means less revenues available for the NHS. It's a national tragedy. @CampbellClaret 
So even the softest, most humiliating Brexit that would turn UK into a non-voting EU colony, even this isn't enough for M. Barnier. Time to respond in the traditional British way with our two fingers 
If Brexit were cancelled...5% of the population would be apoplectic with rage at the betrayal 25% would be pretty pissed off at the waste of everyone's time 70% would be extremely relieved And after a few weeks of national debate we'd all move on apart from the 5% 
Here are some of Michel Barnier's questions to Dominic Raab on Brexit white paper economic proposals, as told to journalists.Lightly edited for clarity.  
Well said @Anna_SoubryThey won't be paying the price of Brexit - the rest of us will. And the cost will be jobs, hard-won rights, and a Brexit bill which will be paid by our generation (and generations to come) for our entire working lives!  
ANOTHER blow to Theresa May Brexit plan as Esther McVey REFUSES to publicly support it 
"My challenge to everyone standing for Labour’s NEC is this: come out for workers’ rights and freedom of movement, oppose Tory hard Brexit plans, and back a People’s Vote on the final deal." Couldn't agree more, and I will be voting for anyone that does. #PeoplesVote 
6 MPs were ordered by the @Conservatives chief whip to break pairs on vital #Brexit votes. Is there nothing this government won't stoop to in their quest ro appease the rabid right wing? Shameful behaviour.#StopBrexit #Pairing 
People had a clear opportunity to take #indyref2 off the table at the Scottish Election #SP2016, but elected @theSNP whose manifesto offered a referendum in the event of Scotland being forced to #Brexit against its will. When will the @ScotTories respect the election result? 
We're now at a point where a Brexit crisis, an Irish border crisis, a Scottish constitutional crisis and a crisis in the alliance between the US and EU member states may converge on the British state in 2019.I struggle to see how Westminster or Whitehall can cope. 
You seem to have choked on "protecting jobs and boosting prosperity" in your #Brexit speech today. :) #HotelCaliforniaBrexit 
Hammond should have been sacked because he has undermined #Brexit at every turn.But he is not the only one.The PM has done the same.  
Mrs May, you've had your reply from the EU, your infantile solution won't fly, it never would.Two choices lie ahead1) You crash the UK out of the EU and take the economy, jobs and people's futures with it.2) You grow a pair and kick #Brexit into the long grass. 
A few months left, and the govt:Still has no workable border solutionStill has no workable Brexit planStill has no negotiation strategyWe are heading either for a bad deal or a disastrous no deal that nobody voted for. We need a #PeoplesVote at the end of the process! 
For all @theresa_may's talk of the precious union of nations, *this* is where it is actually at.Scottish Govt has won the backing of the Attorney General of NI & Counsel General of Wales in its constitutional legal showdown with Westminster over Brexit  
Barnier's full 45 minute press conference on the UK's white paper. The EU makes it clear that without a NI backstop there will be no deal and no transition. That means a Cliff Edge Brexit on or before March 29th 2019 unless we stop it with a #PeoplesVote 
There was speculation that Boris would deliver the killer punch against PM in his resignation speechjust as Geoffrey Howe did to MaggieIt turned out to be a damp squibIt was left to Tory backbencher @andreajenkyns: to deliver the killer punch'When did #Brexit become #Remain?" 
The EU is not trying to negotiate with us, it is trying to humiliate us. It wants to show European people what happens when you dare to defy Brussels. @Tom_Slater_ on the Brexit talks  
The Portage & Main referendum is an awesome opportunity for some progressive ad/PR/digital marketing agency to make a name for itself by taking on the "yes" campaign as pro bono work. Win this one and your reputation is made. 
Analysis: Theresa May’s Brexit speech may break the Northern Ireland peace process  
Eight months before Brexit, London's financiers still have unanswered questions around the divorce   
How come 62% of the electorate in Scotland understood the ramifications of Brexit.  
The UK government pushed through powers for ministers to negate or change any piece of legislation related to Brexit & the EU without parliamentary consent.What do you think they will do with that? 
This is why the call for civility is so bogus. Varadkar and Barnier have been politely realistic about the consequences of a Hard Brexit, while Jacob Rees-Mogg, under the guise of civility, just offers insults with no plan to solve the Irish border problem.  
Just heard that the Government has announced they have done a trade deal with Oxo to produce a new #Brexit red white and blue cube.They will call it "Laughing stock".#StopBrexit 
“Theresa May says EU must 'evolve' its Brexit position”A bit late in the day to take this stance. Should have been strong at the outset.   
Tommy Robinson - a vicious little fascist thug who Nadine Dorries thinks would make a charismatic national leader. The Tory party is now a home for violent fascism.#Brexit #PeoplesVote #StopBrexit 
Completely beside the point, but sometimes organisations do adopt policies which cause economic harm for good reasons (EU refusing to sell arms to developing countries for example).Brexit, however is a country ready to harm itself over a tabloid-generated collective tantrum. 
Today Theresa May ruled out the EU's proposal for a backstop in Northern Ireland but in December she said she agreed.It's now clear: it's either no deal or no Theresa May. Let's fight for no Brexit instead. Join our call for a #peoplesvote here:  
Brexit is an entirely unnecessary act of self sabotage and destruction but it's fascinating to see a Brexiteer equate it with the two biggest disasters of the last century. Also struck by your use of the word "unravels" @GaryLineker 
If you see these stickers, Remove and bin.Criminal Damage? #Brexit#FukEu#ProactivePatriots 
UK politicians send £55 million every day to prop up failing EU economiesIn return, we surrender sovereignty, have severe trading restrictions placed upon us and must take millions of economic migrants, who will never contribute anything.What sort of a deal is that?#Brexit  
SLAMMED: Brexiteer @andreajenkyns hits out at Chancellor Hammond, ‘I don’t care what he thinks’. “Maybe if he stopped trying to thwart Brexit, we wouldn’t need to ask such direct questions, seeking clarity for the 17.4 mil people who voted to leave.” 
Met with Lord Adonis to discuss the catastrophic implications of the No Deal Brexit the Brextremists are pushing towards & the @peoplesvote_uk campaign. 
The football is over.It's time to shut up now, Gary "go go gadget ears" Lineker, you publicly-funded leech on the Working Class.#Brexit first, then we must address our 'media'.   
Dear EU we want Brexit, to be a third country, to stop paying our dues, to end free movement, to leave the Customs Union/Single Market, but you must change the fundamental ways you operate so we’re not disadvantaged. Hope that’s ok!  
No matter how much I wish Brexit wasn't the reality looming before us, a 2nd referendum will be disaster unless structural changes are implemented to society & a new covenant with the people struck. The world outside the top 20% of income earners has been bad for too long now.  
Brexit is solved.  
The real fear of Jacob Rees-Mogg and other wealthy Leavers. Brexit is all at our expense, not theirs; they are making money from it.  
So May is out to scare us lest we might want a good Brexit outcome. This is all about her propping up #Chequersplan 
Surely there  is something seriously wrong with people who like to compare brexit negotiations to the Second World War?  It’s nothing more than war fetishism.  Get a grip.  #fbpe #PeoplesVote #stopbrexit #FInalSayForAll 
Once again @iresimpsonsfans is absolutely nailing #Brexit  
Absolute recklessness, 70+ years of peace and relative stability. There is no benefit to Brexit, except if you shorted on the markets..Brexit is a demonstrable con, conceived by a backroom shady oligarchy. Cui bono? 
#Ukraine is initiating referendum in #Kaliningrad region to rejoin #Germany. No problem that both Germany and Russia are unaware of that or that it's not Ukraine's sovereignty. We just like that idea because people there speak Kantian! 
Week in Review: Brexit lunacy goes quantum  
Boris out. Davis out. The Chequers Agreement in tatters. We're heading for a hard Brexit. Labour are happy to go over cliff edge too.The Lib Dems demand better. You deserve the final say on Brexit with the option to remain in the EU. Agree? Add your name:  
2/ In any event no sane government wilfully drives its country to foreseeable economic harm (an outcome undesired by most leavers where even £10 pcm was too high anprice to pay).& with a now Remain majority Especially on the back of a finding that the referendum was corrupt.  
EU27 ministers assessed w/@MichelBarnier the state of play of #Brexit talks. They discussed the work ahead to finalise the withdrawal agreement, incl solution for the Irish border & future EU-UK relations. More info:  
In a blistering letter to @CambridgeNewsUK Cambridge Stays member Frank Wilson explains why opposition to #Brexit is not going away! #StopBrexit #Citizensrights 
We cooperated with our Allies in WW2.  In Brexit we fight them and cause harm, yet expect cooperation in returnAllies who, incidentally, suffered far higher loss of life proportionate to population than us.Peace was the driver behind the EU. 
Why was this not all properly debated & resolved, for any eventuality, BEFORE the Referendum? Scandalous that such a serious issue was virtually ignored.  
I have just heard this stupid, rude, ignorant, arrogant, delusional fool say the Irish Taoiseach is 'crying like a baby' over Brexit. Oh yes. That anti-Irish rhetoric is back with avengence. Disgusting! @IainDale 
#Brexit reality: The Single Market "is our main asset. There's no justification for us to create additional burdens on business just because the UK wants to leave." ⁦@MichelBarnier⁩ 
This is my #FBSIParty I support Scottish Independence & am calling for a second referendum. I am looking to connect with others who agree.Please:  1 Like 2 Retweet 3 Follow I will follow backCopy this tweet to your own.#ScotRef #IndyRef #IndyRef2 
At 157,900 signatures now! But there were 250,000 of us on that march in London so where are the missing 100k? Retweet, retweet and get them signing. Petition: Rescind Art.50 if Vote Leave has broken Electoral Laws regarding 2016 referendum  
Not a single thing Theresa May said will have brought comfort to anybody but the DUP - Brexit will hurt all sectors, no matter your political allegiance - the DUP don’t care, as long as it’s   
With Barnier's savaging of May's Chequers proposals, which cost her 9 ministers, how can pro-Remain & pro-"soft Brexit" Conservative MPs have any confidence in May to deliver any sort of satisfactory deal with the EU? Wldn't it be better to let someone who believes in Brexit try? 
Michael Portillo - "The Brexiteers now believe Theresa May is a traitor."This has been a betrayal that has resulted from treachery. That’s also the view of a large number of Conservative voters." #Brexit  
There must be an election because the Tories have driven themselves into a cul de sac of a no deal Brexit and that  isn't an acceptable option for Britain. #NoDealBrexit 
Brexit has one undoubted achievement to its name: the word Grexit has now been forgotten and sounds oddly unnatural. 
I don't tell #Brexit jokes in my stand up set, because I don't want to risk 52% of my audience getting up and leaving the venue without any plan whatsoever for the rest of their evening. 
I'm not being jingoistic.Brexit is the biggest challenge Britain's faced since WW2. It will soon require the same kind of national resilience & collective positive mindset to make it work.  
Jacob Rees-Mogg - "Boris Johnson would be a good prime minister. "I backed Boris in the leadership contest two years ago because I thought he would make a great PM. He is absolutely terrific." #Brexit  
Barnier cannot be reasoned with.  Whatever we offer, the condescending smirk will remain the same. Prepare for a treaty-free Brexit  
Statistically this is the safest, healthiest, most prosperous time to ever be alive in Britain. Some perspective is important. Brexit is not going to cause the deaths of millions of people.  
Isn't Maths and Science great ?  Experts have calculated the asteroid Bennu is a threatening Earth impactor with an estimated 1 in 1,800 chance of hitting us in the year 2170.   If we survivie Brexit, that is. 
Thanks for the positive feedback following Austrian TV report and interview on damaging hard Brexit, 62% vote in Scotland to remain in Europe and turmoil in UK Govt. Vielen Dank.  #BrexitChaos #ZiB2 #ORF #Schottland 
Michel Barnier had a lot of questions about the UK's whitepaper but he was very clear that #brexit cannot & will not justify additional bureaucracy. #StopBrexit #FBPE 
Prevail over Brexit? Assume by that you mean reverse it and start sorting out real problems in our country.  If so, that's easy,  #RevokeA50 #PeoplesVote p.s. in case you didn't know, Britain did not win the War alone.... 
There are THIRTEEN weeks left & the 2 options left are NO Brexit or NO DEAL.It would now seem that Parliament are therefore heading for no deal, which means we, the people, must fight for no Brexit. @jeremycorbyn now is the time to #StopBrexit @UKLabour  
You don't understand the point I'm making. I voted Remain but Brexit is going to happen - there will be a time, very soon, when we have to stop arguing about it & make it work. That will require a substantial change of attitude from those willing it to fail.  
A catastrophic no deal Brexit is now a real threat. This is a serious risk to our country.If you think the people should have the final say on Brexit, and the option to stay in the EU, add your name today:  
#FactCheck - you've heard about the #Brexit backstop. But what exactly is it? Here's our guide.  
Given that this was the weakest possible #Brexit that the UK parliament was willing to accept, I think that Michel Barnier just guaranteed a proper Brexit by dismissing it as too hard  
High Court has rejected a bid by Charles Byrne to bring a petition challenging the abortion referendum result. His lawyers are now seeking a stay on that refusal. Judge Peter Kelly will give judgment shortly on a second application by Joanna Jordan for leave to bring a petition 
Thing is the far right is already back. No matter what breed of Brexit we get they're ready to use it; call it a betrayal and beat up some brown people.One way or another we've been out-danced by these bastards & we'll have to fight em. Let's not Brexit & get on with it instead! 
Suzanne Evans - "Theresa May suddenly turning #Brexit into Remain is so ridiculous. She has caused this crisis.“We’d had this vision of Britain on the global stage, if she’d stood by Lancaster House, all of this could have been avoided."  
This is almost apocalyptic; faith in a better day across the dark chasm; the leap of faith is required to arrive at the Promised Brexit.  
Just to recap.Scenarios proposed so far: minus plus Any of the above with extras Max fac Transition No transition Bespoke deal No dealWhich of these #Brexit options exactly is the "will of the people"? 
Brexit yet again compared to cataclysmic events which were largely out of control of the British people. No Piers, we did this to ourselves its not the same at all.  
“No Deal Danger”: ⁦@thetimes⁩ first leader says #Brexit ministers have consistently underestimated the “gravity” of their task. I would add “impossibility”#PeoplesVote #FBPE 
Gary Lineker goes on massive anti-Brexit rant calling for a second referendum – a week after hitting out at politicians who talk about football  
We're notWe are Scotland and we will be leaving the UKAnd deciding our own futureWe'd like #NeighboursNotMastersI hope you manage to sort this English Brexit out for yourselves  
The complex Irish border issue will deliver Irish unification. The surge for Scottish independence will bring victory at the coming referendum. With growing support for YES CYMRU our time has come too, let’s grasp the moment. #Eingwlad 
Barnier has just rejected White Paper's main proposals in extraordinary speech. So Theresa May has surrendered almost everything, and STILL the EU is completely intransigent.  These people are deluded.Distinctive #Brexit research & news:  
I've a Good #FridayFeeling that all May not be good with the Good Friday Agreement if UKGovt is allowed to get away with this now invalid #Brexit coup.The only way to keep an open border between RoI, NI & GB is to #Remain in the SM/CU...but then we might as well Stay in the EU 
James O'Brien thinks there's only two options left open to the UK when it comes to leaving the EU: "No Deal or No Brexit" 
“A #Brexit no-deal scenario is nothing to be feared” says international economic lawyer David Collins“The UK must be prepared to walk away. A WTO scenario is entirely feasible & a practical basis for economic prosperity” Read: #CheaquersMeansCorbyn 
The IMF warns a no deal brexit will wipe $250 Billion off the EU economy and wreck the Irish economy. It will also save the UK £39 billion.I dare Ireland to play hardball with the UK. 
It took us 70 years to pay off the debt from WW2.Brexit is unnecessary and WILL make us all poorer.A soft Brexit requires an actual loss of control and sovereignty, while a no deal Brexit will eviscerate the country economically.To prevail over Brexit therefore is to remain. 
Of course it does. May doesn’t want a deal. Oh and by the way Brexit has already cost us north of £100 billion ...your cost of living has sky rocketed. All for what? Bugger all! We are being royally shafted by idiots.  
 Guess who got the BIGGEST BONUS in the Treasury last year? The guy in charge of EU negotiations.... Mark Bowman. Another whopping £20k payout for Brexit performance...  
Except the EU27 position on brexit has been published online for everyone to read.Following your analogy: The EU gave a list of presents but the family bought something not on the list, and which was not fit for purpose 
A hard or soft optionPet Shop Boys are quoted in “An A-Z of Brexit” in today’s @guardian newspaper.#PetText 
Hey, @michaelgove - you said “The day after we vote to leave we hold all the cards”. Just wondering how it’s going with that? @theresa_may @DominicRaab #brexit 
Angela Merkel had a 90 minute press conference — and no one asked about Brexit  
Not a fact. Brexit hasn't happened yet. It may never happen. If it's so good for the UK, why would we need to 'fight hard to mqke it work'? And against whom? 'Roll over and surrender' - again, to whom? What on Earth are you wibbering on about??  
I’m in Belfast meeting youth, business & community groups, & Theresa May, in Arlene Foster’s pocket, misjudged it in her speech today. THE PEOPLE OF NORTHERN IRELAND DON’T WANT A NEW BORDER & OVERWHELMINGLY REJECT BREXIT 
Between a broken and toxic party, the Tories have cobbled together a nonsense white paper, which they must know the other EU countries will reject and then they and Michel Barnier will be called stubborn and scapegoated for the hard Brexit money hoarding tories are betting on 
А good beginning: #Italy's Interior Minister and deputy Prime Minister Matteo #Salvini in an interview with @washingtonpost stressed that “there was a referendum [in #Crimea], and 90 percent of the people voted for the return of Crimea to the Russian Federation”. 
Brexit is entirely self-inflicted. We don't have to do it. 
Interviewed by @InspireEUorg this afternoon about how both the @Conservatives & @UKLabour have no clue on #Brexit. Also that #remainers must not give up the fight for a #PeoplesVote & #FinalSayForAll. It was good to meet @JackWDart founder of @InspireEUorg. 
Love to see ‘Britain survived WW2’ thrown around re Brexit. Really looking forward to the RATIONING THAT LASTED NEARLY TWO DECADES that never seems to get mentioned. 
Unbelievably sick of the cavalier attitudes and ignorance of Brexit supporters over the Irish border. You fucking idiots may have voted to burn your own house down; now you're insisting we, as your neighbours, are obligated to burn ours down too. Kindly get bent. 
More hyperbole. We’re talking about the possible greater damage to the country of a no deal Brexit rather than a deal. Nothing apocalyptic in my words. Important to debate this now or should we, in your words, “roll over and surrender?”  
This week's newsletter Progress on the #150questions (now 162) to the Home Office on Settled Status French Senate's Brexit report The amazing #EUcitizensChampion initiative 
Coveney on Brexit talks:  "We want to de-dramatise some of these things, which are the basis of exaggeration and headlines across media outlets". This is a man whose boss threatened to block airspace earlier in the week. Lecturing "media outlets". 
Doctor Who vs. Brexit, July 2016  
We have allies with Brexit, notably America. We just have to ensure we are free to work with them.  
Michel Barnier rips Theresa May’s Brexit plans to shreds and says it could create more fraud and red-tape for businesses across Europe  
Just a fact. Brexit's going to happen, so painting an endlessly apocalyptic picture is ultimately self-defeating.The time will very soon come for the country to rally together & fight hard to make it work.  Or we just roll over & surrender.  
We met British PM & SOS in Belfast today & raised Brexit, marriage eq, Irish language act, austerity, votes@16, welfare reform, legacy of the conflict & protecting GFA & Rights (among others) Young ppl critcally engaging decision makers and making themselves heard = #Powerful  
The two main reasons Brexit is still not done...  
More accurately @piersmorgan Britain prevailed in 2 World Wars with the help of overseas allies and US financial support. The latter increased the debt burden on our economy and led to a slower recovery than any of our allies and Germany. #Prescient #Brexit 
British airlines could be banned from Ireland's airspace after Brexit, Irish prime minister warns  
There now can be no doubt, Theresa May is no more than the creature of Mogg and the secretive unelected groups who, since the referendum was illegally delivered, have endeavoured to create a 66m population Singaporean economy off the shores of Europe. They've beclowned Parliament  
Barnier: "There's no justification for us to weaken the Single Market just because the UK wants to leave." #Brexit #bbcnewsThat's the killer line. 
the Brexit discourse is great, I've spent the past few months nodding at people solemnly and going "well, the backstop will be an issue" without ever bothering to find out what the backstop is, and I still have no intention to find out 
There is no room for further compromise with the EU. The White Paper already represents a substantial and significant compromise - as it stands, it is in effect a Remain Brexit that nobody voted for.  
You can't oppose Trump and support #Brexit. Trump and his kleptocrat cronies like Murdoch desperately want #Brexit in order to weaken the EU which stands as the main obstacle to their scheme to replace democracy with a kleptocratic world order. #PeoplesVote #StopBrexit 
Can't believe this needs to be repeated.Any fake "referendum" in Russia-occupied Ukraine would violate both Ukrainian, & int'l law.Stop lending credence to this Kremlin BS. It cannot happen. Any such fraud will be nothing more than another part of RU's unlawful war on Ukraine 
Watching the #Tory party eat themselves alive whilst they constantly bicker over what kind of #Brexit they want to negotiate, convinces me that THEY will be the main cause of a #NoDealBrexit and the end of this #BrexitShitShow altogether. CALL IT OFF NOW.  #StopBrexit 
EU Brexit Negotiator Michel Barnier: "there are some elements that appear to contradict our guidelines, namely the indivisibility of the four freedoms." 
Foreign visitors get a 20% discount on the cost of UK holidays since Brexit, Andrew. What’s not to like, eh ! Unfortunately the promised export boom has not materialised off the back of the cheaper £. I realise you know all this, but some of your readers may not 
EU chief Brexit negotiator Michel Barnier takes apart Theresa May’s Chequers white paper plan  
find this person and put them in charge of brexit. 
Theresa May put on spot over partnership with DUP by teenagers in Belfast "What we've put forward in terms of Brexit is something that works forall communities in Northern Ireland."Nevan Mawhinney then replied: "But the DUP aren't, the DUP aren'tworking for all communities.  
"We have to be prepared for all scenarios, including no deal"EU's chief negotiator @MichelBarnier warns time is short, and members are "accelerating" preparations for a no deal #Brexit 
Britain prevailed over two World Wars during the last century. I'm sure we can prevail over Brexit, however it unravels.  
Theresa May is talking about the provisions of the Good Friday Agreement the way I talked about books in college seminars where I hadn't read the book. #Brexit 
Pointless Brexit’s gift to us all for summer: £1 now worth less than €1.@EveningStandard 
M Barnier confirms there will be no negotiating on the four freedoms. "If Britain does not accept all of the four freedoms within its proposals, there will be no agreement." To discuss Brexit with the EU is therefore a complete waste of time. @BBCNews 
She replied saying she was delivering the majority support for Brexit but did not address the direct question. She did not address any of the direct questions put to her. 
brexit will be good because mass food shortages will make women hot  
An end of term treat is officially ON for Tuesday. @Jacob_Rees_Mogg V @OllyRobbins at the Brexit committee. This would have been postponed until the autumn if No10 had got its way re end Parliament early....  
Chief Remainiac, civil servant Olly Robbins gets a bonus of ~£20K for 2nd half of 2017 (on top of a salary of ~£130K) - a reward for scheming to tie us shackled to the EU forever after #Brexit. Or, in true EU style, a reward for failure?  
I've no wish to be followed by anyone who is blindly negative OR blindly positive towards Trump. You're all just howling in your own absurd echo chambers. Same problem with Brexit.  
So @MichelBarnier has now raised the need for a full legal agreement on british bases in Cyprus and the status of Gibraltar as well as Ireland. Need these before the WA and needs to be legally binding. Brexit keeps on giving 
Great news that Camden Council leader @Georgia_Gould comes out in support of a Peoples Vote on the Brexit deal after questioning by Lib Dem Cllr @LuisaPorritt. We hope @Keir_Starmer + @jeremycorbyn are listening. #ExitFromBrexit   pic.twitter.com/q6hfHIvHNM 
Michel Barnier just asked series of difficult questions about Theresa May's Brexit white paper, none of which bode well:* Is it compatible with integrity of Single Market?* Will it lead to unjustifiable bureaucracy and costs?* Will it enable the UK to undercut the EU? 
’I look forward to a time when the UK feels free to make statements beyond those issued by the EU.’ Australia’s foreign minister, @juliebishopmp, shares her thoughts on #Brexit at Chatham House. Watch the full video:  
You want me to support Mr Corbyn @jeremycorbyn? Simple, get Jeremy  to support a #PeoplesVote. Tell him to not respect the referendum vote achieved by breaking the law and by cheating. 
Today becoming a truly excellent day in the Brexit shitshow as Theresa May goes to Belfast to say what she wants, and Michel Barnier wanders out of his office in Brussels to say she can't have it. Six meaningful weeks of negotiating time left. Get ready for Hard Brexit. 
British public will get weekly warnings on how a no-deal Brexit will impact on their lives as Theresa May accelerates plans to cover the negotiations collapsing  
1. The most idiotic thing about the #Brexit ultras is that their game is not going to work. For sure they can crash us out of the EU but they won't be in power long enough to bring about their Singapore on Thames nonsense. 
France says Brexit concessions by May make deal 'even harder'  
Having said all that, taking a wider lens to all this and ignoring daily politics it’s awfully hard to see how no deal Brexit now envisioned doesn’t mortally imperil the Union. Scotland and N I voted remain and hard not to see that having a political outworking sooner or later  
This! This would be fantastic @Anna_Soubry - You could do this and I'd support it. I think millions would as well. #PeoplesVote #FinalSay #FinalSayForAll #FBPE #BrexitPlaid could join 'national unity' government, says Tory MP - BBC News 
Think tank says: In the first year of Brexit, car sales would fall by roughly 550,000 units in the UK. As a consequence, Deloitte predicts that approximately 18,000 jobs in the German car industry would be put at risk. 
Very sharp thread on Brexit and union beyond NI. Scottish Tories fear that NI-specific deal could be repurposed for Scotland in event of independence. But an economically damaging Brexit could shift the floating third upon whom union depends (as in N Ireland, to an extent)  
For all the posturing and threats the EU send us daily, they all collectively forget one big thing. Here it is. #Brexit  
Note to the EU27, this is what happens when you let unelected people run your country for you. It's time you took back control.IMF warns no-deal Brexit will wipe $250bn off EU economy with Ireland suffering worst. 
Watch Michel Barnier deliver the EU's first official verdict to the Chequers Brexit plan  
So the Irish PM says he'll block British planes flying over Ireland if Britain takes back ownership of British waters post #Brexit.Can someone remind this obstructionist that air transit is a non-EU 133-nation treaty and Ireland cannot block planes without quitting that treaty?  
We are not self-harming. A gang of venal con-tricksters is treating the British people as hostages to be pushed off the no-deal cliff if the EU won't give them what they want, which is a hard #Brexit resulting in the UK being forced to become a #BrexitTaxHaven. 
If May, or someone who ousts her in order to assert rational government of the country, were to declare a stop to Brexit, MASSIVE supporting crowds should fill the streets of our cities in support (& to shut up the Express & the <25% of the country who would object). 
Overseas residents made a record 39.2 million visits to the UK in 2017, despite Brexit. So much for the isolationist nonsense peddled by Remoaners!  Support us at  
May’s Brexit plan lost in translation  
“Vote Leave didn't file their paperwork correctly! Putin hacked my paper ballot! The Brexit vote doesn't count!” Gentle reminder: Cameron let Remainers outspend Leavers by £5m, not including £9.3m in Govt propaganda.The establishment rigged the EU referendum – and STILL lost.  
yeah that will work considering nobody believes a word she says.Brits to get weekly warnings on how no-deal Brexit will impact lives  via @MailOnline 
Jacob Rees-Mogg backed to take over from Theresa May as PM rocked by Brexit woe  
"Peacekeepers" and "referendum" in Donbas would only mean the West surrendering future of Ukraine.Such moves would create another Russia-occupied territory such as in Moldova.Munich 1938. Do not repeat it!@20committee @Kateryna_Kruk @yevhenfedchenko @Makeiev @StZaryn 
Brexiters are fond of saying, “the EU needs us as much as we need them.”Ok. Here’s how it will be the day after Brexit:EU: Over 750 global trade deals in place & a free trade single market between EU member states.UK: 0 trade deals in place. No access to the single market. 
#Brexit is an abomination built from lies. It holds no benefit to anyone who is not a disaster capitalist. Other Leavers have been conned. Time to wake up. Time to agree on a #PeoplesVote 
You know what I think the worst thing about brexit likely ending in no deal is, that we don't have to go through with it. That our politicians are too cowardly to admit they were wrong, that they are willing to decimate the UK to keep their fucking jobs while 1000s lose them 
A totally justified howl of rage too. Completely understandable that the vote went to Brexit, but none of us knew then what we’re starting to realise now. It’s now seemingly become a battle for positions of power in government rather than a fight for the best for the country.  
This appears to be the point when Brexit, incoherent as a policy, has become a religion. “Let us not lose sight of the belief.” Let us occasionally consider the facts here on Planet Earth.  
During the ref Remain didn’t have a positive message. There is much to criticise about Brexit but we are slipping into the trap of criticising Brexit without offering a positive alternative. If you have a visual that shows positives about the EU pls share it on this thread.   
From the Irish #Brexit Minister , who is in #Brussels at the #Article50 General Affairs Council .  A direct challenge to the PM before she speaks in #Belfast- either the backstop that has already been accepted or one with the same outcome (no border) is a non negotiable. 
Trump. Brexit. Pairing. When did this notion that "The result wasn't affected, so cheating doesn't matter" become a thing? When Lance Armstrong and Charles Ingram cheated, nobody said "Oh well, maybe they'd have won anyway." The results were declared null and void, and rightly. 
Taking everything into account, and having discussed it with my esteemed colleagues, for me there are now 2 Brexit endpoints — no deal, or May capitulates on the backstop. Neither would get through Parliament, so both would produce either an election or 2nd referendum (or both). 
No Deal Brexit will lead to complaints and demonstrations from the same people who've been complaining and demonstrating for the last two years.Cancelling Brexit would trigger a fundamental crisis of democracy- way worse than a few quinoa-'liberals' dancing around with EU flags.  
Crime is up. Trains are broken. The justice system is broken. Democracy is broken. The NHS is in crisis. And the Tories are leading us to a no deal brexit. The Tories. The worst thing to happen to our country since the Nazis.@Conservatives 
The government’s madness in even considering a no deal #Brexit is scaring businesses. Another reason for a #PeoplesVote 
At a large Tesco, 'fighting brexit price rises' stickers look so official.Our pleasure. X  
#Russia's state TV host claims Trump was fine w/ Putin's offer of holding a referendum in E Ukraine, but needed time to sell it to Europe. Host claims to be quoting Bloomberg, but article doesn't contain such info. She could be quoting Antonov, who frequently appears on the show.  
Fascinating that nothing can ever be the fault of #Brexit according to the extreme ##Brexiteers.  So now we are back to the days of Stalinist denunciation of those who are deliberately wrecking the economy for their own political purposes , including the Chancellor himself! 
Designed to look official, every little bit helps!'Fighting brexit price rises' at a supermarket near you. #FBPE 
- proposal to close an entire motorway (albeit 16km long) to ease lorry congestion- electricity generators on barges- passports for ponies- plans to prevent shortages of drugs, food and fuelWelcome to Whitehall’s contingency planning for no-deal Brexit  
The UK is thus cornered, courtesy of plan-less Hard Brexit narrators who are now desperately grabbing for No Deal and the WTO Option (which they still don’t understand) to try and save Brexit from their own folly. /18 
We don't HAVE to suffer food and medical supply shortages. We don't HAVE to suffer job losses. We don't HAVE to have flights grounded. We don't HAVE to force families to split up. We don't HAVE to limit our kid's opportunities. BREXIT is a CHOICE - we don't HAVE to do it. 
Good isn´t it. The EU are now openly backing May because they believe if she is replaced Britain will go for a hard brexit. Its now obvious that they knew she would go for a soft brexit and betray her own country but countries don´t matter where globalists are concerned do they. 
Britain's constitution/democracy may boast about being the oldest but this Brexit process might have revealed it is also in the most need of updating. "Not having been over-run by fascism" or external challenge may have paradoxically brought us to this sorry point. /7 
Brilliant. Bonkers Brexiteer ultras now claiming Remainers inside the government are deliberately slowing economic growth to "undermine faith in Brexit".  
This human factor had been a relatively small one for me. I don't approach things worrying about who else might be on my side. But there are limits and this Brexit process including Brexiteers' continuing descent into madness has eventually revealed those limits. /4 
How exactly would Leo Varadkar enforce his ban on UK planes flying over Ireland? Would they be intercepted by its air force?  #Brexit 
HAMMOND: No Deal planning underway, £3 billion set aside for Brexit preparations, ready to spend more. No Deal was, is and will always be better than a bad EU deal!  
Hammond calling @andreajenkyns a "stupid woman" for asking a legitimate question on Brexit. Awful behaviour from the Chancellor! 
Remember I said that if you want to be kept informed about #Brexit, you should read the @IrishTimes? Well, read this: 
Clear that the ramifications weren't fully understood. We need a #PeoplesVote on the final #Brexit deal to give the public back control  
#Russia's state TV: Ex-diplomat Nikolay Platoshkin says that the referendum in E. Ukraine, offered to Trump by Putin, would be followed by another referendum.Female host clarifies: "First about seceding, then about joining Russia."Platoshkin proceeds to reminisce about Crimea.  
And also, after #Brexit aliens will invade and take over our minds.Project fear are insane.  
Stop beating about the bush. @michaelgove lied during the referendum campaign, knew it then and knows it now. He is a despicable shadow of a human being and May’s instinct to sack him was right first time. The hypocrite bubbles over with false honour.#bbcdp 
No gov't or Opposition with any integrity would knowingly, wantonly elect to destroy the country, as Brexit will do, as even the DExEU analysis demonstrates Brexit will do. It is predicting long-term fall in GDP that matches the worst of the temporary 2008 crash. It is a disgrace 
Not only a Golden Boot winner, but also a sensible voice on Brexit and a #peoplesvote. You can join us here Gary if you'd like to  -  we'd love to work with you!  
The Brexiteers have demanded Ministers prepare for a No Deal Brexit.   Ministers are now preparing for a No Deal Brexit. Brexiteers will now attack these preparations as Project Fear 2. 
With just eight months to go before Brexit, and a new ministerial team being inducted, if .@theresa_may does not act immediately she will drive the UK right off the Brexit cliff. I hope she will see sense and listen to the .@LibDem call for a final say on the deal 
There is a lot in the news on Brexit and no-deal planning. I’ve been clear that we are preparing for every possible outcome, and that’s why I set aside £3bn for Brexit preparations in the last Budget and stand ready to spend more if and when needed. 
Putin told Russian diplomats he proposed a referendum to resolve the conflict in Ukraine during his private meeting with Trump in Helsinki. “Trump didn’t immediately reject it and instead asked Putin to keep the plan secret so he could consider it.”  
After Brexit all the cattle will keel over and die. Luckily I'm not a first-born, or I would really be fearing for my life right now  
No one voted for a no deal #Brexit & too few seriously appreciate how bad it’ll be  
£6m for McClean? Fuck me They should negotiate Brexit  
Trump and Putin discussed a possible referendum in eastern Ukraine during their summit meeting this week, Russia's ambassador to U.S. says.  
Honour to meet Lord Adonis today and talk about #Brexit and Europe!  
Addressing ‘Economists For Free Trade’ John RedwoodMP accused the Chancellor Philip Hammond & BOE Chief Mark Carney of deliberately slowing down economic growth to undermine a clean Brexit, their aim is to prove Project Fear right using slower growth as a weapon. 
#Brexit - What a waste of money! 
Hammond calling @andreajenkyns a "stupid woman" for asking a legitimate question on Brexit. Awful behaviour from the Chancellor! 
Please don't use the term 'alt-right'. They are not some kind of trendy anti-establishment insurgents, they are fascists who would brutally silence all opposition and violently persecute minorities if given half a chance. #Brexit #PeoplesVote #StopBrexit 
ENTER, LINEKER. Incredibly glad that @GaryLineker has joined the growing calls for a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal. Students and young people across the UK thank you. #FFS 
Although not a Corbyn supporter, I find these accusations of anti-Semitism disgraceful. They're a Tory-media orchestrated distraction from this government's disgraceful and abysmal handling of Brexit. 
Hard Brexit to be a big blow for Netherlands, IMF says  
With both sides talking up no deal Brexit it is absolutely crucial to ring fence #citizensrights already agreed. This is a highly complex and ring fencing at least would give some degree of certainty to the 3.6m EU citizens in the UK & 1.2m @BritishInEurope. 
Why Europe’s leaders are staying SILENT on May’s Brexit plans - and what they REALLY think  
Britain should consider ending welfare handouts to Irish nationals, not in response to Leo Varadkar's ridiculous threats, but because it has the potential to save taxpayers' money, reduce pressure on public services and cut crime.  #Brexit 
For over 2 years it's been blindingly obvious to the rational that the deal we have inside the EU is the most economically and politically advantageous the UK could have. Theresa May cannot negotiate anything better....that's it. #Brexit 
Not least because we were told time and time again by the Brexiteers a No Deal Brexit was simply a product of Project Fear. The EU would never countenance it because they want to sell us lots of cars and glockenspiels... 
Theresa May’s top Brexit official, £160,000-a-year Olly Robbins, has just received a taxpayer-funded bonus of almost £20,000 for “good performance”.2 years down the line and hurtling towards a no deal scenario and she gives him twenty grand.They are laughing at us. 
Surely the only sensible outcome for Northern Ireland is reunification. #Brexit 
We’re not actually, really, seriously, possibly contemplating a no deal Brexit, are we? Democracy is democracy and all that but there are limits to how much we want to self-harm, surely. #PeoplesVote 
Eurosceptic outrage as Whitehall's 'real Mr Brexit' Oliver Robbins scoops up to £20,000 bonus for six months' work  
Know we went through the Brexit looking glass long ago, but this - a Brextremist conspiracy theory accusing Chancellor of deliberately and secretly sabotaging the economy to undermine Brexit, which would otherwise be a glorious success - is something else  
A thread on the current state of UK-EU #Brexit negotiations. The immediate focus will need to be on the withdrawal agreement and particularly the NI backstop. (1/9) 
5 things for Friday:- Missouri tourist boat tragedy- Trump and Putin, the sequel- Brexit- Disney vs. Comcast- NFL and the National Anthem 
Watch as @mrjamesob sums up the "5 stages of Brexit" in under 3 minutes 
Well then let me correct that quickly. It’s absolutely #StopBrexit for me now. Brexit’s had its chance. It clearly fails politically in any format, let alone economically. Ditching Brexit wholesale is the first step to a better future.You can rt me ‘til kingdom come on that. 
Brexit uncertainty has already damaged Britain’s exporters  
The BBC cannot continue to ignore these important stories in favour of spreading blatant Government #Brexit spin. BBC journalists must SPEAK OUT and return to proper FACTUAL reporting. Who pays the License Fees? The "British People" do!  
Theresa May i have come to the conclusion would you F**K OFF and leave Brexit to someone who knows about it. You have madea complete and utter Cock UP of Brexit so far, you sold us out and are a traitor too your country and it's people. Give it up and let a Brexiter take over. 
Devastating to hear North East Fife farmer Tim Stockwell tell @BBCRadioScot #gms that within a generation #Scotland's #softfruit industry may disappear because of #Brexit  
..@sinnfeinireland president @MaryLouMcDonald says Theresa May has come to Belfast to "pick a fight with Ireland and to pick a fight with the European Union"  #brexit  
No more I  NHS for the Brexited #brexit #brexigeddon 
Labour would rather respect a referendum that’s mired in #VoteLeaveFraud, allegations of illegal campaign financing & blatant & obvious lies than offer us, the voters, a final say on Brexit.It seems, despite their claims, Labour are a hard Brexit party.   
.@AllianceParty leader @naomi_long : the PM is escalating the issues of the backstop & the customs union to issues that are about sovereignty. These are not sovereignty issues - the GFA settled sovereignty.  #brexit  
pretty empty speech by Theresa May in Northern Ireland today - she accepted that UK Financial services companies would lose the passport into the EU - further acceptance that #Brexit can & will have no positive consequences for the UK at all @peoplesvote_uk 
What #Brexit has givilen us is a real insight of how EU institutionalised the establishment & media has become, entrenched & ingrained into the very heart of parliament & how far these people will go to preserve it against the wishes of the British people 
The one thing underlined about Brexit in Belfast is that not one questioner media or business is talking about the "opportunities" Brexiteers banged on about. ... It is all about avoiding the utter disaster it is going to be.  
RE: Brexit. When the public voted to call that boat Boaty McBoatface, everyone thought there'd be mass rioting if the decision wasn't upheld. Then someone had the idea to call it David Attenborough, and everyone shut up, because you can't say a bad word against David Attenborough 
Leo Varadkar's latest outburst has exposed the cynical deceit of the EU as he threatens to stop UK planes from flying over Ireland:  #Brexit 
I don’t think brexiters are hysterical. Most have decided the EU is to blame for all their ills and cannot absorb any information which threatens their core belief. So facts are dismissed or reinvented to suit the Brexit beliefs.  
"The process of withdrawal will be complex and it will require hard work" - PM Theresa May on #Brexit process  
Theresa May's challenge to EU negotiators: improve your proposals on Northern Ireland, trade and borders after #Brexit - rather than "fall back onto previous positions that have been proven unworkable"  
The speech by @theresa_may clearly demonstrates that the British Government is nether neutral or honest broker of the GFA. Respect the GFA and the democratic vote of NI (Brexit) as we wish to remain in Europe, therefore trigger #BorderPoll now!#Irish#European# 
UK government is today in real time ripping up an international agreement w Ireland. They're doing this to allow themselves  be able to go out and make other international agreements.Brexit means 'we do what we like Johnny Foreigner and you jolly well have to agree' 
Theresa May: As PM of the UK & NI it is my duty to serve the whole UK & to govern in the interests of every part of it.ME: Yes but so far you've only served your own party self interest & those of the DUP, bribed to back you & listened to only 26.5% of the Ppl who back #Brexit 
"The #Brexit shows dramatically that leaving the European Union does not solve one single problem, but creates many new, much larger problems." Minister of State for Europe @MiRo_SPD ahead of today's #GAC on #Art50 in #EU27 format. @GermanyDiplo 
So Brexit means Ireland’s economy tanks too. Seems fair right?   
#Brexit is Great Britain! There is no cause for alarm.  
The IMF warns a no deal brexit will wipe $250 Billion off the EU economy and wreck the Irish economy. It will also save the UK £39 billion.I dare Ireland to play hardball with the UK. I fucking dare you @campaignforleo 
Notion of a hard border in Ireland after #Brexit is "inconceivable" and "alien", says PM Theresa May during speech in Northern Ireland  
Prime Minister Theresa May says "our job" is not to deal with Brexit in "theory" but to make a success of it in "practice" and that there can never be a hard border between Northern Ireland and the Republic of Ireland 
British Prime Minister here in Ireland to continue upholding the denial of rights for Irish citizens and impose Brexit against the wishes of the electorate in the North. We will not accept being collateral damage in the Tory civil war.  
PM once again comprehensively demolishes the Brexiteer idea that Britain could simply leave the Irish border unmanned after the UK leaves the EU. Everything flows from that decision and the backstop. Brexit will never escape the dreary steeples of Fermanagh and Tyrone. 
Theresa May in Belfast quotes parity of esteem for unionist, while refusing an Irish Language Act. Talks up consent while imposing #Brexit against the will of the majority. Rejects agreed backstop. This isn’t a leaders speech this is trolling nationalists, Irish gov. and EU. 
Ireland’s PM branded ‘mad’ for threatening to stop British planes flying over Ireland as revenge for Brexit  
Switched off Theresa May's Northern Ireland speech a few mins in; just more vacuous virtue signalling with a dollop of her max strength Brexit turd polish. 
The UK is the biggest exporter of books in the world. Most go to non-EU countries. Industry announces record sales of £5.7 billion. BBC headline: "Brexit threat to record exports". 
Crash out of EU. Blame EU intransigence when the errors are all ours. Foment hatred of EU citizens in the UK. Shred regulations and welcome the disaster capitalists and hedge funds with open arms. Brexit 101. 
England showing Scotland its Brexit magic trick.  
Ok, a bit of fun. Which fictional character would you put in charge of #Brexit negotiations? 
Now we have 4 nations in a union!! :)) This guff and dangerous flirt with a hard hard brexit and borders is about keeping DUP and her parliament working going... As ever party in power before what is good for people's jobs and communities comes first.  
It is astonishing that no one can remember the BBC, Channel 4 or Sky News broadcasting A SINGLE positive message about Brexit, even though that's what the majority of the country wants. Time for a new broadcaster to serve the 20 million odd abandoned Brexiteers.   
It’s now clear that the only way to achieve Brexit is to lie about the EU, promise things the can’t deliver, break election law and now... cheat breast-feeding mums out of a democratic vote in Parliament. Brexiteers: have you no sense of shame? 
Whatever you think of Brexit,for or against,the sight of the PM utterly incapable of articulating her own position is incredibly worrying. How can we expect to get a great deal when Mrs.May doesn’t even understand how it will work?  
The only solution “is to take the final Brexit decision out of the hands of deadlocked politicians, away from the backroom deals, and give it back to the people”. #PeoplesVotepetition #BrexitisBonkers #FBPE 
Rees-Mogg’s hard Brexit mob is holding the country hostage, says @jamesrbuk 
WATCH LIVE: PM @Theresa_May speaks about the Union and Brexit in Belfast  
By cheering Brexit, dissing the EU, suggesting NATO is obsolete, departing Syria, trying to get on with Putin, Trump is threatening the entire US foreign policy establishment with what it fears most – irrelevance. For if there’s no war and no war wanted, what does a War Party do? 
#TheresaMay asks EU to respond quickly to her #Brexit deal proposals, having taken over two years to produce them. You couldn't make it up. Small wonder she & her ship of fools (AKA the Cabinet) are exasperating #EU27. So inept, so inept. 
We are not Brits we are different nations & Scotland isnae xenophobic we welcome everyone who want to come live in a progressive country. We also didn't vote for Brexit & won't be dragged anywhere by this inept corrupt RW tory government. We are leaving the UK. #LeaveUK #StillYes 
Is the Chancellor deliberately undermining Brexit? It wouldn't surprise us. 
Treasury and Bank of England accused of deliberately slowing down the economy to undermine confidence in Brexit:  #BrexitBetrayal 
Busy day in Brussels with ⁦@HMcEntee⁩ and ⁦@MichelBarnier⁩  at EU General Affairs Council discussing #Brexit. Solidarity is clear across EU.  
Secret Protocol of the Helsinki Summit: the Third Fake ‘Referendum’ in Russian-occupied UkraineMy @RadioLemberg article. 
By that means you support Tory austerity & state sponsored cruelty. A Tory Brexit risking jobs and the economy & a likely no deal. Vote anyone than LAB and get tory.YOU are part of the problem & why we have endured Tory cruelty for 8 years.  
Queen's private estate records £20m profit but could take Brexit hit  
In Brussels with ⁦@HMcEntee⁩ to meet ⁦@MichelBarnier⁩ at GAC - focused discussion on protecting Ire and Northern Ireland in #Brexit negotiations. For NI the EU Backstop proposal is not a threat to GFA, it is BREXIT that threatens status quo. EU will always defend GFA.  
There's a word [Brexit] missing from [Brexit] this headline but [Brexit] we can't quite [Brexit] put our finger on it. Anyone? 
A reminder that the Brexit movement is and has been pushed by some very rich people who were shit-scared of the pending EU anti tax avoidance rules coming in 2019.  
As every day of this Brexit madness continues, I think more and more of John - who poured his life and spent his health trying to get people to understand the complex nature of relationships here, and the importance of us all being able to have a European identity.  
Fabulous Voters,Diplomatic etiquette is the hot oil massage that greases the wheels of power. They don't me #TheIronLama for no reason. Or for any reason either. Mulletproof or Bulletproof, I've made #Brexit my business.Your LeaderDaleo Lama  
This is factually incorrect and intentionally provocative from one of the world's top rags.#brexit  
I keep rolling this sentence around my head, trying to make sense of its insanity: "Consumers and companies will be given detailed advice in weekly “bundles” from the start of next week on how to prepare for “a disorderly Brexit”, under government plans."  
People are just sending me music videos. I said footage, and you can see from the video that it's one long shot to be edited later. But people don't think. It's why we've got Brexit and Trump. 
good to see groups like @YoungTories4PV and @YoungLabour4PV springing up Young people regardless of how they vote in a general election are OVERWHELMINGLY pro People’s Vote - they must be included in the Brexit debate!  
working on my clever satirical novel about Brexit, there is a donkey called Willo d'People and horny sealion called Doris Bonson 
Jo Swinson, At first I was lost for words, now I am angry.It seems that there are no depths to which the Conservatives won't stoop The British people should get the final say on the Brexit deal, with the option to remain in the EU. Agree? Add your name:  
This government, #Labour can't deliver Brexit. It's that simple. This farce WILL end. The cost to Britain will be HUGE. Out of this mess tho we must see British politics is changed. We are ill-served by what we have now. WE MUST DEMAND CHANGE, WE MUST MAKE CHANGE HAPPEN.  
I’m 50. At various times in my life I’ve witnessed ‘chaos’ - 3 day week, 1979 Referendum, Miners’ Strike, Poll Tax, Iraq War, The Vow. But this is by far the worst I can remember #brexitchaos 
I know there are several #remainernow who are also a @UKLabour members, if you would like to get involved with a vital project  @remain_labour are working on  to help the leadership shift on #brexit I would love to hear from you ASAP.#PeoplesVote #labour #StopBrexit 
Like many on the right the prospect of a Corbyn government appals me but I'm gradually internalising it as a certainty simply because a no deal #Brexit will be unforgivable. 
‘Almost Stalinist’: Labour Brexiteer Kate Hoey lashes out at EU — RT UK News  # ONE OF THE FEW DECENT LABOUR PARTY MPs  
May is not going to get the brexit she wants. Barniet will continue to humiliate her until the whole damned cabinet has resigned which will automatically set her off chirping "brexit means brexit. She is a disaster and has given up on brexit to try and save her miserable job. 
The EU continues to reject every major concession May makes (except the offer of money) while simultaneously  actively plotting to undermine the UK's economy.When will our government stand up for the United Kingdom in #Brexittalks? 
'AIRHEAD' Rees-Mogg blasts Varadkar as Ireland threatens to BLOCK planes in Brexit revenge. Only a dumb Irishman would fail to see the difference between trawling hundreds of thousands of tons of fish from our seas and flying through their airspace.   
NEWS! Hard Brexit will be ‘brilliant for Britain’, insists complete f*cking moron  
.@GerryCarrollPBP tells @qnewsdesk @theresa_may isn’t welcome in Northern Ireland because she’s refusing to deal with issues facing people here outside of BREXIT. The PM’s due to give a speech on that very issue later this morning.  
So good for cheap holidays. Meanwhile more expensive for British citizens to go overseas. Brexit really is a fools business... 
Remember last December when Julia was boasting Remainers got it wrong?And now May and 'her' government are betraying everything they promised the EU at that stage of Brexit negotiations, threatening peace in Ireland.People will be crying, Julia. Because hard won peace is lost.  
BBC working on a series of programmes to celebrate leaving the EU and Brexit. To be screened when they think we’re leaving. No wonder they are so heavily involved and invested in promoting Brexit. Disgraceful BBC. Stop Brexit.#FBPE 
Those involved in the stop Brexit movement need to decide what the purpose of their campaigning is: is it to win people over, or is it to enable the individuals involved to feel “smart and right” to the exclusion of others. Because it looks and smells a lot like the latter  
⁦@theresa_may⁩ demands new deal from EU on Irish border backstop #Brexit The PM still doesn’t understand that she’s the suppliant, & she’s only in this mess bcse she gave Art50 notice before she had an agreed plan. #Mayhem indeed. 
So there's this trend of "#FBPE supporters aren't really working class! Posh yuppies who are anti Brexit because they know nothing of struggle!"These are my hands. I can assure you they don't get in a state like this day after day by holding a champagne glass.  
In the UK we're thinking about having a second Brexit referendum. Maybe Putin could organise it, since he's so keen to hold referendums in other people's countries. 
Michael Barnier has said: Chequers blueprint for #Brexit breaches “fundamental” European principles & May will need to make further concessionsWe say: No, there can be no further concessions on the already far too soft White Paper#ChequersMeansCorbyn 
EXCLUSIVE: How the Chancellor is 'KILLING the economy on purpose' just to sabotage Brexit  
Is it just me, or does Brexit now feel like a late night game of Risk where no one is really sure why they're playing any more but also won't admit defeat and go to bed 
Today I took Sir David Attenborough's advice and spent 15 minutes in my garden counting butterflies. I counted zero. I'm still stressed out about Brexit and now I'm also worried that butterflies hate me. Thanks for nothing David. 
READ: 5 times Brexiteers talked down the chance of a no deal which now looms. We can't trust Brexiteers with our future. We need a #PeoplesVote on the final #Brexit deal:  
Tech industry body TechUK warns that if the final Brexit deal sees the UK outside of the Single Market for services, the UK digital economy would be put at serious risk.To all our technologists & IT gurus, contact your MP and tell them this is madness! 
So here it is. The moment Theresa May went back on her word to the EU and ensured a No deal Brexit. A decision which according to the government's own figures will cost us 2.8 million jobs and £3bn per week.The choice now between No Deal or No Brexit. 
World not shunning Brexit Blighty ... so far. Overseas residents made a record 39.2 million visits to the UK in 2017, 4% more than in 2016  
Matthew Parris: An idea of Brexit was sold by the Leave campaign which is simply not deliverableIt's all very well saying it's the will of the people but the people could will that pigs could fly but they can't fly & the Brexit they want can't be deliveredWhy don't MPs get it? 
It’s not just Julian Smith who should go over pairinggate. Brandon Lewis said he “thought” it was an honest mistake. Not when you get it right 7 times but wrong on the last 2 crucial knife edge Brexit votes! Also serious questions on what PM actually knew about this skulduggery  
Information war: the British electorate was bombarded with illicit propaganda before the Brexit vote. Most its newspapers and media fail to report the cheating even 2 years after the vote. Democracy depends on accurate information. Without it, demagoguery follows.  
Anchor Butter a New Zealand company has operations in Wiltshire and has already said it will continue providing UK with dairy products post BREXIT. Cheesemakers in UK rubbing their hands. Yet another scaremongering story from The Independent 
Here's my column on Brexit (wrote it yesterday so it will now be 3 episodes of chaos behind)  
Tánaiste @simoncoveney and Minister for European Affairs @HMcEntee held a meeting with Chief EU Brexit negotiator @MichelBarnier in Brussels this morning ahead of todays GAC (Article 50) meeting. 
US media grasp catastrophic enormity of May's speech today on NI border & Brexit. NI peace process is in danger now.  
A Russian referendum in Ukraine would be something what we already know.Sudetenland, 1938.Hitler did the same.Please do not even consider such a surrender.@JulianRoepcke @edwardlucas @Kateryna_Kruk @Makeiev @SlawomirDebski @john_sipher 
The British people should get the final say on the Brexit deal, with the option to remain in the EU. Agree? Add your name:  
Sir David Attenborough: Stop squabbling over Brexit and start counting butterfliesMe: *Goes outside for the first time in 2 weeks*  
‘All that Scottish fruit rotting in fields is because Scots are lazy!’ says caller‘How do we target young people?’ asks hostNever mind Brexit, crap conditions and wages with £ on par with EuroDo BBC do anything other than tidy up after UKGov these days?  
BOOM: Record number of overseas visitors to Brexit UK in 2017, up 4% since 2016. Global Britain is here to stay!  
Ex-EU commissioner Hill has become #Brexit adviser at mega-bank UBS. There's a clear overlap with his previous responsibilities as commissioner for financial regulation. We've written to @JunckerEU and asked him to investigate Hill's #revolvingdoors jobs:  
The best way for the UK to bring the EU to heel is to say plainly an unambigiously that the UK prefers a No Deal walk away Brexit. Watch them scramble as the fear sets in that they won't get the £39bn May promised. 
Brexit: for the few, not the many.Women will never sit back and watch a bunch of privileged guys strip away our hard won peace, prosperity and legal protections. Time to join the fight #WomenAgainstBrexit #stopbrexit 
EU citizens! Thanks to backup from the EU, ireland will soon be able to deal this crushing blow to the UK after Brexit. It won't affect Ireland adversely in any way shape or form, just the UK. We really are stronger as a 27. 
It's interesting that only those unaffected by Brexit champion the necessity of Brexit.#StopBrexit with a #PeoplesVote 
RESIGN YOU SLIMEY T--D JULIAN SMITH Tory chief whip under mounting pressure to resign over Brexit vote 'cheating'  
Cancelling Brexit will bring a few gammon onto the streets.Going ahead with Brexit will bring thousands of unemployed onto the streets. It will mean the 1920s all over again.  
“We can put a man on the Moon but we can’t #brexit Britain out of the EU” etc...   
Open & honest meeting with the Prime Minister, we made it clear that as Unionists Northern Ireland will not be the price for a reckless Brexit and reassured that she agreed.  
Oasis reforming would be the ultimate manifestation of all things Brexit. 
It’s also a shame that Labour continues to mislead us & openly spread disinformation then isn’t it.Tony Blair might be wrong on many things but he’s right  on Brexit. He’s right on Labour’s position re Brexit. He’s right that millions of Labour voters will no longer vote Labour  
No, your current Brexit path will lead to the loss of nearly 3 million jobs in the UK according to DEXEU  
The European Commission has allowed a group to launch a petition calling for permanent EU citizenship after Brexit.The proposed petition on “Permanent European Union Citizenship” is to be registered on July 23 as a European Citizens’ Initiative. 
What’s Liam Fox been up to? Clearing the way for chlorinated chickens. The trade secretary is busy pitching Britain into a global race to the bottom after Brexit  
 RT if you agree: the best way to avoid a disastrous no deal #Brexit - protecting jobs and living standards - is to stay in the Single Market.  Here’s why.  
This week what appears to be a Tory plot led by the Chief Whip took away Jo Swinson's vote on key Brexit legislation by violating a 'pairing' arrangement.@cajardineMP writes on the need to implement proxy voting. 
Is there any sane reason why Scotland shouldn't vote for independence ?  Westminster isn't fit for purpose, the economy is tanking, inflation rising and  a Hard #brexit is going to wipe 10% off our GDP. There is a different way #indyref2 #scotref 
How top Brexiteers are thinking about surviving Brexit. Mogg - invest in Ireland. Lord Ashcroft recommends Malta. Lord Lawson - French residency. Gove- become PM. Rupert Murdoch - doesn’t live here. These options probably  not available to everyone .... 
When so much of the WM government's handling of Brexit has been shambolic, how confident can we be that their contingency planning for a hard Brexit or a no deal will be up to much?   Do not expect it to be "all right on the night"! 
UK's youngest Brexit voter has died aged seventy three 
(tourist gets off plane in Scotland) Visit Scotland: Welcome, please enjoy some of our magnificent engineering and our values of tolerance and care. You are welcome-(unionist jumps in) Unionist: GO HOME! WE'RE A SHITE COUNTRY! WE HATE OURSELVES! BREXIT MEANS BREXIT!  
Should Sir David Attenborough be on prescription, muses @bbcnickrobinson, as the great naturalist extols the health benefits of #ButterflyCount - "It's good for people just to forget about the woes of Brexit and concentrate on the natural world... good for the soul" #r4today 
'Domestic legislation does not an international agreement make.' Quite. Too much media reporting of recent events in Parliament appears to suppose that MPs are deciding what form Brexit will take — rather than merely deciding what they want the Government to put to the EU.  
Stop squabbling over Brexit and start counting butterflies, says Sir David Attenborough  
“Nothing at all will change even with the hardest Brexit” says man who told investors to pull money out of Britain because of Brexit. 
Theresa May “let me tell you what I’ve been doing this week”Vote rigging cheating lying, so stupid couldn’t even answer a basic Brexit question, oh and panicking and holding giant Orange balloons hand FFS!!!  
Calling all young people!!! It’s important to seize every opportunity we can to make our voices heard in the Brexit debate   
From a solicitor in Belfast. This seems crazy when Irish people are being told they do *not* need to apply for post-Brexit settled status. @BernardRyan1 @SimonFRCox 
News: A no-deal Brexit could lead to food rationing.Brexiteer, at home surrounded by their WW2 memorabilia: Finally. The good days are returning. 
John Redwood: Thank the Irish PM for showing us how absurd Project Fear is.There are international agreements allowing overflights.Irish planes will still fly over UK once we have left EU & UK planes will still fly over Ireland...#Brexit #Leave #EU 
Ireland threatens to block UK planes from its air if Britain crashes out of Brexit talks with no deal  
I'll literally sign any old shit to get us out of this. Sign if you want to - don't get your knickers in a twist if you don't. Simple! The British people should get the final say on the Brexit deal, with the option to remain in the EU. Agree? Then sign.  
David Lammy's "like a shit episode of Black Mirror" might be the best description yet of the Hard Brexit doomsday scenario. 
.@EmilyThornberry says we must 'accept our instructions' and let #Brexit happen.So, @UKLabour should 'accept our instructions', support Tories on: Sure Start closures, NHS cuts, a hostile immigration policy?No. We stand up for what is right. We should stand for a #PeoplesVote 
The trouble is that Brexit damage and other economic shocks are not mutually exclusive propositions. The nightmare scenario is that both happen at once.  
As millions of lives are disrupted in Ireland, as May stumbles from one crisis to another and as government stock piles spam in case of a no deal Brexit  - it's worth remembering that none of this is necessary. We don't "have to" do this. Everything was working perfectly well. 
Spanish prosecutors have dropped a European Arrest Warrant for former Catalan leader Carles Puigdemont, over his part in last October's controversial independence referendum  
Theresa May facing threat of another Brexit crisis as top law officers in Wales and Northern Ireland back Scottish Government ahead of Supreme Court showdown.  
Government no-deal Brexit advice leaflet, no. 58 of 70  
Spanish prosecutors have dropped a European Arrest Warrant for former Catalan leader Carles Puigdemont, over his part in last October's controversial independence referendum  
Here are your tea leaves on July 20th 2018, careful as they are bitter:Brexit is not recoverable and is going to destroy the lives of millions, as well as bringing life under emergency legislation.Russia’s success in America is not recoverable.Europe will face war. 
Let's remember, when the establishment had "more control", you & I had no rights. Unions fought hard for people for decades to get so many of the rights you & I now take for granted. They were obtained for people by people representing & helping others. Brexit can undo all that. 
The #FBPE community has an essential role, giving a united voice to those speaking out against hate, loss of rights, freedoms, peace & security that Brexit represents. It empowers those isolated in Leave areas or families who need a hand to hold. Join up, RT, #FBPE #TheResistance 
#EU27 ministers to discuss today with @michelbarnier #Brexit and future EU-UK relations. Follow the meeting:  #GAC #Art50 
You avoid reporting on how much of a disaster Brexit is because you consider the issue “settled” yet you report extensively on UKIP, despite them holding no seats, because that issue is not settled somehow?  
.@theresa_may & the @CONservatives KNOW ‘no deal’ is reckless and ruinous for the U.K.If not, why didn’t they just walk away the day after the referendum result? We must NOT leave the EU with ‘no deal’ & @UKLabour must push hard for a General Election if that is the outcome. 
Hugely doubtful that a loada entitled foul-mouthed lefty comedians sneerily bashing Donnie Trump and Brexit on scripted comedy panel shows for 30 minutes solid will amuse audiences one century later.However Charlie Chaplin still holds up today.#TopClassComedy 
I voted Leave, which I now regret, but it was NOT a vote for this kind of mad Hard Brexit.If the choice in 2016 had been between No Deal and Remain, Remain would have won comfortably. If this is now the choice, we should be asked if we still want to go through with it. 
This is a graphic illustration that all th PM has is a bunch of cliches rather than the smallest clue as to how to resolve the many Brexit conundrums.  
This has aged well.Boris Johnson "Brexit will be a titanic success" - and it is certainly proving to be!  
Sobering analysis from across the Atlantic....Theresa May’s Brexit speech may break the Northern Ireland peace process - The Washington Post  
This just raises even more questions. @DamianCollins & @commonscms committee have been asking for this info for EU referendum for months. And Facebook has refused to hand it over. Why???  
It's worth noting that Brexit is supported by quite a few black and brown-skinned people in the Tory Party, too. Arrogance and ideological obsession transcend race. They transcend party, too.  
I voted to leave and I was adamant it was for the best but gradually over the past two years I have changed my mind. The EU needs to reform but if we had another referendum I would vote to stay.  The public need another vote I didn’t vote for this  
What a delight to hear David Attenborough on #BBCR4today advising we all forget about Brexit for a little while and go and count butterflies instead. I’ll tell my newsdesk.... 
Jacob Rees-Mogg's ERG group is setting the Government up to fail so that we inevitably head towards a No Deal Brexit, which they will justify by whipping up jingoism and xenophobia against Europe. Don't let them get away with it.Me on @GMB this morning: 
UK Prime Minister Theresa May is expected to tell the EU that the UK will never accept a border between Northern Ireland and mainland Britain, and that its leaders must "evolve" their position in Brexit talks  
SIR DAVID ATTENBOROUGH JUST SAID WE NEED TO TAKE A BREAK FROM BREXIT THAT IS AN ORDER 
WATCH: As the warnings of a disastrous 'no deal' Brexit start to pile up, don't forget that leading Brextremists said that getting a Brexit deal 'would be easy'.Don't let them get away with it. Please RT this so everybody knows:  
Just landed in Brussels for meeting with @simoncoveney & @MichelBarnier followed by #Article50 General Affairs Committee. On the agenda... Brexit Brexit Brexit 
The waste, stupidity & pointlessness of Brexit: @nytimes “With Brexit looming, governments around the EU are planning: Banks are moving staff out of Britain. Belgium is considering drones for customs surveillance. The Dutch government is hiring nearly 1,000 new customs officials” 
“Theresa May inexplicably doled out £20,000 to her new Brexit civil service guru Oliver Robbins”  
Time for Varadker to shut up and try and reach a sensible Brexit solution.  
You think Mogg & Johnson care? “A hard Brexit would damage Ireland's economy far more than that of any other EU member state, the International Monetary Fund has warned” @thetimes 
Interesting. @TheEconomist is calling for a second referendum.  But note the final paragraph: "Be in no doubt, a referendum is a desperate remedy... How much better if Parliament were to spare the people and make up its mind." 
What Tory Leave voters should do to save Brexit. My latest piece for Brexit Central  
UK Prime Minister Theresa May is expected to tell the EU that the UK will never accept a border between Northern Ireland and mainland Britain, and that its leaders must "evolve" their position in Brexit talks  
Corbyn's Brexit outriders are adopting a more ameliorative tone - because they recognise this is damaging Labour. If I wanted sweet words whispered into my ear, I'd talk to @clairemaugham. What I want is sensible policy proposals. 
Brexit News:Brexiteer Sir Edward Leigh said the EU is estimated to have a wine cellar boasting over 42,000 bottles. He urged ministers to promise to take back control of our fair share of this wine. In Other News:Since 2010 foodbank users increase from thousands to millions.  
If Barnier rejects May’s deal, what then? My @telegraph column on Brexit’s new Plan B:   
Brexit: Watchdog warns of need to issue driving permitsOur current driving licences will not be valid in EU from March next year unless there is a Brexit agreement#StopBrexit 
The incredible stupidy of Brexit, which could so easily be stopped: “As March 2019 draws closer, so does the prospect of a no-deal Brexit. From next week companies and consumers to be given weekly detailed advice on how to prepare for a "disorderly" exit from the EU @thetimes 
Worst of all, Corbyn lacks courage. You don't sit around and do nothing about anti-Semitism because it's all a bit awkward. You don't sign up to a disastrous policy on Brexit because of an ancient advisory referendum and what your market research says. You do what is right.  
'She is turning Leave into Remain!' MEP accuses May of 'overturning referendum by stealth'  
Facebook has agreed to give Irish voters details of who targeted them online during the abortion referendum, and how much was spent. So why won’t they do the same for Brexit referendum?  
What are you doing to address the sharp increase in crime in London? You tweet all the time about how much you hate Trump & Brexit but we just really want a mayor who is tough on crime & TFL strikes  
I don’t want to scare anyone, but we are definitely going to have a no-deal Brexit, and it’s going to be a disaster. How do you know, Twll? I hear you ask. Well...  
Two loanees, playing matches in a training kit, no club communication on anything other than repeat invitations to buy a Brexit paving slab or spunk £15 to watch kids play York on a channel that has never worked properly. Appointing Bielsa against this backdrop is bizarre. #lufc 
What a shame that #fbpe is being attacked by infighting by certain political factions. Just for the record, I think the majority are great people - a community that has come together to fight #brexit   I am not aligned to any party and will continue to use #fbpe  
It now takes a US paper to explain just what was so bad about May's NI speech: Analysis | Theresa May’s Brexit speech may break the Northern Ireland peace process  
From anxiety to Zuckerberg: an A-Z of Brexit  
I’ve just joined @YesCymru as I believe passionately in my country and the survival of our language and culture, which seems increasingly under threat amid the rise of xenophobia and bigotry becoming apparent post brexit  it was really easy. #gwlad #ymaohyd 
I have watched this a few times. What's breathtaking about it is not just the content & delivery - but the fact that politics is in such a messed-up state that the most raging class analysis of Brexit lunacy comes from... a Tory MP.  
There needs to be a HUGE anti-Brexit march in Belfast in October. Happy to do what I can to bring people together to organise  
Really worth watching clips in @mpc_1968 thread. If the Prime Minister cannot explain to Parliament clearly how her White Paper Customs plan will operate IN PRACTICE, how are businesses supposed to prepare?In theory, pigs fly. In practice, they don’t. Brexit, in a nutshell.  
The cost of a hard Brexit would be enormous for countries like Ireland. It would reduce GDP by 1.5% in total in the EU. Interesting new study by the IMF. #in 
Fri 20th July it is now a LEGAL FACT that both Leave campaigns deliberately broke the law to win the Brexit referendum@BorisJohnson @michaelgove  should be in jail    #VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw #VoteLeaveCheatedSign andSign 
Johnson said that accepting May’s Brexit deal would be like “polishing a turd”. What Johnson does'nt acknowledge is that it is his turd. If he is incapable of clearing up after himself, the least he can do is not blame the stench on others.#BrexitShambles 
And yet he still talks more sense on Brexit than you, Owen.  
We may as well start the public inquiry into the betrayal of Brexit right now. May’s deceiving of the British public will never be forgiven.  
While UK politicians furiously insist Brexit is none of Ireland’s business.  
‘The job of the opposition is to oppose. Alas, we haven’t seen much of that lately, except opposing those seeking to root out anti-Semitism from within the Labour party itself. Least of all on Brexit’  
It is not that "the #brexit they wanted" can not be delivered, it's that it could never be delivered because it was never based in fact. It was always a fantasy and now reality proves that.  It can not be the will of the people because it doesn't exist.  #FBPE 
No deal Brexit would make UK ‘dumping ground’ for chemicals banned in Europe, environmental groups warn | The Independent  
When Boris Johnson calls Northern Ireland ‘the tail wagging the dog’ of Brexit, he demonstrates a disregard  for public duty to maintain the peace which is sickening for a former Foreign Secretary 
Here is another reason why there isn’t (and cannot be) any” #Brexit dividend” - along with increased borrowing and duplication of arrangements we already enjoy as members of th #EU 
It can be hysterical and inflammatory to predict violence, but sometimes it’s also necessary to be clear about the risks. The no deal Brexit that we’re now sliding towards carries that risk. When people lose jobs, can’t feed families, bad things can follow. 
Food expert warns Brexit could lead to rationing ... and the UK is 'less prepared than in 1939'  Tory enforced food rationing on the Working Classes you can bet their tables will be overflowing. 
Good news, @facebook have agreed to reveal data on how much money was spent in online adverts during the recent #repealthe8th referendum campaign. It sets an important international precedent. We're now looking for @Google to do the same. @TransparentRef 
Theresa May: I will never accept EU's ideas on Irish Brexit border  
Brexit: May knows how catastrophic no deal would mean to the country and to ordinary people. She knows if she published this information there would be public outrage against her and Brexit.  
Remember, @johnredwood has advised his clients (he's only a part time MP) to get their money out of the UK. He wants a hard Brexit so the pound tanks further and they can use their foreign currency to buy UK assets cheap.Because YOU don't matter in this.#StopBrexit #FBPE 
two years into Brexit and chill, absolutely no plan yet and they still haven’t said “haha only joking”  
If you are not fighting against #Brexit, you are complicit.If you are complicit, you are on the wrong side of history.If you don't like being called one of the bad guys, you know what to do!#FBPE#PeoplesVote (because Parliament hasn't the courage to #StopBrexitSaveBritain ) 
Theresa May is to put the country on a no-deal Brexit footing  
For what? : Theresa May's Brexit mandarin Olly Robbins was paid £20,000 bonus  via @MailOnline 
4 fight for democracy which is crumbling before your eyes. You allowed blind loyalty to lead you by the nose to the worst kind of Brexit. You think you have won, you have won nothing, you will all lose. You have no one to blame but yourself, your apathy & your blind loyalty. 
2 Fucking fuckers will fucking get away with it! 'You voted for Brexit, we never defined Brexit, you have your Brexit. We said best possible, this is the best we could do. You didn't hit the streets, you didn't sign the petitions, you sat back and did nothing like you 3 
A lot of talk about ministers and civil servants 'making preparations for a No Deal #Brexit'. The government has been unable to even agree on Brexit in any other acceptable form over the last two years, so the worst possible outcome will be delivered. And you know what? The 2 
Spot how Barnier is still insisting on the Northern Ireland backstop?You know, that thing which the Tories' new amendments ruled out.Looks like we'll have a straight choice soon betweent No Brexit or No Deal.#PeoplesVote 
Unfucknbelievable Theresa May Julian Smith Tory Chief Whip Brandon Lewis Tory Party Chairman stand “accused” of Vote Rigging in Parliament on crucial Brexit vote to save PM’s Premiership then lying to cover it upDemocracy is Dead Lawless Britain Dried up Britain Gone to the dogs pic.twitter.com/SFb5rRKJKR 
Brace yourself for even greater attacks on Brexit. Mrs May, the mainstream media, remain campaigners, The EU, all round scumbag Tony Blair and all the other Brexit-enemies will be scaremongering and fake newsing like you have never seen before. All rubbish. 
How hard will Brexit hit Britain's trade with Japan if we leave the EU?#StopBrexit 
Theresa May misled the House when she sad that Brandon Lewis & Chief Whip Julian Smith had cheated 'in error' during the Brexit Customs Union vote. Truth and honour are in very short supply in the Cabinet. This #ToryShambles need to be removed #r4today #pairing 
Hope you take time to talk to young people,, maybe discuss last two referendum results, attitude to religion, world views, etc. This is not the country you think it is. We're not crazy about extremist bigots. When you return, spread the word. And please, don't come back. 
What?! Having attended excellent lecture by @Andrew_Adonis at Queen's Belfast yesterday (packed out, incidentally) it became clear government's incompetent handling of #Brexit another reason we need a #PeoplesVote. 
1. Whatever happened to the "bonfire of red tape" #Brexit was supposed to bring?2. Project Fear was right.  
Brecon & Radnor, this little constituency in Wales that voted to leave has contributed 206 signatures here. Fantastic. Well done B&R.Petition: Rescind Art.50 if Vote Leave has broken Electoral Laws regarding 2016 referendum  
Mr Javid is a proven and habitual liar.He is our Home Secretary.Ms May is a proven and habitual liar.She is our prime minister.Mr Smith is the Tory Chief Whip. He rigs votes in parliament.Mr Raab is #Brexit Secretary. He can't circulate papers on time.#GE18 
Yes Cameron just rode of into the sunset and left others to sort out the shambles. EU referendum called to sort out Tory infighting and look who will suffer. Those of us on the border who never wanted to leave the EU in the first place, because WE understood what it would mean 
"The donations could constitute a conflict of interest as the Conservatives face calls to launch a full investigation into Vote Leave in light of an Electoral Commission ruling that they broke the law by exceeding spending limits." and fiddled the result. 
The British Government should not sacrifice peace in NI  secured by the GFA to secure Brexit. A hard border risks security in Ireland and on mainland UK. This would be a betrayal of all HMG has said before & of the people of Ireland on both sides of the border. Don’t do it. 
Tony Blair’s article on Brexit is absolutely correct.  He was wrong on Iraq.  I can separate those issues. 
Today’s @DailyMirror: Boris Johnson still living rent free in a Foreign Office house despite quitting nearly 2 weeks ago. Wants all the benefits Brexit-style without any of the costs  
People who have never heard of Ben Tre in Viet Nam know the phrase, uttered by an American major to AP correspondent Peter Arnett. "It became necessary to destroy the town in order to save it" , this is what Unionists are now saying about Scotland in this madness we call Brexit. 
every person/MP who blindly believes - it'll be ok or can't be bothered to read news or acquaint themselves with Brexit issues are part of the problem. Wake Up! When your jobs/housing is gone you'll be looking around wondering why someone didn't do something. That Someone was YOU 
It gets worse...Putin tells diplomats at closed-door briefing that Trump is weighing his idea about holding a popular referendum on eastern #Ukraine’s status via ⁩@business ⁦@world_reporter 
Facebook to publish data on Irish abortion referendum ads  
Huge anger here in Belfast at Johnson & Rees-Mogg calling Northern Ireland the ‘tail wagging the dog’ of Brexit. From the party which calls itself ‘Unionist’! In poll at end of my lecture at Queen’s University y’day, 200 of the 250 were in favour of people’s vote to stop Brexit 
UK Prime Minister Theresa May is expected to tell the European Union that the UK will never accept a border between Northern Ireland and mainland Britain, and that its leaders must "evolve" their position in Brexit talks  
Ahead of Brexit, E.U. Shifts Into High Gear to Keep Goods Flowing  
Spanish prosecutors have dropped a European Arrest Warrant for former Catalan leader Carles Puigdemont, over his part in last October's controversial independence referendum  
Voice of UK establishment that interfered in US elections seeks to embroil US establishment in its battle over Brexit.  
Visiting Northern Irish border, PM May to defend her Brexit plan  
Hey @CPC_HQ @AndrewScheer can you explain why Russian attack accounts are defending CPC and attacking @JustinTrudeau @liberal_party ? You met with the UK Brexit folks, Andy. They used to Russian trolls just like Trump. Hamish Marshall is a fan of manipulation #cdnpoli #cheaters 
Bannon cuts to the chase:  "November is a national referendum on Trump. Full stop. Up or down vote on Impeach him or press on. You are either with Trump or you are against him.”  
Fact is most of these Unionist brexiteers want brexit for sectarian anti Irish reasons..they have no answers to the "benifits of brexit" question and haven't the balls to admit the real reasons of their support. 
"It’s very simple, very basic, very clear—it’s the entire package; this is a national referendum on Trump, an up or down vote on his presidency: vote Republican for the Trump program, all of it, or vote Democrat to impeach him" —Bannon to The Daily Beast  
Bloomberg News: Putin told Russian diplomats that he proposed to Trump to hold a referendum to help resolve the conflict in eastern Ukraine, but agreed not to disclose the plan publicly so the U.S. president could consider it.  
If #brexit mean brexit then #cheated means cheated. 
Britain’s economy has slowed to a standstill, largely because of Brexit  
The US would join the ranks of the British Nationalist Party, Le Front National, Jobbik and other fascist movements in acceding to a sham “referendum” in occupied Ukraine. A great look for a superpower, no?  
The content of Blair’s argument about Brexit has some merit, particularly given the current context and the slide towards the prospect of “no deal”. But if I were an ERG Brexiteer and could choose an opposition message carrier then I’d choose Blair. He really needs to take a seat 
FWIW I've considered dropping #FBPE only because it causes left wingers to see the badge not the argument,but I haven'tLabour is not pro brexitLabour Leadership isLeft wing commentators are turning against #Brexit however, finallySo it's a tough one, but we do need bridges  
BREXIT BORDER CRISIS: Varadkar threatens ‘DOOMSDAY’ as Ireland PUTS FOOT DOWN  
So Brexit fan @AFNeil is again making jokes about @CampbellClaret wanting sporting events rerun bc he didn't get the result he wanted, yet to see him make a joke about anyone wanting a replay bc of cheating! #ThisWeek #VoteLeaveFraud 
17. These are men without principle, without decency, without honour. They are the saboteurs and wreckers. They don't care about Brexit. Brexit to them is just a window of opportunity for their dogmatic "free trade" ideas - all of which are bullshit. 
9. And then in blunders the Brexit clown car with Johnson;s aspirational guff, bypassing the details entirely while snakes like JRM and Redwood offer their simplistic nostrums - plucked out of the air while possessing zero subject knowledge, 
1. I cannot contain my loathing of Jacob Rees-Mogg, Boris Johnson and John Redwood et al. They are wreckers and liars manipulating the stupid and the easily led. #Brexit thread. 
...By all means pillory Tony Blair for his contribution to the tragedy that Iraq War was - I may even chip in myself - but for goodness sake do not conflate Iraq War and Brexit: that's just nonsensical. 
There's a simple explanation as to why he didn't want Putin to disclose.tRUmp didn't have a fucking clue what "referendum" meant or what Vlad was proposing or talking about. He agreed to something and had ZERO CLUE as to what it meant. 
If you think I’m going to rerun the referendum debate with you on Twitter then you are mistaken. Most of us are way, way beyond that point and are eager to get on with leaving. The debate has been had. It’s done. Either sort out a deal or don’t but either way, we are OUT. 
A second referendum is a desperate remedy. But it would be the best way to break a deadlocked Parliament  
UK people were asked to vote in referendum & we did in good faith.We are now being manipulated by the full weight of the media BBC & others in a tirade of pro remain crap with No but on the plus side reporting. Deliver Brexit as voted for. Obey the democratic will of the people. 
Brexit gets even more fraught  
wow. Per @bpolitics, Putin told Russian diplomats he & Trump discussed the possibility of holding a referendum in Russian separatist-controlled Eastern Ukraine (which would be used to justify Russia's illegal invasion), but Trump asked him not to disclose the plan publicly.  
A very informative interview, which every major UK broadcaster should have conducted, but noticeably hasn't. The #BBC appears to have gone AWOL on covering the sinister culture hacking uncovered by @carolecadwalla, as part of it's #Brexit-related journalistic meltdown. 
You know what this independence supporter is livid about is, that we're still part of this shambolic, heading for a No-Deal Brexit UK. A UK led by a completely shite government and an utterly incompetent main opposition.   
This is great Those Brexit Brits still can't seem to understand Scotland will leave the UK taking our Water Oil Gas and all Energy. What Are You gonna do? Try and sell us some pension Poilicy on Sky telly 
Is Tony Blair against Brexit? YesIs Brexit bad for the people of this country? YesIs Tony Blair going to convince anti-establishment Brexit voters that Brexit is bad for them? Not a chance in hell.You may like Tony Blair, But are we just here to talk to ourselves? 
Too late, Varadkar et al have overplayed their hand from the beginning with the result being that we are heading for a no deal scenario. You can only push the UK so far. As a brexit supporter from Northern Ireland I am absolutely fine with no deal, in fact it’s preferable. 
If you think the cancelling Brexit riots will be bigger than the No Deal Brexit riots, I respectfully suggest that you are one of history's greatest morons. 
"If the Tories can't give the far right - and me, who has nothing to do with the far right - exactly what they and I want, after a referendum campaign designed specifically to appeal to them, the far right will surge and I will be forced to join them."  
Midterm elections are usually a referendum on the President. But in their effort to focus attention on President Trump, Democrats could make the midterms about their own divisions as the left is energized about Trump's comments about Russia. 
1/ It's all very well-worked out tactically, but you're not going to stop Remainers laying into the Labour front bench when one of them talks about a good #Brexit deal, or a jobs first Brexit, or rejects the #PeoplesVote, and of course any such response will target Corbyn. 
Just signed this petition - please add your name. It must be possible that these criminals affected the result - and the future of our country. We must stop Brexit now @LibDems #ExitFromBrexit 
Not sure what is worse, Britain's red rag @TheSun portraying Ireland as seeking vengeance over Brexit or @fiannafailparty taking this factually inaccurate and ignorant headline seriously. Tells a lot about both. 
The trouble with your reasoned argument and use of facts is that those who voted for Brexit, and those delivering it, couldn't care less. They don't care about lost trade, lost jobs, lost status. It's an ideological coup, plain and simple. 
To be honest, I'm seriously worried about gravity now. Don't we mainly import that from Germany? If we Brexit, we will all gently float upwards, and helplessly drift into deep space. For God's sake, Nick Clegg WARNED us about this, and people just laughed. 
The Brexit problem. #Brexit  
He's my MP. When I wrote to him after the referendum expressing my concerns for the economy and asking him to vote issue by issue in the interests of his constituents, he sent me a badly photocopied Vote Leave leaflet. Hopeless. 
I follow some Conservatives who are pro EU, I follow many in @UKLabour who are unequivocally pro EU. I do not respect those claiming to respect a vote that was obtained by cheating & breaking the law, who deny us a #PeoplesVote & who want #Brexit. I am #FBPE 
Oh dear. @Daily_Express prints the classic mistake that the AV referendum was on Proportional Representation #AVisnotPR  
May’s performance of exasperation here is Brexit in a nutshell. All these silly technical questions, like “What do these words you wrote down actually mean?”, “But what will actually happen?” and “So how will that work?” Other people will figure all that out! I just say things!  
These are the kind of things I pass by every day in Berlin. Two people dragged out from a house of 120. They could be me or you. So you can bet I'm worried about Brexit. Fascism from the far right. Anti-Semitism from the far left. And the centre getting screwed, deeper and deeper  
The whole story of #Trump #Russia #Brexit summed up by the journalist who's single-handedly broken more major stories in the last 18 months than most major media organisations @carolecadwalla 
Theresa May will reaffirm her pledge to keep the border between Ireland and Northern Ireland open following Brexit  
I work with many firms who span the Irish 'border'.Not a single one is concerned about threats of a "Hard Border" because it is literally nonsense.All the NI 'issues' being raised are done so purely as a barrier to #Brexit, not for any realistic reason.Keep calm, carry on.  
Thank you Mike, but Although I agree with general Labour views, I think it’s wrong to support Corbyn as opposed to the clearly pro EU Labour faction like Chuka Umuna & David Lammy for example. Corbyn is the reason why Labour doesn’t get anywhere, he’s leading the pro Brexit side 
@guyverhofstadt There is also the point, Steve, that the 2016 leave vote from which the "brexit" scheme stems has now been shown by both the Electoral Commission and the ICO to have been criminally procured , thereby making a total mockery of British democracy and the rule of law 
‘Either there is something about the Brexit department that renders all ministers who work for it catatonically stupid or Raab is determined to live down to the standards of his predecessor’  
Any UK politician who had a hand in delivering Anglo Irish, Downing Street Declaration or GFA must be utterly appalled at reckless and almost wanton act of expedient political vandalism by May towards NI. She's spent what little political capital she had at behest of DUP #Brexit 
"Correct me if I'm wrong, but there's a suspicion that Arron Banks' funding for Brexit came from the Russians?" This & other GREAT questions. It's literally the broadcast that the BBC don't want you to hear. (Though - LOL! - we taped it in a BBC studio)  
In case you hadn't noticed, the UK's standing in Europe and the world has been possibly irreparably damaged by Brexit and it's conduct. And it seems most can't even attempt to understand why. There really is no cake for anyone. Just salt and vinegar. 5/5 
So #FBPE & other remainers, Mrs May will rule out the EU backstop for Ireland. No deal Brexit. She has to go. @UKLabour this is your chance. Support #Remain & you have a real chance of forming a gov. No deal could bring the Cons down. But we need an alternative. #StopBrexit 
Brandon Lewis lied when he gave a false apology to Jo Swinson - just one look at the votes he took part in reveals his scheme. Didn't vote in the insignficant amendments but did in the 2 key votes. Pre-meditated cheating to drive through a Hard Brexit - #NastyParty #r4today 
And yet, beyond crass and at times spiteful comparisons of whether it will cost them more than it'll cost the UK (it won't), there has been virtually no appreciation of this from the Government or (with a few exceptions) reporting on Brexit. 3/ 
In the event of any U.K. planes straying into Irish Airspace after Brexit the Irish Airforce stands ready to repel any intruders.  
No-deal Brexit would cost European Union 1.5 percent of GDP: IMF  
For Theresa May to suggest that backstop is "constitutional dislocation" is not only wholly inaccurate, but is dangerously divisive. Nationalists, unionists and others all agree need for backstop. I'm sorry, this just reads like DUP  propaganda. Reckless in the extreme #Brexit 
Westminster doesn't work for the benefit of the Scottish peopleAn independent Scottish government WOULD work for the benefit of theScottish peopleTime to break free'FACTS over FEARS'#YouYesYet#indyref2#Referendum#Independence#DevolveTheUnion 
Hey Look!!  ... Latest Survation poll says that 54% WOULD VOTE YES in a Scottish INDEPENDENCE referendum ... excluding don’t knowsTurns out that @glasgowcathcart was spot on the money, Ruth(and that’s obviously not a reference to your unexplained #darkmoney sources, Ruth) 
Reading through the Commission's Brexit Preparedness Communication, I'm mainly struck by what a massive, costly, time consuming stack of unnecessary work, hassle and uncertainty the UK is causing its closest neighbours, allies and trading partners. 1/  
17.4m people who voted LEAVE have waited two *years* for May to deliver. Now it turns out she has other plans. Anger is building + the @Conservatives MUST right this wrong + get Brexit back on course, deliberately, resolutely, inexorably. Find a way.*soon* 
This is ridiculous. The Tories created this problem, they have to fix it. “Brexit: Theresa May says it is now up to EU to prevent hard border as she visits Northern Ireland - The Independent  
Putin began his war on Ukraine with 2 fake “referendums” (Crimea & Donbas). 5 years, 11000 dead later, he wants a 3rd referendum. Ridiculous 
Newsnight had a very frustrated Tony Blair on to discuss Brexit. He dismissed the Chequers Plan but cannot see why the UK shouldn’t rejoin the EU if it reforms immigration policy. The idea we should rule ourselves as an independent democracy is fundamentally alien to him. 
This is some nonsense from the Sun #brexit  
No deal Brexit would make UK ‘dumping ground’ for chemicals banned in Europe  
We keep hearing about how Brexit was supposed to be a way to hit back against 'elite political class'.... THEY'LL BE FINE.They're letting Brexit happen because they plan to just blame voters!!  
Friday’s Times: Public to be warned every week over no deal Brexit #tomorrowspaperstoday #bbcpapers (via @hendopolis) 
I'm sick of brexit obvs, but also am pretty sick of the 'brexit in a nutshell' metaphors. "If we agreed to do a picnic with 28 of us and you then decided you no longer want to bring cheese twists but still wanted to eat… GIVE IT A REST, AESOP! 
Wow.  Nice reward for data breaches and hacking for #Brexit and #Trump Steve Bannon - $1.73m #CambridgeAnalytics  pension pot + $1-5m sale @carolecadwalla @chrisinsilico @profcarroll @WendySiegelman 
Project Fear worked so well last time, they thought they would try it again.Delivering on the democratic will of the electorate is outside the capabilities of an Olly Robbins-led #Brexit team.  
Honda at Swindon receives 2m components per day thanks to free movement of goods. After a no deal Brexit, to store the minimum 9 days' worth of components on site, they would need to erect the 3rd-largest building on Earth: 300,000 sq m = 42 football pitches. (source: FT 26.6.18) 
Fresh pressure on chief whip after claims of foul play over knife-edge Brexit vote. “This government is rotten to its core. Julian Smith and Brandon Lewis must now resign or be sacked, and Theresa May must apologise for misleading the House.” 
Former Prime Minister Tony Blair says Theresa May’s approach to Brexit "doesn’t honour what most people who voted for Brexit think" #newsnight 
Theresa May's guide to Stockpiling food part of the LADYBIRD book series about preparing got the bright #brexit future  with thanks to  @ReplabJohn for the idea 
Reneging on the December backstop agreement creates enormous bad faith between EU and British government and increases chances of a no deal crash out, can see why Theresa May embargoed that little gem until after Fermanagh visit #Brexit 
Theresa May: I will never accept EU's ideas on Irish Brexit border  
The Sun lied all the way through the Brexit campaign.It didn’t stop telling lies after 23 June 2016.And it’s still telling lies,in this case about what @campaignforleo has said about Brexit. Ireland is UK’s best friend, trying to remind everybody of what is at stake March 2019.  
This is an example of the madness of crossing the border in Ireland after Brexit. Today I cycled from home to Crom Castle in Fermanagh. Crossed the border six times by the most direct route. Could barely tell the lines (change in paint colour at side of road). Brexit is pure mad.  
Let's nail this fake news from May now. The backstop doesn't in any way breach GFA.Its really only option for ensuring it remains intact (bar calling Brexit off!) It doesn't alter NI constitutional status, consistent with principle of consent. Why is May playing divisive games? 
The UK is stockpiling medical supplies and the EU is stockpiling customs agents amid Brexit uncertainty that could wreak havoc on cross-border trade  
I can write a whole book on all the high profile events Russia is responsible for since 2010. Downing MH17SyriaBrexitAssassination attempt of PM of Montenegro Multiple interferences in EuropeOngoing deadly assaults in Ukraine 
No insurance company will give insurance for a plane to fly if it is not legally certified, no airline can and will take that risk. This counts for all legal aspects of international businesses. EU member states share their agencies and still have them after Brexit. UK doesn’t. 
Speaking as the British Prime Minister visited Fermanagh today, Sinn Féin deputy leader Michelle O’Neill accused Theresa May of attempting to renege on the commitments she made in December on Brexit.  
Good to see tomorrow’s @TheSun showing a total understanding of international aviation law, regulations, standards, the EU-US open skies deal to launch a wholly false & personalized #brexit attack. Assume @IrishSunOnline will balance? 
#EUsupergirl & @mikegalsworthy back @peoplesvote_uk The @Conservatives will destroy themselves from the inside#Brexit will become a victim of its own contradictionsAny MPs with a conscience will back a #PeoplesVote@JustineGreening just this week! 
The EU-27 starting to help their businesses prepare for the chaos that would follow of a no-deal Brexit. No one voted for this.  
Ireland’s PM has been branded ‘mad’ for threatening to stop British planes flying over Ireland as revenge for Brexit  
Petition: Rescind Art.50 if Vote Leave has broken Electoral Laws regarding 2016 referendum  
Watch: Tony Blair speaks to @EvanHD for #Newsnight, discussing why a resolution on Brexit should be put back to the people. Tune into @BBCTwo now. 
It’s all a bit mince. Brexit is mince. Scotland not being independent is mince. Mince being rationed is going to be mince. Possibly being chucked out of The Netherlands is going to be mince. #Mince 
So in Theresa May's FIRST visit to NI since referendum, she has the brass neck to come over here to tell us she's getting rid of NIs safety net? And the biggest insult- trying to now claim backstop breaches GFA? No, YOU are breaching the GFA as no backstop = no deal = hard border  
#EUsupergirl and @RenewParty back a #PeoplesVoteI gave an interview with Portuguese newspaper @dntwit telling #Portugal that #Brexit CAN and MUST be stopped... and #EUsupergirl backs @PeoplesVote_UK 
I’m not a journalist, I’m a 69 yr old grandma in Indiana. In 9-16, I posted my “conspiracy theory” on FB r/t Mercer, Bannon, Cambridge Analytica, their impact on Brexit & possible Trump win. FB took it down saying it contained “objectionable” material!? 
Hello @neil_parish MPThese are just some of the one million Brits in the EU27 that your #Brexit has affected for two years.Because of you voting against giving EU27 citizens, UK citizenship in 2016 you have affected over 4 million people.This is Mark: 
TIMES: Public to be warned every week over no deal Brexit #tomorrowspaperstoday 
These happy Brexiters are using No Deal Technical Note no 37: How to Grow Potatoes Now All the Eastern Europeans are Gone.This used to be the village cricket pitch...not now.Dig for Brexit.  
Brexit won by a margin of 3.8% after we were promised more sovereignty and a better dealIf we had been promised less sovereignty or 'no deal' than EU members, Remain would have wonTherefore: what Theresa May is asking for has no democratic legitimacy. Neither does "no deal" 
So what if leave cheated.Respect the referendum result anyway, seems to be the response.My response is, never. Never will I support a policy that hurts the UK.Never will I support a policy that damages democracy.Supporting Brexit is anti UK and anti democratic. #FBPE 
No one will impose border checks on Ireland, so let's stop pretending it's an issue:  #Brexit 
Regardless of Brexit, experts, pundits, forecasts, what your neighbours/parents/children/bookies think, and/or whether you want it to happen or not, do you *feel* that Scotland will become an independent nation within the next five years? 
Just watched Dominic Raab looking rather silly in Brussels which greeted him by publishing advice on no deal. The BBC of course is playing it up as a new version of the Great Scare. No one advocating a clean Brexit will be allowed within a million miles of the BBC. 
Yvonne from Newcastle tells us why she wants a people's vote on the Tories final Brexit Deal.  
Probably more. What's disgusting is that the Ultra Brexiters don't even care how Brexit hurts our allies and destroys our alliances. That is why Rees-Mogg is a scumbag.  
Its amazing the amount of Brexit threats mainstream media keeps dreaming up. Project fear is getting rather tiring. Yawn!BBC, Channel 4, ITV and Sky really are tedious fuckwits. 
Why is the BBC just a mouthpiece for Brussels propaganda?Why is it not reporting that HMRC officials told a Parliamentary Committee this week that everything would be in place at ports for Day One of a No Deal Brexit?The BBC is lying to us - just like May is lying to us 
After 18 wasted months, extending Article 50 would avert a no deal Brexit, writes @jdportes  
Pretty much sums it upWhy are so many MPs still pursuing the myth that #Brexit is the Will of the Ppl, when it is based upon the diverse wills of only 37% voters & 26.5% of the Ppl & can only leave us all Poorer, Weaker with Less Control & Fewer Rights?#FinalSay #PeoplesVote 
Just imagine for a moment: leader of then opposition @YvetteCooperMPNow imagine PMQs. Now imagine poll numbersNow imagine the brexit debate. Now look at @jeremycorbyn Now cry. 
"Politically Bulletproof" "Cast Iron"  "Strongest Committment that exists" @campaignforleo 2017#Brexit #tonighttv3 #BrexitShambles 
Theresa May promises woman campaigning to get more safety warnings put on deep fat fryers she’ll take a look as soon as she’s finished sorting out Brexit  
I'm not British. I don't know how laws are decided in England, and I'm just... confused by Brexit. People have been trying to figure out how to make it work for 2 years, & no one still understands how to make it work. Can't they just vote to end Brexit, and end this confusion? 
Muller coming for 'bad boys of #Brexit'? - "Mueller appears to have zeroed in on British politician @Nigel_Farage and other self-described “Bad Boys of Brexit,” including businessman Aaron Banks, who met repeatedly with the Russian ambassador in the UK"  
Lance Armstrong’s Tour de France wins reinstated after Brexit revelation that cheating is fine 
If British politics weren’t mortifying enough, here’s more on those translations of the who-knows-if/what Brexit #WhitePaper.  *sighs* 
Jesus H. May is walking back on the NI backstop she agreed last year. She might as well have sent a lit stick of dynamite to the EU - that's how it's going to be interpreted. No deal hard brexit now all but guaranteed. 
Brexit Media Bias Survey.Q1. Have you ever received a positive message about Brexit via the BBC?Q2. Have you ever received a positive message about Brexit via Channel 4?Q3. Have you ever received a positive message about Brexit via Sky News?  
A no-deal #Brexit could cost Ireland more than 50,000 jobs, warns IMF  
She isn't cancelling Brexit, she's cancelling the backstop deal she signed in December. She will say tommorow that she means we *have* to get a deal, is my prediction. 
And EU introducing new measures to curb tax avoidance in tax havens as from 1 April 2019. Tax dodgers are desperate to get Brexit across the line by 29 March. The country can be sacrificed on the altar of their greed.  
Correction: the country is now divided between people who think and people who support Brexit...  
Before everyone gets petition fatigue, ask yourself which you’d prefer: 78,000 extra nurses or Brexit. Not hard is it? #stopbrexit Please take one minute of your day and sign and share the petition below @Ferretgrove @spaceangel1964 @Women_4_Europe @ali__samson 
These Catalan leaders are now free European citizens and can travel all around the World except to Spain, where they face jail for organizing a democratic and peaceful self-determination referendum for #Catalonia. 
This man has done more for Brexit than the PM or any of the Cabinet!   
Would Hard Brexit have beaten Remain in 2016, if they were the two choices? Not a chance.I voted Leave, which I regret, but it was categorically NOT a vote to leave the Single Market.If Leave cannot deliver what it promised, we should be asked whether we still want to do it.  
A No deal Brexit is not achievable, because the U.K. simply doesn’t have the legal infrastructure in place. EU knows that and I even suspect John Redwood knows that, although it doesn’t surprise me if he doesn’t. 
It emerged that ​@JulianSmithUK urged Tory MPs to break with 'pairing arrangements' to avert a damaging #Brexit defeat  
Expensive London lawyers! For the avoidance of doubt, I'm saying he was questioned not that he's guilty! Nor that the highly litigious Len Blavatnik is guilty of anything either! I'm saying that Russian money & influence is everywhere. Including - irony! - Brexit 
"leaving the people of Northern Ireland without their own voice in trade negotiations"-ha ha ha ha. Remind me how the people of Northern Ireland voted in the referendum and who listened to their voice then.... 
1. A strange disease stalks the land. When a person is confronted by well documented consequences of leaving the EU without a deal they simply grunt "Project fear!". This is odd because we are not talking about #Brexit economic projections... 
Opinion: Brexit is so far from 'strong and stable', literally any two words in the dictionary could describe it better  
We now know Vote Leave's @matthew_elliott cheated. We know too about Russian influence op that paid for him to visit Moscow. Now here's @WendySiegelman on his links to US Trumpist right. It's not just Farage..Shout-out to Wendy & other US researchers on Brexit case. Thank you!  
Brexit was based upon cheating  #pairing issue about cheating. Who is holding this so-called govt to account? #pairingdeals 
This is just insulting. British Prime Minister claims backstop is a breach of GFA. Imposing #Brexit is the breach. And while we are on breaches what about an Irish Language act agreed in St. Andrews, Legacy agreed at Stormont etc.  
Hello John, you are a politician. You realise what EU law means. You know that you are wilfully throwing the lives of 3.6m EU citizens in the UK & 1.2m @BritishInEurope under the red Brexit bus by advocating no deal Brexit. How do you sleep at night?  
Peter Brookes on Theresa May and Brexit - Political Cartoon Gallery in Putney  
I wish everything were narrated by Olivia Colman. Even Brexit would be reassuring if she were talking me through it 
Thanks #brexit #brexitshambles #TheresaMay and all your pompous buddies. It’s an honour being #Dutch 
A BC millionaire and the ICBA spent more in one day on ads against #ProRep & the referendum than many Cdns make in a year. Some people weren't too impressed with BIG$$$ trying to manipulate them.Join the people's campaign here: #pr4bc #bcpoli 
Soros activity is ramping up it seems. The BBC is broken. Yesterday they ran apiece about the 4 "Brexit options". In so far as we are legally obliged to leave on match 29th it's crock, just lying propaganda.1) Deal2) No Deal3) Sta in EU4) Rerefendum 2 
Government trying to justify themselves keeping us in the EU With a so called leaked report saying that the uk economy is doomed if we left EU Same old Scaremongering lies trying to get people to change their minds and remain in a Corrupt European Union 
Brexit is an abstract for most people. But the consequences of no deal will be all too real.   
The EU is unfit for purpose and little more than a trade protection club, but Theresa May has failed to grasp the Brexit opportunity from the despised European freeloaders:  #BrexitBetrayal 
Honestly the EU didn’t think it through at all when they started this Brexit thing. 
Theresa May's Brexit mandarin Olly Robbins was paid £20,000 bonusFor What? Writing a Remainer’s Brexit?  
Not surprising. But reinforces the view of pretty much everyone at this stage that we all have to prepare for no-deal Brexit as a precautionary measure.  
What would a second Brexit referendum look like? Tony Blair offers some options on The Economist asks podcast  
I admit it. I voted leave. However, the whole Brexit mess has got me seriously wondering if I got it all horribly wrong. If I did, please accept my abject apologies 
Rees-Mogg: Average [EU] tariff on food imports is 23%Nothing we could do about tariffs without Leaving EUEU is putting up cost of living for people who are least well off in this country.EU is lowering standard of living for my constituents!#Brexit #EU 
My laser-guided Twitter missiles have been picked on Brexit’s radar - it’s like Bletchley Park but with really thick people  
Brexit has done ‘the people’ one great service: it’s shown that Parliament’s arcane, antiquated, unfit for its crucial purpose in the current world and needs a complete overhaul. Don’t just rebuild the building, rebuild democracy.  
Unlike you lot who have cheated and broken the law to secure a 'victory' in an advisory referendum Ms Dorries @NadineDorries. Cheating and breaking the law, no honour in that Nadine. Yes, get a grip, do. 
Michel Barnier's first meeting with new Brexit secretary Dominic Raab in Brussels | Latest @guardian cartoon...#BrexitNegotiations 
I'm an ex-pat in the US and I am stunned at the lack of coverage of this Brexit conspiracy in the UK. One has to question whether any BBC top brass are complicit in all this. Therein may lie the true scoop. 
Putin: How about this? I'll hold a referendum in Crimea, which I invaded, annexed and now rule. You'll accept the results.Trump: Let's keep this our secret. I'll think it over.  
McDonald to tell May ‘Brexit chaos is intolerable’  @MaryLouMcDonald 
Two things I’ve learned in conversations with Brexiters today;1) Some still believe German car manufactures are going to be the real losers from Brexit2) Some still believe that they had no need for any kind of plan after Brexit. That was up to Cameron.Life’s a joy. 
The government chief whip faces calls to resign over allegations he used underhand tactics to win crucial Brexit votes – and then tried to cover it up.@cathynewman talks to Andrea Leadsom MP about the allegations. 
Since this video was recorded, Russia has:- Illegally annexed Crimea- Killed hundreds of civilians on MH17- Interfered with Brexit, the 2016 election, and other elections around the globe- Deployed a nerve agent in the UK  
Now we know that Putin's "new idea," quietly tabled with Trump during the #HelsinkiSummit, was another fake referendum that would allow Russia to bite off another piece of #Ukraine. 
Why a No-deal #brexit would be catastrophic @InFactsOrg 
The president wants to make the midterms a referendum on ICE. It’s a pity for him that they're already a referendum on:- Putting Children in Cages- Rampant Corruption- Reproductive Rights- Unnecessary Trade Wars- Global Instability- A Stolen Supreme Court- Literal Treason  
Ben Jennings on our new Brexit Secretary Dominic Raab set for talks with the EU - Political Cartoon Gallery in Putney  
Putin told Russian diplomats that he made a proposal to Donald Trump at their summit this week to hold a referendum to help resolve the conflict in eastern #Ukraine.Putin wants another rigged "referendum," just like #Crimea.Thanks for telling us, Trump. 
Reporter Shows The Links Between The Men Behind Brexit And The Trump Campaign  @carolecadwalla 
Brexiteers: the EU is a joke, Brexit will be a doddle, we'll do all the dealsEU: *totally outclasses UK ministers in negotiations, signs massive trade pacts*Brexiteers: the EU is a joke, Brexit will be a doddle, we'll do all the deals 
No Putin, you don’t get to invade sovereign territory, take 10000 lives, and hold a US-backed referendum to legitimize your crimes.  
She’s panicking because she doesn’t know the answer to who and where will ‘Tariffs’ be collected.. Theresa May hasnt got a clue about the simplest of things to do with Brexit.. this is so scary for the entire country, we are led by the least amongst us  
Encouraging support from the European Parliament's lead negotiator on BREXIT.  
There you have it. Brexit in a clip. Even the Brexit advocates don't know how it's going to work. As someone else has already said, trying to do Brexit, of any flavour, type or style, is like trying to take the eggs out of a baked cake! This is gonna be a car crash like no other. 
The number of EU nationals in Scotland increased last year despite  Brexit. Official figures show the number of EU citizens living in Scotland rose by 26,000 to 235,000 in 2017. England and Wales have witnessed a decrease. Welcome to Scotland ladies & Gents Failte Gu Alba! 
Britain's public service broadcasters haven't touched the story. But America's NPR devoted an hour today to unravelling the links between Trump & Brexit & Russia. Thank you so much, @nprworld & Terri Gross for giving this story a platform that we just don't have here in Britain 
How we became the laughing stock of Europe - German readers of a poorly translated Brexit white paper suggest Brexit is described in mythical terms like an old German fairytale - #Unicorns abound in Brexit-Land  
This is all they have left to eat in the UK. Behold the awful price of Brexit.  
The amount of work and thought that some of the EU’s other governments and MPs have put into Brexit is quite extraordinary. For example, looks like Dutch MPs have visited Northern Ireland more times that Boris Johnson  
FFS, answer the question, @theresa_mayThe tariff idea you're asked about is the one you want at Brexit & the question is simple.Either you:a. Do not understand your own ideab. Can not comprehend a simple questionc. Had not considered that imports might enter UK through EU 
Referendum legality in serious doubt.Another reason for a people’s vote And a reason to make sure next time the people’s vote is run fairly, and won.Kudos to @fairvoteuk for pursuing this campaign #peoplesvote @BestForBritain 
Remember when David Cameron called the EU referendum to keep his party together?  
The case for a second Brexit referendum.If Parliament cannot agree on a Brexit plan, the decision must go back to the people. 
According to this, Putin says he & Trump discussed the possibility of holding a referendum on the future of Ukraine, which Trump asked him not to mention publicly while he mulled the idea. Still no word from any US official on what transpired in that room  
Lord Heseltine - Public opinion is moving on #Brexit.. Trump's visit helped...Trump's not going to deliver for the UK economy.. the same week the EU signs a free trade deal with Japan.. Why aren't we under that umbrella gaining from the strength of the EU partnership.#FBPE 
The People's Party is not in favour of a People's Vote, says Emily Thornberry / #Brexit #Labour #PeoplesVote 
TONIGHT: We speak to former Prime Minister Tony Blair about Brexit, Labour’s anti-Semitism row, and British complicity in torture after 9/11 22:30 @BBCTwo | #newsnight 
Looking forward to Brexit  
BBC News - Brexit: EU's 'no deal' preparations.  'There are all sorts of EU databases, including dealing with policing / internal security which the UK wants to retain access to after Brexit. But the EU has argued that the UK can't simply pick & choose' 
film idea: mamma mia, but the daughter is brexit and the three mystery dads are played by david cameron, andrew adonis and tim farron 
Putin told Russian diplomats that he made a proposal to Trump to hold a referendum on Crimea; Putin said he agreed not to disclose the plan publicly so Trump could consider it, sources tell Bloomberg.  
Reporter Shows The Links Between The Men Behind Brexit And The Trump Campaign  
Hoping that this government is going to save us from a disastrous Brexit is like hoping that a shark will stop you drowning once he’s finished eating your boat. 
I'm sure the referendum will be protected by that crack cyber security squad that Trump and Putin want to create. 
Did you know that 103 Labour MP’s have been sacked or resigned since Corbyn seized power of Labour. Many good people that oppose Brexit. Be rest assured Corbyn is in charge of a rump of Labour MP’s that will accept his nonsense. Labour will unite when Corbyn and cronies are gone. 
My mind immediately jumped to Austria's referendum on independence in March 1938 (& Hitler's invasion the night before bc he was worried about results)...  realized that Putin wouldn't have to worry about invading beforehand - he's a pro at fixing elections! :( 
They dare not tell the public what the consequences will be. The language is deliberately obscure in order to prevent ordinary people understanding what a total catastrophe a No Deal Brexit will be for the UK. Only the mega-rich will survive  
The UK economy would suffer far more than the EU in the event of a "no deal" Brexit new research from the International Monetary Fund shows  
Tony Blair: We are stuck There will no majority in Parliament for [the Chequers Compromise], or for ‘Clean Break Brexit' or possibly any version of Brexit. In any rational world, this would go back to the people. Watch TB set out why the Govt's Brexit plan is fatally flawed ↓  
Cheating gave us the Brexit win & cheating is getting it through parliament. #BrandonLewis 
Jacob Rees-Mogg backed to take over from Theresa May as PM rocked by Brexit woe  
A reminder that Farage and some Tory Brexiters were calling for a 2nd referendum (a straight replay, not a vote on the final deal) if  Remain won. #StopBrexit #PeoplesVote #Brexit  
The British government is facing ridicule from German-speaking Brussels officials & diplomats after Whitehall botched an attempt to translate its new Brexit white paper into other languages. In fairness to Whitehall most don’t understand it in English  
The November election is shaping up to be a referendum on whether or not Vladimir Putin should remain in charge of the United States electoral system. I vote no.#ProtectOurDemocracy 
Sharia May,singing the praises of Islam and sharia law,criminalising criticism of islamic terrorism,and rape gangs,demonising concerned citizens by labelling them dangerous extreme right wing,Manchester terror attack nothing to do with Islam,deceiving us over brexit,Enough..  
I’ve been on a friend’s Facebook post today about Brexit. He has lots of male football fan friends (just for context - not a judgment).Not one of them came out with a correct fact. NOT ONE!And the bottom line was always “we have to leave the EU to stop NON-EU immigration”.  
Tory members can no longer grin and bear Theresa May's handling of Brexit, says Don Porter @Con_Voice 
Brussels is warning every country in Europe to prepare for a no deal Brexit. The dramatic move comes just a week after the UK revealed its white paper on leaving the European Union  
We'll make a success of Brexit, says country where businesses can't sell things for a pound 
As Dominic Raab makes his debut in #Brexit talks in Brussels today, good time to remember that he’s a serial fibber on Europe: 
DAVID Davis’ former chief of staff Stewart Jackson launched a blistering attack on Theresa May’s chief Europe advisor Oliver Robbins, accusing him of wanting a “Hotel California #Brexit” where Britain checks out but never leaves. 
Philip Davies Sends Letter to Graham Brady."Politics is all about trust and once it is lost it is impossible to win back. Many people have told me that as a result of this they have lost trust in the PM to properly & fully deliver the referendum result" 
For those who think the EU is actively trying to keep Britain in, here’s what one rather fed up diplomat said to me recently: ‘It’s got to the stage when we say if it’s a hard Brexit, it’s a hard Brexit. We’re just keen to get it over and done with now.’ 
IMF warns no-deal Brexit will wipe $250bn off EU economy 
In a parliamentary bind, Theresa May has three options: threaten a no-deal Brexit, go to the polls or hold a second referendum  
There are @PoliceServiceNI officers on one side of the bridge; @GardaTraffic officers on the other. The irony of cross-border security for the British Prime Minister. #Brexit  
Check out 5 things you need to know about Dominic Raab, Theresa May's new Brexit Secretary: 
"He’s not there to actually do anything. He’s there to give the impression that he’s doing something. The Brexit negotiations are far too complex to be left to any of the halfwits in the Brexit department." 
As an Ulsterman & Unionist, I’m delighted to see the Republic & The EU looking out for N.Ireland’s best interests. London couldn’t give a stuff. The DUP’s Brexit stance is ‘nose off, spite face’ & frustrating, the people will suffer. A United Ireland is all but inevitable 
First Brexit was a pizza to be delivered. Now it's a pot noodle to be heated up. Next It will be something revolting covered in mould you find at the back of the fridge when cleaning it. 
Once again Labour front bench as useful at fighting #Brexit as a hole in a parachute. Yesterday’s performance at PMQ’s was JC’s chance to land some blows & he blew it, again. Getting urgent for Lab to join fight to stop Brexit, protect jobs & our children’s futures #PeoplesVote 
A YouGov poll for the Brexit supporting Times says British people would rather stay in the EU than accept a no-deal Brexit. So what does that say about the will of the people, Mr Acting Prime Minister Mogg? #PeoplesVote 
#Brexit desperation calls for desperate measures in the whips office. Preventing a new mother from voting is the sorry reality of that.Carmen Ria Smith, spokesperson for @FFSake_ writes why this latest saga is yet another reason for a #PeoplesVote 
RememberThe goal of the Pro Brexit extremist is to hurt the EU.Max damage to our friends and allies is the objective.No deal will hurt EUThey will not forget. Neither will any other country we may wish to FTA with.The uk will be a pariahWe are collateral DamageResist#FBPE 
In another blow to ⁦@theresa_may's #ChequersPlan, ⁦@EstherMcVey1⁩ has refused to give her full support to the #Brexit paper amid growing unrest among #Conservative backbenchers over her #EU exit plan.#ChequersMeansCorbyn 
The horrible translations of the Brexit white paper in EU languages, which look like a barely retouched Google translate (at least the Dutch one does) exemplifies how clueless and insular this government is.Monolinguals may not realise, but languages are complex 1/ 
Enter Dominic Raab, a veritable chip off the old Brexit block | John Crace  
Finally crystallising in my head now“No deal is better than a bad deal”Makes perfect sense, Brexit has never been about the general public it’s about a section of the elite & for them it really is a case of“No deal is better than a bad deal” 
Tory Chief Whip Julian Smith instructed multiple Conservative MPs to cheat with their pairings  on a crucial Brexit vote. Tory Chair Brandon Lewis did just that &  then lied to MPs that it was an 'honest mistake'. Julian Smith needs to step down now!!!(or be sacked) #ToryShambles 
. @theresa_may shows not a flicker of remorse at the way she has deceived voters over #Brexit.  Used DD as a patsy.  Had secret department, colluded with @Ollyrobbins to destroy Brexit. Needs to apologise to the nation. @borisjohnson #borisjohnson pic.twitter.com/oz5HZdHq5W 
In a democracy there is no final vote. It is a core democratic right to oppose any government policy no matter how it was arrived at and to seek to garner enough public & political support to overturn it. Where this right ends so does democracy.#PeoplesVote #StopBrexit #Brexit 
California Supreme Court rejects plan to break California into 3 smaller states, ruling the referendum cannot be placed on ballot. Predictable, but wrong. Let the people decide how they want to be governed!  
The benefits of a complete Brexit are1 No EU regulations inhibiting our businesses2 Give UK lowest business rates in Europe undercutting ROI3 Offer free trade to whole world instead of EU's Common External Tariff4 Allow only British ships to fish in British waters5 Be richer 
Once #Brexit negotiations are complete & terms of exit from EU are agreed, do you think there shd or shd not be referendum to accept or reject?Should 40%Should not 42%Don't know 18%Leavers 65% "should not"Remainers 64% "should" YouGov July 17 
The European Commission employs about 32,000 officials *in total*, working for all of Europe. The UK is now hiring an *additional*  8,000 officials - just to handle the #Brexit process.  
Imagine if every moment put into saying something smug like “you lost, get over it”; banal like “Brexit means Brexit”; or inane like “No deal is better than a bad deal” had been spent actually analysing the trap we’d built for ourselves and devising a sensible way out of it. 
Former Prime Minister Tony Blair tells Newsnight Theresa May’s approach to Brexit "doesn’t honour what most people who voted for Brexit think" – full interview tonight at 22:30 on BBC Two @BBCTwo | #newsnight 
“It’s written really weirdly. It reminds me of Old German texts”Insane new levels of Government fuckwittery make you realise any kind of Brexit deal just ain't gonna happenIt's either extend/revoke A50, Referendum, General Election or off a cliff  
Another Tory MP Reveals Letter of No Confidence in May, Slams ‘Unacceptable’ Brexit Plan   
I’m being consumed by hate for these bastards destroying my rights. Literally destroying my freedom. I don’t what other emotion I’m supposed to feel. Poorer, less powerful, less relevant less free for what? To see or hear a few less polish people?? Wtf is Brexit about?? 
This is a very good way of putting it by @theSNP MEP @AlynSmith A Scottish #indyref IS Scotland's referendum on the #Brexit deal.  
More importantly, as the lies of brexit have been slowly revealed, the outstanding argument was always that its the people’s will in a fair & open democratic vote. We now know that to be a lie. There is no legitimate democratic mandate for brexit. Time ref was annulled. 
Sorry folks, don't expect me to swallow fallacy that backstop is somehow a binary nationalist V unionist issue, because IT'S NOT. I totally get that we're divided society etc etc, but yanno what, the inconvenient truth is people of NI are united on need for a safety net!#Brexit 
No-deal Brexit would harm EU countries as well as UK, warns IMF  
BBC News - Cliff-edge Brexit fears back in boardrooms  
"The increasingly insular and nationalistic tone of much of debate around Brexit is necessary to deliver a specific political project: shifting centre ground of UK politics to right, sharply." My latest for @bellacaledonia on Brexit's radical right agenda  
Alyn Smith MEP says an independence referendum will be Scotland’s vote on the final Brexit deal #EURef #PeoplesVote 
The @Conservatives are in a mess over Brexit. But who’s causing all the trouble for @theresa_may? @BBCEleanorG explains: 
As Brexit metaphors go, ‘speculated to be Alexander the Great, but was actually skeletons and sewage water’ isn’t a bad one.  
HoC voted that they do not need scrutiny on future trade deals. Whips lied colluded & cheated on another Brexit vote, MP’s voted to make all investigations into them anonymous & removed from register . And that’s just the last 48 hours ! 
No-deal Brexit: EU warns its citizens to prepare for the worstBarnier will go down in history who failed to make a deal with Britain, costing the EU billions in tariffs and putting EU citizens' security at risk.   
Apparently the Brexit White Paper, when translated into German, read something like, "Hearken ye to mickel gladde tydinges of Greate Britayne and hir nobleste sovereignety frame hir cruelle yoke." 
The problem is Heidi that you all keep acting as if nothing has happened . The only remaining argument for brexit was ‘ will of the people ‘ in fair & Democratic Ref : we now know Leave committed fraud. Buzzfeed reveal ERG using bbc & radio 4 as their own propaganda arm. 
I am starting to think that this whole brexit thing may not be a very good idea  
All you need to know about the #pairing row is that it’s about cheating. Cheating gave us Brexit and it’s what it continues to be about. 
Nigel Farage - "I’d be perfectly happy for Boris Johnson to take over from May, I really would. Or anybody else who actually believed in #Brexit."  
Sorry, but it is so good to finally be out of London. The air actually *sustains* life here in Sheffield. And the research I'm doing for a new video, if the things I'm finding/learning stay along the same lines, it will destroy a key Brexit myth and once that's down... oh boy.  
The Economist endorses a #PeoplesVote to unblock the Brexit jam:  
Theresa May signed off five-figure bonus for chief Brexit adviser  
I look up to him ...#Brexit#IKnowMyPlace 
I want to thank everyone who voted for Brexit. I’m really looking forward to being marooned on a racist island with nothing to eat but shit cheese. You stupid bastards. 
Even Project Fear's Mark Carney admits that a no-deal Brexit would be worse for the EU's financial system than for ours.  
It's my column, on the smooth path of Brexit. I bet you're glad I'm here to cheer you up.  
If Boris is the solution to Tory Brexit chaos, every political rival will benefit. If Theresa May remains she will drag her party down. So no matter what semblance of unity is constructed this summer, Scotland’s moment of choice is surely getting nearer.  
Lord Digby Jones - "From the day of the referendum the establishment and Remainers decided to use every legal way to make sure #Brexit never happened and they are very close to pulling it off."  
This is Just to SayI have replacedthe Anusolthat was inCameron’s bathroomwith someweapons gradewasabiForgive meBrexit has made me feel so angryand so hopeless 
1/ Trump challenges NATO's mutual defence clause which is one of the foundations of the post-World War II Western world.This fits what Tory MEP @CharlesTannock has said about the destructive ambitions of the Tory Brexiters#StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE 
The PM has been let off the hook with her #Brexit #ChequersPlan Freedom of Movement will be renamed Labour MovementCustoms Union is replaced by being tied to #EU regsWe have to accept ECJ legislation for regs otherwise the plan is undone.#ChequersMeansCorbyn#MAYMUSTGO 
All this shit about ‘respecting the democratic will of the people’ in respect of the EU Referendum, yet the pairing system gets deliberately broken so that the government gets its way. It’s horrific how low we have fallen. #PeoplesVotepetition 
Hey, @theresa_may @LiamFox for all companies with EU patents and trademarks, do we have to re-register UK marks at £1000 a go after Brexit? Who pays for this? 
EU WILL PAY: UK warns Brexit no deal will SLASH EU member states’ GDP   
Retired CIA Chief of Russian Operations: [From a #Brexit perspective, the government and even more so the ERG are colluding with Trump and therefore serving Putin in trying to detach the UK from the EU. #Brexit is an attack on our national security] #StopBrexit #PeoplesVote 
You’re a speechwriter for Theresa May.She asks you to write a speech about the benefits of #Brexitfor her to give during her visit to Northern Irelandwhich voted 56/44 against itwithout mentioning the #backstop she agreed to (but wishes she hadn’t)#IfYouThinkYouGotProblems 
Holidays just got a whole lot more expensive today, as the pound fell to its lowest rate in months.When Theresa May threatens a scorched-earth no deal Brexit, it hits hardworking families in the pocket. It's time for a sensible solution, the option to stay via a #peoplesvote 
I asked the Conservative MP Brandon Lewis why he took part in a key Brexit vote despite a "pairing" agreement not to. Didn't get much of a response...  
I've half jokingly suggested previously that a driver behind Brexit was a desire to abolish VAT and replace it with a sales or purchase tax, raising substantially less.But here, de facto, we might be in March.  
BBC News - Tory chief whip Julian Smith under fire in pairing row . The May Government is morally debased, dishonest and corrupt. MP’s should walk out of Parliament in protest. Show some bottle. Stop Brexit. #FBPE 
The gingerbread house that is the Tory Party is falling apart rapidly. If you were lured in by their promises of wealth and freedom after Brexit, get away NOW! As Hansel and Gretel would say, if cruel people who want power offer you something for nothing, YOU are PREY  
Don’t worry, a no-deal Brexit won’t be allowed to happen | Simon Jenkins  
WHY REFERENDUM IS THE ONLY SOLUTION TO THE QUEST FOR BIAFRA (PART 1)  
The government’s negotiating strategy on Brexit...  
Brexit: What do the EU's 'no deal' preparations say?  
Defeating Brexit is more than a political battle. It is a moral crusade. Simply a battle of good against evil. To save our country from extremism in both Tory and Labour parties. Brexit must, and will be, defeated 
#EUsupergirl hits the Portuguese press with the @PeoplesVote_UK campaign!  interview with @dntwit "It was launched in April this year with the aim of uniting all anti-brexit groups and demanding a vote of citizens on the final agreement." 
To all those who tell me "but YOU will be fine" after Brexit, here is what the EU Commission has to say:If no deal Brexit"There would be no specific arrangement in place for EU citizens in the UK or for UK citizens in the EU"Waiting for the mainstream media to report this.  
I think this opens up space on the political spectrum for the Conservatives to rebrand entirely as an overt Hard Brexit/No-Deal/ERG party for those who want to define/project themselves as non-racist. In other words, UKIP is becoming the EDL & the Tories becoming old UKIP.  
A Tory MP has demanded that any of his colleagues who call for a second referendum resign their seat  
One Eurosceptic MP says the £20k bonus handed to PM's chief Brexit negotiator Olly Robbins 'should be paid by Brussels' 
A packed room @QUBelfast hears Lord Andrew Adonis make a passionate call for a public vote on the final Brexit deal. A very engaged audience. @QUBEngagement @QPolAtQueens @ryanjfeeney @Andrew_Adonis 
The only European Arrest Warrants that should be issued in relation to the Catalan independence referendum are for every member of the cowardly, thuggish Spanish Civil Guard who obeyed orders to batter voters and every single politician and officer in the chain of command. 
This is quite astonishing, even by Brexit standards. Toe-curlingly embarrassing to see May obfuscate and talk absolute nonsense about trade proposals which are very obviously completely unworkable. Not a cat in hell’s chance of being accepted by EU27  
Folks if you watch the last RT and don’t understand that Brexit is not only a complete clusterfuck but also that the UK Gov are thick as mince then there really isn’t much anyone can do to help you when the disaster strikes. Scotland the alarm is becoming deafening..... 
Before #Brexit was even a thing.  #RuleBritannia@Silverclassic never one to disappoint. @Productions_TS shot for The Gentleman Racer. 
How about getting your team to figure out how to reduce moped robberies, stabbings, and acid attacks? More in your remit. Leave Brexit to HM Government.  
Northern Ireland close to recession, CBI warns as May visits region. Nothing to do with Brexit of course, at least that's what Brexiters will be saying.  
UK government will allow a VAT evaders charter in case of no deal Brexit. HMRC will be unable to collect import VAT due to the huge volume of parcels. Expect industrial levels of VAT evasion on goods sold to UK consumers by mail.  UK retail will suffer     
Theresa May's Brexit deal is a collusion between establishment remainers in Parliament & the civil service with the EU. The entire aim of the deal is to stop Brexit & continue our EU membership in all but name. May's deal has to be stopped & the UK needs to walk away with no deal  
Worried the government’s Brexit plan hasn’t been through? Hopefully this will reassure you. 
Dear @POTUS... KEEP TWEETING! With each tweet... #WeThePeople are joining the #GreatAwakening!We're choosing to #WalkAway from Globalist CORRUPTION!We're choosing #CountryOverParty #AmericaFIRST #MAGA!We're choosing the #RedPill #QAnon #WWG1WGA #KAG #Brexit!  
Friends! London is now generating half of all robberies in England & Wales!But Brexit puts this at risk by ending freedom of movement for Our Robbers, making 'frictionless' crime impossible!Yet, when you tell Leavers this, they just say "Good thing too!"Talk about uncaring!  
No physical border checks in Ireland even if there is no deal say the EU. So why is it a problem for the UK but not for Dublin. In fact it's a manufactured problem to stop a full Brexit 
I live in Spain but occasionally go to Gibraltar for a Morrison’s shop.  Quite frequently many shelves are empty because the lorry from the U.K. is delayed etc.  This is what it will be in the U.K. after Brexit, lorries delayed at customs checks and you will be paying more. 
MOD salaries are the same across the UK; are you claiming that up to (or over) HALF of all MOD personnel stationed in Scotland earn £33k+? Also, your own party will soon have to increase some form of taxation in the rUK, now that the imaginary ‘Brexit dividend’ has been debunked.  
Hard ball from Brussels on no deal Brexit. Plus v stark on NI backstop: "no progress has been made in agreeing on a ʻbackstopʼ to avoid a hard border on the island of Ireland" 
In a new headache for Theresa May, U.K. chief whip faces call to quit  
Brexit Minister to Publish ‘No Deal’ Brexit Plans in Warning to Brussels   
EU Bosses warn Mrs May her White Paper “will not form basis” of any Brexit deal so UK will have to Leave EU after all...UK would then trade WTO rules same as EU does for non-EU countries.Both #EU AND 17.4m #Brexit voters brand White Paper ‘unacceptable’. 
As usual, @danielricciardo on top form in media session today.  Talking about next contract: "It depends on what happens with Brexit, right? Does that exist, has it happened, or what? Wasn’t it meant to be happening over a year ago? You Brits, jeez!" 
When I was asked by @SODEMAction"How do I think #Brexit will benefit the British people?"My response was clear:#Brexit will benefit no one & is #Disastrous!RT if you agree. 
The tide is turning - time for Labour to say they will stop Tory #Brexit!  
EU member states have been told to step up their preparations for a possible "no deal" #Brexit  
New Brexit Secretary @DominicRaab makes his first appearance in Brussels alongside EU Chief Negotiator @MichelBarnier 
Any MP calling for a second Brexit Referendum should stand down, have a by-election and call for a second opinion on themselves  
The EU is not ashamed that there are European citizens like Carles Puigdemont and Clara Ponsati who can travel to all the countries of the world except Spain for having organized a democratic referendum? This is the "European project"? 
Please. 16 million of us voted to keep our European Union citizenship. If UK crashes out with a chaotic brexit then millions of people living on the mainland will become status-less overnight. Please do the civilised thing - let us keep our citizenship. 
And in France. Spoke to my neighbours here yesterday about Brexit. Bemused by UK tearing itself apart, yes. Bored by the whole thing, yes. Terrified? Hahaha, no chance. 
Help UK nationals retain EU citizenship after Brexit 
New #Brexit Secretary Dominic Raab says negotiations need "renewed energy, vigour and vim" as he meets the EU's chief negotiator Michel Barnier in Brussels  
I really can not believe the sheer and utter stupidity of No voters in Scotland!! To know how bloody catastrophic Brexit will actually be and they'd rather that, than allowing their own country to flourish!! Pls do us all a favour and fk right off!!  
Blue passports and boxes of tinned food stacked in the garage. Brexit Utopia. 
Packed hall for lecture from @Andrew_Adonis who is calling for a referendum on the final Brexit deal.Would be excellent if the British Government could recognise that NI didn't vote to leave in the first place...  
Spain's Supreme Court has withdrawn European arrest warrants for former politicians linked to Catalonia's independence referendum  
TODAY: The links between Russia, the Trump campaign and Brexit. Journalist @carolecadwalla broke a key story about how Cambridge Analytica used data from Facebook to target users in support of the Brexit and Trump campaigns. 
Anti-Brexit folks you know what to do. Sign the petition, RT #FBPE 
This "People's Vote" thing is just marketing man's BS from folk who don't want to admit they are wanting a second referendum. Who do they think voted last time, livestock? Aliens? 
I backed #Brexit because I believe in country before Party.Please sign and RT if you agree.#Brexit #EU #bbcdp #MayMustGoNow 
One of the clearest calmest explanations yet. #FInalSayForAll #peoplesvote #rescindArticle50 #brexit.  
Evidence now emerging that the Tory Chief Whip ordered 5 MPs to break their pairings for a fundamentally crucial Brexit Vote. Disgusting betrayal of the very values of British fair play. He must resign now. 
Government hiring 5000 Customs Officers for Brexit. Who would you rather the government hire? 
#Tories #cheating to get votes through parliament. Tory cabinet on the board of the #Leave campaign that cheated to obtain the #Brexit result.How can #May continue as #PM unless she sacks those conspiring to #cheat in both votes. By doing nothing she is condoning their actions. 
And that he is willing to walk away with no deal because, 8 months from Brexit day, UKGov has just started preparations for it. Because no deal is better than a bad deal, despite needing to produce 70 notices on how people and businesses can cope with the chaos it would cause. 
PLEASE SHARE. If you think Vote Leave breaking the law and cheating in the referendum matters, sign this petition to halt Article 50. There is no democratic mandate in a vote won through cheating and illegality.  We need a new vote.  
'No deal' Brexit will hurt UK economy more than the EU, IMF confirms  
Thank you @RachaelMaskell for calling on the Brexit Secretary secure the future work of the Chemical Regulation Division of @H_S_E. It is essential that Brexit does not undermine local jobs in York and Bootle or our world class chemical regulation expertise.   
We want to ensure that the government puts you first in its Brexit plans, protecting your consumer rights and giving you the greatest access to quality and affordable products  Here are our 5 asks following the Brexit White paper. What are your priorities?  
More lost trade due to Brexit for the UK as Dublin port launches a new roll-on-roll-off ferry for taking Irish trucks direct to the EU (sorry Hollyhead).  @wrexham 
Ireland by-passes the land of the idiots, otherwise known as the UK.#Brexit #PeoplesVote #StopBrexit 
Michelle O’Neill, Sinn Fein leader in Northern Ireland, talks of "the catastrophic implications of Brexit, the fear and trepidation of the business community in terms of what comes next for them". If her 7 MPs ended their boycott & voted in Westminster, they might change all that 
It was only a month ago the Tories refused to honour MPs to be nodded through on a Brexit vote – meaning Naz Shah and Laura Pidcock both had to go through the lobby to vote, despite needing wheelchairs. Now the Tories lie about pairing to try and win. This government is done. 
Frustrating Brexit  
Tory & Labour Brexiteers can send their parties a message by returning to support & vote for @UKIP The Party that wants a Brexit that means freedom & independence.Lets get the opinion poll support up tp 12% & more 
Great find from eagle-eyed colleague.Is this the incriminating final conversation before @BrandonLewis broke pairing arrangement with @joswinson?#Brexit  
The Impartial Reporter covers Fermanagh and Border counties - Cavan, Monaghan, Donegal - and has been following #Brexit for two years, speaking to residents, business people, farmers and rural communities. Will the PM take our questions when she visits today? No, says Number 10.  
What does "no deal" Brexit really mean? IMF have just published a very handy assessment on the economic impact for the EU27. There will be no apoclaypse on the continent: WTO-only world cuts EU27 GDP by 1.5% in long run. Germany <1%. But much worse for Ireland  
So there is a Brexit Dividend.  
Referendum is a word that strikes fear in the minds of people who know they've been doing the wrong things.If Referendum was be held every five years, fairness will be the theme of politics in most African counties. 
We must be brave enough to give the people a final say on any Brexit deal - Chuka Umunna - Evening Standard  
#NadineDorries: "#Number10 were led by the nose by the elite #Remain  establishment; they were battered by them ... @DominicRaab has one job and that is to prepare for a #nodeal #Brexit." @JuliaHB1 @NadineDorries  @ConHome @andreajenkyns @DCBMEP #UK 
.@JamesCrisp6: 'If Britain cannot even get the summary of its own #WhitePaper right, what hope is there that it can navigate the #Brexit negotiations?' 
Boris' Brexit dream is over - it's time to wake up  
Listening as I do most of the time to Classic FM it is clear they have adopted BBC speak for their news bulletins.If we strike NI Brexit trade deal, we are not 'crashing out'.We are leaving without a trade deal.Stop being emotive or give no news bulletins. 
EU member states have been told to step up their preparations for a possible "no deal" Brexit  
Summary1. Labour’s task is to arm its working-class supporters - e.g. students, criminals, terrorists, etc - with a narrative of hope.2. It must totally smash the hegemonistic neoliberal racist paradigm, i.e. Brexit.3. Talk about thinking outside the box!4. That's all, folks!  
I was interviewed about racism and hate in the context of Brexit and Trump for @VoiceOfIslamUK 'Drive Time' on Monday 16 July (10 mins in).  @UELCriminology @UELInclusion 
Conservative MP Philip Davies has submitted a letter of no confidence in Theresa May to the chair of the backbench 1922 Committee saying he has “lost trust” in her ability to deliver the referendum result  
What this country should’ve done and Brexit. And apply to rejoin under our terms.  
Great to be on ⁦@BBCNews⁩ with ⁦@MartineBBC⁩ talking about small business and Brexit  
Theresa May was clueless about the risk of a no deal Brexit for the environment. Waste, air and water targets are currently enforced by the EU - that will be lost if the UK leaves the EU with no deal. #LiaisonCommittee 
Brexit provides an opp. to better control our money & decision makingWe must make sure this doesn’t all just flow into Westminster & stop there, but that cities/towns are empoweredOnly then will you fix some probs which led to Brexit@angus_young61 
I do, 1/2 my family voted for Brexit.I care that globalisation & trickle down economics have disenfranchised them,I just don’t believe the solution is a left wing or right wing Brexit. I think being in the EU is the best way to capitalise on the benefits &  mitigate the downside  
I can't get over the fact the petition is in metro, already...Petition to cancel Brexit grows after Vote Leave was found to have 'cheated'  via @MetroUK 
We need to change course all right, we need to insist on a real Brexit for an independant sovereign nation NOT this Chequers rubbish. Best thing for London jobs Khan? get rid of dead wood like you. Tosser. 
Taxpayers set to be hit with another £200 million annual bill for Brexit  
One Nigeria No Longer Acceptable, Our Unity Must Be Put To Referendum – Briggs  
Thank you Matt, love you too. I’ll just wait until you change your tune on Brexit again shall I?  Implications have been clear since the ref & many of us  have consistently opposed it, you however change your tune depending on how advantageous it is to your faction.  
Parkinson fingers the populist problem & its outcome - Trump, Brexit & our own minority ratbags. Ciobo blames media for people feeling insecure - reckon your own party might be playing a role there, Steve?  
The Tories will soon be publishing "technical notices" setting out how households can prepare for their "No-Deal Brexit" #ToryBrexitShambles #ToriesOut 
The latest insane #Brexit news. HMRC are having to  recruit upto 5000 more customs officers. That £200 million per year could have been spent on 5000 more nurses or police officers. #FBPE 
Live scenes as Boris Johnson says it’s ‘not too late to save Brexit’.  
I've asked some Parliamentary QUestions about impact of 'No Deal' #Brexit - replies are truly frightening. We don't seem to know what will happen, let alone have plans for the catastrophic consequences - will tweet the replies shortly 
Think you've got this confused dude you're the one bringing up Corbyn anyone would think it isn't brexit you oppose but that that's just the stick you choose to beat Corbyn with. 
.@EU_Commission has some blunt warnings to EU27 biz about preparing for a hard Brexit:  
"It will require bravery from across the parties to decide that we must have a People’s Vote on the final Brexit deal, and that is needed now more than ever" says @ChukaUmunna: 
Peter Bone forced the Government to confirm it will not accept an extension of Article 50 following rumours the European Union is plotting to delay Brexit with a formal request  
It's easy to write off Liam Fox as DFDM and a waste of space but we need to remember that he's a rabid right-winger and in thrall to the US billionaires who poison democracy with their dark money. Fox's Brexit means loss of any semblance of sovereignty. 
We must be brave enough to give the people a final say on any Brexit deal. My piece in the @standardnews on who really runs Britain and why our campaign for a #PeoplesVote is gaining momentum.  
I'm off to France with the kids and wife for our first touring Caravan holiday in August.I have 2 Scotland stickers on the back of the Caravan, 1 (sadly mandatory GB sticker), an SNP Stronger for Scotland sticker and a Scotland in EU sticker.France will know i detest BREXIT 
Irish Economy grows 9% in Q1 2018  Northern Irish Economy shrinks 1% in Q1 2018 The Brexit Dividend in action 
If you haven’t got a full erection every time you think about Brexit then you are not a true hard Brexiteer. 
Brexiters can attempt to 'pretty' things up all they like, the bottom line is that the UK voted to make itself POORER, to TAKE AWAY opportunities, to REMOVE rights. There is NOTHING positive about Brexit. Not a damn thing. #BrexitCon#BrexitFraud#StopBrexitSaveBritain 
You do realise that Brexit is a cross party issue, one that both Labour and Conservative manifestos backed? 
You dismiss Brexit if it shines a bad light on Corbyn & you highlight it  when you think it’s to his advantage  You don’t really care about Brexit & the people it will affect, you care about Corbyn.  
EU warns UK citizens about 'very real impact' of a no-deal Brexit  
We're outside the US embassy to deliver our petition to Donald Trump. He wants to take advantage of Brexit shambles to lower our standards, remove our rights and privatise our NHS. Help us stop him, join our campaign here:  
After Chequers, the polls are shifting away from the Tories, and the Brexitisation of the Conservative vote post-referendum leaves the Tories far more electorally vulnerable to a UKIP revival now than in the past, says @MattSingh_ 
Today I asked the new Brexit Secretary who is a member of the Campaign  Committee of Vote Leave, what he thinks the consequences should be when  an organisation has been found by the Electoral Commission to have lied  and broken the law in a referendum campaign:  
How can any human being stand for this?  5 million people, lives, futuresNo deal would sacrifice them on the Brexit altar. If you think this is wrong: tell your MP become #EUCitizensChampion for @The3Million support @BritishInEurope #TheHumanCostOfBrexit #NoDeal 
This theatre of the absurd is making another referendum more likely. My latest Brexit blog analysing the last few days' developments:  
Really important piece as heavyweight figure from left calls for people’s vote. Bottom line: hard Brexit is dead as a doornail. Instead of a soft Brexit that disenfranchises the whole country, let’s have courage to stay in EU and fight for progressive policies from inside it.  
Brexit: The people who are negotiating  
On Tuesday, Anna Soubry claimed that “people who voted leave did not vote for Jacob Rees-Mogg’s version of Brexit”. JRM supports leaving the single market, leaving the customs union, leaving the ECJ, and ending preferential treatment of EU migrants. So yes, they did. 
Disappointingly a very early draft of my Brexit TV drama was stolen and leaked to various people to read & now comment online. My fellow writers on here will know what first drafts are like as you privately play around & test ideas. It is not the script we're shooting. 
Here’s an idea. Why don’t England and Wales get trialled with Brexit like Margaret (hope you’re still alight) Thatcher did to us with the Poll Tax. We’ll get popcorn and watch.... 
They tried misogyny, they tried electorability, they tried abuse, they tried communist, they tried Czech agent, they tried terrorist, they tried pacifist, they tried Brexit, they tried Russia, Syria, Venezuela. But after it all, only one stuck: antisemite. Because we let them. 
Daniel, we had a general election last year where Kate stood for re-election and was voted back in with a large majority. Her constituents knew full well her views on this topic as she played a large role in the #Brexit debate and they still voted for her 
Quite extraordinaryTreasury minister plumps for a soft touch on tax evasion at borders in a 'no deal' Brexit via @financialtimes 
3/ EU is urging citizens to be prepared for no deal Brexit by March 2019. It also tasks embassies & consulates to inform their citizens. Concerned? We are. Maybe a good time to get into contact with your embassy to find out more. /end  
1/ The EU have published their general preparedness note for no deal #Brexit. And it looks very bleak on the #citizensrights for the 3.6m EU citizens in the UK and 1.2m @BritishInEurope. 
So the Brexit dividend will be that we have to pile every bit of space with tinned food, a whole generation will never taste cheese and we'll have to spend most of our time fending off looters who didn't get to the shops in time. 
Massive story today - Tory Chief Whip Julian Smith put pressure on Tory MPs to break the convention on 'pairing' for Tuesday's Brexit vote. May lied about it at PMQs. Smith under massive pressure to resign.Yet not a word, NOT ONE WORD on the lunchtime news on ITV and BBC1  
Paul Mason (@paulmasonnews) is bang on here.The youth love their "Bollocks to Brexit" stickers & working class youth (18-34, DE class) voted Remain by 56:44 margin. Working class youth are against Brexit - now we need a +ve alternative vision for them. 
How many days after an acrimonious No Deal Brexit do you reckon it'll take for the army to be called in to ameliorate a problem no-one had planned for? I'm going four. 
The most consequential amendment adopted by MPs this week is the one that makes EU backstop proposals to avoid a hard border in Northern Ireland illegal - it has substantially increased the chances of a no-deal Brexit 
Good to have commentators on the Corbynite left like ⁦@paulmasonnews⁩ joining mainstream @uklabour calls for a #PeoplesVote to avert a disastrous hard Tory #Brexit. #BrexitShambles #BrexitChaos  
"According to a diplomatic source, diplomats were warned by a senior EU official that given the discussions and decisions that have taken place in the UK this week, the risk of a no deal has increased exponentially." Going well then.... 
Diplomats from the European Union’s 27 remaining member states have been told that the amendment adopted this week by MPs in the UK not to havr an Irish Sea border has substantially increased the chances of a no-deal Brexit  
The EU Thinks That Theresa May’s Week From Hell Has Increased Exponentially The Chances Of A No-Deal Brexit  
Evidence now emerging that the Tory Chief Whip ordered 5 MPs to break their pairings for a fundamentally crucial Brexit Vote. Disgusting betrayal of the very values of British fair play. He must resign now. 
There is no sense in delaying the inevitable - Brexit will succeed just as the EU will fail.   
Brexit deal is unravelling, Airbus chief warns MayWhat the Airbus chief really means is he wants more UK government subsidies. 
Re N Ireland: EU says it won't impose border checks if no dealEire says it won't impose border checks if no dealBritain's already said we won't impose border checks in any eventuality.So why all the unwanted fuss about the border?#Brexit  
‘@DKShrewsbury: No Deal Brexit becoming more likely - and is very attractive. ‘Knowing the EU as I do they may well drive a coach and horses through Chequers and if they do then...thank you for the memories, but goodbye.’  
Things I used not to write about, and wish I still didn’t: Brexit, and the erosion of our democratic norms:  
Former Brexit Minister @SteveBakerHW urges his successor @chhcalling to go out and galvanise the whole of Government to deliver on no deal preparations: "It will require the very top of Government to mobilise every Department" 
Andy Davey on our new Brexit Secretary Dominic Raab set for talks with EU - Political Cartoon Gallery in Putney  
I WANT THIS. RAM YOUR BLUE PASSPORT UP YOUR BREXIT HOLE.  
"I will not accept the result of a referendum tainted by fraud." Please RT. 
As Boris Johnson has said, all we have to do is believe in Brexit and it shall come to pass. This may help.  
Spanish judge rescinds European Arrest Warrant FOR A SECOND TIME because the German judges (like the Belgians before them) didn't agree with Spain's definition of a crime. Because holding a referendum is NOT A CRIME! It's frankly embarrassing.  
I'm struck by the continuity in the Brexit negotiation team: @DavidDavisMP was shit and @DominicRaab has ALREADY proven himself to be shit.  If we end up with a no deal, there will be the biggest class action for negligence the UK has ever known against these clowns and May 
No more Brexit, Kenneth for PM !!!  
I wouldn't worry Sadiq, by the time brexit impacts 90,000 people probably would've died in London on your watch 
A no-deal (scorched-earth) Brexit could lead to another collapse in the pound according to a new Bloomberg survey. Ordinary families are already feeling the hit from the first fall in the pound, they can't afford to suffer another one. 
Rumour has it that SNP pressure on the UK Government has paid off and fruit pickers will be allowed in to harvest crops. If true, good news for Scottish farmers who have been warning about this. No confirmation yet, but a chink of light amid the #Brexit chaos 
The EU says its preparing for a no dea brexit. . . .yeah like those spongers are going to turn down Mays 50 billion pounds and refund the 10 billion Britain has in the EU bank and the 1 billion spent on Galileo . . .Bullshit, all calculated to create fear and pressure. Leave now. 
GOOD NEWS. Want to retain your EU citizenship in the event of Brexit? The College of Commissioners @EU_Commission is registering a European Citizens' Initiative entitled Permanent European Union Citizenship.  
Other people are sacked or go to jail for this kind of corruption – Paisley says sorry, quotes the bible, and gets 30 days off. Yet he and his DUP cronies still have more influence over brexit than the Scottish Parliament. #DissolveTheUnion 
There’s now a grave risk we could crash out of the EU with no Brexit deal. This worst-case scenario could lead to nearly 90,000 fewer jobs in London.   That’s why I’ve got my team at City Hall preparing for a no-deal situation. #MQT #LondonIsOpen 
People keep saying "Nobody knows if Brexit would make EU trade more expensive."Why do you think EU countries make laws together? If a business has to change the way it makes its stuff to adapt to the rules of different countries, that adds costs. Basic logic.#ThursdayThoughts 
TM brazening out her #Brexit fiasco like irked headmistress, clinging on until the #EU rejects her flawed Chequers plan. Lords has opportunity on Monday to debate White Paper and set stage for votes on customs union when we return in September #FBPE 
Me: "Do you have full confidence in the Chequers plan?"Esther McVey: "I will say I have full confidence in the Prime Minister to deliver the Brexit that Britain has voted for" 
Brexit Minister to Publish ‘No Deal’ Brexit Plans in Warning to Brussels   
Brexit always was a right wing coup, going back to the 1970's they've been on every PM's case 
Take action to protect wildlife! The government is consulting on new environmental protection after Brexit, but their 'green watchdog' will be too weak unless it can take the government to court, with principles set out in law. Add your name by 2nd August:  
No-Deal Brexit Will Hit 'Prosperity' and 'Wellbeing' of EU Citizens  – Official:  
Senior Tories are under pressure after claims they deliberately reneged on agreements not to vote during knife-edge #Brexit divisions  
I see the EU is now warning the EU27 to get ready for the disruptions and long queues for goods and people crossing UK/EU borders in the event of a no deal #Brexit. Indeed it is also warning that disruption to supplies will occur in any case, even is a deal is reached. 
Last night's Comic Strip Presents Brexit was ace wasn't it? Well done Ch 4. J.Saunders as May. Ade's Gove. P.Richardson's Aaron Banks all ace. Dawn's Boris a masterstroke. Not forgetting Rik Mayall as Farage! What? Rik? When? But... what do you mean there was no such show? 
Yup. My lfe in London has grown more restricted in past two years as a direct consequence of Brexit othering and constant xenophobic rhetoric from press and politicians  
Well well. Guess who got a Brexit "performance related bonus" of between £15 and £20,000 last year? Theresa May's Brexit guru.. @OllyRobbins 
BOMBSHELL SPEECH FROM @BORISJOHNSON blows gaff on #May.  Cowardly May never even tried to get free trade deal.  She lied to Voters about red lines and pretty well everything backed by @OllyRobbins @borisjohnson #borisjohnson #boris johnson   #Brexit  
"In 2016, in that referendum people were offered something that was not deliverable” @AaronBastani  “...a 14-word referendum” #bbcdp 
But @mattzarb didn’t you tell me ordinary people weren’t bothered about Brexit?  
Can referendums coexist with representative democracy? Brexit: now it’s a battle over who governs Britain | Martin Kettle  
WARNING: Are you prepared for a Tory "No Deal Brexit"? #ToryBrexitShambles  
Oh dear, oh dear, oh dear. As a TV dramatist cum journalist I have some sympathies for any writer working on a true life political thriller - but this Brexit the TV movie! Some reflections on truth telling and story telling follow.   
Babysteps to understanding, for the media and public, of the multiple concurrent Russian intelligence #HUMINT operations of #TrumpRussia #Brexit and other related efforts...  
Interesting that ⁦@EU_Commission⁩ document on no deal #brexit preparations today is absolutely clear on point Downing Street dodged at lobby briefing. No deal by 29 March 2019 = no transition  
“A political thriller” @GavinLeeBBC on the 16-page document to cope with no-deal between UK and EU after Brexit #bbcdp 
“IN CASE.” It bloody well better had! If these latest revelations don’t on top of the Windrush scandal & lies, austerity & NHS deaths, and the Brexit incompetence, then we no longer have a democracy that can be trusted or respected. #GE2018Now 
So. We appear to be heading for a no deal Brexit. What ONE thing will you stockpile "just in case"? For me, it's tea..#BrexitShambles 
The Brexit campaign by its very nature was misleading. Again, you roll out 'Project Fear'. Your empty slogans are redundant. No Deal will not just be difficult - it will be socio-economic hell. We see you for what you are. We will resist this treachery every step of the way. 
Cheating in a nationwide referendum, now cheating in a Commons vote, thank goodness for British democracy... #sarcasm#PeoplesVote #Juliansmith @Labour4EU @DavidLammy @joswinson @BestForBritain 
#Askraab #peoplesvote @DominicRaab Remember the fuel strike in the UK in 2000? Massive queues, shops not getting deliveries, staff and patients struggling to get to work. That was 8 days of blockades by tanker drivers. How will impact of Brexit compare? 
Brexit visas. European Commission confirms that decision on whether UK citizens will need visas for stays of less than three months, ie which “list” the UK is on, is up for grabs, to be decided by European Council “depending on the outcome of the negotiations”  
#Brexit is often referred to as an 'act of national self-harm' & we need to treat it as such. NHS definition: "the intention is more often to punish themselves, express their distress, or relieve unbearable tension. A cry for help."This is why we need @UKLabour to #StopBrexit 
The UK went to war in the 80s to protect fewer than 3000 Brits in the Falklands.  But MPs who remember that era are still happy to hang 1.3mn @britishineurope out to dry after Brexit because it suits their own agenda. And they  dare to call themselves patriots. #NoDealBrexit 
Not sure what’s worse - that Tories trusted to run the country are stupid or arrogant enough to leave text evidence trail of their cheating, or that they lie and cheat with impunity. Little wonder Brexit is such a mess and they can’t even get their Novichok story straight.  
The Tories just refused to deny that the Tory Chief Whip @JulianSmithUK demanded Tory MPs voted on crucial Brexit legislation even though they had agreed not to under pairing rules.This is either a sackable offence, or pairing rule is completely dead. Theresa May must act.  
Chief whip Julian Smith under pressure over Brexit votes 'pairing' row. Does anyone apart from Brandon Lewis believe this was an "honest mistake"? Didnt think so.  
Dutch reveal they have already hired three times as many customs staff as UK in preparation for a ‘no-deal’ Brexit as Government comes under pressure to step up no deal plans  
Senior Tory Brexiteer tells me if May "doesn't change tack, there’s going to be an ultimatum. There’ll be a leadership election. If she doesn’t change [her Brexit approach] by next week, then there’ll be a challenge" 
A second referendum.  
For those of you with a bit more stamina and undiminished interest in #brexit #IrishBorder, here's a long read from @DPhinnemore and me. 
Thought experiment: the day after a no-deal Brexit. You run an airline. A $100m aircraft is on the runway with 200 people. The lawyers say it can't enter EU airspace or land. The insurers say you're on your own. But the MP for Woking reckons you'll be ok.  
Countries we have historic links with, such as India, continue to grow exponentially. One of the most petrifying prospects of #Brexit not being delivered is remaining trapped behind the EU's protectionist walls and missing out. We would be sacrificing the future! 
That gets today’s prize for missing the point, which is that government Chief Whip appears to have deliberately broken agreed whipping arrangements. That’s not a Brexit issue, but a much simpler point about cheating on an agreed procedure designed to make Parliament workable. 
It always comes back to this. Why people who live in poverty believe that the wealthy will work to give them a slice of their wealth is beyond me. The few that do are definitely NOT in politics. #IndyRef2 #Brexit  
More proof if it were needed that #Brexit was never about parliamentary sovereignty  
'@BorisJohnson's constituents back him for PM over May‘He’s a good MP for Uxbridge and has his own view for the country’‘I think he knows what he wants with Brexit, whereas Theresa May wants a soft Brexit’VIDEO: #RunBorisRun 
No deal would harm EU businesses and economy. Brussels' threats are just an effort to make the UK accept their punishment Brexit. 
CCHQ is simply saying that no other pair was broken during the Brexit vote - which is obviously not the same thing. 
Asked if she has full confidence in Chequers plan, Esther McVey says she has "full confidence in the PM to deliver the Brexit people voted for" - which is not quite a yes 
BREAKING: CCHQ is not denying that the chief whip told Tory MP to break pair during crucial Brexit vote 
MP to Planet Theresa:'Politics is all about trust and once it is lost it is impossible to  win back. Many people have told me that as a result of this they have  lost trust in the PM to properly and fully deliver the referendum  result.'Spot on! 
This is like death by a thousand cuts for Theresa. Her summer tour of Tory associations will likely be a disaster too. She's bad at interacting with actual real people and local Tories are unlikely to accept meaningless guff like 'Brexit means Brexit'. 
The treachery undertaken by our Establishment politicians since the Brexit vote will not be forgotten. The deceit and cowardice shown by those using underhand tactics to defy the will of the people is nothing short of a disgrace. Support us at  
Brexit isn’t about taking control of sovereignty to Parliament. It’s about taking control of unregulated power to the wealthy few. To achieve this, immigration and the EU were used as a smokescreen of blame. And tragically, millions of people read this and believed this. 
The Tories don’t need any help in wrecking Brexit. They’re immensely capable of doing that all by themselves.  
So you're in your 70's you're retired, live a quiet life and congratulate yourself on voting brexit because now you have your country back.... problem is you've got your WW2 country back ... with food rationing and medicine shortages. Ahhh Brexit the dream that keeps giving  
THIS STORY IS INSANE. Equivalent of Gavin Barwell putting a helmet on and biffing the Stop Brexit guy outside Parliament  
The #Chequers #Brexit plan has gone done like a bucked of sick in Brussels @EurasiaGroup Mij Rahman tells clients in latest note. 
The reason there's no contingency plan is because there is / was never any intention of the UK Leaving, despite the referendum.Boris is correct "it was not too late to save #Brexit" but ultimately we need a Brexiteer at the helm.  
£5.50 for Brits to drive into EU post #Brexit? No problem, £10 for EU to drive into UK post Brexit. Problem solved.  
The Tories would like the Country to forget, that  Ukippers gave them their temporary vote & support in the 2017 election, to deliver a quick & true Brexit. The Tories are not delivering on that pledge.  Ukippers are now coming home in droves. Up from 2% to 8% now. 
#BREAKING EU urges member states to 'step up preparations' in case Brexit talks fail  
The Alpe Suez Stage is the only one where the supporters are segregated in case of crowd trouble. Each of the 21 bends is allocated to a different country. Bend 10 is Irish Corner bend 7 is Dutch corner . Hairpin 5 is Brexit U-turn.  
The European Commission has published a pretty severe warning about the consequences of a no deal Brexit — Over 3 million EU citizens in limbo; supply chains turned upside down  
Petition to cancel Brexit grows after Vote Leave was found to have 'cheated'  via @MetroUK 
EU member states told to step up 'no deal' Brexit preparations  
Brexit was supposed to be the vote that ended all Conservative wars, but here we are: two years down the line, a split cabinet with a threadbare agreement that Brussels might reject. No one voted for this. The people must have the final say, with an option to remain in the EU 
#Brexit whistleblower sues Taxpayers' Alliance and reveals nine organisations "all based out of or with links to the same London address" met regularly to strategise. That address is 55 Tufton Street. Read more:  
7 months on and this is still a better articulated and more coherent Brexit plan than what the government is cooking up  
A police watchdog warned there’s a ‘real possibility’ of an increase in LGBTI hate crime as a direct result of Brexit.  
A Tory MP has revealed he has submitted a letter of no confidence in Theresa May after "losing trust" in her ability to deliver Brexit. Shipley MP Philip Davies letter could b the catalyst for more? 
Britain “we’re not having Johnny Foreigner telling our pilots when and where to land!  We’re Britain!  We do what we like!”*one referendum later*“We landed, didn’t we!?  Now stop being so bloody unpatriotic!”  
I've read the script. And I can confirm that Benedict Cumberbatch’s Brexit TV drama is hilariously bad. Only it's not hilarious. It's wilfully misleading the British people on a key moment in British history. It's disinformation. And it's dangerous.  
Reminder from senior official that the EU is not negotiating the Brexit white paper, but withdrawal agreement: “We are really happy that we have the white paper on the table and we have something we can work with. But it is not more than that. It is not the 10 commandments.” 
CHALLENGE: Brexiteer @PhilipDaviesUK is latest Tory MP to submit letter of no confidence in Theresa May. “It is with much sadness that I have to say that I have also lost trust in her to deliver the referendum result.” 
The EU warns of a “disorderly Brexit” if we leave w/o an Agreement. That means we leave w/o paying which annoys them but is good for us. They'll find that people, companies & global rules will work just fine. There's nothing disorderly abt the way EU states trade w/non EU states. 
Plea to BBC bosses: Please research and broadcast/publish as a matter of urgency the best available unbiased expert analysis of what the short/medium term effect a No Deal Brexit would have on all areas of life on these islands. That would be an excellent public service,  thanks. 
Two in three Scots would rather stay in the EU than accept a no-deal Brexit, poll  
A "no deal" #Brexit would spell disaster for the UK, but the Government are now actively preparing for it.This is why we need a #PeoplesVote on the final #Brexit deal. Support the campaign by signing the @peoplesvote_uk petition: 
It’s Dominic Raab’s first day on the job – but let’s remember how he got here.Here are 5 things you need to know about the man in charge of Brexit.  
FCA tells banks to prepare for hard Brexit  
Seven things businesses in the EU27 need to know in order to prepare for #Brexit. Learn more in our factsheet ↓  
"To say Brexit is Brexit is like saying Breakfast is Breakfast, as Chris Patten said. What kind? Full English? Toast on avocado? dahi paratha? Idli sambar? eggs benedict? cereal with milk? Nobody knew what it was meant to be." @saliltripathi 
Today, we published a Communication on preparing for the UK's withdrawal from the EU. As #Brexit will have repercussions for citizens, businesses and administrations, we call on EU countries and private parties to step up preparations for all scenarios →  
Today, @EU_Commission published a communication on preparedness - for all outcomes in the #Brexit negotiations. National authorities & economic operators called on to step up preparations. More details here:  #Brexit  
‘@NadineDorries: New BrexSec @DominicRaab has one job: prepare for No Deal Brexit.  
yes 'stick to science'...and leave politics to the experts... like those running #Brexit ... oh wait....  
Chief whip under pressure over Brexit votes 'pairing' row  
If you're a member of Momentum and want Labour to oppose a Tory Brexit and support a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal - sign this. 300 signatures away from a national referendum.#FFS 
'It's BETRAYAL' Brexit could be DELAYED under shock EU plans to extend Article 50 deadline!! @theresa_may says did you say something Boris? Yes we DID #TraitorMay you #ResignNow or just walk away with NO DEAL NOW!! Do you understand that May??? 
BREAKING Yorkshire MP Philip Davies submits letter of no confidence in Theresa May after "losing trust" in her ability to deliver Brexit 
Top 5 most annoying MPs on TV crying       about Brexit & Donald Trump morning noon & night.1    Emily  Thornberry 2   Anna   Soubry 3   Diane   Abbott 4   David   Lammy5   Chuka   Umunna  
Channel 4’s Brexit movie script has leaked... both Remainers and Leavers agree it is total bullshit.  
The Conservative chief whip is facing calls to quit over claims he urged three of his MPs to break pairing arrangements to win a crucial Commons vote on Brexit  
Despite saying that @BrandonLewis was asked to vote in error while being “paired” with @joswinson, @thetimes alleges that @JulianSmithUK asked Lewis to ignore the pair on a key Brexit vote. 
to be fair, the Titanic could be worked quite neatly into a metaphor for Brexit 
Young people who are #OneOfThe3Million tell us what they have suffered since the #Brexit referendum and why they decide to still #StickAround  -they have family, friends and plans for future here threatened now by #BrexitChaos @The3Million @MigrantVoiceUK @FifeMigrants @GRAM_Net 
Doris intends a campaign to sell her fake Brexit deal to grass roots conservatives.I spent 25 years working for Brexit & £300k of my money.It is now time for grass roots activists both labour & Tory to step up to the wicket & bat for their country 
A quick recap for Brexit historians:A man who had sex with a pig was so terrified of losing his job to a lying blond pig that he forced the country to resolve a complex socio-economic matter with a yes/no vote. The result lost both pig people their jobs and wrecked the country. 
#AskRaabWould you still call your Brexit negotiations a success if it makes trade with Europe (closest place for us to sell/buy) more expensive for UK businesses and citizens? @DominicRaab 
7/ I would like to end this with a quote from Helmut Schmidt that will be on many politicians' minds when they read  the German version of the #Brexit White Paper: People who suffer from visions should go and see a doctor. /end  
A step in the right direction, but Whitehall should have been prepared for a no deal from the start and should have been aiming for a "hard" Brexit (proper Brexit) all along. 
Theresa May if you really wanted to honour the referendum result you would rescind the Article 50 notification and start working to build trust and consensus in your angry and riven country.  
This chart from The Economist shows how anti-EU feeling was whipped to a frenzy by lies & false promises in the #Brexit referendum campaign.It also confirms what we know from talking to many people on the streets in #Cornwall.Brexit is *not* the will of the people any more.  
Talk of economic reforms, elections, referendum .... etc. It is good to dream, but remember that reality will always hit hard. #Libya 
Voters who changed their mind on Brexit express considerable interest in politics and believe they are better informed than average  
excellent, now we only have to revert Brexit, get rid of Trump, and reunify the EU  
Alliance Leader @naomi_long has signed a joint statement from pro-Remain parties expressing concerns over a diminution of rights as a result of Brexit.See more here - 
Sighing very deeply at the number of Brexiteers (including some MPs) who have taken this as some kind of threat, rather than a simple acknowledgement that a no-deal Brexit means withdrawing from airspace agreements. Nobody’s blind to the effect that has for Ireland either.  
Then let’s see your written down plan for Hard Brexit so we can put it to proper scrutiny, please. You’ve had two years. Let’s see it. 
Green Party leader Steven Agnew has signed joint statement with leaders of @sinnfeinireland @SDLPlive @allianceparty calling for rights to be protected during #Brexit negotiations.   
Senior EU diplomat: “The Govt’s Brexit white paper is not going to form the basis of the negotiations.” #FantasyBrexit 
“May’s been far too weak with the Europeans, she’s just not bargaining as hard as she should be.”“Theresa May, I think, wants a soft Brexit. She’s a Remainer that’s stayed a Remainer.”VIDEO: #RunBorisRun 
One of the (many) problems with the Brexit is that the manifesto turned up 7 months after the vote (Lancaster House) & was rejected at the Election (May lost majority). 2nd manifesto (Chequers/White Paper) launched 2 YRS after vote. Attacked by all sides.#brexit #BrexitChaos 
The advisory referendum result showed a clean split down the middle of the country. It did not give the government a mandate to totally disregard either side. It gave the government a mandate to explore options for rebuilding national consensus. It's been hijacked by extremists. 
This morning I’m giving my regular update to @LondonAssembly, including the preparations we’re making for London in the case of a devastating no-deal Brexit. Watch Mayor’s Question Time live here:  #MQT 
More evidence of a shameful dereliction of duty by Gov Ministers at #Brexit questions. No analysis done of the impact on profitability, job creation potential and ability to export to the EU of the services sector if either the Chequers agreement or No Deal is implemented #FBPE 
An Asian chap on Victoria Derbyshire talking about the 'hate crimes' he's suffered as a result of Brexit.The day after Brexit I was called a 'racist old c*nt' but because I'm white, it doesn't count - or something. Certainly no-one seems to care.It's a funny old world innit. 
John Redwood: #Brexit language“No Deal” is WTO global trading as used by #EU with non-EU states.“Crash out” is Remain phrase to describe Leaving without paying EU £39bnNo crash, More cash!“Fall off cliff edge” is just another meaningless Remain phrase. 
Get your blue ration book for a chaotic Brexit here  
"Science by its nature has always been an international enterprise and in fact the more prestigious and high performing the lab or institute, the more international it is. It’s very hard for the science community to see any advantages in Brexit." 
Raab wasting more money on No Deal Brexit leaflets. Wasn’t he the one who criticised the first Government leaflet. Double standards. He is actively seeking no deal to please who he sees as the new leaders Rees-Mogg and Johnson.Stop Brexit.#FBPE 
Hey Brexit lads, I voted Remain. Sorry that there's no workable plan for Brexit and no one seems to know what is going on, that is clearly my fault. 
Remember that whole "EU rejects populism after Brexit" thing?2 years on...SwedenNational populists now no.1 in pollsGermanyAfD now number 2 in pollsItaly60% now for populists/hard rightAustria 58% for national populist coalitionHungary69% for Orban + Jobbik 
this EU-funded advert about this sexually available potato is the final straw. hard brexit now  
Important new @WomensBudgetGrp report on the causes & impact of women’s poverty – issues that Ministers could be tackling if they weren’t so busy fighting among themselves over #Brexit. Which @IPPR tells us today will hit women harder than men   
Haaa! I’m travelling currently and the last thing I want to do is read machine translated U.K. government waffle in German. But this doesn’t surprise me! #brexit  
Massive support for a #PeoplesVote in Liverpool City Council. Massive support for one amongst Labour people across the country.As we head towards the abyss of Tory Brexit, @UKLabour must listen to the deafening calls from its members and supporters.#PeoplesVote 
The #DarkMoney @iealondon is unusually quiet about my latest column about its power and strategies. I expect it's hoping to tiptoe over the line with its great prize: a superhard Brexit in which crucial public protections can be ripped down:  
In light of the pending gov advice on how to prep for a no-deal brexit, I am proud to announce the publication of the sequel to my bestseller "1001 Tasty Turnip Treats". My new book will be in shops from tomorrow: "Lootin' in Luton - Fun For All The Family" No debate/tagging/smut 
Robert Courts, who resigned from the government over May's Chequers deal says it will leave us "in a position of being essentially a member of the EU but without a vote".We didn't vote to become a vassal state. We demand a true Brexit!Join us at  
Sir @DesmondSwayne asks the Brexit Secretary: All our manufactures will have to be produced in full accordance with EU law, won't they?  
The free movement of scientists must be retained after Brexit or vital research will suffer, the Wellcome Sanger Institute has warned the government. 
Calling @theresa_may Will Brits living and working in the EU be receiving official advice on how to survive after you’ve messed up their lives with your insane #Brexit folly?#StopBrexitSaveBritain#PeoplesVote 
Breaking: Government to save money on printing no-deal Brexit advice leaflets by re-using diagrams from exiting government pamphlets.  
Today I sent our UK goods schedule to the WTO secretariat on behalf of @LiamFox. This will be circulated shortly to all WTO members for certification. This sticks to the plan set out by the UK Government after the referendum for establishing the UK’s independent position @WTO. 
 A must read article by @FraserNelson. The PM’s plan for #Brexit at Lancaster House was excellent. Yet we’ve not even tried to negotiate with it. The alternative to the #ChequersPlan has been there all along. So let’s stick to the PM’s original plan that had huge party support. 
From our Brexit coverage today... how Scottish Tory MP Ross Thomson appears determined to make his mark on Westminster - as Boris Johnson's No1 fan  
TORY BREXIT2016: “I see no downside to Brexit, only a considerable upside”2018: “Please stock up on canned food and medicines. You may also want to build yourself a bunker” 
Indian Constitution based on Victorian moralities and legalities has failed to protect Hindu Dharma and it's age old traditions. It has relegated Hindus as second class citizens.Lets adopt a Constitution based on Hindu Dharmik traditions via a referendum in 2024. 
The Dutch Parliament has closely followed the Brexit and the impact on the Netherlands since 2016. In this time line, you find our reports, our recommendations and the policy follow up given up to them: - I have been MP/rapporteur during the whole period - (1) 
Brexit: Watchdog warns of need to issue driving permits - BBC News  
Learning to cook insects another Ladybird #Brexit survival manual  
What’s the fuss? The referendum was clear. Should the United Kingdom...Remain a member of the European UnionorLeave the European Union so that everyone who wants to drive on the Continent will need a permit costing £5.50? 
Remember when Heathrow Terminal 5 opened and they lost everyone’s luggage for weeks? No deal Brexit will be like that but for everything and it will last for years. Buy tinned food people. Lots of it.  
And here we go. The ReMoaners are in full force to try and stop #Brexit If you support #Brexit it’s time to get involved in defending and fighting for it again. We won’t allow them to steal our democratic vote away from us. ReTweet #BrexitBetrayal #Brexit  
Priti Patel & John Redwood claim that supply chains will be fine even with a hard #Brexit.Ciaran (@donnyc1975) is a euro-courier whose livelihood depends on supply chains working smoothly.Who knows more about supply chains?#StopBrexit #PeoplesVote 
Every time #TheresaMay finds herself in trouble over #Brexit and her other failures police very conveniently release more information about their supposed' 'progress' in their farcical investigation into the poisoning of Sergei Skripal  and his daughter. This is becoming absurd. 
Tory chief whip told three MPs to defy "pairing" deals on crucial Brexit votes according to today's Times. If true, this is despicable behaviour which makes politics even more inaccessible for women. If true, Julian Smith must resign, or be sacked. 
It's Official: The Brexit Campaign Cheated Its Way to Victory | via; TheDailyBeast  
How did we get to this point? The UK government will shortly be issuing literature advising its cutizens how to protect themselves from the negative impacts of the governments own #Brexit policies.If you were watching a film about it, you'd say the plot was unbelievable. 
#pm ... when @theresa_may is ‘pottering’ about the border counties this evening will she give interviews to journalists from local newspapers? These reflect the pulse of their communities on matters like Brexit. @rodneyedwards I detect news management by @downingstreet. 
#Trump #Brexit  Could be applied to those supporting #Farage and his kind. 
If you still believe Brexit is net positive, or hide behind that vague notion that it’s difficult, sure, but it will be worth it long term (the, ‘this time next year, Rodney, we’ll be millionaires!’ Brexit faith system). You have a really useful unit of your own irrationality. 
@DominicRaab Given that we are hurtling towards a Brexit disaster that no one voted for, will you support a people’s vote on the final deal, rather than allowing government strategy to be dictated by the ERG? #peoplesvote #askRaab 
Friend of a friend has been made redundantHe blames brexit 100%#StopBrexit#StopBrexitSaveBritain#StopBrexitSaveDemocracy#PEOPLESvotePETITION#FinalSayForAll#OptionToRemain 
Nadine Dorries: "Number 10 were led by the nose by the elite Remain establishment; they were battered by them ... Dominic Raab has one job and that is to prepare for a no-deal Brexit." Watch again ▼@JuliaHB1 | @NadineDorries |  
Daily Briefing: - Skripal Novichok poisoning suspects identified - report- PM May visits Northern Ireland to offer border reassurance- UK's new #Brexit minister goes to Brussels 
If Remain had won, you can be sure that would have been the end of the debate for the Establishment - no third referendum, no compromise to appease Brexiteers. Why should it be any different the other way round?Because we voted the "wrong" way?  
If the UK leaves the EU with no Brexit deal, all Brits driving to France would need a £5.50 permit. 89 post offices currently sell this permit. We'd need 4,500 post offices selling them by March 2019 in order to match increased demand.  
Owen Smith - For the avoidance of doubt I'm absolutely campaigning for a 2nd referendum #PeoplesVote. The #Brexiteers want to take this country back to a fantastical past that cannot deliver in the modern era.. the scale of risk the country faces is grave.#StopBrexit #FBPE 
Boris Johnson says it is 'not too late to save Brexit' as he brands Chequers plan 'miserable, permanent limbo' | May to embark on national tour to woo grassroots | Ministers to start publishing no deal advice | Raab set for first talks with Barnier today  
Of course. When we show confidence, pride and belief in our #nation - like May did in Lancaster House speech - the world and markets notice. #Brexit will be a huge success if we believe in #Britain. 
It's impossible to reconcile a hard Brexit with the survival of the NHS as we know it. The UK welfare state will be main collateral that a depleted UK has when approaching any trade deal with US or others. Selling access to this "market" becomes inevitable. They KNOW this. 
It’s not only British politicians who are being driven mad by Brexit, I see  
BREWING TURNIP GIN part of the ladybird surviving #Brexit series   @VesperUK 
Hate crime in England and Wales up 57%. That is the nation they have become because of Brexit. Not even out yet and criminals are out of control. 
Remainer: “The Emperor isn’t wearing any clothes!”Brexiter: “Yes he is.”Remainer: “I can see with my own eyes! He’s naked!”Brexiter: “Your eyes are wrong. You need to believe more, then you’ll see.”Apply to every Brexit subject, daily. 
After the refo the @BBCNews definition was :EEA membership = soft BrexitNo FOM & canada style trade deal = hard BrexitNo deal = disorderly BrexitNow the BBC definition is:Minimal trade deals on goods =soft BrexitHard Brexit = disorderly BrexitDid you see what they did? 
“We also acknowledged that the questions read out by Mr Salmond were not ‘invented’ as alleged by the complainant and that only one of the six tweets and emails referred to Brexit, the matter raised by the complainant in this case”.Ofcom Decision paragraph 5  
Brexit is dangerously unstable because it is based on dodgy foundations. Add your name to the petition calling for Article 50 to be rescinded & share: #StopBrexit #HateCrime #ThursdayThoughts @SODEMAction @OFOCBrexit @StopBrexitMarch @TheNewEuropean 
This was only 2 years ago, remember when Harriet Harman hadn't got a clue who Juncker, Tusk & co were?I wonder how many other Labout MP's were as ignorant as this?& some people think Labour could deliver Brexit.  
We will lose 759 trade agreements on Day One Of a No Deal Brexit. They won’t be signed by Day Two. 
This lieing, cheating, fraudulent Brexit government has to go. #StopBrexit. 
It’s Thursday.How on earth did we get to this point?Massive resources are now being channelled into producing ‘technical advice’ for a catastrophic no-deal Brexit.Wake up, you idiots, we don’t have to do this! Remain is still on the table.#StopBrexitSaveBritain#PeoplesVote 
Lord Digby Jones: "From the day of the referendum the establishment and Remainers decided to use every legal way to make sure this never happened and they are very close to pulling it off." Watch again ▼@JuliaHB1 | @Digbylj |  
It's time to start talking down to hard Brexiters as though they were children. If you've chosen not to think and you've chosen to ignore the technicalities then you've opted to shed adult responsibilities thus should be treated as a child. #Brexit 
This theatre of the absurd is making another referendum more likely. My latest Brexit Blog post analysing the last few days' developments:  
.@DominicRaab if you cannot negotiate a #Brexit deal that leaves this country better off, will you then allow a #peoplesvote so that the people of this country can decide if your deal is good enough? #AskRaab 
May’s Brexit plan has failed. She needs a new one – and fast. Leading article in the new @spectator: 
Interviewer on @BBCr4today just put to @vincecable that a no deal Brexit might work out because we’d end up with a Canada style FTA. The EU is *offering* a Canada FTA *as a deal*. FFS 
#Labour calls for inquiry into ministers’ actions during EU #referendum, now that the #VoteLeave campaign that they ran has be found to have broken the law. 
. @vincecable you should have been in Parliament on Monday critical vote or not because it was important #Brexit legislation. You’re the leader of #Libdems & you didn’t even contribute to the debate! #whatamess 
Did Vince Cable just say on R4 that Lib Dems “didn’t make a crucial difference”? He’s finally realised! Still, their supporters must be a bit grumpy about missing crucial votes. After all, if they can’t turn up to vote on Brexit, what can they do? 
New #Brexit Secretary @DominicRaab will be answering questions from MPs on his #Brexit strategy. There's a lot still left to be answered. Tweet him your questions using #AskRaab #PeoplesVote 
Tory David Jones on #r4today broadcasting the Brexiter line that the Irish border issue is not a problem really, and never has been, it's simply been 'weaponised' by shadowy anti-Brexit elements. Be alert to this complete falsehood: it is one you will hear them use repeatedly. 
"It was a confidential political meeting on relevant subjects.” Why, why is Sir Vince Cable so coy about saying where he was during Monday’s Brexit vote no-show? If I had a bigger tinfoil hat I’d say he has something to hide. 
I wasnt swayed by vote leave or remainer camps during the referendum my mind was made up the day the referendum was announced and i stuck by that decision,i vited leave as did 17.4 million other people because we want our country our sovereignty back our lives back 
The new Brexit Secretary, @DominicRaab , will be answering questions from MPs on his Brexit strategy for the first time this morning - but what about the concerns of everyone else across the UK?Tweet YOUR questions to him beforehand using #AskRaab #PeoplesVote 
The voters got it RIGHT THE FIRST TIME. So did Justine Greening when she said "we need to respect the result" - not call for an unwanted and divisive second referendum. #RightTheFirstTime 
#EURef Campaign Spending: Leave - £13,436,241Remain - £19,070,566**Excludes the £9m spent by HM Government on pro-remain leaflets Who REALLY cheated the British People? #Brexit 
Simply brilliant by @johnredwood .  We have consistently said that he should be back in cabinet.  Unlike many MPs, he knows what he's talking about when it comes to business, trade, and the EU.Distinctive #Brexit research & news daily:  
We communicated it. You called it Project Fear.Food shortages, power cuts, no flights, no radiotherapy or scans, border chaos, businesses folding, huge job losses.That’s Brexit reality.  
Brexit Tory MP David Jones on Radio 4 coyly admitting there'll be 'an element of disruption' on trade with the EU thanks to Brexit. Like the other Brexiter phrase, 'some friction on trade', this means job losses and us all getting poorer. Why won't they admit it? 
Labour’s tactic of refusing to spell out a Brexit endgame, and pulling May towards softer solutions incrementally, has worked. But it is time now for a different tactic: a clear vision of a post-Brexit Britain. @paulmasonnews on the Durham Miners Gala. 
Contrary to the Boris line, the key to avoiding widespread Brexit harm is not more blind faith, it’s more critical thinking. Nothing should be more concerning than a politician begging us to disengage from reality. 
Talk is, the EU would now like to extend the Article 50 period. Allowing this would be the ultimate Tory betrayal of the 17.4 million.I don't blame the EU for all the time wasting since the referendum. The blame rests solely with this Tory government. 
Two years on from Brexit and the ‘solution’ to Irish border being put forward by Tory on #r4today is max facilitation plus ‘goodwill’. Why not just get the unicorns to do it, in the sunny uplands of Tyrone and Fermanagh 
There are 40 non-EU countries that have a land border with EU.Those countries have traded with EU for many yrs without any problem.So why all this artificial fuss over the Irish border after #Brexit?  
In a no deal Brexit the UK would forfeit its £500m share of the record fine the EU slapped on Google yesterday, as it won't be paid before next March. Proceeds from fines are covered by the Withdrawal Agreement. As a source said: 'No deal, no settlement.'  
Labour @OxfordCity Councillors are calling for a @peoplesvote_uk on the final Brexit deal. Brexit will trash the economy, scrap workers’ rights and bind us to dodgy trade deals. @Remain_Labour @LabLinda75 @maryoxford @smt49 @chriscrossmary @MarkLygo 
Brexit is disintegrating, it is said, because Remainers don’t believe in Britain. At 4 pm today let’s all stand, hum the anthem, squeeze our eyes closed and then shout “I believe in Britain. I BELIEVE”. I can’t see how the EU could withstand that.#TinkerbellBrexit 
If there's a better metaphor for Brexit than the government throwing a new mother under a bus for a rounding error majority and calling it the will of the people, I'm struggling to find it. 
Amazing. Tory Brexiter Sir Desmond Swayne states "there is no majority in parliament for any particular flavour of Brexit" ...and says we should blame the people.No. We should ask the people. #PeoplesVote 
Former Brexit Minister David Jones: Preparation to leave the EU should have been done long ago. There will probably be an element of disruption and this should've been communicated to the public long ago #r4today 
Newsnight were fair to me last night and I was able to mention Brexit. What is needed is for the Govnt to take up my plan for leaving the EU. Stop asking the EU how we can leave and tell them how it is going to happen. To see the UKIP EU Exit Plan go to  
Still true. And a no-deal Brexit would mean no science deal - and screw it all royally for UK science.  
It’s official: Government preparing for No Deal. I never believed soft Brexit was possible. So everybody wake up! This is not good news for anybody apart from hard #Brexiteer. We need an #ExitfromBrexit #peoplesvote 
"@theresa_may says 70 'technical notices' for businesses and households will be published in Aug and Sept setting out how we can all prepare for a no-deal Brexit." These notices will be based on this 1970s guide book:  
This morning I genuinely thought: perhaps I should start stockpiling my drugs - the ones where I die if I stop taking them - in case of a no-deal Brexit. It would be totally ignominious to be killed by an internal spat in the Conservative Party. 
they interfered with campaigns (from Brexit to US elections etc) fuelling racist right wing sentiments but ultimately? white people *voted* for these things. This is what they wanted. You might argue they were lied to but they weren't. They wanted white supremacy and voted for it 
Looking forward to taking questions from MPs on Brexit this morning, with our excellent Ministerial team @DExEUgov, then off to Brussels to meet Michel Barnier and his team. Time to intensify our negotiations. 
⁦.⁦@Freedland⁩ is right - #Brexit gridlock in parliament makes a #PeoplesVote on the final deal all the more necessary - sign up here to add your support  ⁦@peoplesvote_uk⁩ 
WORRYING: Some in Brussels are now talking about extending the Article 50 Brexit process.This must not be allowed to happen!  
Soldiers are to Tax as Fishermen are to Brexit as far as BBC Scotland is concerned. Fishing allows the Brexit narrative to be skewed in favour of the Tories. Soldiers allows the tax narrative to be skewed likewise. Soldiers and Fishermen are singled out for political purposes. 
The government are so desperate to force through their botched Brexit that they're defying the most basic ethical conventions. It's unacceptable and they must be called out for it (and other attempts to rig votes in their favour) 
Boris Johnson blasts May’s Brexit plan but doesn’t threaten leadership challenge  
Theresa May to woo grassroots Tories over Brexit deal. I stopped listening to Mrs May when she starting talking to everyone as if we all voted for Brexit. Dear @theresa_may, we are NOT all Brexiteers. You speak as if you lead a Brexit party - you don't! @Nigel_Farage does. 
This is an initiative for a change to European law, which would ensure that anyone who had acquired EU citizenship at any point (or had been born with it) would keep it for ever more. All UK citizens would therefore remain EU citizens after Brexit, keeping Freedom of movement.  
Journalist just asked if true I was the mysterious person having dinner with Vince Cable on Monday, plotting a new party when he should have been voting against Brexit. Sorry, not me. However, I’m often mistaken for Vladimir Putin, so there may be a big story here! 
Yougov poll puts remain 10 points ahead with growing support for a 1st referendum on the terms of a deal.Public opinion is changing but we need to keep campaigning.  
'It's not too late to save #Brexit', Boris Johnson tells UK parliament  
Lord Patten - "All those little bits of mendacity added together created the fog of doubt in which we took the decision we did on brexit" - Boris Johnson is "always extremely careless with the truth" & he goes onto to say Boris Johnson "is no Churchill" #StopBrexit #FBPE 
Really can’t emphasise how right this is. It was Tories’ sheer terror of @UKIP gaining support in the polls which led to us getting the referendum. It’s the ONLY thing which moves them. If anything, we are in an even stronger political position to do this again. #Betrayal 
This is your Thurs 19th July reminder that it is now a LEGAL FACT that  both Leave campaigns deliberately broke the law to win the Brexit referendum@BorisJohnson @michaelgovebroke the law & should be in jail#VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw #VoteLeaveCheated 
This doesn't bode well for any Settled Status information UK Gov might want to give out in native languages to EU citizens.Translation of Brexit White Paper ridiculed by native speakers. German version so bad it was classed as 'unreadable' by some.  
Truth is Whitehall and the political class have in effect held their own 2nd referendum among themselves and they decided to scrap Brexit. 
I have had lots of disgraceful tweets like this. Response of parts of the far left to anti-Semitism is to accuse the people calling it out of being racist!Just when the Tories go berserk with Brexit, this happens to Labour  
Calling them cultists was, on reflection, neither unkind nor unfair. Brexit is now blind faith versus cautious understanding.Perhaps it always was.  
The Brexiteers have had two years to come with a credible plan. And let's face facts: they can't.Rees Mogg and co huff and puff about 'Brexit in name only'.But that's because their alternative is 'Leave without a deal'.  
Yet more discredited @scotgov figures have been caught disseminating fake news on the Kremlin’s TV channel, where a past @scotgovfm hosts a show. This time the lie is not about a power grab, it is about polling data.It’s time for reconciliation, not another referendum.  
It's remarkable how little personal scrutiny those in govt who opposed no deal preparations for so long (eg Hammond) have come under. They manifestly sought to strengthen their own causes by undermining the UK govt's Brexit policy. How was that permitted? 
Those who still revere Thatcher's legacy unquestioningly yet are horrified by Brexit need to ask themselves where a mindset willing to risk the loss of 100 000s of jobs and the collapse of whole business sectors comes from 
Brexit Paper translation nightmare: native speakers find mistake after mistake in official docs, criticise some as “unreadable”  
Betraying Brexit will do for Toryism what the Iraq War did for Blairism. Tory Brexiteers can avert that by lending their votes to UKIP. 
Fantastic to see Labour politicians showing leadership, it’s in short supply when it comes to recognising dreadful reality of Brexit:a ‘less’ jobs, reduced public services, divisive, badly thought-out, project, currently seemingly propped up by Labour.  
The week the Brexiters lost control of Brexit  via @financialtimes 
Today’s dose of fake news about Brexit,  courtesy of the Guardian,  which these days has become almost a parody of itself.    
Ruth Davidson has compared Alex Salmond to  Trump and used the word thug to describe him.Evidence Ruth is becoming increasingly desperate as her party fall into 3rd place and she has been exposed on Brexit and maintains her silence on dark money &ignores the thugs in her party. 
You know who has been consistent in their opposition to Brexit, and we are still saying it loud and clear. @LibDems 
First the lies, then the backtracks, then alleged Russian data shenanigans and Gove admitting he shouldn't have misled on immigration... now this. Are we ever going to get an honest vote on a brexit issue? 
The Office for Budget Responsibility said definitively that there is NO 'Brexit Dividend' for the NHS. Tory plans will increase the National Debt by 57.9%  of GDP or £1.3trillion. Be afraid, be very afraid!! #r4today 
This is a fantastic -and timely- series of testimonials.Our fellow UK citizens living elsewhere in the EU have been in limbo since the vote. A no-deal Brexit is our government carelessly dumping them. Abandoning its own citizens.  
TORY BREXIT PLAN:1. Propose impossible deal, which EU refuses2. Say: "Look at those EU wankers, it's their fault we're crashing out of EU with disastrous no-deal3. Crash out of the EU with disastrous no-deal(Don't mention whole disaster triggered by Tories in 1st place) 
Brexit: now it’s a battle over who governs Britain | Martin Kettle  
The anti-Brexit bias of @BBCr4today is demonstrated yet again by the way it repeatedly refers to 'crashing out' of the EU, rather than 'leaving' it. Even the biased anti-Brexit Electoral Commission agreed to the word 'Leave' on the EU referendum ballot paper. #BBC #Brexit 
Police preparing for a rise in hate crime after Brexit. MPs hang your heads in shame for the anger and misery your incompetence is fuelling. People of the UK, be better than this. Don’t hurt other people. 
BBC reports that @DominicRaab will continue negotiations with the EU's Michel Barnier Leavers know that this is merely window-dressing. In reality, arch-Remainer Olly Robbins is Theresa May's appointed #Brexit wrecker  
Sean, my tiny company was involved in R&D projects across the EU. They’ve all gone now thanks to Brexit uncertainty. That’s over £500k of business lost in last 24 months. I’m having to close!One tiny business multiplied across the country!#StopBrexit 
No deal Brexit, the one favoured by all the “I know what I voted for crowd,” Is going to be explained. Allegedly.70 "technical notices"for businesses and households will be published in August and September setting out how we can all prepareDigging for Britain is a thing again 
I will never understand why Brexit supporters are so keen to have voted for less of everything - less jobs less money less food less petrol less cars less freedom less rights less protections less work less wages less emergency services less healthcare-WHY VOTE FOR LESS? Crazy!! 
Boris Johnson’s vision for Brexit would never have worked – his resignation speech proved that  
Theresa May is going to issue 70 "technical notices" for businesses & households in the next 2 months, telling us how we can aprepare for a no deal Brexit, a bit like that 1980’s nuclear leafletShould this happen, the only thing she will need to plan for is a general election 
'Theresa May will go on a tour of Britain this summer in an attempt to convince sceptical Tory members to back her plan for Brexit. ' Is this woman blind and deaf? 
"It's not too late to save Brexit," bleats Boris.I don't want to save Brexit. I want to kill it. Someone hold it down while I gouge out its twitching heart.  
Airbus condemns the U.K.’s "unraveling" Brexit plan, echoing Rolls  
I feel that my prediction that the UK would rejoin 5 years or so post referendum (fully engaged) may transpire to be correct. I wince at the pain it will go through to achieve that reconciliation. Because its leaders failed to deal with the bullies in front of the playground. 
News Daily: Hate crime report and Raab takes up Brexit reins  
Both EU and UK now warning about damaging no-deal Brexit. With Austrian EU presidency the 62% result in Scotland to remain in Europe was key fact on main Austrian TV news. #BrexitChaos #ZiB2 #eu2018at  
Remain spent 40% more than Leave — and more than double when we include the government’s pro-Remain leaflet.  Let no one suggest that a disputed half million of Leave spending invalidates the referendum result.  
And still Remain is attempting to overturn #Brexit, says LEO MCKINSTRY 'If Soubry and her gang had their way, Britain would cease to exist as a country, becoming nothing more than a regional province in the EU’s empire.' 
Pleased to start the initiative on #Indonesia-#UK Think Tank Dialogue hosted by @ChathamHouse in cooperation with @CSISIndonesia & @KBRILondon as the 2nd track mechanism to define strategic direction of the relationship between both countries post #Brexit. @Kemlu_RI 
In a world of doom, gloom, Brexit and misfortune we felt the urge to cut through the misery and brighten your day with the image of a six-year-old boy leading his Grey Faced Dartmoor, Paddington. #MoreThanJustANewspaper 
The Brexit we are going to get with May is one the EU want, not one the British people voted for, May's deal is worse for the British people than a no deal, and that is the truth like it or not. 
Gove, Johnson, Fox, Farage, Banks et al cheated to win the referendum. The result crashed the pound. The pound crashing has resulted in our losing over €10K in pension payments in the last 24 months. Anyone know how we can recover the losses from these criminals? 
Brexit needs a Union of people who believe in Brexit from all sides of  the political rainbow to come together to achieve the Brexit the people  voted for. The Tory Brexit is looking like a one sided May dictatorship  that is in a total mess. 
As a result of the new EU/Japan trade agreement, surely even our dim witted Brexit negotiators must realise this heralds in a new baseline to our negotiations. 
Whole Union Fleg campaign a rip-roaring success then?Drop in profits couldn't possibly have anything to do with the brilliant Whitehall plan to descotify Jockland by extinguishing its iconic brandMaking it just another county council of the post #brexit Greater English Reich  
If your business is catering to tax dodgers and those who who want to hide assets from prying eyes post-Brexit UK is the place to be.  
Raab to flood businesses with ‘no-deal’ Brexit adviceWhile UK government still posturing for negotiating advantage, the very real risks of no-deal Brexit increase, and EU side advises member stats about planning to limit damage#BrexitShambles 
@UKIP got 13% in 2015  but only ONE MP.What we need is a #BrexitCoalition so the 17.4 million can unite behind just ONE candidate in each seat.In that way we can elect a #BrexitGovernment that will deliver the Brexit we voted for.It would also scare the Tories & Lab to death.  
Don't expect Labour to mop up the U.K.'s Brexit mess  via @bopinion 
Pharmacists preparing to stockpile medicines after warning over  no-deal #Brexit  
Now on way to Belfast to campaign for @peoplesvote_uk and meet civic leaders & politicians. Speaking at Queen’s University at 4pm - all welcome! No need to register. Will also be signing copies of my anti-Brexit book  
Brexit: Watchdog warns of need to issue driving permits  
... "Currently, UK driving licences are valid in all EU countries, plus Iceland, Liechtenstein, Norway and Switzerland. But unless a specific agreement is reached, UK drivers will need 'additional documentation' in Europe after Brexit."#StopBrexit  
The question is : "do the government care?". I suspect the answer is not unless they have to answer for it & the chances of that are slim to none.Brexit will trigger rise in hate crimes, warns police watchdog  
Fitch ratings does not hesitate to downgrade or upgrade a country's credit rating as long as data/facts support these positions. Together with Moody's positive outlook of the Philippines, they both make up a solid referendum of our country's strong economic growth.  
By the way, the Russians also tilted the playing field on Brexit, part of their strategy to weaken the West. (Which is working)  
Mrs May has ruled out the idea of a second referendum—but of course, two years ago, she ruled out a snap election  
Brexit will trigger rise in hate crimes, warns police watchdog  
Boris Johnson delivered a statesman-like resignation speech, urging the PM to deliver the positive #Brexit promised at Lancaster House, not the BRINO of her #ChequersPlan.This was no leadership bid, but a warning shot, from a PM-in-waiting. 
In one week, Britain welcomed two White extremists. One who sanctions murder & bigotry (#Trump), & another who incites murder (#SteveBannon).Then you wonder why fascism is rife in #America & #Europe.#Brexit #WhiteRadicalisation #FarRight 
Cue JRM calling him an enemy of the state for doing his job. Again.No-deal Brexit would have big economic consequences – Carney  
"TWO WEEKS BEFORE HIS INAUGURATION, Donald J. Trump was shown highly classified intelligence indicating that President Vladimir V. Putin of Russia had personally ordered complex cyberattacks to sway the 2016 American election." 
Calls for second Brexit referendum  
Tfw polling is not going the Dems way, millennials (especially white male millennials) are abandoning Dem party before the 2018 elections which were supposed to be a “blue wave” & a referendum on Drumpf.....twist the knife  
Everyone sees this now. Corbyn is Milne’s people person for Stalinism. But Brexit has scuppered his project. We the people understand it will make us poorer. He is flustered . So blame the Jews. Trump fake news strategy.  
With support faltering, members of Theresa May's own party, including her former Brexit secretary, felt emboldened to ask sharp questions about her way forward in rowdy House of Commons session.  
May presses on with her #Brexit plan  
Baptism of fire for UK's new Brexit minister  
Question for those public figures who say "I don't like the result but we must respect the referendum on #Brexit" What corruption threshold needs to be passed before you say "no, enough's enough - it must be stopped"Do you really want to be remembered for defending this stain?  
Brexit seems to be going well.  
Just a thought..re #Brexit has anyone yet heard Theresa May, or for that matter Jeremy Corbyn, utter the phrase:"We're going to get you a BETTER DEAL"?Seems to me that really would be the only reason to justify this utter #BrexitShambles & the denial of a Democratic #FinalSay 
Brexit will trigger rise in hate crimes, warns police watchdog  
Brexit would be infinitely more bearable if ppl knew the Govt cannot run out of money. #LearnMMT 
Between Trump and Putin and after and bloody ridiculous Brexit shenanigans the news is weirder than Space Giraffe level 64 at the moment. One might wish for a Superzapper.Thank goodness for being able to go outside and cuddle a sheep when it all gets a bit much.  
Good god, the replies to this from rabid Brexiteers who have no comprehension of the consequences of a no-deal Brexit are disturbing.'Project fear, scaremongering' and yes, even 'fake news'...with not a single thought as to how this would affect the terminally & long-term ill.  
In 2014 it was the ‘Six Californias’ ballot initiative to split California into six separate states. The referendum failed to gather enough qualifying valid signatures to appear on the 2016 ballot. Venture capitalist Tim Draper was the point man. 
Check out my article on @InFactsOrg There must be many #brexiters who bought holiday homes who’d find this interesting!#BrexitReality #brexit #LeaveEU #StopBrexitSaveBritain Brits with holiday homes across EU are at risk from Brexit @InFactsOrg 
The EU would have less incentive to offer a good deal if a referendum was on the cards  
A no-deal Brexit could lead to a catastrophe for science in the UK  
We’re heading for a no deal Brexit, aren’t we?  
This is just dangerous. You CANNOT push Brexit through on populist ideology. It must be pragmatic and only about what’s best for the people. You are a politician NOT a preacher and #Brexit is not above scrutiny, the law (#VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw )or democracy. 
Austerity is precisely why we should be fighting Brexit. Especially the Labour Party. Things will get considerably worse with Brexit. To pretend to represent the interests of those crushed by austerity AND support Brexit is utter hypocrisy.  
Nothing to do with Brexit, nothing to see here: “'The money has run out' - health bosses' admission as hip and knee patients denied NHS operations - The Telegraph  
300+ Tories vote to make an economically calamitous hard-right "no deal" Brexit even more likely. Tory MP Anna Soubry seeks to deflect blame onto the 4 Labour cranks who outright defied Jeremy Corbyn to support Theresa May and the ERG Brextremist mob.Pathetic!  
Well done Liverpool!Labour, Lib Dem & Green councillors all working together for a #PeoplesVote on #Brexit.Wish this was happening at national level.  
Yes! “Will Britain Renounce Brexit? - Vanity Fair  
230,000 votes is not ‘hard line’ support. Sinn Féin won every Nationalist seat in the last Westminster Election with a record high vote. And did so on the back of a Progressive vision for Ireland. We also opposed the Brexit vote as did a majority. Something lost on partitionists!  
Petition to "Rescind Art.50 if Vote Leave has broken Electoral Laws regarding 2016 referendum" Now over 110,000 signatures #BrexitShambles 
Honestly, in all the excitement about Brexit, and the implosion of the Tory party, and the implosion of the western alliance, I'd almost forgotten that the planet was irreparably fucked. 
Bloody EU, taking on multinationals who are monopolising markets, ripping off consumers and avoiding paying taxes!These unethical multinationals will be more than welcome in Brexit Britain, where we’ll allow them to do what they like, avoid paying taxes and rip everyone off!  
In UKIPScotland they are coming back from Remainer Ruth's Anti Brexit Conservatives but just as many  from the anti free speech one party State SNP which they say wants to hand Scotland's fishing and oil to the EU. What sort of independence is that ?  
The updated slogan for the Brexit bus  
‘Our politicians have failed us – it’s time for a second referendum’  
The events of the past week make perfect sense in the context of the insane Brexit project. An insane premise must always lead to lunatic consequences. The essential irrationality of Brexit can never be transformed in mid-stream by a sudden onset of mitigating rationality. 
It's Official: The Brexit Campaign Cheated Its Way to Victory || via TheDailyBeast  
This petition is from the Good Law Project against Brexit. #FBPEyou've signed the other, now sign this one. The referendum must be annulled due to law breaking. 
Or to put it another way, if overspending by Vote Leave and Leave EU, coordination between campaigns, dark psychometric ads by #CambridgeAnalytic and massive Russian interference changed the minds of just ONE in 50 voters, it swung the vote for #Brexit  
Absolutely agree with this. I found myself shouting exactly that at #r4today this morning: “No Deal Brexit is NOT Hard Brexit; Hard Brexit is a basic FTA”.  FFS!  
1. Fill a bath and any pots you have with water2. Buy candles3. If you have children pick the one you like the least and sell it4. Your dog can make a tasty treat in a pinch5. Sharpen a stick as your neighbours will try and steal your tasty dogBrexit is going to be great  
No, Brexit is a stepping stone for the global cognitive elite. That small group of mega rich who see paying taxes for schools roads and hospitals as theft. The EU want to shut down tax havens and protect workers rights and it scares them. They are what links Trump, Putin, Farage 
Can’t be bothered on #DarkMoneyDavidson either or explaining the economic disastrous impact of Brexit on Scotland’s families, employment, jobs lost or trade negative impact,  BBC Scotland are just useless in terms of their education brief and honesty. #dissolvethebbc 
No Deal Brexit will be intant panic-buying and rioting. I guarantee it. No-one should need 70 government leaflets just to get on with their day. Suspend Article 50, call a fucking election and give Rees-Mogg a job as border security in Northern Ireland. 
A study by the London School of Economics has found basic food stuff like "Cheese to become ‘luxuries’ in UK after Brexit". Scotland did not vote for the monumental catastrophe being created by UKGov. #Chaos 
Indeed, basic principles of administrative law say that if at the time of deciding to serve the A50 notice the PM did not properly consider the possible consequences of the UK leaving the EU (of which a no deal Brexit is one), she had no business sending the A50 notice at all. 
They NEVER had a plan. Just a load of hot air and bollocks. Brexit is actually a religion. A really, really naff one. #FBPE #ExitFromBrexit 
May claims Brexit vote 'cheating' was an 'error' - but Labour don't believe her  
Gerrard Batten: I'm a fascist & I just promoted my racist views on national TV, but I'd also like to take this normalising opportunity to pretend UKIP are "mainstream" by discussing BrexitMaitlis: We'd love you toFFS#newsnight @LBC @ofcom @BBCNews 
The Guardian front page, Thursday 19 July: Johnson attacks ‘miserable’ Brexit plan  
Utterly repellent man, unable to conceal, during HoL debates on their would-be Brexit-wrecking amendments, how much he despised giving the great unwashed the chance to vote on their own destiny.His losing his seat in the 1992 election was a joy to behold. 
Shut up Boris! You're one of the main people who got us into this mess, then didn't make much progress on #Brexit while Foreign Secretary. Forget saving Brexit, this is now about saving our nation's future from an unnecessary manufactured crisis. #FBPE 
Realize I’m on a hiding to nothing here - but how Sinn Fein’s MPs can resist the opportunity to march in Parliament, stop Brexit, bring down a Tory Gov & shout; “Revenge for Skibbereen, yiz bastards!” Is beyond me. 
#bbcnewsnightHow is calling Islam a cult, describing its prophet a child molester, and alleging that Islam promotes paedophilia, NOT hate speech?I am talking about Gerard Batten. Who is now instead been allowed to talk about Brexit instead of being pressed on his hate speech. 
I don't know about you but with the last few days of Trump in the US;Brexit in the Commons, I feel dispirited, troubled and heartsick. 
The British Prime Minister #TheresaMay has won a narrow vote in the British parliament which will allow her to continue with her soft #Brexit plan. Meanwhile, there has been an increase in speculations about Brexit hardliner #BorisJohnson preparing to unseat the PM.#Chequers 
Yup. But for all his lies, bluster and self promotion Johnson has moved the political spectrum. No deal is now a distinct possibility. Soft Brexit is where Hard Brexit used to be.Isn't it about time we stood up for our Labour values and for Labour people and fought to Remain? 
And if you think there should be a second Brexit referendum I can't really see how you can deny the SNP a second independence referendum. Which means you are, like the Leavers, making Brexit a bigger issue than the future integrity of the United kingdom. 
In case you may be unaware:If Russia is pushing #Brexit that can only mean one thing, Brexit ain't good for the UK. And RT isn't media, it is propaganda directed by the Russian government.  
I want a boyfriend to surprise with a solution to Brexit so I never have to think or talk about it ever again  
“I think it was nonsense. I don’t think history will be very kind to David Cameron,” says former Conservative Party chairman Lord Patten on David Cameron’s decision to call the Brexit referendum. He says no doubt the former PM will say “it wasn’t his fault” #newsnight 
Chris Patten, John Major, Michael Heseltine... every living Conservative statesman is convinced that #Brexit will be terrible for Britain.Why, oh why, are the current Conservatives playing into the hands of the lunatic far right?  #Newsnight 
#HERALD Iain Macwhirter: "Sturgeon must now fight for a People’s Vote on the EU"No, she must not - she must call #indyref2 - that's what she and her party stood on if we were taken out of EU against our will - and we #will be, under #any Brexit deal.  Get Scotland out of UK, FM! 
'The MP's attack on May's Brexit plan may prove a watershed  moment,' Leo McKinstry writes 
Chris Patten on #newsnight now giving the authorised view, how the BBC wants you to view a superb speech by Boris.Notice how much time a man not elected since 1992 is being given, compared with the #brexit leader who made resignation speech today. 
The British people should get the final say on the Brexit deal, with the option to remain in the EU. Agree? Add your name:  
I am in full support of @darrenpjones call for a judge-led public inquiry into the #Brexit referendum. Four current Cabinet Secretaries, inc current Brexit Sec, were on Campaign Committee of Vote Leave - that org that has now been referred to police. They must explain or resign.  
Please do sign and share this. EU27 citizens were promised automatic leave to remain and the “exact same rights” before the referendum. We should all help to make sure that simple promise to them is kept.   
Alas @piersmorgan it’s become Sport for the looney left, in the last 2 weeks I’ve had 9 ‘you c**t, 3 F**k you’s’ thrown at me I’ve had 1 coffee, 1 Pimms, and a Glass of Merlot 2005 (what a waste) spat at twice and all because of Trump/Brexit - I’ve left the UK for 6 weeks   
The Norway option is the only thing left that will save Brexit: 
Go on, how will you get a good night’s sleep until you sign it?If you think Brexit is nuts, you might like to sign. If you think our democracy is under threat, you might like to sign. Different reasons to do the right thing.#StopBrexit #RescindArticle50 
Brexit dividend for NHS is a fallacy says OBR  
This will trigger a massive increase in support for a second referendum, and seriously impact any existing support for the “no deal” option  
Fellow Remainers, Leave cheated & broke the law to win a referendum in 2016. They cheated & broke the law, Tim thinks it's OK to cheat & break the law to win. Don't be dim like Tim, don't allow cheating & breaking the law to be acceptable. Cheating & breaking the law is wrong.  
Depressed about Brexit? Following this link and watching the numbers pouring in live will give you a boost.Please sign and RT Widely.We are on the march...! 
Only ignorance stands in way of a real Brexit now, says @johnredwood 
I agree, that’s why I never voted for a party  that implemented Austerity. But Brexit will be far worse than Austerity & I find it hypocritical to criticise the Lib Dem’s for supporting Austerity but not the present Labour leadership for supporting Brexit.  
Maybot’s circuits blew when she was asked in detail about her Brexit plan. Couldn’t answer and so kept repeating herself. Brexit means Brexit. Tired and alone. Give up and give us the People’s Vote. Stop Brexit. #FBPE 
40 YEARS! I voted for Labour, I wish I could take every single vote back, you have backed the Tories all the way through #Brexit and shat on Scotland, You’re done. 
The front page of tomorrow's Daily Telegraph: 'It's not too late to save Brexit from this disaster' #tomorrowspaperstoday 
BREAKING: For the first time, a Beckham stadium proposal will go to voter referendum in Miami  
EU assault on May's white paper heightens 'no deal' Brexit fears  
Boris Johnson called for a hard Brexit in his resignation speech today, so let's remind ourselves of all the times he called for the UK to remain in the single market (courtesy of @AdamBienkov) 
Our @Femi_Sorry asked a Fruit-vendor in Cardiff how Brexit was affecting him and his business.  
Theresa May's new #Brexit chief called to 'turn back the clock' on workers' rights. This is what #Brexit is all about, a #BrexitTaxHaven, a paradise for the rich in which wealth gives them all the rights they have robbed from us. #PeoplesVote #StopBrexit 
Theresa May has sold out her own team, Chequers Brexit is not Brexit, Tory Basketcase Media are trying to work out what to do? Bozo or Busted!!Hahahahaha!!!!  
Thursday’s Express: It is not too late to save Brexit #tomorrowspaperstoday #bbcpapers (via @hendopolis) 
So apparently The pm  says that 70 "technical notices"for businesses and households will be published in August and September setting out how we can all prepare for a no deal Brexit..WTF??? Surely if the government knows that a no deal scenario will be so bad we’ll all be screwed 
This is like something out of an apocalypse movie: Tories admit a no-deal Brexit will be so disastrous that they have to give households notice of how to SURVIVE IT?!?!  
So if people did vote to make themselves poorer, why did the leavers talk about a brexit dividend? 
Small businesses like ours were always supported by the Tories. Now they don’t even listen to the massive ones. There must be many like me. Silent - and on Twitter lol. Brexit will cost the Tories for a long long time when it kicks in. 
At what point was it decided that Brexit meant severing every last trading and regulatory link with Europe as opposed to simply leaving the unwanted political union? I remember not so long ago many prominent Brexiteers were quite happy to promote the EEA as a workable option.  
Yes. This. Language is extremely important here. Using “Hard Brexit” for no deal/cliff-edge/car-crash disorderly Brexit makes it sound like one of several equivalent options. By an order of magnitude, it is is not.  
Whilst the British government is preparing a pamphlet on how to survive a Brexit apocalypse - “10 easy ways to cook a shoe” and that kind of thing; our European neighbours are, no doubt, drawing up proper plans to help the people of the UK.  
Former UK Foreign Secretary Boris Johnson just gave the best and most important speech of his life: the one that might, with luck, save #Brexit 
The Government is to publish around 70 ‘technical notifications’ setting out what people and businesses need to do in the event of a ‘No Deal’ Brexit. But why, if it’s all going to be so bloody brilliant? 
APPROVED: David Beckham and company score win for MLS soccer complex ambitions as Miami approves proposal for November referendum –  
This is disgraceful that not one person of colour is a member of the  #brexit related committee.  
Vote Leave broke the law.Let’s make sure Parliament has to debate it.Sign the petition to Rescind Article 50 if Vote Leave has broken Electoral Laws regarding 2016 referendum, and help #StopBrexit. Please sign, share and RT to everyone #FBPE: 
In a 3 way #PeoplesVote, Remain wins comfortably now that we actually know what Brexit is. But look at Labour voters. Our Party is pursuing a policy for the Few, not the Many. It must change.#PeoplesVote@jeremycorbyn@Keir_Starmer 
BREAKING: The MLS Miami Stadium proposal led by @Jorge__Mas will go to referendum In November, with the vote for referendum passing the Miami City Commission 3-2 
The Government met today in Derrynane House, Daniel O’Connell’s ancestral home. We had a long & substantial discussion on Brexit & agreed to ramp up our contingency plans. This will include hiring more than 1,000 extra inspectors for our ports & airports. We will be prepared. pic.twitter.com/aoVYtxfzM1 
Anna Soubry is right. The moderates of all three parties outnumber the crazy fuckers. It is time. They must form an emergency coalition, force a general election and stop Brexit. 
The BBC in London has played an active role in brexit by constantly showcasing Farage and co and instead of learning the lesson they are doubling down. I don't think it's cos they are brexiteers - well some of them are, like John Humphreys - I think it's cos they are idiots. > 
My view: Theresa May is a Globalist Lib Masquerading as a Conservative. There’s no Way Referendums like BREXIT Should be Allowed to be Ignored/Overturned in a Democracy.Brits Deserve Better; Democracy Demands itThe Conservative Party Needs to Oust Theresa May  
Tomorrow's front page: 'Completely delusional' ... Johnson slammed for latest Brexit nonsense in his resignation speech as Scottish Tory MP cheerleader looks on  
Lidl...get extra staff on at the end of the month as we'll be stocking up for Brexit armageddon.......... 
Best thing about #PMQs was this Q from @andreajenkyns, who thereby showed she has more balls than most of the male Tory MPs cravenly backing May's Soft-remain (non)-Brexit sellout put together.Bravissima,  Andrea.    
Taoiseach warns that UK planes could be restricted from flying in EU airspace in the event of a no deal Brexit. Mr Varadkar said UK could not take back its waters and expect to use EU skies. "You can't have your cake and eat it," he said. 
Britain is crying out for a leader who believes in Brexit, has courage and is not scared of criticism.  
Pleasure to be on main Austrian evening news to talk about the dangers of hard Brexit, the 62% support for Scotland remaining in Europe and the crisis in the UK government #BrexitChaos #ZiB2   
Wow! Just saw it break past 100k! Looks like a great many people want to tell our politicians that crime, cheating and rule-breaking must be punished not rewarded. This isn't just about #Brexit it's about the rule of law. #PeoplesVote #StopBrexit 
On the subject of banning UK flights over Ireland, Varadkar's cocky phrase about Brexit from a few months ago immediately springs to mind:It doesn't seem like Leo has thought all this through has he #OwnGoal Leo pic.twitter.com/gZ7t7tGBFn 
Important to understand that when ERG politicians invoke (implicitly or explicitly) the Minford/Economists for Free Trade (Brexit) plan, this is what they mean: literally no more manufacturing or farming in the UK. The will of the people?  
Finally had a chance to watch this and it's brilliant. Incisive, statesmanlike and on the money. Finding it hard to disagree with anything he is saying. Been critical of Boris Johnson before but not here#Brexit #PMQs #BorisMeansBrexit #BorisJohnson 
Sean, I fully agree. I'm MD of a London based co. We've had to move a business unit to the EU. Brexit is a massive act of national self-harm, driven by politicians with no business experience or understanding. Tories are the "fuck business" party & we are being f@&ked. 
Liverpool City Council voted 68-2 in favour of @peoplesvote_uk this evening, with Labour, Lib Dem & Green councillors supporting. Privileged to speak alongside Mayor Joe Anderson. Inspiration to councils nationwide to campaign to stop Brexit on behalf of their communities! 
Just so surprised Japan didn't insist on getting full EU membership & beg the EU to accept 1,000's of Billions of Yen for the privilege of having to obey EU laws & submit to Brussels to make their laws & allow unlimited immigration into their country.#FreeTradeIsFree#Brexit #EU 
Fraudulent? #Remain was backed by government funding. Plenty of working class people voted for #Leave. You all said the UK economy would fall apart once #brexit was announced. Here we are with the best unemployment figures for 43 years and 21 consecutive quarters of GDP growth. 
MUST-WATCH: Lord Hesseltine joins leading Conservatives by calling for a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal.Everybody needs to see this. Please RT:  
The thing is, in own resignation letter, Baker acknowledged Commons maths would not support his vision of a harder/cleaner Brexit.So no majority for Baker ERG Brexit, None for Chequers.No majority for No Deal (eg John Mann is against it).No majority for exit deal referendum. 
Sorry Remoaners you find any reason to kick up a fuss but Brexit always meant a mainly vegan diet and Leave was very clear on that point  
I love Dani. She speaks for the Nation. Perhaps she can sort Brexit when she comes out... #loveisland 
Currently got  a van on way back from Italy - dropped off 2 weeks ago and recollected today for London .. it’s for an art school they send students to paint .. post brexit they will stop this as there is so much gear it wouldn’t fit into a carnet!! (I’ve had the work for 6 years) 
Coming to a letterbox near you, 'Preparing for a No Deal Brexit'Fatten the cats. Buy a shotgun. Buy a case of Beans, buy another case of Beans. Send your kids to Canada. Buy more Beans. Put up a 'No Beans Here' poster in your window. Buy Beans, more of them. Funny? Not! 
HOW MICHAEL GOVE PANICKED when @Borisjohnson resigned!  If he had an ounce of  principle, #Gove wud have resigned too, but he has sold out to #May, shoring up her #Brexit betrayal, what a weasel.   @borisjohnson #borisjohnson #boris johnson 
Petition: Rescind Art.50 if Vote Leave has broken Electoral Laws regarding 2016 referendum  
Thousands of disgruntled Tory Brexit voters have joined UKIP since Theresa May’s crunch Chequers summit   
If older voters realised they were going to have to pay for it, Brexit would die in about three hours. 
You know who’s been very quiet recently? Philip Hammond.Now if I was him, I’d be preparing a few little goodies like the freezing of the state pension and significantly ramped up inheritance tax to “pay for Brexit”. 
Oi Labour MPs, can you imagine how good it would feel to be part of a party of Labour that wasn’t troubled by anti-Semitism, that didn’t have Hoey and Field, O’Mara and Livingstone in, one that opposed damaging Tory policies like Brexit?Sound good?Then damn well set one up 
Increasingly vexed by 'no deal' Brexit being called 'hard Brexit'. It isn't. Hard Brexit = no SM/CU but transition to FTA = bad. No deal Brexit = no transition, planes grounded, food rationing, drugs shortages = catastrophe. Shifting language matters: normalises the abnormal. 
And now for today's whether forecast.Whether or not I will support #Brexit .The outlook is fucking bleak, no sign of me supporting Brexit. The long range forecast is even bleaker. Chance of not supporting Brexit 100% with a smattering of no fucking way before tea time. 
In the past 48 hrs - anti Labour FBPE trolls seem to have desisted in their demands that Corbyn STOP #Brexit.Could that be because Farron & Cable FAILED to turn up for a key vote ?Or MAYBE they're planning a campaign to RE-RUN the World Cup - so as to get the result they want ? 
.@BorisJohnson says in his resignation statement that the government needs to 'believe in the UK' and 'it's not too late to save #Brexit' - Follow the latest here:  
So BBC's response to the Cliff Richard judgement is that it will stop them scrutinising innocent pop stars who have never been arrested, funny bc they have absolutely no interest in scrutinising Brexit. 
Really hoping that all senior UKIP people will keep the focus on Brexit - it's working. 
One of the EUs local council leaders, Leo Varadkar, says: "UK flights won't be able to enter Irish airspace without Brexit deal".This is right out of the school playground book of bullying.  When Varadkar grows up his country will be "Billy no mates."  Grow up Leo. 
There you go, Guido confirming that a UKIP surge is dreaded by Tories. Make it happen and they will have to toughen up on Brexit.  
Boris says 'Not too late' to save Brexit in resignation speech...  
Everyone, I mean EVERYONE, needs to watch May's interview with the Brexit committee today. Her attempts to bluff through were thoroughly embarrassing, the woman is clueless. 
Thanks. Increasingly I think that the geo-pol and security aspects of Brexit are the most alarming & important. Even if it were accepted that 17.4M 'knew what they were voting for' in 2016 they can hardly have known what it meant in post-Trump world. 
AND THEY ARE STILL GETTING AWAY WITH IT !!...BREXIT MUST BE STOPPED BEFORE ANY MORE DAMAGE IS DONE !!#FBPE #StopBrexit #StopTories 
Hoey, Mann, Field & Stringer have just helped Labour turn against Brexit.Good. 
Boris Johnson's resignation speech was not only excellent as was expected but it threw his hat into the leadership ring. I would vote Tory again if Johnson was leader and I hope it happens soon enough to save brexit and put Britain back on its feet. 
Northern Irish border ‘hitherto assumed on all sides to be readily soluble’. Rubbish. It was barely discussed during the referendum. The few who did discuss it said it would be a problem right from the start.  
I can't get over the cognitive dissonance of Leavers who think there will be a mutually advantageous Brexit deal because in the end the EU will protect its economic interests but also that EU leaders are spiteful ideologues who want to punish Britain AND THIS IS WHY WE MUST LEAVE 
A second Brexit referendum is back in play  
Just signed, please do the same.Petition: Rescind Art.50 if Vote Leave has broken Electoral Laws regarding 2016 referendum  
TONIGHT: Boris Johnson tells the PM to tear up her miserable plans for Brexit as former Tory party chairman Chris Patten tells us he's never seen the atmosphere in the party as "toxic as it is today" @BBCTwo | 22:30 | #newsnight 
Britain is crying out for a leader who believes in Brexit, has a bit of courage and is not put off by criticism, says @Nigel_Farage 
Few people realize that the majority of British voters have been in favour of remain for close to a year. This trend is growing, as Brexit falls into chaos and the deal on the table is so obviously ruinous to our nation. ⁦@NicolasHatton⁩ ⁦⁦@voiceseurope⁩ 
.@borisjohnson has said that it is "not too late to save Brexit" as he savaged @theresa_may's Chequers plan on #Brexit as a "miserable, permanent limbo" Read more:  
I do worry that some people are in danger of losing the plot. There are issues with aviation and Brexit but flyover - the first freedom of air - is guaranteed by IASTA of which Ireland is a signatory   .  
Dutch government hires nearly 1,000 customs officials to prepare for 'no deal' Brexit  
Irish government announces hard Brexit contingency plans to hire up to 900 staff for checks at ports and airports  
I welcome technical notices for businesses too but it’s how a cliff-edge, no-deal Brexit would affect so many aspects of our  lives that will be most shocking. 
Pharmacists preparing to stockpile medicines and medical supplies for no-deal Brexit  
Corbyn Twitter as depressing as Brexit and Trump Twitter. Don't know why I do it to myself. We're screwed. 
Anyone else think UKG don't give a damn about NI? Flippancy with which they discuss impact of Brexit on NI, contempt with which they discuss border as if it's a manufactured crisis.We've been through hell here & we'll be damned if your feckless Brexit is going to jeopardise it 
Tim Martin has his say on who he would have liked to have succeeded David Cameron after the referendum. There's still time to steer clear of May's disastrous plan and install a Brexiteer PM to ensure that Brexit still means Brexit! Support us at  
Boris Johnson resignation speech has lit a fire under the wet Mrs May. With Boris brexit really would mean brexit & the insults and humiliation leveled at us by the EU would cease immediately. May is a remainer. She cannot provide brexit, she can't, she doesn't believe in it. 
To deliver a green Brexit the Government must bring forward new ambitious environmental legislation to give nature the best chance of recovery. You can help here:  #NatureLaws 
There are a minority unhappy - you can generally recognise them by the #FBPE in their Twitter name. The majority accept the result and want to get on with leaving. The electorate was exactly the same as allowed to vote in any referendum or GE. We never got a say on EU membership. 
“Prepare for food rationing”I’m sure that would have been a resounding success as a referendum slogan.  
Result of the referendum means:Food shortagesNo medical scansNo flights50 mile queues at Dover2,800,000 jobs lostIndustries relocate to EUThat's our plan. You voted for it.  
Gone from 91k to 93k within last 25 minutes....... banking on 100k by the end of play tonight! #CrookedVoteLeave 
I also voted leave. I was wrong. I voted leave as a starting point for true reform of this countries institutions and voting system. I thought brexit would give us a clean slate. I was never happy with the right wing leave leadership. I am also now a remainer. 
Many in Westminster wonder if the only way to break the Brexit deadlock may be to send the matter back to the people  
“At what point was it decided that Brexit means Remain?” - Andrea Jenkyns. #Revive 
“So Brexit now looks as geo-politically reckless as it is economically reckless. There is a serious and growing case against Brexit on national security grounds as well as economic ones.”The ever-brilliant and perceptive @chrisgreybrexit 
So busy day in London - got Theresa briefed for her trip to Northern Ireland - now she wants help with Brexit!  
Airbus activates Brexit contingency plans - Reuters  
You do realise people in Scotland no longer trust or believe you. So either get on board supporting independence and help get us out of Brexit UK or face complete destruction of your party.  
Taoiseach @campaignforleo says he won't let UK planes fly over Ireland in the event of a "hard Brexit".Hope he likes going on holiday to Lanzarotte because he's going to have trouble flying anywhere else.  
Update, just finished a 15 hour day, the reason being I’ve just invested In new machinery and the upheaval has put us behind.Now sitting, eating my tea only to see May will inform us how to deal with a no deal Brexit.@theresa_may you are a disgrace, we need a #PeoplesVote 
My point at Liaison Committee today was that Govt  needs to publish a plain English account of the consequences for individuals & families of a no deal, walk-away Brexit, the contingency planning & the costs.  
Andrea Jenkyns: At What Point Was It Decided Brexit Meant Remain?  
"The result in favour of #Brexit was obtained, at least in part, by breaching electoral law. It cannot be allowed to stand - another vote now essential," says Scottish Brexit minister following #VoteLeave revelations 
John Major on the clear case for why we must have a #peoplesvote with an #stopbrexit option. So accurate.And in the second half he makes a point about how leave voters will realise the reality of brexit and change their minds, many already have and said I'm a #RemainerNow 
Raab to flood businesses with ‘no-deal’ Brexit advice  
'If the people have voted for pigs to fly, there's not a lot of point in asking MPs to stay behind at Westminster & work out how pigs are going to fly because we know they aren't.' Excellent by Matthew Parris on #c4news #Brexit 
Project fear is now project reality - you cant say we didnt tell you - now you need to prepare for stockpiling and rationing (the content of 70 technical notices) we are going  to be hit hard by brexit - but you leavers knew this didnt you 
SCOT goes POP!An independence referendum looks ever more inevitable tonight as Tory rebels FAIL to vote down a hard Brexit 
There should be a condition attached to the referendum: if you vote "No" to opening P&M then you have to spend a day on a wheelchair navigating the underground and the next closest intersections. Oh, and the elevator may or may not be working.  #wpgpoli #wpg18 
I think it will be 50/50 chance of civil war. Cliff edge Brexit is inevitable. Depends how long it takes for UK to collapse; and how long it takes to rehabilitate UK. The Union is dead. Scotland will be independent in 5 years. Ireland will reunify in 10. 
This is just threatening a punishment Brexit unless UK gives in the the Brussels bullying. 
A Passionate, measured and articulate speech by @BorisJohnson today in the Commons. I agree with his view on #Brexit  
91,172 signatures.What are you waiting for? 
Prof Roland Alter: "Britain extricating itself from the European Union is more complex than the first moon landing, with the key difference being that the USA was aware of the complexity of its undertaking whereas Britain was patently oblivious"...... 
‘Taking back control’ goes beyond Brexit - it’s about giving power BACK to communities and the people.Bringing railways, water and energy back into public ownership to benefit US is really taking back control.People powered politics. 
The LADYBIRD BOOK of NOBBLING DEMOCRACY.Part of the 'Learning to Live with #Brexit' series.#LadybirdBrexit #FBPE 
Pump out a few more Union Jack tins for the Brexit market, it'll be fine.  
Our political class is DETERMINED to ruin Britain. The referendum was an advisory referendum and an illegitimate one at that, but that doesn’t stop the brainless fuckwits from doing their worst. Their motivation is perplexing, but they do STUPID brilliantly. 
This is going well. 100K by tonight.Will Brexit benefit the UK? If you think it won’t, you might want to sign this petition. If you think democracy in the UK is at risk, you might want to sign this petition. I want to #stopbrexit#FBPE 
The Guardian view on who governs Britain: amid Brexit chaos, we ought to know | Editorial  
Starting to look like there might be a Brexit Dividend.With no food to eat I might once again fit into all those clothes that the Trouser fairy insists on shrinking!#optimism 
Airbus CEO tells Farnborough he's activating his Brexit contingency plans after the British gov's plan for leaving the bloc appeared to be "unraveling." The antics of Johnson, Davis, Rees Mogg, 4 Labour MPs sending a global signal UK heading for Brexit chaos @emmarossthomas 
As Brexit uncertainty continues @CliveBull asks: would you be in favour of a cross-party government of national unity? 
To re-cap: so far we have announced 4 speakers for the Great Northern Stop #Brexit Conference:Eloise Todd, CEO, Best for BritainRichard Corbett, Labour MEPNatalie Bennett, former Leader of the Green PartyFemi Oluwole, campaigner with OFOC!Keep following for announcements!  
I was worried about freedom of movement. I was dismayed at the hit to jobs. I was upset at the growing racism. But now *cheese* is impacted?! YOU’VE GONE TOO FAR, BREXIT.  
John Mann MP wants a frictionless Brexit trade deal, out of customs union and out of single market. ‘That’s what people voted for’. People could vote for sun to shine everyday, doesn’t mean it will 
buffoon Boris Johnson was in favour of staying in Europe until he fancied David Cameron,s job & now wants Theresa May's job. #c4news #Brexit #BrexitShambles 
#BorisMeansBrexit - #BorisJohnson must be our next Prime Minister. #MayMustGoNow for betraying Britain on #Brexit Please support this petition by signing and retweeting as widely as possible. #Brexit #andreajenkyns #FarageOnLBC @lbc 
Advertising works. If it didn't companies wouldn't invest in it.£675K buys a lot of influence. Digitally this represents millions of targeted ads.All political parties know this. and so did the Leave campaign.#anulltheref #FBPE #StopBrexit #brexit 
The UK is fucked.. And that my friends is the bottom line! #Brexit 
Proud and pleased that Liverpool City Council has voted overwhelmingly by 68 votes to 2 to back a #PeoplesVote to give citizens the final say on any #Brexit deal. 
Its ard for us Yorkshire folk cos when we hear certain words it means summat else...EU - "Hey You!"Brexit - "Breaks It"Teresa May - "Pillock" 
Irish leaders signal frustration at shifting UK stance on Brexit - Tough shot guys! Maybe if u had assisted rather than obstructed u would be in a better place now - good luck!  
Petition: Rescind Art.50 if Vote Leave has broken Electoral Laws regarding 2016 referendum  
It is a depressing irony that most of those supporting #Brexit in the hope of giving Britain more sovereignty, are backing politicians who want to hand most of Britain's sovereignty over to kleptocrats bearing no loyalty to any nation. #StopBrexit #PeoplesVote 
Leave broke the law. The very fabric of our democratic system. The same democracy that they hold so precious and love to shout about.If you truly want democracy then you will accept that the result is unsound.Respect democracy. Null the ref.#FBPE #StopBrexit #brexit 
Well done citizen. You have a full house in Brexit bingo.  
The Commons has approved the membership of the new European Statutory Instruments Committee which will scrutinise secondary legislation related to #Brexit. It is the first gender-balanced committee.  
In the warped minds of Brexit fanatics, Boris is their Churchill. In the eyes of the rest of the world, he is a clown. 
| Theresa May's Chequers deal is a total betrayal of our historic vote to leave the European Union. Help us to keep fighting for a true Brexit!  
STOP WHAT YOU ARE TWITTERING!! Sign this and Share - SAVE OUR DEMOCRACY!! and #STOPBREXITPetition: Rescind Art.50 if Vote Leave has broken Electoral Laws regarding 2016 referendum  
Brexit: 1,000 new customs officers and vets for Irish ports  
IF YOU HAVE SIGNED THERescind Article 50 IF #VoteLeave has broken Electoral Laws regarding 2016 referendum Petitionand as #VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw,perhaps you would also CONSIDER SIGNING the #PEOPLESvotePETITIONPlease SIGN & please REPEATEDLY RETWEET. 
All the claims that Remainers made against Brexit to no avail with voters during the referendum have been made against Brexit inside Government for the past two years, where they have been permitted to prevail. I still can't believe Tory MPs are going to let May get away with it. 
Just the ‘yikes’ in this should get this prat the sack.It’s not a nuclear winter, numpty.No-deal Brexit would be the best thing that ever happened to Britain and European nations.  
My 13 year daughter has Type 1 diabetes - should I start stock piling her insulin?  This is terrifying.  Brexit is terrifying.#indyref2 #DissolvetheUnion 
Andrew Mitchell(Tory) - No deal will threaten our levels of growth & risk the living standards & prospects of our constituents. The Conservative Party owns the #brexit process and will be held to account for no deal!#StopBrexit #FBPE 
The Leave Campaign broke electoral law. The so called "will of the people" does not exist. The advisory EU Referendum is fundamentally flawed, the decision to activate Article 50 was yours alone and Brexit is a political ruse by your Party, not in the national interest. 
One of the weirdest things about Brexit is how people think Jacob Rees Mogg has their interests in mind.If you showed up at his house after a car accident he’d ask his nanny if you were his butler before he asked his servant to release the hounds.  
Putin's over the top claim @Billbrowder gave $400M to Clinton, and openly admitting Russia invaded Crimea by holding a "referendum" there according to "international standards" reminds that like Trump -- to quote Merkel -- Putin "lives in another world."  
Bob Moran on Theresa May and  criticism of her Brexit white paper - Political Cartoon Gallery in Putney  
Both Vote Leave and Leave EU broke the law during the Brexit referendum. They cheated in multiple ways, including overspending by 10%. The margin of victory for Leave was only 2%. We cannot base a major constitutional change on such an unsafe vote.  
Thanks to the 3rd Duke of Richmond-a supporter of the Americans fight for independence-a newly discovered copy of our Declaration of Independence has been found preserved in Chichester W. Sussex archives! Thank you ⁦@Stephljones1970⁩ #Brexit  
.@BBCNewsnight, why are you giving a platform to extremists? The reason this country is in such a mess is because the media gave these idiots oxygen before the referendum.  
Amazing! Now at 86k signatures, every one of which is affirming that we will not allow our futures to be decided by crime. #PeoplesVote #Brexit #StopBrexit 
Look at the fucking state of this. The only thing you are consistent in, @theresa_may, is spouting the same tired insidious lies, even when the deceit has been blown wide open. Shove your crooked Brexit Plan and "honouring result" rhetoric, you disgusting snake.  
Absolutely true..... while MP's obsessively fight to either overturn #Brexit or try to deliver #Brexit, our servicemen are giving up their fight for life through lack of support, resources and commitment from the Government.  
Taoiseach warns hard Brexit grounds international flights from UK:“If they want their planes to fly over our skies, they would need to take that into account. You can’t have your cake and eat it. You can’t take back your waters and then expect to take back other people’s sky.”  
It is 'not too late' to save #Brexit.@BorisJohnson 
This week's #Brexit kerfuffle made me think: when was the last time this government did anything that was competent, successful, kind, useful, or improved lives of ordinary people.And honestly, without any party political bias... I can't think of a thing. Not one. Can you? 
The new Brexit plan is "Let's not and say we did."The longer this farce goes on, the more clear it is that Brexit was about feelings. Leavers don't actually want to leave, they want the benefits of union but the ego of an empire.  
Everyone needs to read this. This is what Rees-Mogg was fed as a child. It’s truly shocking what these Brexiteers are seeking to do , once they have got rid of the safeguarding EU. Retweet urgently. Stop Brexit. #FBPE 
Boris Johnson’s vision for Brexit would never have worked – his resignation speech proved that  
I am no political strategist, but striking that Right of the Labour Party choose to attack their leader at the very time Tories are in greatest disarray. Previously it was day after referendum. 
70 notices to go out in Aug and Sept to prepare businesses and people for a hard Brexit. This is what May and her cohorts have been working on instead of negotiating for a deal with the EU. Their aim has always been to leave with no deal. The rest was just window dressing. 
Theresa May at the Liaison Committee was asked about the European Health Card and the possibility of grounded aircraft if the Rees-Mogg's get their no deal #Brexit, she didn't have a clue, think about that, not a clue, she must go #GE2018Now and Parliament must suspend Article 50 
Radioisotopes generally have a short half life & cannot be stored for long. You cannot stockpile flights, which cease in the event of a no-deal Brexit. Food runs out in days in Cornwall & Scotland. In weeks we run out of fuel. JiT manufacturing dies. #StopBrexit #PeoplesVote 
I understand that @theSNP is trying to keep its #DissolvetheUnion powder dry, but they’re going to have to very careful that the rapidly rising #Brexit floodwaters don’t soak it before it can be ignited. 
So may is right now denying she showed the Brexit plan to Merkell before ministers, but the same ministers were outraged as Theresa May ‘told Ministers Brexit plan can’t be changed as Angela Merkel cleared it BEFORE Chequers’So which is It  @theresa_may It can't be both 
PM Boris on the horizon. Trident being renewed. Child poverty rising. The rape clause. Universal credit. Brexit. Are we waiting for this Eton mess to invade Scotland before we realise we need to call a new independence referendum right now? #ScotRef 
BREAKING: Taoiseach @campaignforleo has said Ireland will hire 1,000 new customs & veterinary inspectors to prepare our ports and airports for #Brexit .  
Brexit: New move to keep EU citizenship for UK nationals  
 It's been over 750 days since the EU Referendum and Ruth Davidson is still flip flopping on Brexit. Here are just a few times.  
Brexit: Where we are at:- Government impact assessment reports on a ‘No Deal’ Brexit indicate an economic decline greater than the Great Depression of 1931.- The Government have taken 2 years to create an unworkable plan that will be rejected by the EU.It’s a total mess. 
To ensure @MDCPS has necessary resources for continued success, Board approves resolution for referendum to be held on Nov. 6, seeking public approval to levy ad valorem assessment to improve compensation for teachers & instructional staff, increase school safety/security staff.  
Our ⁦@Adamstoon1⁩ ⁦@EveningStandard⁩ on the Brexit votes  
Change whether good or bad means a buy or a sell and that means a commission and a percentage for people buying and selling funds, hedges, etc...this is why brexit was mooted not for independence but for the market turmoil that generates cash from nowt. 
'It's not too late to save Brexit,' Johnson tells UK parliament  
Today our Chair @normanlamb questioned the PM on future immigration rules to support science and innovation after Brexit. We've been told repeatedly that 'people' is the biggest Brexit issue for research. Tomorrow we're publishing our report with our own proposals on this.  
‘Save Brexit’? No – Boris Johnson’s speech was about saving himself | Anne Perkins  
Dana Rohrabacher is the US Congressman linked to Maria Butina, arrested by the FBI for being a Russian agent.Rohrabacher is a big supporter of Brexit.Here's a picture of him (left) with one of his British friends (right).  
OMG! This is the edited down end clip of Yvette Cooper trying so many times to get a straight answer from Theresa May to a simple #Brexit question. She got nothing but flim flam, gobbledygook and Trump levels of delusion.There is NO TORY #BREXIT PLAN we urgently need #GE2018Now 
Proposal for new law, ideally passed next week: anyone talking about *why* their particular brand of Brexit would be so amazing has to devote exactly same amount of time explaining *how* it could realistically happen. Applies in the Commons, in pubs, on social media, everywhere. 
So I want to see your detailed plans for Hard Brexit, written down, subjected to intense scrutiny and then AND ONLY THEN, can we chat further. Now get on with it. 
Only an imbecile would want to save something so utterly stupid. 'It's not too late to save Brexit,' Boris Johnson declares in explosive resignation statement - Sky News  
Because rolling your eyes and saying “We must deliver Brexit” is like me waving my hand over a meadow and saying “Yes, there needs to be a house there” without having any understanding of how to build the house or whether the meadow is on a flood plain etc etc to fade. 
I am going to bang on about this until someone does it. Hard Brexiters - You want to leave the SM and CU, clean break Brexit. Super. Now let’s see your homework. 
And so it came to pass...The EU is issuing emergency guidelines to all member states to immediately step up preparations for Britain’s ‘No Deal’ Brexit. Buckle up people. It’s going to be a long and bumpy ride. 
Apparently the UK voted for something so damaging that it will require the government to send out 70 'technical notices' to businesses and households - something you'd expect during wartime.Even if the risk of no-deal were small (it isn't), it would be reason to cancel Brexit. 
It is interesting how even Johnson's most fervent supporters aren't saying this was a bid to be leader. This was the speech of a man who gives up on everything - and who has given up now on believing Brexit could ever be made to work.  via 
Johnson assumes that there will definitely be a post-Brexit transition period. But this depends on the ratification of the withdrawal agreement, unless the EU and UK agree to such a period separately (which is hardly certain). He's being either ignorant or deceptive.  
Theresa May pre-referendum warned of Britain becoming a "safe haven for European criminals" outside European warrant, risking law abiding citizens lives. Her EU white paper doesnt commit to keep us in post-Brexit so I asked her about this mismatch and got nothing concrete back.  
Boris: After 18 months of stealthy retreat..."Mr Speaker, it is NOT too late to save Brexit.We HAVE time in these negotiations.We HAVE changed tack once AND we CAN change again!#Brexit #Leave #EU via @GuidoFawkes 
These incompetents can’t work out the terms of a withdrawal bill that’s simple a trade deal is far more complex. We appear to be being led by donkeys. Proud & stupid donkeys. They don’t have the intellectual power to grasp that Brexit kills the GFA , so how can they manage a SOE? 
John Redwood MP - "We must have that freedom make our own trade agreements and our ability to settle our own laws and spend our own money."The British public would expect no less from this Parliament. They will not accept higgling of their decision to leave the EU.” #Brexit  
Downing Street's latest pronouncement is there won't be a #PeoplesVote -- at the end of the Brexit talks. In fact, it is increasingly likely that there will be one  Sign the petition here: 
WATCH: @Keir_Starmer on why the Tories are letting down the country over their handling of the Brexit negotiations.  
An allegory for Brexit. Left standing outside the room where others will decide your fate with nothing at all to say.  
Would you prefer to know what was going on with Brexit at every stage, or to only hear about it once complete? All Brits: 47% every stage, 39% once completeLeave: 40% every stage, 47% once completeRemain: 59% every stage, 29% once complete 
Former Brexit Minister @SteveBakerHW: "People must face up to the difficult truth that a Brexit which requires high alignment to the EU will not go through the Commons, it will fail"  
Seriously brilliant, highly analytical, highly intelligent, comprehensive analysis of the many failings of the Government's Brexit white paper by @Keir_Starmer if only he was leading our negotiations. It is a genuine pleasure to work for him. @UKLabour #TeamLabour #Brexit 
Arrived at Liverpool town hall for full council meeting. Here’s @Andrew_Adonis addressing the chamber in support of @mayor_anderson call for a People’s Vote on Brexit  
Local volunteers will be handing out leaflets in #Walsall this Saturday calling for a #peoplesvote on the final Brexit deal. In an area that voted 68% to leave it is important that we are engaging with people here on Brexit. Can you spare an hour to help? 
Just read Boris's speech. He is truly  correct in what he says. He outlines Mrs May's migration from Brexit support to EU colony with great accuracy. He knows what the majority want and has the courage to deliver it. If no one else comes forward he is defo the one to replace May. 
So I've made an @ft video about Labour's Brexit position and whether activists will be able to push Corbyn into backing a second referendum 
Steve Baker just stated in Parl re ministerial debates that if the Govt accepted an EEA Lite option it would damage the Tory Party.ME: There we have it...the priority for this #Brexit madness is not the Ppl, is not the Country, is not the Economy but the Tory Party. QED#Remain 
No such thing as "hard Brexit". There has only ever been Leave or Remain. We voted to Leave. 
Want to know how well #walkaway  campaign is working? The left are now blaming Putin and the Russians.  This is Trump/brexit level of success. The leftists have no answer so they blame Russia.  Just #WalkAway from these leftist idiots. 
A genuine soft Brexit would obviously be less damaging than a Hard Brexit, though it would highlight the ‘what's the point’ nature of this choice. But this Brexit is just mush.Tony Blair on why the 'Inbetweener' solution should be rejected →  
Do you use experts for anything? What do they all say about brexit? Oh, and hard brexit means no flights, good luck getting back 
‘Save Brexit’? No – Boris Johnson’s speech was about saving himself | Anne Perkins  
Even the prospect of these notices should mean an end to Brexit. Nobody voted with stockpiling food or the risk of business grinding to a halt in mind. These notices will leave millions worried and fearful and firms will relocate never to return. It's a disgrace.#PeoplesVote 
Campaigners for a #PeoplesVote hit the streets of Monmouth to show why it is important the public have a #PeoplesVote on the final #Brexit deal:  
As I always say, Brexit proved that the British Constitution works only if you don't use it. 
Why won't I accept soft Brexit?I want to keep our influence in EuropeI don't want to have less control than EU countriesI don't want another 10yrs of debates on lost sovereigntyI want to us able to focus on fixing the UK problems that made people vote Brexit 
"It is not too late to save Brexit."Former foreign secretary Boris Johnson, who quit the cabinet over Theresa May's EU policy, makes his resignation speech to the Commons.  
So, Treason May insists that Brexit must be 'workable'.That's fine, as WTO terms are 'workable'.Indeed, proof can be found all over the world. 
.@Theresa_May’s #Brexit relief won’t last long – the clock is still ticking towards catastrophic rupture  
Great! Let's start with the large and substantial dossier detailing the coordinated and substantial collusion between the remain campaigns which resulted in them overspending. It was presented to our biased and unfit for purpose @ElectoralCommUK refused to investigate #brexit  
Putin meant “THEY” not “WE held the [Crimea] referendum in strict compliance with international law and the UN Charter.“  via @meduzaproject 
Today I asked @theresa_may about the importance of science collaboration with the EU after #Brexit, including the issue of skilled workers. Govt. needs to ensure we have an immigration system in place that enables us to get the best people to work in this country.  
Dear God; They Caught Them ALL! #Putin Gives #Trump 160 Terabytes of Communication Intercepts; ALL people behind fake "#Russia Collusion" - #FalseFlag Chemical Attacks in #Syria, Sabotage of $Brexit, Nefarious #Clinton activities & More#GreatAwakening 
One of the great cons of Brexit is UKGov continuing to act as if it is something being done to us. It isn't. UKGov and Parliament can choose to stop it at any time. Instead they march us towards a no deal Brexit they know is disastrous as if it is out of their control.  
Remainer Tory MP claims Britons need SECOND referendum to break the #Brexit stalemate Remainers have run out of options, so they are now behaving like the EU in saying 'let's force the people to vote again until they deliver the right answer' 
Boris reportedly in resignation speech now elevates his preferred hard Brexit to the level of an item of religious faith!  
Brexit. The time when a plucky band of insurance tycoons, bankers, Oxbridge alumni, political commentariat, and career politicians stuck it to the establishment.  
There is no point doing a thread deconstructing the Boris Johnson speech. The people who believe him are tribal and have no mind of their own. They are not responsive to information. #Brexit 
literally people will die from a no deal brexit.I have HIV. my medication comes from abroad. if i miss a month's worth, i will start to die. how the hell is a technical note going to save my life? 
Local volunteers will be out in #Doncaster this Saturday campaigning for a #peoplesvote on the final Brexit deal.Come along and join us and help to engage with people in your local community. 
Eye-watering €4.3bn fine on Google by EU for unfair competition. Shows the advantage of collective strength in tackling corporate abuse. If we #Brexit we will not have size of market or powerful institutions necessary to stand up to these companies.  
Just as everyone outside Donald Trump's base can see that he is an idiot. so too everyone outside Britain can see that Brexit is nonsense. Why can't MPs see it? Or the media, who are now quick to call out Trump? 
We're from different political families but I salute your indefatigable energy and courage in defying your party leadership over what you consider right which I concur with entirely namely the great Brexit deceit perpetrated on the UK electorate! 
Today at #PMQs Theresa May claimed Labour want to keep us in the Customs Union and Single Market. So all those FBPEers and Lib Dems constantly attacking me over our Brexit position, listen to Theresa. Lib Dems are experts at listening to Tories, so it shouldn’t be difficult. 
.@BorisJohnson: "To behave not as rule takers but as great independent actors on the world stage ... that was the vision of Brexit that we fought for." pic.twitter.com/seYI5C1TGq 
"On referendum night Farage twice conceded defeat live on TV. When the results came in sterling’s value collapsed, and a number of prominent pro-Brexit hedge fund managers made millions." 
BOMBSHELL.............Dear God; They Caught Them ALL! Putin Gives Trump 160 Terabytes of Communication Intercepts; ALL people behind fake "Russia Collusion" - False Flag Chemical Attacks in Syria, Sabotage of Brexit, Nefarious Clinton activities & More  
According to the government's own figures, a NO DEAL BREXIT will cost us 2.8 million jobs & £3bn per week! #StopBrexit#PeoplesVote 
Resigned from the Labour Party. The failure to properly deal with anti-semitism, coupled with an approach to Brexit that’s only a shade less shambolc than May’s, means I can no longer vote for them, let alone be a member. 
"We now need a properly organised system of proxy voting" @amcarmichaelMP in the aftermath of @joswinson losing her pairing vote last night on a key Brexit bill.  
About to address Liverpool City Council which meets in the magnificent Georgian town hall behind me, in support of ⁦@peoplesvote_uk⁩ on Brexit, alongside Mayor Joe Anderson. Huge privilege pic.twitter.com/zUFIzAzJp2 
Rees-Mogg is no Tory, destroying his own party and the country. He is a fanatical extremist. It’s history repeating itself. Stop Brexit.#FBPE 
Gove has told MPs there has been a "step change" in Brexit no deal preparations since the Chequers agreement  
We currently trade with over 69 countries via multilateral deals #EU ~ who have just signed a Free Trade deal with Japan .OK, now scrap ALL those. (Hard #Brexit) Takes 2+ years to sign a trade deal.Day 1 of the 'New Global UK: Where's the food/fuel/etc coming from?#tradebill 
Wise comment from @BorisJohnson let's go back to the vision for Brexit that people want. #ChequersMeansCorbyn 
Completely delusional  & mendaciously self serving. His words will strike few if any chords in Scotland.  Moreover there is not a word of apology for the huge damage & distress that his arrogance has caused. I wouldn’t trust him to deliver the messages , let alone #Brexit  
I just asked the new Brexit Secretary Dominic Raab if he welcomes the new EU Japan trade agreement. And would guarantee the UK would continue to benefit from it. He didn’t answer.  Just waffled on about global free trade. 
BBC decisions from Brexit to Cliff Richard taken for shallow reasons..we need a scoop..we got Savile wrong so won't block Cliff scoop...Help-Mail is attacking us over Brexit...No depth of thinking about journalism within constraints of a publicly funded body since John Birt era. 
Petition: Rescind Art.50 if Vote Leave has broken Electoral Laws regarding 2016 referendum  
A reality check: Leave spent £13.5 million. Remain spent £19 million. That's not including the £9 million the government spent of taxpayers’ money on their pro-remain booklet. So take the biased Electoral Commission with a VERY large pinch of salt #Brexit #Leave 
Boris Johnson attacks May's 'miserable' Brexit plan in resignation speech  
Prime Minister @theresa_may refuses to agree to let the public know what a ‘No Deal’ really means. 3x she was asked by @sarahwollaston who said the public needs to know so they understand. Typical TM, 3x she ignored & waffled on meaning No, sod the public. #Brexit Disgust  
Hilary Benn: Can you tell us how much the government is spending preparing for a no deal outcome?Theresa May: The treasury has set aside £3bn over 2 years...Just imagine what we could do with all that money if we weren't having to implement the catastrophe known as #brexit  
'@BorisJohnson for Brexit PM?Westmonster visited BoJo's constituency today to ask his constituents what they thought of him potentially challenging May.FULL VIDEO HERE: #RunBorisRun 
"Rescind Art.50 if Vote Leave has broken Electoral Laws regarding 2016 referendum"Now on >75,000... and rocketing up. Let's get this to 100,000 asap. Sign and share, share, share.  
I'm backing @darrenpjones's call for a full public inquiry into illegality in the Brexit referendum, so we can ensure that we learn the lessons and reform our electoral system to protect our democracy in the future.  
Tax Avoidance Rules come into force 2019.I know that's a good thing for most people, but it's bad for the Brexit leaders. 
Not a single Scottish Tory on the list. Weren’t Scottish Tories heralded as harbingers of ‘soft Brexit’ last June?  
“Will of the people”.Brexit is failing. It’s doing immense damage to our country, politics and reputation around the world. It doesn’t have to be like this. Put this process to the test of public opinion.#PeoplesVote 
We're hiring! Frustrated by the UKgov and their #Brexit shambles? Come and work with our fantastic press team  
Friends! Fuming!Our Opposition had a huge chance to defeat the govt, yet these MPs scuppered it, on the utterly flimsy grounds that in last year's election Labour had promised to uphold the referendum result and take Britain out of the customs union!Talk about total betrayal!  
Brexit voters can save Brexit by switching support to UKIP (even temporarily). Push the UKIP poll number well into double figures at Tory expense and Tories will dump May and install a proper Leave PM. You have the power, so I suggest you use it folks. 
Watch: Boris Johnson's resignation speech: "It is not too late to save Brexit"  
WATCH @BorisJohnson's personal statement to the Commons this afternoon. A tour de force. "It's not too late to save Brexit".  
"It is not too late to save #Brexit."In his resignation speech, Boris Johnson accused Theresa May of "dithering" over the UK's strategy for leaving the EU  
 Brexit.  
As I have told you, I will not commit (as an ex #Brexit voter) to voting #Labour unless you support a #PeoplesVote in which I would now vote #Remain We need to escape this brexit madness . I live in a Labour held marginal.  
If TM does this and the notices are in any way honest then brexit is dead. The People will be genuinely astonished.The idea that the gov accepts it will be so bad that households need to prepare is *insane*! 
Sign it. Seal it. Deliver it. And gimme a RT sisters and brothers. Petition: Rescind Art.50 if Vote Leave has broken Electoral Laws regarding 2016 referendum  
Just watching @theresa_may giving evidence to the Commons committee.Nobody seems to care that referendum result was illegal.Every word she says ties her to her determination carry out an illegal act.The #SupremeCourt should now step in and declare the referendum result void 
Redsky, Nama, RHI, Brexit, Sri Lankan holidays;  Carlsberg don't do political scandal, but if they did...they'd probably be the DUP. 
FULL TEXT: Boris Johnson resignation speech -  "It is not too late to save Brexit" 
So Boris made a substantial speech, deliberately shorn of rhetorical fireworks but nailing the Chequers approach as a disaster and Brexit in name only. Interesting to see where Tories go from here. He owns the idea of true Brexit so far as it still exists in the Tory party. 
The hectic #Brexit events of this past week raise big Qs for NI/IRL.Here @DPhinnemore & I  assess the state of play re: #WhitePaper, #CustomsBill, & #backstop for @BorderIrish.  In sum: ERG amendments have killed neither the White Paper nor a backstop. 
Boris’s Brexit resignation speech was not “stinging” nor “brutal” as the sensational headlines suggest. It was a decent reminder of how far we have strayed from Brexit. But not a rallying cry.  
.@theresa_may says 70 "technical notices" for businesses and households will be published in Aug and Sept setting out how we can all prepare for a no-deal Brexit (should that be what happens). Yikes 
Friends, I don't want to be immodest, but I would like to note that the former Secretary of State acknowledges in his resignation speech that I have buggered up Brexit for him. I'd like to thank him for his honesty in saying so. It's unborderly to gloat but hahahahahahaha  
We asked British citizens living in the EU what they think of the Brexit negotiations so far - this is what they said...Read more on the latest #Brexit fallout here:  
Boris Johnson is right: there is still time to change tack in our Brexit negotiations and deliver a deal that takes back control of our money, trade, borders and laws.  
WATCH: Former PM Sir John Major outlines the strong case for a #PeoplesVote on the final #Brexit deal  
Boris Johnson has described Theresa May’s plan for leaving the EU as “miserable permanent limbo” as he insisted it’s “not too late to save Brexit”  
Andrea Jenkyns asked the key question at PMQs today: ‘When did Brexit come to mean Remain?’ The Tories will rue the day May allowed this to happen. Fate will not be kind to them. 
We are in this mess because HMG has never been honest with us about the consequences of different Brexit scenarios.  No red lines but should have been laid down. The public should have been shown the impact studies to enable informed, consultative decision making.  
As he leaves the front benches, Boris Johnson has offered his wisdom on how to make Brexit a success:  "Believe in this country and what it can do." - so there we have it, if we believe hard enough then everything will be alright... Thanks Boris...for the UK's destruction!!  
Just been in the House of Commons chamber to hear a brilliant personal statement by @BorisJohnson following his resignation as Foreign Secretary, outlining why Britain must now have the self confidence as a nation to complete a true BREXIT the British people voted for!  
I believe a second brexit referendum is very necessary 
"I'm a charlatan, who put personal ambition ahead of the prosperity of our nation, by campaigning for Brexit.Brexit is now going tits-up, so I'm scarpering, like a rat deserting a sinking ship. I will now sit on the backbenches, blaming everyone else for the disaster I created"  
One thing has become crystal clear over the past ten days. The Brexiteers have no plan for Brexit. They have slogans. They have sweeping rhetoric. But they no plan. 
So @RuthDavidsonMSP do you agree with Ross' obvious agreement with Boris Johnson ? Is this now your policy for Scotland - who voted 62% Remain - as well ?How can voting WITH the UKGovt on their hard Brexit plans be standing up for Scotland for your Scots tories ? Hmmmmmm ??  
Boris demolishes May's #Brexit shambles“Let us aim again explicitly for that glorious vision of Lancaster House, not the miserable, permanent limbo of Chequers.” 
#Boris resignation speech simply sought to put him ahead of JRM & DD as captain of the NoDeal #Brexit team. Staggering failure to accept complexity &detail of Brexit, given his ringside seat for 2 years. Having left his own job - his proposed Brexit would see 1000s lose theirs. 
Discredited prime minister John Major is now calling for a second referendum. Perennially useless Sir Nicholas Soames wants a government of national unity. Remainers will accept anything except the implementation of the will of the people. 
Repetitious tripe in @BorisJohnson ‘s resignation speech. Literally nothing new. Vacant exhortations glorious future etc. Complains Govt didn’t turn Brexit into workable plan. But it’s impossible-Boris sold UK a fantasy he never expected to deliver. And he still has no idea how 
"We should not be stampeded by anyone" - @BorisJohnson tells parliament in his resignation speech that the government 'should believe in Britain'Follow that latest #Brexit fallout here:  
If you’re passing Parliament tell Steve the great anti-Brexit protester he is all over the Wall St Journal today  
Boris Johnson desperately trying to save his reputation. He had a political lifetime to prepare for Brexit, spent two years in one of the most powerful Govt jobs and has delivered nothing except a shambolic mess that the UK Govt tells us will cost jobs. 
The definition of a Dog's Brexit: Theresa May's current predicament (that she worked hard to engineer); ie lacking a parliamentary majority for her Brexit strategy, indeed for ANY Brexit strategy (including  Brexit's reversal) 
Former Foreign Secretary, @BorisJohnson: “It’s not too late to save Brexit”  
When Boris says "it is not too late to save Brexit", he is putting Theresa May on warning - go back to Lancaster House, or I'll challenge you (and he knows she won't). 
"It is not too late to save Brexit"Former foreign secretary Boris Johnson says government has time to change its position on #Brexit talks  
Boris has in effect just put the May-Robbins Soft-Remain (non)-Brexit Chequers Plan through the shredder and then burnt the pieces.Good. 
Historic and excellent  personal statement from @BorisJohnson - There is still time to save #Brexit if the PM can hold to the pledges she made at Lancaster House. Absolutely spot on. #GlobalBritain  
"The UK's admirers across the world" don't believe in Boris Johnson's unicorn Brexit. They mourn Britain's withdrawal from the EU and see him as the symbol of a country that has badly lost its way. It's those who want a poorer, weaker Britain who are cheering. 
BORIS: Not too late to save Brexit, we must believe in our country. Hammers government on ‘stealthy retreat, fog of self-doubt, volunteering for economic vassalage.’“We will not get another chance to get it right.” 
In #PMQs, Boris Johnson just confirmed that he and the Conservative Party want Brexit so they can get rid of the EU's protections on social/workers' rights.  
High quality, measured speech by Boris, designed not to cause chaos but get Brexit - the Brexit which the public voted for and expect to be delivered - back on track. 
"In the 18 months that have followed it is like a fog of self doubt has descended"Former foreign secretary Boris Johnson says government never turned Theresa May's Lancaster House vision of #Brexit into a negotiating position  
Ouch -  'it is not tht we failed to make the case for a Free Trade agreement, ...we haven't even tried' - 'it is not too late to save Brexit = we have time' 
Sitting listening here, Boris Johnston seems to completely have no use of self reflection, repose or indeed regret for his wrecking behaviours from Vote Leave to leaving the Foreign Office.  This is no valedictory speech but an admission of failure with a No Deal #brexit 
Johnson suggests it is Brexit in name only, and govt is 'saying one thing to the EU about what we are really doing and pretending another to the electorate' 
My friend Saveed Miliband (Ed's Indian cousin) has made an important correction to Jonathan Freedland's article in the Guardian, 'A national unity government? A second referendum is more likely'.I reproduce his comment here, as I gather that not all of you read Our Guardian.  
Great to hear @BorisJohnson making such a strong case against Brexit. 
"The pound soared" after the Brexit vote says @BorisJohnson. Stop lying. 
“Three cheers for Kate Hoey and Labour’s other Brexit rebels. In voting against keeping Britain in a customs union they have stood up for the will of the people. The abuse they’re now getting from Corbynistas is shameful.”Brendan O’Neill in @spectator 
"We allowed the issue of the  Irish border to dominate the Brexit talks," says the ridiculous @BorisJohnson who is also claiming that he had made "technical solutions" that would solve the Irish border issue that "weren't even considered."Shame on you. 
Exactly right @BorisJohnson - there was huge support for PM when she set out our brexit plans at Lancaster House. That’s where we need to be. 
Resignation statement of @BorisJohnson deep in denial of reality of situation regarding Irish border & Good Friday agreement #Brexit 
In his personal statement, @BorisJohnson makes it clear that Global Britain has always been about leaving the Customs Union and Single Market as well as making our own trade deals. He makes it clear that the PM is not fully delivering Brexit. 
The exact antithesis to the vote in the U.K. Parliament yesterday designed to keep U.K. citizens in the dark. #Brexit  
While we're at it, lets have a referendum on building a real transit system with reliable, accessible and affordable service.  #wpgpoli 
Isn’t it funny how so many metropolitan commentators suggested Scottish Indy supporters were crazed lunatics to think the media were unhealthily biased but they now denounce the media as biased over Brexit. Shoe. On. Other. Foot. 
BREAKING: @RuthDavidsonMSP has just announced that she meant to say we are NOT being sold a lie. Apparently #Brexit is awesome and we should embrace it.#BrexitShambles 
Did the extra money used by the Vote Leave campaign make a difference to the #Brexit referendum outcome? Professor John Curtice of @UniStrathclyde gives @BBCPM his thoughts. 
Whether as part of the European Roundtable of Industrialists, or by speaking out individually, all of these businesses have warned the government against a hard Brexit and for barrier-free access to Europe. We need to stay in the Customs Union and Single Market.  
Should the Scottish Parliament be recalled for an emergency sitting given the extraordinary nature of the situation at Westminster with respect to Brexit? 
The “30 sitting days” suspension for Ian Paisley MP means he won’t be allowed to vote from Sept 4 until into November. That could prove disastrous for Theresa May’s Brexit plans, which depends on all 10 DUP votes in Parliament. 
Two in three Scots would rather stay in the EU than accept a no-deal Brexit, poll   
Twice last week, Donald Trump told a vivid story about how he had spoken to reporters at his golf course in Scotland the day before the Brexit vote in 2016 and correctly predicted the outcome. None of this happened.  
Looking forward to doing a great trade deal with the UK post Brexit!  
No deal Brexit looks more likely than ever, says @LeanneWood. We have twice asked @fmwales what @WelshGovernment is doing to put plans in place in the case of a no deal Brexit and twice he has said there are no plans in place.  
Electoral Commission: the official Leave campaign is guilty of a serious breach of referendum funding rules. Don’t forget: that the separate pro-Brexit campaign group, , has already been fined £70,000 for exceeding its spending limit in the 2016 campaign 
Whomst can speak for karma BUT Darren Grimes, the twerp who stole my art to use as Brexit propaganda while claiming it was his own has been fined £20k AND faces police investigation, for his ~other~ well-considered life choices.   
This a shocking indictment of what havoc the ‘Tory civil war’ is wreaking on our country: “Airbus says activating Brexit contingency plans as UK strategy 'unravelling' - Reuters  
France and Germany gang up on Brussels to REJECT EU budget cuts left by Brexit blackhole  
Now that Corbyn is (rightly; & at last!) challenging May over the legality of the referendum, will he come out & acknowledge it is void & Brexit must be stopped? 
Brexit: Theresa May recadre Jeremy Corbyn  
Motorbikes AND Brexit! As a result of the new Japan-EU Free Trade Agreement, Japanese motorcycles will cost 8% less in the EU (but not in the UK, post-Brexit) and EU manufacturers will get easier access to the Japanese market. From  Thanks @Mototaal 
We are THE laughing stock of the world, along with trump of course. This a play on brexit in Avignon #fbpe 
.@lolhayd changed his mind on Brexit, partly due to the work we've been doing at @OFOCBrexit. He tweeted that he's a #RemainerNow and received such abuse from Remainers that he deleted the tweet. Anyone who abuses people who put country over pride, should be ashamed of themselves 
Outstanding summary of where Brexit now stands, and future scenarios, from @KirstyS_Hughes of @SCER_eu on @FedTrust. A long read, but well worth taking the time:  
You live in Canada? It looks like you're suggesting that the British electorate should have taken your situation into consideration before voting. Also, if you've lost your life savings as a result of Brexit perhaps a responsible adult should manage the purse strings in future.  
Jeremy Corbyn: "The Brexit white paper did state that the UK is committed to membership of the EU convention on Human Rights - Is the Brexit secretary Dominic Raab signed up to that? - He's on record of saying he doesn't support the Human Rights Act"#PMQs 
If Remainers win their fight for a second referendum, they may be in for the shock of their lives, says @AVMitchell2010 
The Royal Mint produces the UK’s first £5 coins, which will become the UK’s first £3 coins after Brexit. 
The problem is large majority of Brexit voters rarely leave their towns or villages. Freedom of movement meant mixing with foreigners, something they see no value in. That is why they are happy to throw it away, it won't impact them, just us. 
Yes I'm afraid my previous sympathy and respect I held for four decades for BBC impartial and quality reporting vanished over their conduct over Brexit.  
There’s a clear parallel between what the worst of the Democrats and their allies in the MSM are currently doing re “treason” and what the worst of the Remainers did durning Brexit. False fear they don’t actually share to rouse up anger for political purposes. Unethical. 
Apparently A4 paper and duct tape costs billions...Now, I know Brexit has lowered the value of the pound but now you're just fuelling project fear... 
Leo Varadkar: “It’s not obvious that the government of Britain has the majority for any form of Brexit."For all his mouthy, 'I'm a big shot' comments he's very quiet  about publishing his assessment of the impact of Brexit on the Irish economy.PS Leo, enjoy EU corporation tax 
Jeremy Corbyn:The Transport, Trade & Brexit secretary were all members of Vote Leave campaign.They've been referred to the police by the Elec commission for refusing to cooperate.Will the PM guarantee that ministers will fully cooperate with police?#PMQs 
The only way to get freedom & independence  from the EU, is to support & vote @UKIP It's not about Brexit. It's all about Independence.There's no such thing as hard or soft independence. Just simple independence.UKIP are the Independence Party.  
VIDEO: With the British government struggling to agree how best to leave the EU, former UK Prime Minister Tony Blair calls for a new referendum on the issue, saying "the only way in the end this is going to be resolved is putting it back to the people"  
Yeah, Donnie came to the UK, criticised the way we are doing Brexit, said he might not want to trade with us, and acted rudely around the Queen. He did all this after bullying NATO members instead of negotiating with class. What a piece of garbage. 
So where is the workable Brexit plan that leaves us all better off, doesn’t crash the economy, or split up people’s families, or remove Freedom of Movement from UK citizens, and allows us to continue to work & trade as we currently do with the EU, AND replaces world trade deals?  
A big fat tory liar. Johnson big liar. Farage massive liar. May liar. Trump liar. Mog liar. All very big liars dragging country off a cliff. But I’m sure they’ll be ok and make a financial killing like Farage on referendum night.  
Dear fellow Brits, no sign that German media is slowing on the #Brexit jokes. @Jack_Blanchard_ @kate_day 
The British people should get the final say on the Brexit deal, with the option to remain in the EU. Agree? Add your name:  
Is the Brexit dream dying?  
Vote Leave broke the law. That's a fact. They cheated. They refused to co-operate and have been referred to the police. Several cabinet ministers are now implicated in a criminal conspiracy. How can we let these people run Brexit when they ran a campaign that broke the law?  
For 'Ghastly Man' translate asHonest Statesman & Democrat,unlike the Charatans who lied, deceived & cheated their way with illegal tactics to gain a deeply suspect #Brexit result.#PeoplesVote to allow a #FinalSay & a #Remain option..the only way out of this debased policy. 
John Brennan started spying on @realDonaldTrump in 2015 in conjunction with MI6 to block TRUMP who opposed NWO & BREXIT - Brennan a communist prior to joining CIA  Lisa Page who just testified Chinese jacked DNC computers (PEREZ won't allow being examined). 
"At what point it was decided that #Brexit means Remain?" @Conservatives​' @andreajenkyns​ hits out at @theresa_may​ over her #Brexit plans which the PM responded by saying "#Brexit continues to mean #Brexit".  
2.9 million British passport holders living and working in the #EU were denied a vote in the #Referendum. The #Referendum was invalid and  illegal  
A new poll suggests Remain would defeat no-deal Brexit by 55% to 45% in three-way referendum based on first and second preference.#FBPE 
"A People’s Vote on a Brexit deal might offer ways out of this mess" says @BenPBradshaw: 
I will be supporting a motion coming forward to Council tomorrow proposing that a referendum question on the future of Portage and Main be added to the municipal election later this fall. #wpgpoli 1/3 
#PMQsJeremy Corbyn: "The Brexit white paper did state that the UK is committed to membership of the EU convention on Human Rights - Is the New Brexit secretary Dominic Raab signed up to that?""He's on record of saying he doesn't support the Human Rights Act.."  
Irish leaders signal frustration at shifting UK stance on Brexit  
No deal Brexit:2,800,000 fewer jobs £158bn loss per yearTrade agreement Brexit (outside the single market):1,750,000 fewer jobs£99bn loss per yearSoft Brexit (EEA & single market):700,000 fewer jobs£39bn loss per year Remain in EU:No impact on jobsNo £ loss per year 
We could have been party to this . Instead we’re in bed with Russian colluding , chlorinated chicken , narcissistic megalomaniac , keeping the Queen late , Trump. Brexit isn’t about global trade . We become smaller by the hour. #VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw#NoRecess 
Next time some runt tells you that 17.4m voted for the #brexit fantasy, ask them how many want #brexit now that we know the reality. Forget the polls, they're bullshit. The reality is no one wants this shit. Most just want it gone and if we bin it tomorrow they'll be happy #FBPE 
Three quarters of black ppl and two-thirds of Asian ppl voted to remain. Maybe don't use phrases like 'enemy of the ppl' or 'elite' in contrast to 'ordinary' Britons but better still maybe don't use EU referendum voting as the sole social divide / characteristic in the UK 
'Theresa May must be BROUGHT DOWN!' Farage demands Tories 'ACT NOW' over Brexit failure 
So if (us) British voters are too thick and uneducated to answer a simple Leave-Remain question correctly, how will these stupid voters be able to answer the far more complicated 3-part question Justine Greening proposes in her second EU referendum?#Brexit  
5 hours ago this petition stood at just over 50k signatures; now it's at over 67k signatures. Let's keep this going & get it to 100k signatures.#VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw, but the #Brexit #Tories don't care. Tell them they are not above the law! Please sign: 
#PMQsOn Monday the new Brexit secretary was starting the next round of Brexit negotiations & didn't show up.No wonder he didn't turn up, he doesn't know what he's supposed to be negotiating.Isn't it the case that the government has no serious negotiating strategy what so ever?  
The bonkers #FBPE brigade would have us believe there is no difference between Jeremy Corbyn's position on #Brexit and Theresa May's. The PM clearly disagrees. At #PMQs today she listed all the differences. It was a very long list. It included not ruling out a 2nd referendum. 
While I think Münchau is indisputably correct in his take here, I don't think Remainers are blind to this reality, but that's why it's so important (for the UK) to reverse Brexit while it's legally and politically possible. Rejoining just ain't gonna fly.  
Brexit: SNP MPs demand rerun of EU referendum amid Vote Leave probe.  
Very strong performance indeed at #PMQs from Conservative Prime Minister @Theresa_May - Labour Leader Jeremy Corbyn absolutely rinsed on #Brexit  
This is it. The new EU Japan FTA deal is a game changer. No more UK built Japanese cars post Brexit.  #BrexitShambles 
Throw this into the mix. extraordinary @yougov numbers polling the @JustineGreening 3 way exit deal referendum idea...Remain on 50% after first round, 55:45 after reallocations, winning in first round even with 50-64 year olds.  
Former Brexit Minister @SteveBakerHW asks May to ensure that the UK's no deal plans "bolster our negotiating position by reinforcing the credibility & feasibility of those contingency plans"May agrees that the EU must "be in no doubt that we are making those preparations" #PMQs 
Among Trump's big lies last week: where his own dad was born; how Obama reacted to Russian interference; his imaginary Brexit prediction in Scotland; imaginary NATO developments; imaginary blood on the walls of a London hospital; Reagan's imaginary 1984 defeat in Wisconsin. 
Here it is in black & white... sobering figures. #Brexit means Brexit? Bullshit. It means catastrophe plain & simple. 2nd referendum is the only answer to this god forsaken mess.  
Are you an #EU citizen working or living in Scotland? @scotgov & North, South & East Ayrshire Councils want to hear from you! Come and share your experiences and concerns about the impact of #Brexit on your right to live, work, study or retire in Scotland:  
We would like to thank @JohnMannMP who is one of the few who have put his country first, a hard working #constituency #MP who believes in and works for the people of #Britain! Thank you #JohnMann! #Labour #LabourParty @UKLabour @labourleave #Bassetlaw #BBC #SKY #LBC #BREXIT  
This is the clear difference between @Theresa_May and Jeremy Corbyn on Brexit:Make sure your friends see this.  #PMQs 
As if Brexit wasn’t bad enough already. Cheese prices are set to soar.  
WATCH: Momentum is building. Increasing numbers of Conservative politicians are backing a #PeoplesVote to give the public a say on the final #Brexit deal  
The man who, for two years, rebuffed our repeated demands for greater transparency about the impact of Brexit and the Government's approach on the grounds that it would undermine the negotiations. Must have had a change of heart...  
Dear UK: You are NOT stuck w/Brexit. Like us, you were victims of a sophisticated & well-executed Russian intel operation. Do NOT go through w/it simply out of a sense of obligation. The consequences will be lasting & disastrous. Vote again if you must, but don’t let Putin WIN! 
We would like to thank @frankfieldteam who is one of the few who have put his country first, a hard working constituency #MP who believes in and works for the people of #Britain! Thank you #FrankField! #Labour #LabourParty @UKLabour @labourleave #Birkenhead #BBC #SKY #LBC #BREXIT  
This Liberal MP has voted to cut penalty rates multiple times. Make the next election in the seat of Corangamite a referendum on penalty rates #restorepenaltyrates #Vote1LibbyCoker 
Former Brexit Minister @SteveBakerHW reminds the PM that it’s in the national interest that we implement contingency plans for a ‘no-deal’ scenario, and that these preparations need to be accelerated 
So ERG and @Jacob_Rees_Mogg will try to get @DavidDavisMP’s CETA-plus free-trade plan for Brexit published using the humble-address device recently exploited by Labour. The Brexiter campaign to force @theresa_may back on to what they see as the true path will not be stopped 
If you want to honour the referendum you must honour the promises made which delivered the result. NHS cash (not from taxes), quick trade deals, more prosperity. One without the other is meaningless tripe & an insult to democracy. The fact that you can’t means you can’t go ahead. 
Understandable as there are only 8 months left to proposed exit day and chaos is still the keynote from @GovUK : Varadkar says Ireland is stepping up plans for no-deal Brexit | Politics | The Guardian  
Good to see Vince back in the Chamber today, now all the crucial Brexit votes are over. 
The exchange of post-truths between Trump and Putin:Trump says he "misspoke" about Moscow's intereference in the US elections.The Kremlin edited, on its website, Putin's statement that it was Russia that had orchestrated the "Crimea referendum" in a sovereign country. 
.@SteveBakerHW at #PMQs we know exactly what the ERG are up to. The ERG want a hard #Brexit and No Deal, even though it will be disastrous for British jobs and livelihoods. If the UK crashes out of the EU, the ERG will be responsible. #FBPE 
Please show your support for these #Labour #MPs who put their Country first and the wishes of the 17,410,742 who voted for #BREXIT! You did your duty by the people! @KateHoeyMP @JohnMannMP #GrahamStringer @frankfieldteam Thank you! @labourleave @labourleave #BBC #SKY #LBC 
#PMQsJeremy Corbyn: "The Transport, Trade & Brexit secretary were all members of 'Vote Leave' campaign. They've been referred to the police by the Electoral commission for refusing to cooperate""Will the PM guarantee that cabinet ministers will fully cooperate with the police?"  
Anna Soubry invites Sir Cliff Richard to lead a government of national unity on Brexit, or something. #PMQs 
Winning the #PeoplesVote won't be enough. We need to use this moment to utterly change our country and to reverse the tide of nationalism that is flooding over the world. On 8 Sep in #Leeds we will be debating how to do this, at the Great Northern Stop #Brexit Conference. #gnsbc 
Is this where the Brexit bus resides these days?  
In the event of no-deal brexit British people living in EU27 will lose all EU citizenship rights on 29 March 2019. As Steve says, find out what the position is where you're living.  
Corbyn slams Theresa May at PMQS today on her Governments Brexit chaos  
It’s clear the Tories have no solution for Brexit. But we have an alternative.Pass this on  #PMQs 
SNP Westminster Leader @IanBlackfordMP calls on Theresa May to extend Article 50, warning the Tory government's shambolic Brexit negotiations could result in a disastrous no deal or hard Brexit scenario that would hit jobs, incomes and living standards #PMQs #BrexitShambles 
EU braces for 'chaotic' no-deal Brexit after May's concessions.  Time to call out the Brextremists  Emperor's New Clothes....  
This Ian Paisley????? 
Zombie Prime Minister, capitulating to remain on #Brexit, disastrous #ChequersPlan, mass resignations and the PM still destroys #Corbyn in #PMQS I am Tory, but my god, our democracy is crying out for a decent opposition. 
Corbyn goes on Vote Leave breaking electoral law asks about Cabinet ministers from that campaign cooperating with police investigation - PM suggests Corbyn withdraw.Significant Corbyn goes on that - having focussed on competence of Brexit process, now on legitimacy of campaign 
UK now:"Pass the butter""Ok sure"UK after Brexit:"Give me some of that cheese""No. I have saved for months for this bit of cheese.""Oh you wanna throw down? I will fucking fight you for that bit of camembert." pic.twitter.com/X3lIquROVL 
PM has confirmed that Brexit means Brexit after her backbencher Andrea Jenkyns asked at #PMQs when Brexit had become Remain 
Issues you may have with May’s deal aside, let’s just remember what #Labour have tried to do on #Brexit: Commit us to a customs union  Tie us into free movement Re-run the referendum#PMQs 
I'm watching #PMQs and nobody has even mentioned the 2.8 million jobs that will be lost if a hard/no deal brexit happens. It's almost as if nobody gives a shit. #PMQs 
It is now twenty minutes since Andrea Jenkyns asked her genius question about "when did Brexit become Remain" and twenty minutes later she is still smirking.  
Our local MP, @andreajenkyns, destroys the Chequers deal- Brexit MUST mean Brexit! #PMQs  
Andrea Jenkyns to @theresa_may: At what point was it decided that Brexit meant Remain?  
'Whole damn thing needs to be BLOWN UP!' Churchill’s grandson DEMANDS Brexit is restarted  
It’s clear the Tories have no solution for Brexit. But we have an alternative.Pass this on  #PMQs 
Labour's broken promises on Brexit:Their customs union plan would prevent us striking new trade deals around the world.They backed an amendment to the Withdrawal Bill that would mean free movement continued.They won’t rule out re-running the referendum.#PMQs 
fascinating must-read here from @TheRedRoar on how the Tories have taken £5m since referendum from Vote Leave donors  
.@andreajenkyns: "Can the Prime Minister inform the House at what point it was decided that Brexit means Remain?"Theresa May: "Brexit continues to mean Brexit."  
‘@andreajenkyns asks May: When did you decide Brexit means Remain?Standing up for Brexiteers yet again!  
Andrea Jenkyns asks Theresa May "when did Brexit become Remain"? A reminder that Andrea Jenkyns is an actual imbecile.  
WATCH Andrea Jenkyns: "At What Point Was It Decided Brexit Meant Remain?"  
'Prime Minister, at what point was it decided that Brexit means remain?'Follow live updates as the PM faces questions:  
Andrea Jenkyns delivers a cracker to the PM, cutting right to the heart of the mess Gov't/Parliament have made of leaving."At what point in the House, was it decided that Brexit means Remain"#PMQs 
The morning after the night before and the Tory civil war alive and kicking: Andrea Jenkyns “Could the Prime Minister inform the House at what time she decided that Brexit means Remain?” 
'The positives of Brexit'? I can't remember you @theresa_may or our national broadcaster ever flagging up - or even investigating - the massive potential benefits of Brexit. Given that it's been the biggest issue of our time, why is this? #PMQs 
Andrea Jenkyns at  PMQ’s has just asked the Appeaserwhen was it decided that Brexit meant Remain!!Whole house in uproar.Well done to Andrea.PMQ’s might be worth watching today. 
WATCH | @Nigel_Farage calls on Brexiteer Tories to "bring down" Theresa May and have the courage to go for a clean Brexit, and to not be afraid to call a general election if a new administration needs the numbers in Parliament. Hear, hear!  
Absolute savage question for Theresa May from one of her own backbenchers - "At what point did the Prime Minister decide that Brexit means Remain" #PMQs 
This MUST be stopped. It is too irresponsible for words. The kindergarten politics of this country have long since ceased to be a joke. “Brexit latest: EU braces for 'chaotic' no-deal outcome after Theresa May's concessions to hardliners - Evening Standard  
"#LiamFox announces UK will prioritise new trade deals with US, Australia ; New Zealand and seek to join the trans-Pacific CPTPP bloc. "And de-prioritise  27 nation trading bloc 175 miles from London for one around #PacificRim. (oops forgot , there's  #PitcairnIsland)#Brexit  
It's not been a good week for the BBC, has it? ...#cliffrichard #sirCliffRichard #Brexit #StopBrexit #Remain #Brexitshambles #FBPE #ABTV #WATON #PeoplesVote #FinalSay #BBCBias 
Dear me, @JohnMannMP wants a ‘nice clean Brexit’ that protects the car industry and the aerospace industry. There isn’t one. Fantasy. 
Independence involves uncertainty. But only independence offers us the powers to create a better country.  Brexit offers us the certainty of being trapped forever inside a worse one. 
A national unity government? A second referendum is more likely | Jonathan Freedland  
... comparing the people who got us to vote Brexit with Nazis is just baseless and completely inappropriate...  
WATCH: @Just_RichardB highlights how the public have been misled over #Brexit and deserve a #PeoplesVote on the final #Brexit deal  
During Welsh questions in @HouseofCommons made the point that following the passing of trade bill yesterday, Wallonia a region of Belgium will have more influence over EU trade policy than Wales will have over post Brexit UK trade policy. So much for the partnership of equals 
Nicola must NOT fight for a second EU ReferendumWhy? Simply because Scotland has already voted NO to Brexit.  This is WM's mess, they must sort it.The SNP (or SG) calling for a second vote implies that they agree with Brexit and want it changed.  
We actually *have* a Government of national unity, made up of sensible, pragmatic MPs from across the Commons implementing the democratic will of the people. @Anna_Soubry is simply part of the Opposition of national unity, made up of MPs who refuse to accept the Referendum result  
'. .a morally-bankrupt cesspit of political putrefaction'My latest @TheConWom article, on the May Administration & Tory Party high-command over which now hangs the inescapable stench of anti-Brexit treachery. 
Petition: Rescind Art.50 if Vote Leave has broken Electoral Laws regarding 2016 referendum  
It is hugely concerning that EU Governments view the disaster of a No-Deal Brexit as now likely, but you can't blame them when this Government is being held hostage by the ERG. We need a @peoplesvote_uk to sort out this mess. 
Europhile John Major wrecked the economy with the ERM and the Conservative Party with the Maastricht Treaty. It's bizarre that the media takes his views on Brexit seriously.  #BrexitBetrayal 
Both parties beginning to fall apart. Far better that Brexit wrecks them than the country. Serves them right. Time for a serious grown-up party of national unity. “John Woodcock labels Jeremy Corbyn a 'national security risk' as he quits Labour - Sky News  
The country should be very aware that Dorries & Co voted last night to take the country to a catastrophic Brexit & empower an islamophobic, fascist ERG that would wipe out national wealth (no teachers, doctors etc) and believe worker, environmental protection is wrong #madness 
The Cumberbatch channel 4 film on Brexit apparently has me playing a sweaty game of tennis with Farage after he helicopters in to Old Down. apparently I’m played by an East end villain who looks like a pug but has the character of a Rottweiler. Sounds like a string contender ?  
Butter, yoghurt and cheese could become ‘occasional luxuries’ after Brexit  
Huge: DUP MP Ian Paisley Jr likely to be suspended from the Commons for 30 sitting days at a time of knife-edge Brexit votes after being found to have got lavish gifts from a foreign government which he didn't declare...before lobbying for that government.  
Brexit is destabilising and the politicians enacting it need to be sensitive to that.(H/T @37paday for finding some of the videos in this first clip) 
They can absolutely piss off with a 2nd referendum.The bigwig self serving idiots just want us to keep voting until we reach a decision that suits them.They can **** right off  
Ouch. @BBCGaryR gives Tory @AndrewBowieMP an absolute roasting over yesterday's shambolic Brexit amendments. Well worth a listen.. 
"Honouring the result of the Referendum" doesn't include dishonouring the country with "Brexit at any cost", which was not on the ballot paper.Anyone who says it does, demonstrates how much they're motivated by politics or hate of the EU, & how little they care for our country. 
Looks like the country is #remainernow based on polling based on the 3 way #peoplesvote suggested by @JustineGreening So if #brexit is both not the #willofthepeople and on (the vast majority of independent and the government's own) economic analysis bad for UK, why continue? 
Ten days on from his visit, @InFactsOrg considers the Trump soap opera and Brexit. 
What your Brexit plan has actually delivered for Britain so far:1. Eleven govt resignations and counting.2. Amendments by the ERG that make a hard border in Ireland inevitable.3. A big chance of No Deal which would batter the British economy by 13% (your own assessments).  
Brexit *is* a far right revival.  
"I just want to get out of the situation where we have to have a choice between the dreadful @theresa_may and the completely incompetent @jeremycorbyn" says @glasgowcathcart after regional President says Dover & Calais face 'catastrophe' after #Brexit.  
Dollar's advance puts squeeze on gold, Brexit and BoE blues sink sterling  
More Brexit dividends on the way  
Why are you honoring the result of a referendum in which one side cheated, breaking the law? 
Can’t wait for Brexit  
OBR confirms government is LYING about there being a #Brexit dividend for the NHS. That's the big fat lie on the side of the bus that Gove, Johnson, Davis and Fox told.Come on #Leavers / #Brexiters / #Quitlings defend this lie. Explain yourselves. 
The only thing that needs to leave Prime Minister... is you from No10. Hand the reins to someone who can actually LEAD this country. Your Brexit strategy, or lack of it, is making us a global joke.  
Irish foreign minister says EU to negotiate Brexit on UK's white paper only  
No-deal Brexit would have big economic consequences – Carney  
Stunning poll of 25k voters on #Brexit. Highlights:- 91% unhappy with negotiations- 10% of Leavers want to Remain (only 3% Remainers want to Leave)- 78% of those who didn’t/couldn’t vote want to RemainThe people have changed their will!#PeoplesVote 
Right that MPs voted last night to honour the result of the referendum by voting to leave the Customs Union. We voted to #TakeBackControl over our trade policy 
Our opponents like T Montgomerie feel our fightback is ferocious.Great. We are getting to them.But we haven’t even started. No backward stepShow up at every possible momentKeep talking to your MP, MEP & in yr local community#brexit#StopBrexit#FBPE#PeoplesVote 
We are leaving the European Union, and honouring the result of the referendum. Here’s what our Brexit plan for Britain delivers:  
Investment in City of London offices jumped to £3.6bn in the second quarter of this year, reaching a 28-year high...'despite Brexit'   
Dear Mr Clegg, I have a 14 year old Labrador which has started to fart a lot. Does this mean we'll have to have another referendum because so far every similar happening causes you to demand one. Your political days are over. Please remain silent and do us all a huge favour. 
To those who look to London, take note of Foreign Affairs Minister Simon Coveney’s comments to RTE’s Morning Ireland. “Brexit is not going to be resolved in London. The real negotiations have to take place with the EU, they will only start in proper this week.” 
The very Olly Robbins who, as May's (non)-Brexit Svengali & Rasputin rolled into one, was/is the key figure in the No. 10 black op to deceive politicians & public alike & foist May's Soft-Remain on to both.Should be sacked, and immediately, along with May 
...why the BBC thought that Cliff Richard was a story to aggressively pursue and aspects of Brexit not so much...is part of the problem 
CONSEQUENCES: Trump’s TripWATCH:Joel Skousen joins me to examine #TrumpPutinSummit & the possible geopolitical consequences for #NATO, #BREXIT & #Syria. 
How fantastic! The EU’s new trade deal with Japan provides an excellent new model for the UK’s relationship with Europe post-Brexit via @GuidoFawkes  
People are not born to hate.They are taught to hate.I am a migrant.My grandparents were refugees.Brexit is personal.#EUcitizensChampion #inLimbo 
4,000 disgruntled Tory Brexit voters joined Ukip since May's Stitch-Up.2,500 new #Ukip members in the last week alone.All because EU 'Associate Membership' is NOT Leaving the EU !!17.4 Million voters voted to Leave - So Leave!#Brexit #Leave #EU Go #WTO 
We've said this from the beginning but now it is official: the Office for Budget Responsibility has told the Government that its "Brexit dividend" for the NHS is a lie  
This from .@owenjones84 who was pro referendum, Anti-EU, then Pro-EU, advocated leave and remain,Supported Jeremy and then manoeuvred against him. Total Charlatan!  
Focus on Sinn Féin's mandated abstentionism is complete distraction, simplistic numerical analysis of hypothetical SF voting is a nonsense!The British government has to negotiate its chaotic, contradictory Brexit position with the EU, that's what will determine outcome! 
If it's parliamentary sovereignty you’re looking for, you've come to the wrong Brexit  
Why going from acceptance of the "Common Market" to hysterically denouncing the very notion of 'regulatory alignment' as treason is a major factor in the Brexit debacle.  
If there's a general election before #Brexit, then @theSNP should campaign for a majority of Scottish MPs (30/59) as a mandate to commence negotiations for independence. A referendum isn't necessary. 
We will be setting up a new #peoplesvote community group in #Nottingham to campaign for a People's Vote on the final Brexit deal.Come along and find out how you can get involved in the campaign in your area. 
Dominic Raab and Boris Johnson were among Tories calling for thresholds in votes for union strike action to be raised to 50%. #Brexit only got 37%. Tory Brexiter hypocrisy is beyond measure. #StopBrexit #PeoplesVote 
Thought provoking contribution from @iainmacwhirter. It’s important for future #indyref that we take a strong stand against the idea that it’s acceptable for a referendum to be won by lies & cheating #Brexit #ScotlandsPlaceInEurope 
excellent interview by @Just_RichardB on Sky News this morning - working class people will be let down by #Brexit and the promises which have been made by the Brexiters will not bear fruition - a very fair point for there to be a #PeoplesVote on the final deal @peoplesvote_uk 
Says the man who missed a whole series of knife edge Brexit votes this week because nobody told him they were important.  
Brexit campaigners broke electoral law, watchdog group says  
There has never been a moment in post War history when we need to hug our European allies closer& recognise the fickle & unreliable  nature of the so-called "special relationship." To go ahead with Brexit in this climate would be utter madness and leave us completely isolated 3/3 
Here's how Liverpool voted in the EU referendum by ward.......  
BREAKING: @michaelgove confirms to @CommonsEU that the #Agbill will not be published until Sept. #Brexit #Farming 
Brexit is Britain naked on a heath at night, pulling its hair out  
#TeamJunckerEU today: Important news on #InvestEU #JunckerPlan; European Citizens Initiatives #EUTakeTheInitiative; #EUTrade, #Brexit updates; a major antitrust decision. @EIB President Werner Hoyer visits the College. 
Oh I see , we need to back a PM trying to rat on Brexit because the alternative is Corbyn. Brilliant electoral analysis! Where can I buy the PHD you have ?  
You should be bloody ashamed of yourself, your constituents can't afford food, some ladies can't afford tampons, you've just voted for a Tory no deal Brexit, forecast loss of 12% GDP to the North West! you'll be alright though on your £77K won't you? #SHAME #DESELECT 
I've been thinking about Conservative MP Anna Soubry's speech for a day or so now. It seems extraordinary to me, no matter your view on Brexit, that the strongest/loudest rebuke for it has come in the Commons from within the PM's own party. That's sad.  
Hard-left types like @OwenJones84 want the so-called Labour rebels campaigning for a true Brexit to be deselected. They are the only patriots left in the Parliamentary Labour Party! RT to show them some support! @KateHoeyMP @JohnMannMP @frankfieldteam 
"No deal" Brexit, summarised  
Those who are worried about the effect on democracy of overturning the referendum result: Are you not worried about the effect on democracy of allowing referendums to be won by campaigns rampantly flouting the law while making wild, undeliverable promises? 
The Government’s official and independent spending watchdog has confirmed that there will be no “brexit dividend” for the UK, despite the claims of ministers.  
You know our political system's in a sorry state when the main parties are not only competing to be the least worst option, but also fighting over which version of BRINO to force on an electorate that instructed them to deliver Brexit. 
It’s just not viable to keep waiting to see just how bad things will actually get. The case for independence has never been stronger.We have a mandate.It’s time to launch a new campaign right now & announce a date for when we will hold a new referendum on Scottish independence. 
I have said many times before: if ever I were to decide to leave it wouldn’t be because of Brexit in itself, it would be because of this and the apathy.  
The majority of decent British MPs who do not want an Antisemitic party in charge of government or a hard Brexit that will pointlessly destroy lives need to step up and save this country. Kind of soon. 
“Corbynistas pose as radical yet they’re horrified by the most radical thing that has happened in British politics in a generation: Brexit. These pseudo-Marxists fear and loathe ordinary people and their genuinely rebellious beliefs”, says Brendan O’Neill  
I implore you, take a look at the world and accept where we are.If you don’t believe me, believe what you saw in Helsinki. Believe the speech by @BarackObama and the look on his face. Believe the Brexit impact assessments. Just believe it. Accept. Only then can we survive. 
Justice has been done. Now, given the BBC’s dreadful conduct in this matter, & given the BBC’s sad decline as an impartial news source (eg, Brexit), it’s time for a formal move to demand the end of the licence fee. We, the British public, shouldn’t have to pay for this rubbish. 
‘In a climate where some newspaper front pages have declared judges “the enemies of the people” and called on May to “crush the saboteurs”, there is a marked reluctance to pose awkward questions about how the referendum was won.’  
Former PM John Major makes a powerful case for a second EU referendum.I never voted for him, but compared to the crooks, bullies & fantasists now in charge of the Tories, he's a towering statesman.#PeoplesVote#ITVNowWhat:  … 
YouGov's Brexit trackerBrexit Right  42%+1Brexit Wrong  47%+1 (this equals the highest level for Brexit wrong) 
The old Tory scare story of "Vote for us for Brexit or let in Labour" won't wash with Brexiteers anymore. We need genuine Brexiteers in parliament. That means getting MPs from UKIP, ForBritain & other Brexit Parties elected to fight the Brexit cause. 
Back May or face national election, Brexit rebels told  
EU just signed Free Trade deal with Japan that cuts tariffs on most goods.Japan NOT required to join #EU Customs Union or Single Market.Japan NOT bound to ECJ’s ultimate jurisdiction.Can UK have a similar deal?Or are EU just trying to frustrate #Brexit 
"HARD BORDER INEVITABLE"so there goes the ball-game.  NO-Deal Brexit.that's the one which both ScotGov and UKGov's analysis say will be the worst possible outcome, crippling the economy and devastating jobs.still glad Scotland's in the UK?I don't f*king think so.#indyref2 
Nick. If BBC Scotland was doing its job it would be informing Scotland, mainly the auld who still use it, exactly how the Brexit Laws passed that day will affect Scotland industry. Sector by sector, this is huge damage coming our way that will filter through to every household! 
#May govt. crumbling around her, #Brexit is in shambles, #Labour are ahead in the polls, there's talk of a "no confidence" vote in the PM & maybe a new General Election.BOOM. More fake #antisemitism nonsense to undermine #Corbyn and keep him out of No. 10. What a coincidence. 
It’s official: The Brexit campaign cheated its way to victory  
There are lies, Edam lies and statistics? Now Project Fear says CHEESE will become a “luxury good”after #Brexit?   
Once more, for emphasis: if you want to be kept informed about #Brexit, don't simply rely on the UK press and the BBC - read the @IrishTimes and @Independent_ie too. (Photo HT: @StevePeers) 
There is no case for a #secondreferendum. Just like there is no case for a second general election if there is a close win for the victors. There was a vote, the electorate spoke - it’s called democracy - move on. #brexit  
Could the Brexit referendum be declared void? I have upgraded my "probably no" to "possibly yes" in this thread...  
Brexit is helmed by cheats and liars. It was in the campaign and it is now. Why is no action being taken, @theresa_may? 
This ‘Sinn Féin should take their Westminster seats’ stuff is getting very tiring. The bottom line is they don’t have a mandate to do it. People in the North knew what they were voting for last year and it wasn’t for SF to oppose Brexit and vote in the House of Commons. 
BREXIT LATEST.. YouGov Poll - British people would rather stay in the EU than accept a no-deal Brexit /#EU #Brexit  
No-one seems to be reporting this, but the look on #Corbyn’s face when the #Remain amendment fell, was incredible.Proper #Brexit and no General Election. He then skunk out of the Chamber looking a broken man. 
REVEALED... New Poll shows that Remain would win a new #Brexit referendum by 55% to 45%.. People want to stay in EU  
‘Brexit has revealed the poverty of the system that regulates British democracy’ - I’ve written an op-Ed in today’s @IrishTimes about Vote Leave breaking the law and why Britain is turning a blind eye  
Shameful bullying tactics to oust @KateHoeyMP and the few principled #Brexit supporting #Labour MPs. It is worth remembering around two thirds of Labour seats voted Leave. @labourleave 
Dominic Grieve - If we got to the point where it was clear there was no deal then there would be a major political crisis & in those circumstances Parliament would exert its authority... there is a majority in Parliament that will prevent a no deal #brexit... #FBPE #StopBrexit 
The leave campaign was racist, that's the sentiment of some members of the Great British Public that they tapped into.The next time anyone says 'but Brexit had nothing to do with racism' tell them this.  
Senior Tory criticises May over Brexit, saying: 'Jacob Rees-Mogg is running our country' - Politics live  
Gavin lives in southern Germany with his family. He works over the border in Switzerland (not an EU country). “I am one of those frontier workers. Will I still be able to work in Switzerland after #Brexit?”  
I'm working class I'm gayI'm 18I'm a conservative Labour doesnt own me#Labour #Brexit 
#Canada signs a trade deal with the #EU - No common rule book. Controls its borders.#Japan signs a trade deal with EU - No common rulebook. Controls its borders.@theresa_may @Conservatives what’s your problem? #WalkAway #MayOut #Brexit #BrexitBetrayal #ChequersMeansCorbyn 
I think if there were a second referendum the result might well be the same. Except if the question was: “Would you like all this fucking Brexit stuff to just go away? Yes/No.” Something of a landslide for Yes, there. 
This black hole in Scottish Income Tax receipts is obviously due to Westminster/Tories/Austerity/Brexit/Labour/DUP/Donald Trump. Nothing to do with Saint Nicola and her SNP.  
#Brexit could lead to nearly 3 MILLION jobs being lost in the UK, costing the economy over £150 BILLION each year.This is not 'fake news'. This is not 'Project Fear'.This is what the Brexit MPs have admitted.Nobody who voted Leave wanted this. We were lied to.#PeoplesVote 
Liberal Democrats fined £18,000 for breaching campaign finance rules relating to EU referendum' | via @telegraph  no call to nullify then was there ? 
The Putin-Trump-Brexit triangle has monumental consequences for our security which the British have yet to fully register. There has never been a moment in post War history when we need to hug our European allies closer. To go ahead with Brexit in this climate would be madness. 
Credit where credit is due. @Anna_Soubry is relentlessly standing up against a hard Brexit. She’s spot on when she says that Jacob Rees-Mogg is currently running the country and driving it towards a cliff edge, without a mandate to do so.Via @BBCr4today 
A barbed-wire Brexit - thanks to Rees Mogg and ERG hard Brexiteers who now run our country.  
This is the problem, isn’t it? The Brexit train will plough on as there’s not enough time to complete a full civil or criminal investigation before March next year and nobody is willing to pull the handbrake to insist on a pause while we see if the vote really was constitutional. 
"That would not include Labour's frontbench" - neatly illustrating that the primary purpose of her intervention is not to "avoid a hard Brexit" at all, but to keep @jeremycorbyn out of power. 
13/ Addendum: @ewanmcg argues in this post that there may be recourse through a common law route to declare the referendum void. Here’s a few quick thoughts on that... 
MUST-WATCH: leading Conservatives backing a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal. The momentum is with our campaign - with chaos in Westminster, it's time to give this decision back to the people.Sign & share the petition now:  
Some quick thoughts on our trade policy in the event of a no deal Brexit - summary being that we won't be in a strong position... 1/ 
Anna Soubry attacks Tory whips' threats over Brexit votes  
1/3 When someone of @NSoames standing states we need a Govt of national unity I listen. He’s right - events this week have created v serious #Brexit crisis. PM secured support for #ChequersAgreement & then scuppered it by accepting amendments from hard no deal Brexiteers 
UKIP SURGE 4000 applications had been made since the PM’s soft Brexit plans were published.   
With Brexit and Trump what else can go wrong? 
Covering Brexit is alright but nothing beats spending a morning in a court with a dozen obsessive Cliff Richard fans and Gloria Hunniford.  
Disgraceful that Tories didn’t honour pair with @joswinson last night on #Brexit votes. She is right to say it is cheating. We urgently need proxy votes in parliament for new mums & new dads so MPs can continue to represent constituents. 
Everyone after the referendum  
Away from the detail of complex Brexit amendments, here's what will cut through with people: trying to break for summer early, not honouring a voting deal with a new mum MP, forcing ill MPs to vote 
Check out Molly's website  to see why Tories want Brexit - Millions ( £ ) to be made by Stockmarket gamblers Millions of jobless don't matter to them #SAVEJOBS #StopBrexit Now 
As Theresa Sméagol Tories continue to lie and cheat, Brexit chaos!!! Jeremy Corbyn’s Labour have taken a massive **5 point lead in the polls 41% - 36% its a **9 point swing it’s MASSIVE!!! Believe!!!   Hahahaha!!!!! Where are the headlines???  
We’re heading for a ‘no-deal’ Brexit.Theresa May will present an unworkable deal and then say she can’t work with a ‘bullying’ EU. The right-wing will hail her as Boudicca for standing up to the ‘unelected bureaucrats in Brussels’ and tragically, millions of people will agree. 
UK stockpiling £22 billion worth of food supplies to prevent Brexit crisis. This time they're paying for it. During World War II the British looted food and cash from India, causing Bengal Famine and killing 3-7 million Indians. Empire collapse is a bitch. 
Call it “mid-week blues” if you must but these do seem to me to be dark times: Trump did not “misspeak” and is consistently putting Trump not America first; the Tories’ handling of Brexit is a disaster for everyone and I fear there’s even worse to come! 
Before we get into Day 2 of the abstention debate. Those on the Remain side of the debate should keep our eyes on the real people to blame for this #Brexit mess.  The Leave campaign who had no clueThe British govt who have no plan The hard Brexitiers who don't care. 
.@mollymep is calling on Theresa May to sack cabinet ministers who were on the Vote Leave committee, (you know, the Vote Leave that broke the law during the Brexit campaign). Frankly it's shocking that they've been tolerated for so long... 
Tory chair pairs with pregnant LibDem MP for Brexit vote (i.e. agrees not to vote). Doesn’t vote on some votes but then does on close votes. The “I think” is doing a lot of work in this apology. 
Brexit is going to take away cheese. In other news, 100% of people now back remain.  
Screw Brexit too, obv. 
Friends! Your Brexit has cost me my entire sanity!And my wife is demanding a divorce, which is problematic as we're not actually married!She's also demanding a £39K 'separation fee' along with full access to my bank account, and 'frictionless' sex!Talk about scathing worry! pic.twitter.com/2BFFSwNCuI 
This is truly terrifying. This is what your racist, coming-over-here-taking-our-jobs rhetoric gets us. 2.8 million people more unemployed. There’s no such thing as a ‘jobs first Brexit’, only illusory independence at the cost of prosperity. Happy now?  
Conservative MP @Anna_Soubry says government's Brexit White Paper "is in tatters" because @Jacob_Rees_Mogg and a small cabal of MPs are running the country #r4today 
Hey @Theresa_May why haven't you sacked the minsters behind Vote Leave & why haven't you stopped the Brexit catastrophe won by criminality? 
'Left-wingers' waiting for the "Tories to destroy themselves over Brexit" are also watching the country be undermined. Standing back is callous and negligent. That will be remembered. Dealing with the risk of hard Brexit is more important than getting one man into power  
Mark my words!Michael Portillo's words will prove to be May's political epitaph. "This is the most dreadful betrayal". The #ChequersPlan will either make the UK into a "colony" under a "non-Brexit #Brexit" or force the country to stay in the EU.  
Tragic & still praying for a miracle but hard Brexit with no Withdrawal Agreement deal or NI backstop just became more likely sadly. The role & myopia of DUP, ERG & SF will not be forgotten if 'troubles' return & economic damage ensues. Some seem to live in Alice in Wonderland!  
- May to Brexit rebels: back me or we hold an election - Government wins knife-edge customs union vote- Labour Leavers ensure defeat of rebel amendment- Boris expected to make Commons resignation speech today  
UK’s biggest defence (& civil) air show underway at Farnborough & @theresa_may -consumed by #Brexit- has not found time to appoint new minister for @DefenceES (the part of @DefenceHQ in charge of buying stuff like aircraft) to replace the one who quit over Brexit#defencematters 
There would be nothing wrong with the ERG putting their wish for an ultra-free market economy to the public in a general election. But it is wholly crooked and dishonest for them to try to smuggle it in under concerns about immigration & sovereignty.#Brexit #FBPE #StopBrexit 
“This referendum was about how we govern our country”On referendum night, watch as Cameron’s former right hand man Steve Hilton beautifully captures what Brexit is about. The Remoaners, with their endless, misguided focus on Project Fear economics still don’t get it - even now.  
How about your Labour MPs that voted with Tories and effectively kept Tories in power and facilitated a hard Brexit,  anything? 
We will pay a lot more for many things after Brexit. Everyone will be worse off. Head of Sainsbury’s said it could add 20% to our shopping.   
Chelsea flower show, post #Brexit............  
**First poll on a three way referendum gives #Remain a comfortable lead**Parliament is paralysed and the mood of the country has changed. The only way out of #Brexit is through a #PeoplesVote, with #Labour leading the campaign to Remain. 
Once again, unemployment has risen in Scotland whilst simultaneously dropping in the rest of the UK.Never mind though, the SNP are on the case.They are blaming Brexit.  
Did you vote leave as you were told by people like @MichaelGove that some of the warnings that Brexit would adversely effect key industries were just #projectfear? Well yet again reality is it was #projectfactUpset? Angry? Be a #remainernow & fight! 
BBC News - Jo Swinson says Tories broke Brexit vote agreement . Tories sink to new level of dishonesty. No one believes Brandon Lewis, he needs to be held to account. This is how Mrs May operates by cheating, lies and deception. Disgraceful. #FBPE 
This arguably already happened. The Syrian Civil War was sparked in farming communities stricken by drought likely made worse by climate change. The resulting refugee crisis arguably fueled Brexit and the revival of Euro ethno-nationalism. The destabilized world is here. 
Tbh I'm still laughing about the fact that people want Sinn Fein to save the UK from Brexit when key Lib Dems didn't even turn up to vote. 
“Theresa May threatened Conservative rebels with a general election this summer if they defeated her plans on customs after Brexit.” Best to be prepared for a General Election this summer. 
This from @patrick_kidd in the Times sums up just how deranged Brexit has become.... The ERG party with their 5 Labour helpers madly chanting a lie as they themselves paralyse government.  
The voters got it right the first time. So did John Major when he said: "there will not be another referendum on Europe. This is it." #RightTheFirstTime 
Just look at the Government’s Brexit economic impact assessment that shows a massive drop in GDP across the UK regions because of Brexit. Based on these figures, a Brexit ‘no deal’ outcome would create an economic catastrophe that is worse than the Great Depression of 1931.  
.@PiersMorgan @SusannaReid100 It's not a 2nd referendum it's an informed referendum. Leave never stopped talking about Norway & shouted 'Project Fear' at any suggestion we wouldn't have full access to the Single Market. A vote on pre-written legislation would be true democracy. 
The OBR confirms on page 6 of its July report into Fiscal Sustainability that the promise of a Brexit dividend for the NHS is more Brexit Bull:  
I strongly suggest everyone to watch this!! Particularly any unionists who I don't have blocked could you be so kind as to share!! Britain is already on its knees. Brexit will see bankruptcy!! Can we all share this please. Excellent report. 
Thousands of disgruntled Tory Brexit voters have joined UKIP since Theresa May’s crunch Chequers summit, party insiders claim  
You know why the last Calexit campaign collapsed? Because the leader literally went to live in Russia. But @nigel_farage still involved in new campaign (why?!)  & which is being run by Gerry Gunster. Who worked with Farage & Banks in Brexit.  
Anna Soubry is right, there should be a national unity government. Brexit is the biggest sudden change to our country since World War Two. This mustn't be controlled by some hard-right money-hoarding backbenchers with a vested interest in chaos and no care about who gets hurt 
How is Jacob Rees-Mogg, who has never held any government office, who has lied to us, who will be taking his money out of the UK for safety, who has no mandate for a hard #Brexit, running our country? Please tell me how this is not a right-wing coup.  
Great from @susannareid100 on Brexit - "People voted for ice cream or no ice cream, they didn't know what flavour they were getting". 
There will be no Brexit dividend says Budget watchdog.  
John Mann Labour pro Brexit rebel: "If we can't get a deal with the European Union then we're in trouble". There it is. Summed up in one idiotic sentence. 
How is Jacob Rees-Mogg, who has never held any government office, who has lied to us, who will be taking his money out of the UK for safety, who has no mandate for a hard #Brexit, running our country? Please tell me how this is not a right-wing coup. 
MPs removed the legal safeguards that would have enabled an annulment of the referendum outcome if there was material cheating.  
I don't disagree with @Anna_Soubry on the issue of Brexit this week shows that any one entrenched position will not get through the commons and we need to work together collegiately for the country. 
As a @UKLabour supporter for 40 years I’m disgusted that I am hearing more from Tories like Anna Soubry, Phillip Lee and even Nicholas Soames on how to protect the people of this country from the disaster of #Brexit than I am from our leader @jeremycorbyn 
Never forget.John Major negotiated & signed the Maastricht treaty in 1992, that took this Country into the EU.He denied the people a referendum on that treaty, then presided over taking our freedom & independence away.  
.And now a proponent of all this says there should be a National Unity Gov’t to stop #Brexit and seriously says that @Jacob_Rees_Mogg is running the country.I fear this Remainer is truly deranged! 
In retrospect, maybe we just shouldn't have had Brexit?  
Brexit referendum must be 're-run' after Vote Leave referred to police for breaking electoral law, MPs demand  
Anyone who hasn't realised that brexit is dead is just not paying attention. 
The Government's own spending watchdog, the Office for Budget Responsibility, has confirmed that the "Brexit Dividend" is a myth.Brexit isn’t just a mess, it’s one gigantic myth.  
Look forward to hearing @STVNews @BBCScotlandNews explain to viewers/listeners the amendments brought by their majority snp mps elected representatives over the last 2 days and how they were voted down in WM #brexit 
40+ years in giant single market & customs union sharing same rules on freedom of goods, services, capital and people and still not realizing how much it is in UK’s interest to be in the EU and how much of a nightmare leaving is. Instead, we make a referendum result sacrosanct. 
Let's be absolutely crystal fucking clear, a No Deal #Brexit is the very worst possible outcome for our country. 2,800,000 jobs is only the tip of the iceberg. It cannot and must not be allowed to happen. Nobody, voted to be poorer, to be jobless. @UKLabour, do your fucking job. 
If #Mogg was running the UK we wouldn't be in this mess. Brexit would have been fought for, not surrendered. HS2 & foreign aid would have been reconsidered. Anna Soubry would not be in parliament. Food, clothing & footwear would be much cheaper. If only Carlsberg did politics.  
I get the history & I understand the fact that abstentionism is a policy pursued by Sinn Fein but surely now when there is a chance to positively influence the Brexit situation and therefore help Ireland - North & South - using your key votes in Westminister is necessary 
Beaconsfield Conservative’s are making moves to deselect Dominic Grieve.All this talk about Hard Brexiteers and them being in The minority is coming home to roost for that smallof Hard Remainers who increasingly look likely toall face deselection.#brexit 
If nothing else, the past 10 days have exploded the idea that the EU27 need to "punish" Britain over Brexit  in order to deter other members from leaving. Nobody could administer a more brutal and humiliating punishment than Britain is inflicting on itself. 
Theresa May has consistently proved that she is incapable of leading the country through Brexit. We now need a cross-party cabinet to form a government of national unity to work out a solution to Brexit and to avoid the nightmare of a ‘no deal’ hard Brexit. 
Soubry's having a hissy fit this morning.It'll be a glorious day of Remoaner tears.We're one step closer to a No Deal #Brexit & realistically that's all we can hope for from this arrogant EU. 
Please answer me this Brexiteers. When you cast your eyes upon the chaos, fraud, backstabbing, cheating, lying and bitching going on at Westminster, do you not agree that sovereignty maybe overrated? Do you really want to take back control and give it to these imbeciles? #Brexit 
Brexiteers have abandoned promises of sunlit uplands leaving their only argument for Brexit that it is a democratic necessityBut now that we know there was manipulation, and both main Leave campaigns broke electoral law, there is no argument for Brexit 
The gravestone mum commissioned for my dad already has her name on it, that’s how committed she is to this country: she fully intends to stay in the UK literally forever. It’s her home. Brexit can’t change reality. #OneOfThe3Million 
Never thought I’d say this about a Tory, but I would welcome @Anna_Soubry as PM right now. She was spot-on on #r4today: Rees-Mogg is currently running the country and he’s driving it towards a cliff edge, without a mandate to do so. Brexit insanity. 
Read this. The hard core Remainers on the Conservative benches are a cancer on the body politic.  May naturally seeks to appease them and deliver the “soft” Brexit we did not want. She must fall.  
Have you lost the plot @Anna_Soubry? “Include the sensible SNP in a government of national unity”. You realise that the SNP only exist to break up the nation? All for unity, but they are the opposite of it. Be very careful with my country please #Brexit #IndyRef2 
Chairman of parliament's European Scrutiny Committee Sir Bill Cash tells LBC a summons has been issued for Theresa May's chief Brexit negotiatior Olly Robbins to appear before the committee. 
.@Jacob_Rees_Mogg is running the country, not the PM says @Anna_Soubry. "He and this group are running the country and have no mandate for their hard Brexit" #r4today 
Anna Soubry has just called for a ‘Government of national unity’ with MPs from all parties to stop a hard Brexit  
.@Anna_Soubry on fire on @BBCRadio4 #Today - calling for a Government of National Unity and claiming @Jacob_Rees_Mogg is running the country. #Brexit. 
On balance, for all the Brexit drama of the last couple of weeks, votes of last couple of days, nothing has changed. Backstop (Northern Ireland or UK wide), close relationship based around EEA, extension of time, or no deal.  
Blimey. Anna Soubry calls for a government of national unity made up of "sensible, pragmatic" MPs from across the Commons to avoid a hard Brexit.  Says that would not include Labour's frontbench. #r4today 
Yet another “honest mistake” by this govt.In normal parlance = cheating. What this govt will do to push through Brexit...#BrexitMeansBrexit #VoteLeave #VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw 
Democracy in UK an illusion - "What is the point of having strict rules over elections and referendums if there are no consequences for them being broken?” 
Dan has been triggered by Brexit and deploys obnoxious terms such as “Khamikaze Brexiteers” to demonise those politicians seeking to deliver the will of the people. Don’t be like Dan.  
Vote Leave cheated. They overspent by a massive amount. This overspend could've influenced the result.The ref result is unsound. It is flawed.It should not be respected by any person concerned for democracy, leave or remain.#FBPE #StopBrexit #brexit 
‘The clue is in the name - the job of the OPPOSITION is to OPPOSE. Alas, we haven’t seen much of that lately, except opposing those seeking to root out anti-semitism from within the Labour party itself. Least of all on Brexit.’  Opening of my column this week in @TheNewEuropean 
I hear this a lot from Leavers - they seem to believe the EU is dragging its feet on a post-Brexit FTA with the UK. An FTA is a massive step down from EU membership, but that’s UK’s inexplicable choice. The EU is ready to negotiate one w UK as soon as UK gets its shit together.  
Check out my piece on how Brexit is feeding Britain’s appetite for imperial mythology in the academy #Brexit #Biggar #Gilley #ThirdWorldQuarterly for @openDemocracy 
The Brexit jihadis are frogmarching us into a future of 1950s-style food shortages. AND NOBODY IS DOING ANYTHING ABOUT IT. #PeoplesVoteNow 
It is now a LEGAL FACT that both Leave campaigns deliberately broke the law on a massive fully coordinated illegal scale to win the Brexit referendum@BorisJohnson @michaelgove broke the law & should be in jail  #VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw #VoteLeaveCheated 
Christopher Chope, of upskirting fame, strikes again. This time the obviously woman-hating Tory MP objected to a motion allowing women to make use of the House of Commons. This would be big news, but it seems the Brexit shambles is the only news right now. Shame on you, Chope. 
The UK financial system is well-placed to cope with the immediate aftermath of a no-deal #Brexit thanks to efforts made by the Bank of England to test their readiness, Mark Carney has said “It will be worse in Europe than it is here” 
Trump used the same playbook as Brexit, the same money people as Brexit (Mercer/Bannon) and the same data operation (Cambridge Analytica). 7/9. @carolecadwalla writes more here: 
News broke this week from the Brexit investigation in the U.K. that data from Cambridge Analytica was accessed by servers in Russia. 5/9.   
When facts are distorted and truth is thwarted people can be led astray. There is no way Brexit is good for the people. Not today, not any time in the future and also not yesterday. #StopBrexitSaveBritain 
Remain would trounce Leave in a 'three-way" referendum hands down.It would win 50% in the first round (nearly enough for a knock-out) and 55% taking second preferences into account.'Leave with no deal' can only muster 33% and 'Leave with deal' a puny 17%.Get ready people!  
If a NoDeal Brexit leaves the EU worse off than the UK I’m not seeing why that is a problem?I see that as a result.   
You know things would be so much easier if after the Brexit vote, David Cameron had just said “Sorry, there was a misprint, I meant wouldn’t. It should have said ‘The government wouldn’t implement your decision’”.  
Theresa May’s Brexit plan narrowly survives in Parliament, casting doubt on whether she can negotiate an exit deal with EU  
As Theresa Sméagol Tories continue to lie and cheat... Brexit chaos!!! Jeremy Corbyn’s Labour have taken a massive **5 point lead in the polls 41% - 36% its a **9 point swing it’s MASSIVE!!! Believe!!!    Hahahaha!!!!! Where are the headlines???  
The present British government should indeed be invited to go on their summer recess... and not fucking come back.The referendum was a fraud, article 50 should be rescinded, a new government should be formed and we should mulligan this whole disasterous period of self-abuse. 
It’s time to walk away Mrs May! #brexit  
Off to the Great Driffield Show today, competing our blue cob Ted, expecting silver !I bet Doris will be getting a slating for her Brexit betrayal if the Great Yorkshire Show is anything to go by.70% Leave up here in god's own county. 
We don’t need to reconfirm the referendum, we just need politicians willing to implement the result.  
When Tories talk of "clean #Brexit", it's code for something dirty, mean & underhand. On Monday Anna Soubry exposed the dirty secret at the heart of #Brexit: we, the "little people" will be sacrificed on the altar of Tory ideology. It's not too late. #StopBrexitSaveBritain 
Grandkids: Grandad, tell us about the Great Brexit Farce of 2016-2019...where you completely screwed over the city you were supposed to represent?Thomson: Well y'see kids, for me it was all about rubbing shoulders with people I admired, and collecting mementos like this...  
The Brexit campaign has been fined and referred to the police for breaking electoral law || via; Businessinsider  
Official #Brexit campaign broke electoral law  
Theresa May survives a Brexit test in Parliament — this time by just 6 votes  
Vote Leave, which campaigned for Brexit in the 2016 referendum, has been fined for breaking electoral law, U.K.'s Electoral Commission says   
Why should we be a tax collector for EU?' Brexiteer Patel in passionate Brexit defence  
Spot on. Majority of them want to frustrate #Brexit. They should take the words of @David_Cameron to heart:"The British people have made a choice, that not only needs to be respected but those on the losing side of the argument - myself included - should help to make it work."  
The UK might be left with “a lot of idle bankers” if a hard Brexit as much of the demand for their services comes from the EU.His comments come after the Bank warned that contracts worth £ trillions between UK & EU banks may collapse following Brexit.  
It is clear Tories have fiddled every election yet this corrupt party gets away with sweeping all scandals & all corruption firmly under the rug! Brexit was all about keeping the offshore accounts secret by any means necessary! Tories killed democracy! 
Electoral Commission  -  "The Referendum result should no longer be pretended to represent any mandate.".#Brexit #PeoplesVote 
Trump's thoughts on Brexit is like a college student trying to pull off a presentation on a book they didn't read  
Brexit will decimate the UK on the global stage and everyone knows it  
DTCC to open Dublin office in preparation for Brexit  
Another populist party has taken the lead in national elections in Europe. The Swedish Democrats are leading the Social Democrats by 25.6% to 21.2%. The Swedish Democrats are a nationalist, anti-immigration party whose manifesto policies include a referendum on EU membership. Ha 
On her first meeting with Trump (pic above), she wore a brooch her mother wore to her dad's funeral. The blue suit she wore before at Brexit meeting. The next 2 brooches she donned while Trump there, a Canadian gift of maple leaf & the Obamas' gift to her. hehe 
Brexit: the House of Stupid -  if the House of Commons can't do better than it has been doing, it doesn't deserve to exist. Largely, it is devoting time to party political games and internecine squabbles. It has become the House of Stupid...  #Brexinfo. 
It also doesn't allow for passporting of financial or professional services. Nor does it eliminate the need for border checks on goods.I know you lot are trying to weave a "betrayal" narrative for when your Brexit plans go wrong but at least try to find some factual basis... 
Airbus CEO Tom Enders says American companies are “the best hope” to convince President Trump to stop escalating trade tensions: “I’d like them to be as vocal as we are over here with Brexit”  
If May is genuine about duty to UK, possible Russian meddling in the EU referendum on top of everything else that has emerged should be reason enough to withdraw Article 50 notice pending investigation. If she is intent on ploughing on regardless, her motives are very suspect.  
It’s Official: The Brexit Campaign Cheated Its Way to Victory  via @thedailybeast 
Sir John Major talking sense calling for a #PeoplesVote on Brexit. He faced down the hard-right anti-European fundamentalists in the 90s.We can do the same again today.  
Did you know: In the 2005 referendum, 97 percent of constituencies in BC voted in favour of proportional representation? A total of 57.7 percent of the province voted for STV (single transferable vote). 
The UK is fining pro-Brexit group Vote Leave $80,000 for breaking a campaign spending limit in the run up to the 2016 referendum. (Brexit is probably still happening, though.)  
'Brexit dividend' for NHS a myth, Government's official spending watchdog confirms.The Office for Budget Responsibility confirmed that Brexit is more likely to weaken than strengthen the public finances.So paint that on a bus and #StopBrexit. 
1) Withdraw the Article 50 notice. 2) Prosecute the leaders of VoteLeave. 3) Forget Brexit and resume life in the real world.  
UK, YouGov pollEU membership referendum (three-way question)First preference:Remain: 50%Leave with deal: 17%Leave without deal: 33%Second preference:Remain: 55%Leave with no deal: 45%Field work: 16/07/18 – 17/07/18Sample size: 1657 
Public opinion is divided on whether Brexit is just a really terrible idea or a really terrible idea that you have to pretend isn't a terrible idea. 
By today this debased Tory Govt should've been on its way out instead it keeps pursuing a course of action based upon an illegal Campaign & to impose an invalid #Brexit upon an increasingly reluctant maj who don't want it.Only a #FinalSay & a #StopBrexit option can validate it. 
#IStandWithJeremyCorbyn Amazing isn't it don't you think that these attacks on Labour, Anti- Semitism, Paedophilia etc, etc, always seem to occur at key points in Labour activity eg. crucial votes in the House on Brexit debates - coincidence? #ToriesOut #BlairitesOut #JC4PM 
BBC plays a good game of inverted commas.Why "Brexit campaign 'broke electoral law' in referendum", not "Brexit campaign broke electoral law in 'referendum'"?Why "Gove wanted 'different feel' to Vote Leave", not "Gove 'wanted' different feel to Vote Leave"? 
"At every level -- from day-to-day politics... to the small print of the bill -- the [UK] government is seeking to maximise its own power & limit that of MPs & peers.If it's parliamentary sovereignty you’re looking for, you've come to the wrong Brexit."  
If you want understand the anti-Semitism problem that Corbyn’s Labour has, just read the comments below Chuka’s tweet. Corbynites refuse to even acknowledge the issue and view it as a plot to dispose Corbyn.They’re the same when you criticise him on Brexit. It’s Stalinesque.  
And Labour should be emphasising that Brexit is ideological not economic. The people driving it do not give a crap about the wealth and wellbeing of the nation. They have the cash and comfort that it won’t affect them. 
Who would have thought it...? Apparently "There is no Brexit Dividend"! #THEREISNOBREXITDIVIDEND 
15,000 votes tonight alone. Sign then share.  Petition: Rescind Art.50 if Vote Leave has broken Electoral Laws regarding 2016 referendum  
Wanting to honour the result of the referendum does not make the Tory Brexit rebels “fanatics”.  
#Brexit & #TrumpRussia are the same scandal. The US, UK, & EU are under attack by Russia. 
The Remain use of uber data to manipulate voter influence in EU referendum is a scandal as big as Facebook & Cambridge Analytics.The protection of illegal Uber by Cameron & May and ensuing 'light touch' regulation policy is disgraceful 
The next few months look set to be truly chaotic in UK politics - I'm not prone to crying wolf - and I have watched and waited since the Brexit vote. If it all calms down I will happily admit to having misread it - but this feels like a mess no-one can now fix. The baw's burst.. 
If I am wrong about #Brexit I will have egg on my face and will have to eat humble pie.If you are wrong about Brexit then you will have to live with your deluded arrogance making the entire country poorer and losing 2,800,000 jobs, one of which will hopefully be yours. 
Lying, Cheating & Charlatanism #Brexit is based upon these attributes...Our Democracy is truly under threat from a FarRight coup now being imposed upon the Ppl.We must be given a #FinalSay with a #StopBrexit option; only a #PeoplesVote can now legitimise leaving the EU. #FBPE 
OI!!! Brexit!!! I get that you want to make us poorer... I get that you want to cut off the free movement of British people. I get that you want to permanently politically disenfranchise younger generations.But for *** sake, Stop making me quote Tories!!! 
Should there be a second Brexit referendum? | Letters  
French girl meets Welsh boy in a pub. Fast forward: girl has been living in the UK for a decade (with said Welsh boy) and becomes #OneOfThe3Million after the Brexit referendum. #inLimbo since then. Brexit is blooming personal #EUcitizensChampion 
If you are able to read then I hope you'll read this chart. You are presently supporting the loss of between 700,000 & 2,800,000 UK jobs + the decimation of the UK economy. Am just wondering how you sleep at night considering you're supposed to be a democratic Socialist. #Brexit  
BOOM! Apart from the spies, the dark money, there's the data. Chair of Select Committee confirms the heart of the collusion in #CambridgeAnalytica's database of psychometric profiles of millions of Facebook users.This is #Trump #Brexit #Russia - the joint information warfare 
May survives 24 hours of BREXIT CHAOS (just) as leadership threat SEEN OFF  
I am in serious need of someone to tweet me to tell me Mr Corbyn @jeremycorbyn is still playing a long game, that he doesn't want #Brexit and supports a #PeoplesVote.So that I can tell you to go and fucking fuck yourself and your deluded fucking delusion. Who's first? 
No-deal Brexit would have big economic consequences – Carney  
Thangan.  You just said (Bristol News)  “we must respect the result of the referendum”.The EC says just the reverse.  Leave cheated on a scale that says the Referendum cannot be a mandate or reflect “the will of the people”. I hope you will correct your earlier suggestion.  
No-deal Brexit screws us in so many ways. Here’s another:  
So, the Tory Party are lying again about money for the NHS.There's no Brexit Bonus & no £20billion for the NHS because as we all know, Brexit will be the biggest financial disaster to hit the UK since WW2  
#BBC, state of play: Today, @ElectoralCommUK confirmed #VoteLeave, led by the 'big beasts' of the #Tory party, cheated, lied & broke the law in order to upend democracy & trigger the biggest constitutional crisis in modern times.Yet, not one single utterance on @BBCNewsnight 
Sing it with @albawhitewolf kids...There is no Brexit Dividend 
John Major said something similar. After my 34 years party membership never senior Conservative party figures think the unthinkable as openly as now over this Brexit debacle.The party is deeply divided and pro Europeans like me never been so isolated.  
No matter how bad things seem, no matter how low you feel, now is nothing compared to where we will be if #Brexit is allowed to proceed unchecked. Do not give up, do not give in. We will prevail, Brexit must not. I will not give up, I will not give in. Stand with me. 
There has been a material change of circumstances and there must be now be another referendum on independence for Scotland in 2019 - the Westminster system is utterly broken and we are heading for a disastrous, chaotic shitshow of a hard Brexit 
Thanks @Keir_Starmer Presumably you do recognise that around half of the electorate, who are pro-European Union, want absolutely nothing to do with Brexit? You’ve a legal, analytical mind, how do you square that circle?  
As Kate Hoey continues to vote with the hard right wing of the Tories, a brief reminder of the lies her campaign put out last year about how she backed the Labour manifesto position on brexit. Cc @OwenJones84 @Peston @mrjamesob @faisalislam @RosamundUrwin 
Brexit White Paper has now been published in EU languages, incl. Polish.Funnily, the first translation error can be seen before you even open the file. It should read "Polski", not "Polskie".Inside the paper the translation is mostly correct, but stylistically dodgy.  
Graham Stringer, the Labour MP now working with Jacob Rees-Mogg's ERG to secure a hard #Brexit, is also a climate change "sceptic".This is something he shares with almost all the leading Brexiters. #ClimateChange denial comes very easily to people contemptuous of evidence. 
Labour calls for inquiry into ministers actions during EU referendum  
Here’s some evidence, Britain’s gov tried to rig the referendum and used tax payers money to do it...  
Was a gut wrenching decision to leave Labour a party I had been in for over twenty years a few months ago but subsequent and now today's events have proved me right. And sadly now they are effectively pro Brexit  and racist than I could no more vote for them than I could UKIP. 
Dominic Grieve has just spelled out the potential impact of a no deal #Brexit, it will lead to a Constitutional/Security Crisis, this is what the Rees-Mogg and his extremist pals are prepared to do to our country, its up to ppl like Mr. Grieve to stop this #Newsnight #StopBrexit 
A referendum won by lies, racism and cheating is dragging our country to the brink of an abyss. It's a disgrace to our democracy. 
If we don't move before March 2019 it's game over. If Brexit goes ahead, plans to destroy devolution are already in place on day one. It's direct rule or independence folks. Tell everyone you meet cause the media won't. #DissolveTheUnion 
Plan "WE'LL GO OVER THE HEAD OF @MichelBarnier DIRECTLY TO THE EU LEADERS BY TRANSLATING OUR  BREXIT PLAN INTO MANY EUROPEAN LANGUAGES" is working wonderfully.  
May sees off Brexit rebels with narrow victory in crunch customs vote  
I've long thought that the BBC's coverage of Brexit has been abysmal. I don't watch their news output any more and I think John Humphrys in particular has been absolutely awful. 
Precisely why Brextremist will not allow it under any circumstances as they fear that their lies have been exposed and Brexit could be reversed so #FinalSay chances still very slim sadly. 
Several Brexity Labour MPs tonight prevented a quick collapse of this, the worst government since the 1930s, & a quick General Election. For the Brexit Taliban of all political hues, nothing is getting between them & their 72 virgins. Least of all success for their parties.  
BREAKING: No 10 has announced the PM misspoke. She meant to say: Brexit *doesn’t* mean Brexit. 
Another reason to sack the anti-Brexit muppet John Bercow: he’s the ‘do-nothing’ regulator of the corrupt Electoral Commission: 
Second Brexit vote was always the Remainers' game plan — we must not let it happen  
#NewsNight - We need to bypass the bullying Brexiteers & get the human cost of a no deal Brexit out to the public - this is real peoples' lives, not political ideology! Trying to do my bit - article in @NewStatesman today 
Since when was it up to the House of Commons to decide what form of BrExit we get? We picked that House of Commons based on manifestos, which are a contract with the British people. #Newsnight 
Tory MP Brandon Lewis was 'paired' with new mother & Lib Dem MP Jo Swinson for the day's Brexit votes in Parliament - meaning there was an agreement that neither vote. The vote tally was close, so Brandon Lewis voted - breaking the long-held convention #Cheat #NastyParty 
Brilliant piece from @helentbbc on #newsnight showing #pharma preparation for #Brexit. Every month 37m packs of medicine move from EU to UK. That's why frictionless trade & cooperation on #medicine regulation must be agreed. Read more here:  
Conservative MP Dominic Grieve says the threat of a no-deal Brexit might mean “the break-up of the current party system” #newsnight 
Government spending watchdog has torpedoed myth of NHS Brexit dividend as demands for new referendum grow - The Independent  
Tonight on @RTUKnews I discussed Brexit votes, the ‘13 Scottish Tory charlatans’ and Labour being ‘unfit for opposition, never mind government’.  
Let's take tonight's vote for example. 4 Labour MPs  voted with the Tories and 14 missed the vote. 2 lib dems and snp also missed the vote. Now spin the yarn sdlp would have stopped it.Isn't it time to call for a border poll?Fact, nationalism rejects westiminister #Brexit  
Remain spent more on the referendum (£19,070566) than Leave did (£13,436,241). And that's without the £9 million government leaflet and the full weight of the 'establishment' factored in.  #GetOverIt you lost 
The Brexit white paper has now been published in Bulgarian, Croatian, Czech, Danish, Dutch, Estonian, Finnish, French, German, Greek, Hungarian, Italian, Latvian, Lithuanian, Maltese, Polish, Portuguese, Romanian, Slovak, Slovene, and Spanish   
I must say, I'm rather looking forward to Brexit. Once we can set our own laws again, I'll be able to hire all the neighbours' kids as chimney sweeps and hire them out via my new app "SootBook©".The £££s will just come flooding in.Chim-chim-cheroo.#newsnight @LBC #r4today 
People throw around the phrase "no-deal Brexit" glibly with no idea what chaos would ensue when 40+ years of legal arrangements vanish overnight. Perhaps we're about to learn the hard way - thread from @kevinhorourke 
No deal Brexit would have 'big consequences', Mark Carney warns - Mark Carney has also got every prediction wrong so far !! 
7 in 10 Tory constituencies voted Leave.6 in 10 Labour constituencies voted Leave.Dear Tory and Labour parties, if you cannot deliver a real #Brexit despite these numbers, you are not fit to govern, you are not part of British democracy.You'd've destroyed British democracy!  
There is no Brexit dividend.  This is not a joke, this is people’s lives, facts matter, the truth is not relative, don’t stop being shocked by the deceit of those in power, just because it’s constant and brazen.  #FactsMatter 
Latest YouGov poll for The Times shows why Brexiters are desperate to avoid a #PeoplesVote, despite clear evidence that the #Brexit referendum was tainted by extensive criminality.They know they would lose. The lies just aren't working any  more.#StopBrexit #Newsnight 
What is Labour’s position then? Either take government down or quit hiding behind the ridiculous six Brexit tests or clarify where you stand.  
Wah ha ha haWhat a right old fankle these British Nationalists have got themselves intoNow they can't even trust each other any moreBring on the Second Independence Referendum and let's get Scotland out of harm's way Wouldn't want to get tainted by their mess  
This no longer has anything to do with Brexit or the future prosperity of Britain or British people or sovereignty. It's about the Tories clinging on to power. #brexit 
Unfortunately the BBC’s investigative role seems to have been suppressed. Only investigations approved by senior management are allowed. Otherwise by now we would have the biggest documentary ever looking over the Carole Cadwalladr evidence. Stop Brexit. #FBPE 
Westminster #Brexit vote to keep UK in the Customs Union lost by five votes tonight. Sinn Fein's 7 MPs could have changed Brexit completely, safeguarding Northern Ireland & jobs in the Republic. 
This is IMPORTANT. Both Vote Leave and Leave EU broke the law and cheated in the EU referendum. The BBC trims around this. And they never mention that, with the help of Putin and Bannon, both campaigns used RACISM to win the vote  
NEW: Labour will never support Theresa May's flawed Brexit blueprint“I have a very clear message for Theresa May – if you think Labour will support your fatally flawed Chequers’ agreement, then you have another thing coming,” @Keir_Starmer 
I know lots of people who intensely dislike @sinnfeinireland are suggesting their MPs should have taken their seats in London to stop the Brexit vote - that’s delusional.There are 650 MPs@sinnfeinireland have 7Only 603 MPs voted - do the maths! 
Come on Keir, we've been seeking to improve Brexit for 2 years and things have never looked so bad. All we've got to show for it are lower living standards, a slide to the right and failed amendments.It's time to oppose Brexit in the national interest. 
POLL: More Tories See Farage as a ‘Brexit Leader’ Than May   
Huge #Remain majority in a new Brexit referendum, latest poll shows.The public would now vote to Remain by 55% to 45% in a “three way” question referendum, according to tonight’s @YouGov poll for The Times.#StopBrexit #PeoplesVote 
On the day the Electoral Commission decides Vote Leave broke the law, the majority of Tory MPs voted to save their careers, even though it means driving through the most extreme, insane version of a mandate that we now know was corrupted. #Brexit 
Just getting my head around last 48 hrs. @ScotTories voted against their own constituents, @LabourParty voted to keep @Conservatives in power and Parliament voted itself out of sovereignty and threw the UK off a cliff. Do I have that right? #brexit #YouYesYet 
I would like to thank those democracy supporting Labour MPs for honouring their manifesto commitment and the Conservative manifesto commitment to leaving the Customs Union. Shame @Anna_Soubry didn't feel able to support her own party AGAIN. Are you listening @BroxtoweCons #Brexit  
God what a mess Brexit is. The UK really believes the world cares what we think. We are too small and too old for anyone to care. The EU gave us power in the modern world. 
How @Jacob_Rees_Mogg and ERG may have taken decisive step towards hard Brexit (and the reason is not what you think)  
One leading City figure told me today that many people there would prefer even Corbyn to this chaotic & self-destructive Brexit. 'Even if he nationalises everything it can all be privatised again,' he said. 'You can't undo the damage of Brexit.'  
Would you call a country where the campaign that won a referendum on a knife edge broke the law, where it needed a £1bn bribe to an extremist party to form the government, and the PM can only win votes by blackmailing her MPs with an election, a fully functioning democracy? 
It seems that Brexit Derangement Syndrome is spreading among Remoaners......  
“11 per cent of people who voted for Brexit in 2016 would now vote to remain in the EU, while 6 per cent of people who voted Remain would now vote for Brexit.” @YouGov @BestForBritain #peoplesvoteIt’s time to put the decision on Brexit to the people  
News just reported the Electoral Commission says Darren Grimes “fined” £20k for alleged offence in Referendum. Think about it. A Regulator can “fine” people. The Bill of Rights (1689), which is still in force, says no one can be fined without a criminal conviction. It’s unlawful. 
⁦@YouGov⁩ polling on voting intentions and attitudes to a referendum Clear lead for staying in the EU and building on our current termsIt’s time for a #peoplesvote 
This is Brilliant Give it a wee bit of time Lets let the tories red or blue destroy themself's very Quickly over Brexit Then BANG WE MOVE #Indyref2 Happens TIME TO GET READY TROOPS 
Brining Brexit Back - The Anthem 
Apparently Margaret Hodge launched an attack on The Gandhi Foundation International Peace Award for 2013 winner, Jeremy Corbyn, after the Brexit vote, calling him an “anti-Semite & a racist”. In other news, Labour have a poll lead over the Tories for the first time since March. 
Like the voters, John Major got it right the first time: "there won't be another referendum on Europe. This is it." #RightTheFirstTime 
So it turns out I was right.Trump IS a traitor, and Brexit's leaders DID cheat the British people.But it's a hollow victory.Like when Ian Malcolm said Jurassic Park was a bad idea, but no one listened and he ended up with a mangled leg and that shitty sequel no one liked. 
I suppose in a way the Tories have united the country. None of us have a clue what's going on. #Brexit 
Thanks for the 293 Conservative MPs & The Ulster Unionists for respecting the Brexit referendum vote .....oh yes and 4 Labour MPs 
I see the Express is going big on the fact the Leave campaign has been fined and referred to the police for breaking electoral law... ...oh hang on, it's not that story at all. Yet they seem so keen on Brexit stories normally.  
Dad, that rat tasted funnyBut son, we've got a positive post-Brexit vision.  
What a day...my party tries to redefine anti-semitism, the Government fails to do anything about an illegal referendum which led to Brexit, and Parliament fails to win crucial votes that would protect jobs and industry. #timeforgin 
Against this backdrop I’m glad that members from across the House supported my efforts to defend our NHS from the ravages of an ideological Brexit by protecting our access to medicines. Evidence-based politics are best and it is fundamental that we protect our health service 
Whatever your view on #Brexit, the way this Government has treated @UKParliament on the issue, especially in the last couple of days, is bad for democracy and a betrayal of everyone in our country whose interests it’s our job to represent 
Scottish Brexit minister says 2nd EU vote “now essential” following revelations Vote Leave broke electoral law   
SHAMEFUL: MP who has just had a baby accuses Govt of 'cheating' over crunch #Brexit vote after breaking agreement  
On the day the Electoral Commission finds that Vote Leave cheated in the referendum, OUR ACTUAL GOVERNMENT CHEATS IN PARLIAMENT.This is a coup carried out by desperate criminals.  
"So what's the plan with Brexit?"Theresa May:   
The poll shows that a majority also think the problem has something to do with political correctness.It’s amazing how the politicians doubt the little people so often.That’s why they were shocked with Brexit!                  #ma4t 
The British people deserve better than all of this: the grubby referendum campaign, the lies, the careerism, the MPs who put power above the voters, the spineless Commons voting, the pandering to populism, the tribalism, the stupidity, the bloated egos. We have all been let down. 
There will be no second referendum however support for Brexit has dramatically increased, many people like myself who voted Remain are now firm Brexit supporters due to the manipulation, collusion, bullying and greed of the EU negotiators.Brexit is Brexit no deal.  
Wednesday's FT: "May restores frail grip on Brexit by seeing off pro-Europe rebels"  #BBCPapers #tomorrowspaperstoday (via @AllieHBNews) 
MP on maternity leave accuses Government of 'cheating' over crunch Brexit vote after breaking agreement  
Further clarifications. Bill Clinton “I did have sex with that woman”, Theresa May “Brexit does not mean Brexit” JFK “I am not a Berliner”  
We need Indy vote before #Brexit, or we can kiss SNHS goodbye  
EU and Japan sign historic free trade deal after rush to agree terms before Brexit  
An MP On Maternity Leave Says The Tory Chairman who was paired with her "Cheated" By Voting On Brexit  via @elashton 
Brexit: where are we now?Referendum was fraudulent: result standsDark money involved: result standsForeign influence: result standsCabinet ministers lied: result standsGovt has no majority: result standsCommons stalemate: result standsResult: No dealState of emergency 
For anyone who is confused about all of  this week's common's votes - it is about Conservatives saying - bugger you - bugger the UK - bugger Brexit - bugger corruption - just keep us in power - at any cost.  
Crucial Brexit Trade Bill passes, but by only six votes and with the help ofLabour rebels and Scottish Tories backing Government  
I am hopeful that, faced with approving a no-deal Brexit, the majority of MPs — the moderates from all parts of the House — will finally rebel and form a cross-party pact to vote for Remain.     It’s the only sane way for this to end. 
If we've learned one thing from investigating the money behind the Brexit campaign, its that the laws of British democracy are totally broken:  
An MP on maternity leave says the Tory chairman "cheated" by voting on Brexit  
Well done to the 12 rebels who voted to save jobs and avoid a calamitous hard Brexit.  
Given we signed up to the Democracy by Law Venice Commission’s Code of Good Practice in Referendums (See A24) the result is supposed to be annulled.By failing to do so I’d say MPs are exposing themselves to civil liability for the consequential losses from the Brexit process.  
Apparently Margaret Hodge launched an attack on The Gandhi Foundation International Peace Award for 2013 winner, Jeremy Corbyn, after the Brexit vote, calling him an “anti-Semite & a racist”. In other news, Labour have a poll lead over the Tories for the first time since March. 
Maguire talks like the London-based ardent Remainer that he is. Leave voters in the Labour heartlands should take note that only 4 Labour MPs were brave enough to vote for what 70% of Labour constituencies voted for in 2016 - and that was #Brexit  
New mum Jo Swinson says government 'cheated' in Brexit vote @joswinson 
WTF is this? Labour Leave supported the Government, the Labour Party didn’t.Let’s be honest. The Labour Party don’t represent #Brexit. They represent themselves. Labour Leave are clearly at odds with that. Thank you for supporting #Brexit but let’s be honest. Eh?  
With some cons the victims are so embarrassed they won't accept they've been scammed. Brexit - as manipulated by Vote Leave,  Leave EU and the far-right mob behind Cambridge Analytica  - is a scam up there with The Emperor's New Clothes. The victims are exposed but in denial 
Justine Greening has called for a second referendum despite standing for Parliament on a party manifesto that promised to leave the EU:  #BrexitBetrayal 
In Brussels in 2006 a small British-led team working for Peter Mandelson produced a new EU trade strategy. We called it “Global Europe”. It has been a cornerstone of EU trade liberalisation ever since. #EUJapan #Brexit #givingupcontrol 
Am very pleased that the Commons have voted to reject Customs Union amendment.If UK is to make a success of Brexit it’s essential we have control of our trade policy. 
Join me on @SkyNews from 6.40am for your early morning papers. I would, I mean “wouldn’t” miss it. Steaming in for the ordinary man/woman on #brexit, Trump and the unedifying spectacle of Obama eulogising the Mandelas, without mentioning necklacing  
It occurs to me, the people who will probably be most noticeably impacted by no-deal Brexit are the middle class. The poorer people are probably more adaptable. The uber rich don't care. But the middle class are going to be in for a shitload of hurt. 
Brexit can be seen as talking a prescribed medication.We weighed up the Pros & Cons , and decided to take the medicine. Just as we are about to begin the medication, research has proven that the side effects & risk are much worse than thought. Is our pride worth the risk? 
Hostage May should recall that we are signatories to the Venice commission which states that campaign overspending is adequate grounds for annulling an election result. Our democratic systems are being undermined and it is May’s duty to defend them.... 
Excuse me as a constituent of mr field he is liked here in birkenhead and is a good mp what  gives u the right to tell labour  to remove his whip and stop him standing in future  he is standing by his constituents u voted leave in referendum 
The irony that David Davis got to exit from Brexit before the rest of us... 
These MPs voted to keep Britain shackled in EU customs trap:Heidi AllenGuto BebbKen ClarkeJonathan DjanoglyDominic GrieveStephen HammondPhilip LeeNicky MorganBob NeillAntoinette SandbachAnna SoubrySarah WollastonWe won't forget these #Brexit-blockers next election  
And all based on a referendum which we know now involved cheating. And as Pat McFadden pointed out, he raised concerns about this more than two years ago, during the referendum campaign. This government cannot say it was not warned. Reckless and immoral. 
@georgegalloway Here is an interesting article on @ChukaUmunna £147,000 from bankers to help finance his anti Brexit campaign. And he wrings his hands about Vote Leave?Well well well....... 
For 40 years clueless britnats & their Scots Labour shills lied about @theSNP bringing down Callaghan's government in '79. Now we can simply answer that 5 odious Labour MPs just enabled May's survival & ensured a ruinous no-deal brexit. #UseTheMandate #indyref2 #DissolveTheUnion 
Well done Kate Hoey, Frank Field, John Mann and Graham Stringer. Tonight they voted to preserve Brexit, the largest democratic vote in British history, supported by millions of working people. Thank God Labour still has some principled MPs. 
It's been a crazy week, and it's only Tuesday - so bear with me, what do Begbie and Margot Leadbetter have to do with Brexit?  - 
Me, I respect the result of the Electoral Commission investigation. Accordingly, I don't respect the result of the referendum. No right-thinking, honest individual would do so. Jeremy! 
Now come on, nobody's seriously falling for this are they? 
I cannot imagine how angry you & your colleagues are Jo . We are so angry for you . To use a woman’s pregnancy against her. Despicable. My God is there no depravity that this Govt will not stoop to or  no principle they will not sacrifice at the alter of Brexit? #NoRecess 
Simple pollDo you think the BBC has been impartial over Brexit? 
The point Nick Boles makes is true: lots of MPs oppose a no-deal Brexit. So why do I think chances of such a Brexit are now >50%? Because there won‘t be a vote on no-deal Brexit. If at all there‘ll be votes on various solutions preventing a no-deal Brexit. None has a majority.  
Brexit is so insane, I never thought UK would go through with it. It's why I didn't leave some time ago. I wonder how many businesses & industry are in the same boat. I'm feeling pretty despondent now. Its like a virus infecting western democracies that affects ability to reason. 
But where does this leave the validity of the referendum? The mandate for this awful Brexit? For jettisoning Parliamentary scrutiny for expediency? For ignoring 48% of the country who voted remain? (80% of Bristol West) for bringing our divided country back together? 
Let’s be clear. On every occasion, Tory Brexiteers have voted WITH the government.It’s the Remoaner Rebels who are risking bringing the government down. #brexit  
Airbus warns #Brexit risks its 40 years of success.Nice one #Leavers. Hope you're happy with yourselves. 
I want an Urgent review of entire referendum process but that is not enough. This govt has to start recognising the enormity of going into a disastrous situation for ideological reasons, with a referendum as their cover, which was won with methods including cheating 
The Tories ‘CHEATED to win crucial Brexit votes’ by lying to pregnant MP on Maternity Leave  
Hate to say it people but I think Theresa's doing a Jim hacker on us again. Getting just enough labour votes to make us think we won so we will except the bills even though it's not what we want. well I'm not fooled. Hard Brexit or nothing. Then negotiate.  SIMPLE as that. 
Well, I did say so many times.OBR confirms: There is no “Brexit dividend.”  
#Brexit. So, eh, what happens next?  
Hmmm Labour ahead in the polls, Tory party yet again falling apart, Brexit talks all over the place...so it was only a matter of time before the anti-semetic head raised itself once more. 
Wild to think that mandatory selection would have stopped a hard brexit.It's almost as if democracy.....is actually good and valuable. 
And so it begins....Britain jumps off a cliff towards a hard Brexit and straight into the arms of the WTO.  
Vote leave cheated to win the referendum.The Erg used the referendum to hijack the Conservative party and push for the most damaging Brexit possible.Now they are actually cheating at Voting in chambers to push through anti democracy legislation.The Joe Swinson incident new low 
“Help! I’ve voted in a Brexit amendment by mistake!”  
First, Brexiters cheated in the EU referendum.Now, they’re even cheating in votes in Parliament, to deprive an MP on maternity leave of her vote. What a disgrace. #StopBrexit. 
Peter Schrank on the Theresa May and the pressure over Brexit        - Political Cartoon Gallery in Putney  
Things people in Scotland need to know on #brexit:1) @ScotTories - like Boris - are prepared to sacrifice significant chunks of the economy because they think the hardest possible #brexit will frustrate Scottish independence;2) @UKLabour & @scottishlabour are cheering them on 
So @theresa_may won her vote against #Brexit rebels tonight in part by deceiving a new mum with a tiny baby? @joswinson had stayed away as she’d been assured she was ‘paired’ or told a Tory wouldn’t vote to cancel her out. This is outrageous. And from @BrandonLewis, TORY CHAIRMAN 
Here’s a definition of Brexit we can all agree on.  
Everyone, I have to say, I've got got 25 tabs open on Brexit, and 25 open on Trump, and not one of them is making me calm or relaxed. 
"Support for unification is rising on both sides of the border, and politicians and activists are scrambling to prepare for an eventuality they say suddenly seems more imminent". Well, that would certainly solve some tricky Brexit issues!  
My latest post on #pr4bc: No electoral system has a monopoly on either preventing or fostering far right parties, and those advancing claims to the contrary are merely cherry-picking examples to make mischief in this referendum.   
To everyone in UK politics/UK media trying to cajole the SNP into a second referendum about EU membership. Don't worry, the SNP are right behind it. It's called #indyref2 and it means that an independent Scotland will decide its membership status with the EU. So dinnae fash. 
Absolutely shocking betrayal of trust. A clear sign of how easily women’s rights will be traded for progress on #Brexit  
Lammy grows more demented by the day. Now calling for parliament to vote on a proposal to void the referendum. Utter lunacy.  
Whoa. Tonight, the government breached parliamentary convention to win its crucial Brexit vote. Tonight, it told pregnant women to stay away from Parliament - that they would be paired. No such pairing took place. A betrayal of the foundations of British Parliamentary Democracy 
Very very true.  We remained in the union after the 2014 referendum , we weren't very vocal or organised at that time. I'm confident any future indyref will be soundly defeated.  
Still don’t understand why don’t just Brexit on WTO rules & offer the EU a temporary (time limited) free trade deal on existing terms. (Remember; we buy more from them than we sell). The pressure from the EU multinationals in the EU to accept would’be huge. =UK in control  
If true this is about as low as you can go from the Tories - breaching a deal with a pregnant MP... #Brexit  
Every month, 37 million packs of medicine arrive in the UK from the EU and 45 million move the other way. It is essential that the UK continues to participate in the #EMA after #Brexit  
The 12 #Brexit traitors Heidi AllenKen ClarkeJonathan DjanoglyDominic GrieveStephen HammondPhillip LeeJeremy LefroyNicky MorganBob NeillAntoinette SandbachAnna SoubrySarah Wollaston 
#Brexit Britain on the ropes: UK debt forecast to rise to 283% over next 50 years: the middle range forecast from #OBR. Higher than Greece & would need £200 billion in tax rises. This puts into context those figs abt the deficit under Scottish independence. Graph from #c4news 
Winston Churchill’s grandson Sir Nicholas Soames on the Vote Leave Brexit scandal:“If we are to maintain the integrity and trust of the voting public the whole damn thing needs to be blown up and started again.”#StopBrexit 
Another totally depressing day at Westminster. UK now headed for hard brexit and it's dragging Scotland with it. All attempts to get Scotland's voice heard drowned out by Tory and Labour MPs. 
Anti-Semitism? RifeVirtue Signalling? RelentlessTerror appeasing? Of courseMarxism? That’s @UKLabour Bandwagon jumping? Do it for funBrexit? Full betrayalWe need an opposition which isn’t full of nasty, spiteful wankers. Retweet this  
Vote Leave has been slapped with a fine and reported to the police over spending breaches during the Brexit referendum  
You voted for a hard Brexit which will decimate Bassetlaw. And you’ve propped up the Tories. I am so disappointed that you would do this. It’s a betrayal. This was our chance! 
The weather has been lovely for the #OneOfThe3Million speakers today, but their situations are anything but rosy and re-assured. They have been living with the uncertainty of not having their rights guaranteed post-Brexit since the EU referendum in 2016.  
As @realDonaldTrump comes up with a senior moment excuse to why he acted treacherously.... Obama makes Americans remember what it was like to have a real president! 
Woah. Dirty tricks by the Tory chairman to win key Brexit vote?  
You just voted for a Tory hard Brexit.I used to respect you - but no more.A Tory hard Brexit will damage those on low incomes far more than even the Tories cuts & austerity. 
The argument that we must accept the Chequers fudge just does not add up. The No Deal Brexit card is already on the table for Theresa May — the widely misunderstood WTO, says economist Roger Bootle  
For some reason I don’t think Tom Brake wanted my advice that if Brexit is being debated in the Commons it might be worth Lib Dems hanging around  
Educated people know Scotland would prosper if it was on its own Don't let Tories or Labour politicians tell you everything will be fine after Brexit ! It won't the government's own analysis tells them it will take five decades to get the country out of debt.  
Petition: Rescind Art.50 if Vote Leave has broken Electoral Laws regarding 2016 referendum  
Airbus says Brexit puts at risk its '40 years of success'  
It's times like this that remind us how shit both our politicians and media are collectively. These votes don't mean anything without reference to what Brussels is willing to entertain - and has already made clear. #Brexit 
Stop banging on about Vote Leave and Leave_EU having broken the law in the referendum. It’s not as if it affected the result which it would have done had it been a close result like, say, 52-48. 
Brexit will decimate the UK on the global stage and everyone knows it | Via Independent  
A friend took a taxi to Newcastle airport. The driver chatted with her. They discussed Brexit. When he dropped her off, he admitted he’d voted to leave but he regretted it now. I hear a story like this almost everyday. @RemainerNow @peoplesvote_uk 
Reading about the Rump Parliament, & Cromwell's attempts to persuade the 'Royal Independents' that "what was done was done, and that sulking would not bring the king back", I find it impossible to stop myself from comparing Brexit to the execution of Charles I. 
DUP actions on defeating #Brexit Customs Union amendment illogical, says @StephenFarryMLA See more here - 
In vote after vote, after vote...The Conservative Party strip away safety nets.And push up the risk on Brexit.Upping the stakes.Tory MPs are literally gambling with our country.300 of them. 
U.K. lawmakers' Brexit divisions increase risk U.K. crashes out of the EU without a deal  
We could have been on the brink of finally bringing this Tory government and their calamitous Brexit approach to an end. They were saved. Action has to be taken.  
The Guardian view on Theresa May and Brexit: she is failing to govern | Editorial  
90 years on and Brexit showing us nothing has changed  - Scotland promoting a Bill to advance her welfare. "What is likely to be its fate? At the bidding of an acquiescent majority of English members this Scottish desire for national expression is almost certain to be thwarted".  
No, but the Electoral Commission must still have their work cut out dealing with this very thorough piece of work from Conservative MP and Brexit front-runner @patel4witham 
“People just make stuff up...”Watch and weep. This week of all weeks. #Brexit #Trump 
So the sensible option of staying in the Customs Union post #Brexit has been voted down, the hard right in the tory party are so obsessed with sovereignty they don't give a fuck about jobs/economy, this is a disaster, we're heading for no deal, they've fucked us #ToriesOut now 
#OneOfThe3Million I've lived in the UK for the past 25 years, paying my taxes and educating the next generation. I did not get to vote on Brexit, but it's been a huge worry since, and still is. pic.twitter.com/xRbl9MrbED 
Which, let’s be frank, is pretty disastrous for the prospect of achieving a Brexit deal at the least damaging end of the spectrum. And I suspect that’s the depressing conclusion to be drawn from the events of the last 48 hours.  
Right. That's it. I'm done with the lies and madness. I'm refusing to Brexit. Who's with me. 
No Brexit is better than no dealAnd no Brexit is better than a bad Brexit Still time to sort ourselves out. Get the final decision in the hands of the people, with an option to stay in the EU  
Corbyn could have been all over the media today attacking the Tories over Brexit. Instead he went to the NEC to cast a single vote to ensure they endorsed his hatred of Jews. Game is pretty much up for me. 
We didn’t need The Office for Budget Responsibility to tell us this because we all know Tories lie every time they open their mouthes - The 'Brexit dividend' money Theresa May promised for the NHS is a myth, Government's official spending watchdog confirms  
Theresa May has maintained her fragile grip over the Brexit process after surviving a rebellion by pro-EU members of her own party  
So the Tory hard right would rather have a GE than a Referendum. That’s because they know which way a Referendum would go but they think they might win GE and put one of their own in. We must have #PeoplesVote_UK 
If you read anything this evening, make it this thread. Throughout the entire Brexit process, British emigrants have been neglected, border-line ignored, by our government. Now they're making their voices heard, help them share their stories.  
Here’s the problem(s):Corbyn won’t discipline rebels (unless, like @hilarybennmp, @OwenSmith_MP etc., he considers them a threat).And he can’t land any real punches on Tories for Brexit because he 3-line whipped MPs to trigger Article 50.What a bloody farce.  
2014  "The people of Scotland will be engaged directly..." 2018  "We want free movement" - NO "We want a single market" - NO "We want a customs union" - NO "We want our parliament to be consulted on Brexit" - NO 
The European Union Referendum Act 2015 made provision for regulations. And those Regulations made provision for some of the protections in the 1983 Act to be carried over into the Referendum. But they made no provision to carry over section 164.  
@NickCohen4's piercing rebuttal to #BBC head of news: 'BBC journalists I speak to talk of fear of the consequences of honest reporting. The BBC has let Britain down, it fears being seen to question the people’s verdict. Fear is killing BBC journalism, as it kills all journalism.' 
No-deal #Brexit would leave EU worse off than UK amid big consequences for all, warns Carney 
BIG MISTAKE! BBC accidentally shows massive PRO-BREXIT rallyThe goof reveals that there is PLENTY of support for BREXIT.  
Another Remoaner attempt to sabotage Brexit defeated in the Commons as quisling customs union amendment is defeated.Well done to Kate Hoey, John Mann, Frank Field, Graham Stringer & Kelvin Hopkins.The usual Tory traitors joined Labour in trying to wreck Brexit. Shame on them 
I personally would like to say thank you to all the @UKLabour MPs who are fighting for Brexit.We disagree on economics and social policy, but putting the country and democracy over your party is something we can all agree on! 
Out of the blue, this has just cheered our pro-#Brexit team enormously.  Thank you so much to @RedHotSquirrel who deserves this accolade himself.  
Stop press: @realDonaldTrump now says he meant to say the opposite of what he said abt Putin yesterday. Exactly as he rowed back on NATO. And Theresa May and Brexit. It’s a tactic not an admission of error. 
What did you expect you moron? If I was as incompetent as you, I would be sacked.  Are you disappointed May didn't get more votes? This isn't about Brexit any more. Its about the shameful treatment of the poor and vulnerable in the UK. 
@Anna_Soubry Anna great news that we are not goingTo be in a Customs Union when we Brexit.I know that you thought that your amendment would fly.Don’t be to disappointed we Brexiteers are most happy.Please raise a glass or two to celebrate. 
That is a wholly mistaken conclusion. There are lots of MPs who opposed the attempt to tie the PM's hands on the customs union who would vote to stop a no-deal Brexit.  
The Tory Brexit you've voted through brings with it job losses, falling living standards and individual misery. It leads to the break up of families and communities. We're ashamed Labour MP's would vote for such things.@frankfieldteam @KateHoeyMP @JohnMannMP Graham Stringer 
With the exception of the above four honourable Labour MPs, the rest of @UKLabour MPs have consistently voted against or abstained on every #Brexit vote! Why?  To forcing a GE in @jeremyCorbyn's lust for power!Doing so, they are betraying #Brexit & millions of Labour voters! 
I get that people may feel this isn't very important compared to Trump, Brexit, etc. But I predict that the desecration of the Stonehenge landscape, if we permit it, will echo down the centuries far more loudly than anything in the headlines today. #StonehengeTunnel 
Labour's Kate Hoey Live on Sky News Discussing Brexit  via @YouTube 
Project fear again .....   Bank of England governor Mark Carney warns of "big" impact from Brexit no deal  
If you think Remainers are just using Northern Ireland to stop Brexit, you should know this:There've been 7 nights straight of violence. This isn't a problem that went away in the 90's. The Good Friday Agreement just made it relatively dormant. #TradeBill 
Vote Labour, get hard Tory Brexit.  
Compare and contrast how quickly David Cameron was replaced as UK PM after losing Brexit referendum with May without a new election. Took a few weeks. Sure it's a consequence of parliamentary vs presidential democracy, but still a striking contrast. 
Another capitulation by Tory Whips as recess vote abandoned. Labour should take note of this - when faced with a FULL @UKLabour defeat, they run scared. How about you now put your back into defeating Brexit & get into Gov't so you can sort out the real issues facing the UK? 
++BREAKING++Many sources confirm EU readying emergency guidelines tomorrow informing member states to immediately step up preparations for a ‘No Deal’ Brexit.This is insane.The great trading nation, Leader in services that built the EU single mkt blowing itself up.Madness. 
Thank you to Tory rebels like @Anna_Soubry & @NickyMorgan01 who tried to secure a Customs Union backstop. Shame on the Labour rebels who sided with the government & made a hard brexit more likely, putting hundreds of thousands of jobs at risk. #PeoplesVote 
On my way to @rtuknews to discuss Brexit, power grabs and the pointlessness of @UKLabour, particularly the Scottish branch. 
Erm... this is incredible on @Channel4News. Desmond Swayne just said to 'blame the voters' for a lack of majority for versions of Brexit. Brilliant work from @krishgm 
Has anyone come up with a tangible benefit of Brexit yet?#AskingForAGovernment 
Seems like the #Brexit I advocated has utterly devastated the ancient ruling class Tory Party just as I said it would. Oh ye of little faith who doubted me. Littlewoods are lucky I don’t do the pools... 
Bercow just had a veiled dig at Tim Farron after his Brexit vote no-show last night. "It's very good to see the honourable gentleman." 
I’m disgusted at @KateHoeyMP @frankfieldteam, @JohnMannMP , Graham Stringer MP & Kelvin Hopkins MP - not just for voting today to save @TheresaMay but also for backing a hard #Brexit damaging our economy, destroying jobs & undermining rights. 
Great news that the EU has signed a trade deal with Japan......but somehow doubt they would have got their skates on quite as quick if Brexit wasnt happening.  Anyway it also shows EU can move fast on trade deals when it wants to do so.  
A second Brexit vote was always the elite Remainers’ game plan - but overturning the 2016 referendum result before it had even been carried out would collapse all faith in democracy itself, says @TheSun 
The results are in. Brexit is back on. Anna Soubry took the news as well as you would have expected.  
Four Labour MPs voted alongside Tories against a customs union backstop:Frank FieldKate HoeyJohn MannGraham StringerThey should explain to their CLPs how they prevented Labour’s plan to get a good Brexit position, kept May in power and maybe even stopped a snap election.  
I think Scotland will have a second independence referendum in September, 2019. And it will be Yes. Whatever the problems, they can’t be worse than status quo! 
I am a member of Vauxhall Labour. Can't speak for Birkenhead, Blackley and Bassetlaw, but I doubt many of my friends locally appreciate our MP propping up a Tory government and forcing through Brexit. Suggestions anyone?  
Thread on consequences of tonight’s reprieve for Tory Govt on #CustomsUnion amendment courtesy of a quartet of Labour rebels #TradeBill #Brexit  
If any real Stalinists get control of anything round here then I'm afraid Kate Hoey's in for a nasty shock. #Brexit  
Remoaners have had their asses handed to them in HoC for 2 days now.This will get quite tantrum-like as the week progresses.The lolz will be mighty.Who knew #Brexit would deliver such fun?  
Good news, vile remoaning quisling pathetic excuse for Tory MPs, fail to weaken Brexit further. 
Finally, govt carries the 3rd reading vote by 317 to 286, a majority of 31. That's the Brexit legislation done for the summer 
"We used to have an extra layer of scrutiny when it came to trade deals. They were called MEPs. When the EU was ready to sign a trade deal MEPs would hold it to account. If it's parliamentary sovereignty you’re looking for you've come to the wrong Brexit." 
POLL: More Tories See Farage as a ‘Brexit Leader’ Than May   
Conservative Brexit rebels who voted against May to stay in a Customs Union:Heidi Allen, Guto Bebb, Ken Clarke, Jonathan Djanogly, Dominic Grieve, Stephen Hammond, Phillip Lee, Nicky Morgan, Bob Neil, Antoinette Sandbach, Anna Soubry, Sarah Woolaston. 
EU will just say "no cherry picking" and the CU one is a disaster. #Brexit is like the longest disaster movie ever. Time to call for a #PeoplesVote 
My brand new Edinburgh show 'Brexit Through The Gift Shop' runs from 1 - 26 August. Tickets available here:  
A poll by @SkyData has suggested 62% of people think the 'Vote Leave' campaign cheated during the EU referendum while 39% think the 'Remain' campaign cheated 
We know there was digital jiggery pokery in 2016.  The Electoral Commission have fined Vote Leave and accused them of fraud.  That doesn’t invalidate the result because the referendum was only advisory. Ok then - let’s have a 2nd opinion. 
They openly lie to youThey openly ignore their manifestosThey openly ignore public opinionThey openly ignore referendum results they don't likeNow they want to pass laws stopping you criticising themHave you connected the dots yet? We are not free, we are not a democracy pic.twitter.com/b2SiEpBrYP 
Meanwhile, away from all the Brexit vote chaos, Boris Johnson breached ethics rules in taking up new Telegraph column. 
There has been no time since WW2 when the UK has been as unstable as it is now. We don't know who will be governing us in 12 months, or whether the ruling party will still be in one piece, or whether we'll be in the EU or suffering food shortages after a no-deal #Brexit#FBPE 
So little time for John Major. If he’d offered the country a referendum for the Maastricht treaty, we would not have had this nation-dividing referendum decades later. He is in no position to be an oracle on all things Brexit now. 
If Labour and Scottish Tory MPs had voted with the SNP tonight for a customs union we would have won. Instead we're being dragged ever closer to a devastating hard Brexit that will destroy jobs, and hit people's incomes and living standards for decades to come #BrexitShambles 
John Mann, Frank Field, Kate Hoey and Graham Stringer have voted with the Tories to save Theresa May's shambolic government and ensure a destructive Tory Brexit, or possibly a no deal calamity.They should all be kicked out of the Labour Party. 
Here is my live reaction as Theresa May narrowly wins a crucial Brexit vote. #FarageOnLBC 
You utter balloon! They are in the HoC fighting to save Scotland from the shambles of Brexit! They have been there fighting for Scotland to get some say in the ‘Trade Bill’ post Brexit. But you knew that, right? Do you also know your MP’s abstained again.. 
A referendum is a pure form of democracy. To ignore the Brexit vote is to abandon democracy. #Brexit  
No deal #Brexit now one giant leap forward. A very dark day for #Scotland 
The Labour MPs who are now propping up the government must surely be expelled immediately and intense pressure applied to call by-elections. This is scandalous, anti democratic behaviour. #brexit #CustomsBill 
A gvmt too incompetent and weak to govern, an opposition helping them fail us all and a nasty off-shoot Tory party - the ERG - made up of utter bastards, liars, bullies and fools holding us all hostage to their insane, country-wrecking, rights/jobs-trashing Brexit.#PeoplesVote 
It's clear May cannot get her Brexit deal thru Parliament without constant appeals for confidence. We need an election asap - and Labour needs mandatory reselection and a democratic vote on 2nd Referendum at conference 
All good people sticking to their manifesto. Shame on the rest for voting against the referendum result. Politics of the few Labour MPs, not the many voters.  
That’s the end of the road.  There is no soft Brexit anymore. May has sold the country to a handful of extremists, bent in a punk Brexit. I hate to say it - but the only option now is a repeat referendum. My @heraldscotland column tomorrow explains 
There’s a special kind of exhaustion that comes with having to insist on respect for basic facts. Trump did not win the popular vote. He did not arrive at Turnberry just before the Brexit referendum. The last two Supreme Court nominees were not promptly approved. Exhausting.  
If you can break electoral law and just pay a pathetic fine  while the result stands what's to stop it happening again and again #Brexit it's fucking criminal 
Just 3 or 4 fewer Tory seats at last year's election would have swung the balance and averted an extreme Brexit.  The Scottish Labour and Scottish Lib Dem strategists who thought it was a brilliant idea to give the Tories a clear run in certain seats have got a lot to answer for. 
Odds of a No-Deal Brexit rise again. Hard to state just how cataclysmic that would be. Millions of jobs lost, shortages of food & medicine, chaos at ports & Good Friday Agreement wrecked. And that's just to start.Scotland, we need to get out of here.  
.@UKIP making a comeback? Controversial YouTubers @CountDankulaTV and @PrisonPlanet are joining a string of Tory voters dismayed with May’s #Brexit plan, to bolster the party's numbers.  
Regardless of any politics or Brexit beliefs: you are absolutely shi**ng me @campbellclaret!? You accuse another party of lying, cheating & spinning!? All I can hear are hundreds of dead servicemen & thousands of dead civilians spinning in their graves. Please stop speaking. 
Nigel Farage - "We must have back proper control of our borders. And we must be in control of making our own laws.“If Brussels reject that, we give them notice that we will be leaving and trading under World Trade Organisation rules." #Brexit  
The results of votes in Parliament today surely show that if the UK government has stuck to its principles and not tried to bounce Brexiteers, they could have squeezed through an extensive FTA Brexit. Instead another unforced error. And there's not the votes for their own plan. 
Agreed. Looks like there is a Parliamentary majority for a no-deal outcome to Brexit talks.  
Fuck Tories. Fuck Labour. Fuck Brexit.All of the MPs who are enabling this catastrophe will be judged harshly by future generations. Trouble is it will be too fucking late by then. To have our future decided by the ERG extremists is the antithesis of democracy. It's shameful. 
There never was a majority in the Commons to ignore the Referendum result and disrespect the electorate’s verdict and remain in the Customs Union. As we saw with the defeat of NC18.  
The government scrapes through the customs union vote, the Remainer rebels blinked. Theresa May's Brexit lives to die another day. 
Yes indeed legal options needed but God ‘everyone else stop Brexit but we won’t bother’ is wearing thin. UK Govt won by 4 today, SF could have preserved Customs Union.Before the shinnerbots descend, please find a better reason than ‘will of the people’ for colluding with Brexit  
UK government narrowly wins key Brexit vote, rejecting call to stay in a customs union in "no-deal" scenario  
Wow, actual good news in Brexit land. Staying in the European Medicines Agency is good for the NHS and therefore good for patients. Of course it's already moved from London to Amsterdam and Brexit means we'll have less influence, but at least Brexit will kill fewer people...  
Kate Hoey MP - "We have got into the situation where you are not allowed to have views or opinions without being absolutely railed as being extreme right-wing." #Brexit  
Govt wins crucial vote on Customs Union being Part of Trade Bill by 307-301Remainers amendment defeated.Victory for Brexiteers.Massive plus for Brexit. 
So no customs union backstop means we are heading for a no deal Brexit. The government is totally paralysed by their right wing hard liners. There’s a simple rule fo thumb on Brexit. If Fox, Johnson, Rees-Mogg, Farage and Gove are all on the same side the country should worry. 
Tory Remainers, the overwhelming majority of Labour MPs, Lib Dems and SNP have all stuck two fingers up to 17.4m who voted for #BrexitHowever they failed to lock us into a customs union with the EU and to deprive the UK of the ability to enter into new trade deals 
MPs have voted 307-301 against an amendment from rebel Conservative MPs to the Trade Bill which would have seen the UK remain in a customs union in the event of a no-deal Brexit 
Thanks goodness. The Stop Brexit fanatics lost their attempt to force UK to stay in a customs union, which would have been worst outcome. 
Because an unfair “once in a generation referendum” can become a once held referendum that condemns our generations to come./End 
Absolute disaster that the Conservatives have rejected a customs union in case of a no deal Brexit.The shambolic Tory Brexit plan is going to damage our economy and working class communities across the country.I just know we’re heading for a bad deal. Or worse: no deal. 
Govt defeat NC18 by only 6 votes. 307 to 301. This is a Government in office but not power. Theresa May does not have a Brexit plan that they can get through Parliament. 
BREAKING: Government defeats Tory rebel amendment calling for Britain to join a customs union with EU after Brexit by 307-301. Remainer rebels flop again. 
Michelle Dewberry - "I do think there are many people that would just call for a Trump-style #Brexit negotiation.“‘This is what we are going to do. If you want to work with us, work with  us  if you don’t then don’t worry about it’”.  
BREAKING: May SURVIVES  Brexit vote. MPs oppose customs union plan by 307  votes to 301 
Can’t understand why Tory govt opposed amendment to keep Britain in the European Medicines Agency - its vital for patients and NHS - fortunately govt lost the vote just now #Brexit #NHS 
Drs of the Commons unite! Our cross-party sensible amendment to stay part of the same system for medicines as the EU post-Brexit just defeated the Govt.  
 Tories have been defeated on an amendment backed by SNP MPs and signed by @Dr_PhilippaW, to remain with the European Medicines Agency after Brexit. Big win!  
I‘m delighted that @HouseofCommons voted for my amendment to the #Brexit #TradeBill. It’s now a negotiating objective for the Government to keep our supply of medicines open after #Brexit. I’m just sorry that it came to a vote: this is something the Govt should have embraced...  
So the House of Commons is attempting to defeat the result of the EU referendum, by forcing Govt to beg for membership of the EU Medicines Agency. This will not enhance peoples’ trust in their politicians. 
Another nail in May’s Brexit plans after MPs voted 305-301 to stay in the European Medicines Agency is a blow for her and good for Britons 
The government has been defeated on its Trade Bill, on an amendment to keep medicines flowing freely between the UK and EU after Brexit. Voting was 305 to 301 - a majority of four. MPs are now voting on keeping the UK in a customs union if talks fail. 
The government is now obliged to try to keep the UK in the European medicines regulatory framework. A win for Philip Lee, who resigned from govt over hard Brexit  
Looks like @theresa_may about to be forced by her Tory Rebel Remainers to adopt membership of customs union as her backstop position. This would destroy her negotiating strategy with Brussels and thus shred her Brexit White Paper. A big and dangerous moment for her 
Britain pay attention! The Russian foreign ministry is now officially launching an all out attack on British journalism. We need to defend our country from their information war. This is not just about Brexit, this is about the defence of our free elections and free press.  
Wow - govt defeat - only second time they've lost in Commons on key Brexit legistlation 
So Philip Lee, a former minister who quit over Brexit, just defeated the Government with a rebel amendment that will keep Britain in the European Medicines Agency. It's not a big deal but it looks pretty dire for the Govt now over Customs Union amendment... 
On 30th July we go to court to defend @ClaraPonsati from extradition to Spain for ‘Rebellion with violence’ & ‘misappropriation of funds’ have a lookat the actions of the Spanish Police in the peaceful referendum   
BREAKING: am told EU is going issue very strongly worded emergency guidelines tomorrow telling member states to immediately step up preparations for ‘No Deal’ Brexit. They might be watching Parliament right now...  
The LADYBIRD BOOK of PREPARING FOR CIVIL UNREST.Part of the 'Learning to Live with #Brexit' series#LadybirdBrexit #FBPE 
Coming back from a trip to the Highlands. Wherever I went, I saw Saltires and SNP support, no Union Jack, none! Whoever I spoke with, people were pro Independence and anti Brexit. Time for Indy! #indy2 #scotref #snp #DissolveTheUnion #saoralba #stopbrexit 
Hello Twitter! We are holding a launch event for Yes North Berwick in August this year, please follow for more information on this and other events as we move towards the next independence referendum. #Scotref #indyref2 #Yes #NorthBerwick 
John Major dismantling bit by bit the Brexit fantasy.Good to be able to listen to reasoned arguments without interruptions, thanks to an interviewer that lets his guest speak and listens to him.  
The way the establishment including Parliament has fought the referendum result tooth and nail since 24 June 2016 will live long in the memory.The damage this current manipulating is doing has not yet been processed; a new level of disgust for our political class is out there. 
Rousing speech from @johnredwood today in HoC, rubbishing all the scaremongering over Border Delays & the attempts to Remain in the #CustomsUnion post-#Brexit.  
This is what Labour seems unable or unwilling to grasp. Allow big money to buy the referendum and you open Pandora's box for the wholesale corruption of our democracy.  
I might look at the Electoral Commission decision today and think of how it might damage Brexit, but I don’t. (Thread)  
At least in the US I can still vote for the Dems. Who am I supposed to support here now? A Labour Party that’s rolling over for Brexit and spitting in Jewish people’s faces? 
Hey @AndrewBowieMP you are my MP last night you backed the extreme right winger Rees Mogg's hard #Brexit that shows you put ideology before your constituents wishes. You should resign! 
There is SO MUCH Labour should be doing now: coming up with a Brexit plan or fighting it, fighting against this terrible, broken government. And what is it actually doing? Going against the wishes of Jewish people and redefining anti-semitism. Beyond parody. 
The ministers behind Vote Leave should be sacked and Electoral Commission evidence makes clear that to follow through with Brexit now would be undemocratic.Time for a #PeoplesVoteMe for @guardianopinion 
Vote Leave cheated our democracy. Vote Leave cheated Britain. Brexit is a sham, British democracy is in crisis and no one is doing anything to stop this assault on the rule of law. Parliament must act. Now. Let the people have a say.  
RT. If there was another referendum, it'd mean the media, not the British people now control Britain. Powerful forces, a hidden elite & their visible agents, are determined that Leave won't happen. This a/c has long noted this. Brexiteers are a genie not going back in the bottle. 
Every serious journalist should read this exchange and take note #BBC #Brexit @NickCohen4  via @nybooks 
May meets Cabinet amid fresh Brexit threat from Remainer ToriesWe all want a Good Brexit Deal,  but let’s face it, EU don’t want a good Brexit! Don’t waste any more time or energy, Leave No Deal!  
UPDATED: UK's (dwindling) Brexit options  
Here's @Andr6wMale writing about the sublime @Coldwar_Steve  with me chucking in my 5 bob's worth. Almost makes Brexit worthwhile 
Oh! If John Major had held a referendum on Maastricht, we would have vetoed the ensuing disasters: EU centralisation; €uro crisis: migration crisis: youth unemployment crisis in S Europe: rise of extremist parties across EU; and we would still be in the ‘common market’!  
Reminder post-Brexit customs union is worst outcome. Tory rebels on brink of blowing up Chequers (plan, not house) and maybe the Tory party 
U.S. Defence Giant Raytheon Committed to Brexit Britain   
Good.  Also to nullify the referendum per A24 of the  Venice Commission’s Code of Good Conduct to Referendum (Democracy through Law) that we signed up to. Leave didn’t just “significantly overspend” it cheated and MPs that let this carry on, knowing this,are themselves at risk.  
When Phil Mitchell met Trump: Coldwar Steve and his Brexit Britain mashups  
So this evening Theresa May faces defeat in Commons tonight forcing her to take a softer customs deal by anti-Brexit Tories. Yesterday May was forced to adopt a harder line on trade by pro-Brexit Tories. Strong and stable. 
No word of a lie@BBCNews Item 1 - Hosepipe BanItem 2 - UKIP CouncillorItem 3 - “Vote Leave deny breaking rules in referendum saying claims are politically motivated”WTF #bbcbias 
What option do you feel is the best #Brexit option? - At-a-glance: The UK's four Brexit options  #EuropeanUnion RETWEET & VOTE  #yourvoicematters 
What will Britain look like after a ‘No Deal Brexit’? (It ain’t pretty)@thatginamiller investigates. 
NEWS! Lance Armstrong’s Tour de France wins reinstated after Brexit revelation that cheating is fine  
This is the 12th time I've asked @Jacob_Rees_Mogg how much money would you and your rich clients make from a hard Brexit?  How much do you gain each time your calculated antics and anti-society voting impact on the markets? #CustomsUnionVote 
The poorest have paid for years for Labour’s policies on immigration. That’s why they voted in droves for Brexit.  
The EU who has refused to patrol its borders from African and Middle East migrants and let them flow in in their millions insists that a no deal Brexit will put up a hard border between Northern and Southern Ireland. Twisting the situation to suit their own agenda. 
A reminder that the greatest disasters of modern times have not been due to nature or economics, they have been due to politics. Britain is currently in a state of political breakdown with absolutely no sign that the system is capable of fixing itself.#Brexit #StopBrexit #FBPE 
Tory MP Dr Phillip Lee (one of the resigning Ministers) tells Commons pharmaceutical companies are stockpiling imported drugs in warehouses ahead of #Brexit. Stockpiling of processed foods, stockpiling of drugs....when will this madness end? #commons #bbcnews 
I am  #OneOfThe3Million I was 20 when I came to the UK. I am 52. Home is here. Here, with my British husband and dual nationality kids - all affected by #Brexit and its sinister ‘othering’.#BrexitIsPersonal #InLimbo Check out #EUcitizensChampion 
A reminder on #Brexit from 2 years ago ... “EU Paid €160 Million to Pro-Remain Groups”  
If Tories really wanted what’s right for people of Britain they would work together to find solutions Personal careers first country secondBrexit has shown what a complete bunch of selfishTwats they are They shit on people for profitVermin 
Isn't this actually wild when you think about it - Britain had an EU referendum, the campaigners won by breaking the law, and even then they only won by a slight margin, there is still no plan that any majority agree on and yet we are STILL going ahead?  
Tony Blair calls for second vote to fix Brexit 'mess'...  
I'm in Westminster for a meeting and I can't understand why Conservative MPs like Alok Sharma are voting for an early recess when they could be dealing with social care, police cuts and tackling Brexit. As our MP, I’d put that before extra time off #workingforReadingWest 
Beforehand, we had a double-lock: MEPs to scrutinise EU trade deals and, more recently, member states with a veto. Post-Brexit, they're trying to avoid even having to show them to MPs. 
Now that MPs have voted against govt's having to publish text of future trade agreements prior to ratification, it looks as though we'll have to get the details from the anticipated trading partner(s) instead. May the farce be with us. #Brexit 
Govt just tried the same trick as last time - promising they would amend a #Brexit Bill to the satisfaction of the sensible Tories in the Lords. Fool me once, fool me twice......#BrexitShambles #PeoplesVote 
A shameful day for the @BBC allowing Leave politicians to conflate & misrepresent the findings of a report unchallenged. The facts are simple, the combined Leave overspend is £752,000 and rising plus nobody knows what's happened to approx £10m from @arronbanks - then there's this 
Wasn't Brexit supposed to be about more democratic accountability of decisions? From our elected MEPs voting on our trade deals with third countries, we're moving to the PM and cabinet having their own way. From representative democracy to executive dictatorship.  
WE CHEATED WE WON WE ARE LEAVING  #BREXIT RESPECT THE RESULT  
Keep hearing this mantra that it doesn't matter too much if Vote Leave broke the law because the extra money spent wouldn't have changed the referendum result. That's not really the point, is it? 
Sir John Major outlines why there is a case for a #PeoplesVote on #Brexit: "would you buy a house without knowing the price? No you would not. Should we leave the European Union without knowing the cost? Arguably no we should not"  
Tonight we call on Labour MPs @CarolineFlintMP @frankfieldteam @KateHoeyMP @JohnMannMP to support the government & #Brexit.Please RT - they‘ll see this each time you do.Labours appalling attempt to use #Brexit as a tool for party politics is disgusting. 
Dear Tim,You are talking twaddle.The people who lost the EU referendum are the normal decent ordinary folk in the U.K.  They were lied to - regardless of how they voted.Their lives will be devastated.Here - listen to a Devon farmer. 
Watching Sky News atm because I just don't trust the BBC to report this big Brexit debate/vote properly. 
Friends! Brexit was sold on deliberate LIES and false promises, e.g. that a Leave vote would actually be implemented by the Government, which of course was never the intention!So we must now have Our People's Vote, which will give a clear choice of Remain vs Not Leaving Our EU.  
Just remember that when you're munching down on your chlorinated chicken kievs and hormone-injected beef mince and washing it down with a nice refreshing glass of contaminated water from a fracked to fuck countryside nearby...At least you got a shiny new blue Brexit passport. 
Patrick Blower on sharks coming to UK waters and the unravelling of Theresa May’s Chequers Brexit deal - Political Cartoon Gallery in Putney  
Former Prime Minister Sir John Major tells ITV News why there is 'undoubtedly' a case for a second EU referendumWatch more of his interview with @Peston as part of our new online series #ITVNowWhat:  
1/2 Former PM Sir John Major discusses the possibility of a #PeoplesVote on the #Brexit deal. "Would you buy a house without knowing the price? No you would not. Should we leave the EU without knowing the cost? Arguably we should not" 
Sir John Major: 'undoubtedly' a case for second EU referendum because people voted on 'entirely false prospectus'. Predicts a 'terrible backlash' against those who made false promises if people find they are 'worse off, not better off' 
Sir John Major on excoriating form, telling me there is "undoubtedly" a "case for a second referendum", that Theresa May's "bastards" are far more dangerous than his, and that there is a strong likelihood of a referendum in the autumn  
You want to know what ‘no deal’ Brexit (overseen by a government with no contingency plan) looks like?  If so, read this article. 
Beggars belief that BBC can write about a huge EU Japan trade deal without once mentioning that UK will not benefit from it of Brexit goes ahead. Self-Censorship.  
The absence of #TimFarron and Vince Cable during last nights crucial Brexit vote shows that they are  a party whose sense of opportunism has never changed since they got into bed with the Tories to form a coalition government of austerity that caused Brexit. 
It won't make the headlines it should, but the EU has signed a historic trade deal with Japan today. How can the UK enjoy the benefits? Reject May's #Brexit deal, earn a  #PeoplesVote and win the campaign to #Remain 
As we are unlikely to get a General Election any time soon, how else can we protest against #Brexit? Marches & petitions are fine, but until we can hit them at the ballot box, what can we do to push for #StopBrexit? Add ideas by Reply & RT 
Senior Tory calls for Brexit referendum to be re-run given Vote Leave's 'cheating' - Politics live  
Of course the £600,000 overspend made no difference to the Brexit result. That’s why people spend hundreds of thousands of pounds on political campaigns. To make no difference. 
It’s Official: The Brexit Campaign Cheated Its Way to Victory  
Baffled by #Brexit? These are the four scenarios the UK is facing and how they could play out  
Shock poll reveals Brits would rather have a No Deal Brexit than back May's plan When you get a poll carried out by the Mirror which shows the majority of people would prefer a no deal rather than the Appeasers white paper you know she’s in trouble 
Tim Farron missed last night’s crucial #Brexit vote because he was off talking about gay sex. Again.  
It took just a couple of weeks to call out @theresa_may​ who was, once again, lying through her teeth. The Office for Budget Responsibility has clarified what we knew already: THERE IS NO BREXIT DIVIDEND  @jeremycorbyn @PeoplesMomentum @GMB @LBC @TheSun 
Theresa May has allowed the Brexit process to be controlled and dictated by unelected, EU-backing, Civil Servants. The Chequers White Paper, written by Olly Robbins, is a betrayal of Brexit.  
Powerful stuff from @ChrisM4Chester "we cannot allow cheating and dishonesty to become accepted norms in our political system" 
'It seems May's Brexit deal is unpopular, confusing and disappointing for many voters,' John Curtice writes 
Respect the result? As I’m watching you and your fellow @ScotTories troop away to vote against Scotland’s interests.... again? Not on your miserable life! #LobbyFodder #freetrade #brexit  
Images from the self-determination referendum of Catalonia. We do not forgive, we will never forget. 
"Remainers MPs only insist that the public’s will on #Brexit is not yet settled, that we must have a second referendum, because they are still unhappy with the first answer."@FraserMyers on why a second referendum would make a mockery of democracy  
Exclusive: Former PM Sir John Major tells @Peston some Tory Brexit rebels are "fanatics" who are "prepared to go to almost any lengths to ensure we leave Europe" - and they could spark an early general election Read more: #ITVNowWhat 
Hold me while I faint! “Tory Remainer rebels are set to seek Brexit revenge by trying to defeat the Government over a plan to keep the UK in a customs union with the EU”Really... !!  Hara (Tory)kiri ?  
Do you know, I’m not cross with the people who voted Brexit. I’m really not. But I’m absolutely furious with the people who screamed for Art 50 to be triggered before we were ready. 
So Leave broke the rules, fines £60k on overspend of £500k.Clear message to future referendum campaigns:Ignore all spending limits, just win and pay 12% later. The fraudulent result will still stand. If your opponents kept to the rules and lost, that is just too bad for them. 
Not really interested in how well you fucking enunciated it to be honest, there is no Brexit dividend  
If this government was in anyway serious about #Brexit then Jacob Rees-Mogg would've been at the very least involved at negotiation level, if not in the cabinet.The fact he wasn't is concern for us all and speaks volumes.Time is fastly approaching to right this wrong. 
WATCH: @Will_DryOFOC slams Brextremists for blaming everyone else for this chaotic, botched Brexit that the Gov are pursuing with.It's clear there's only one way out of this mess - a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal:  
Signed . EC state in their report the cheating was ‘ so extensive and deliberate ‘ that the referendum ‘cannot be considered a mandate’. We cannot allow a ref won on fraud and criminal activity to stand. It has no legitimate democratic mandate. #VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw 
Leaked email shows how Remainers threatened No10 into backing their soft Brexit - and then reneged after getting what they wanted  
.@obr_uk have confirmed that the so-called Brexit dividend doesn’t exist. Instead they rightly warn that Brexit is more likely to weaken public finances. The only way to avoid this Brexit mess  is to give the people a final say on the deal & an opportunity to #ExitfromBrexit 
This is a really important thread, brexit will, if it happens, hit the real lives of millions of people. We’ve not forgotten you in the European Parliament @BritishInEurope @The3Million 
So dispiriting that the SNP have to try to explain to WM MPs why it's important that devolved parliaments should be consulted on future trade deals.  tories & labour don't have a clue or a care - they are only ever concerned about the SE and majority of the UK.#TradeBill #Brexit 
Darren Grimes is already playing the classic trick of the political charlatan of portraying himself as the put-upon victim. No Darren you have played games with the lives of 65 million people. They are the victims of your electoral cheating, not you.#StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE 
Tories, 2010: “We are establishing the Office for Budget Responsibility for extra accountability, with the objective of instilling fiscal discipline.”Tories, 2018: “The establishment OBR claiming there’s no Brexit dividend is fake news.” 
I think most people are against gang culture & violence no? And for peace? I think you might be onto something if you went for : * Serious limits on migration* Upholding British culture and identity * Promoting the nation state * and Brexit, of course All positives!  
"Putin made a fatal mistake at the press conference by admitting that it was Russia that held a so-called ‘referendum’ on Ukraine’s territory of Crimea. Putin forgot the propaganda lie claiming the people of Crimea held the vote themselves."  
Do MPs actually understand the reality of Brexit, which they are voting through Parliament? Even on the DExEU own analysis, Hard Brexit or May's Fudge Brexit will make UK significantly worse off, like the worst years after the 2008 crash, but long into the future. It is madness.  
Every single Republican, is now inextricably linked to the events in Helsinki.  Everyone of them now has to own this.  #2018 will be a referendum on treason. #VoteBlue, #NoQuarter 
Bravo! That's 3 huge EU FTAs (by trade volume and GDP): w/ South Korea, Canada, and now Japan. Can't see the UK getting anywhere near this for at least 5 years post Brexit, and even then these countries will demand a "better deal" with the UK than they have managed with the EU  
Under WTO tariffs UK would be £8 billion a year BETTER offAdd that to the net £10bn a year we will not be sending to the EU & that makes a grand total of £18bn a year that we've not had before #BrexitWe can spend it on the NHS,elderly,schools & on cutting taxes for lowest paid  
Vote Leave broke the law broke the lawBeLeave broke the lawVeterans for Britain broke the lawSo why on earth should we “respect” the referendum result @jeremycorbyn @Keir_Starmer @theresa_may ?Art 50 process must be suspendedThey BROKE THE LAW! 
On the urgent question put to Parliament today on Vote Leave having been found to have cheated in the EU Referendum, SIR NICHOLAS SOAMES, grandson of Winston Churchill, said:  
There needs to be a democratically elected body to oversee political output of @bbcnewsAs long as BBC “marks its own homework” & is mindful of its financial and social links with Govt&Establishment, it will fail to report fairly on a range of issues e.g.Brexit, poverty & more 
General Elections have laws that enable judges to annul the result if there is cheating. Parliament took those laws away from this referendum. That's the problem. 
If the UK does indeed Brexit, it doesn't matter whether it's a hard, soft, or no deal Brexit, all those deals will have to be done from scratch. It will take years. What do UK importers and exporters do in the meantime? Leavers cannot answer this question except with platitudes. 
No one could’ve implemented Brexit in a way that wasn’t catastrophic. May’s sole achievement is to have postponed this revelation until now. 
If someone is caught cheating in an exam after passing with 52%, should they be allowed to keep their exam qualification?#PeoplesVote #Brexit 
Can this be true?Apparently it is now being claimed that, because the referendum was advisory, it doesn’t matter that electoral law was broken.Well, shiver me timbers and blow me over with a feather duster. What a country!#StopBrexitSaveBritain#PeoplesVote 
"Demands for another referendum by anti-democrats is a cynical attempt to obstruct, delay, and fundamentally overturn the will of the British people," writes our board member @PeterBoneUK  
IT'S NOT ABOUT LABOUR OR TORIES IT'S ABOUT WHETHER OUR GOVERNMENT, WHICHEVER PARTY IS IN POWER, ACTUALLY RESPECTS THE DEMOCRATIC VOICE OF THE PEOPLE.#Brexit means #Leave 
On 23 June ‘16 every constituency in Scotland voted Remain. On 16 July ‘18 every Tory MP representing a seat in Scotland voted with pro-Hard Brexit ERG Tory MPs to reject @scotparl having a say in trade deals, to eliminate backstop option & to make No Deal with EU highly likely. 
The MPs - Dutch parliament's three Brexit experts - most concerned about no-deal for citizens: they want citizens' rights preserved in event of crash-out Brexit. 
Dutch MPs have tabled 11 questions to Dutch gov on Brexit no-deal, starting with this:"Have you taken note of the somewhat chaotic situation in the British government with 9 resigned ministers during the past week and the increased chance of a no-deal scenario?" 
Currently the U.K. is part of this trade deal but from next March we will not be as a result of people who lied to us and also cheated in the Brexit vote. We could hope for a trade deal with Donald Trump. Anyone got any better ideas?  
The 'Brexit dividend' money Theresa May promised for the NHS is a myth, Government's official spending watchdog confirms  
Dear @Jacob_Rees_Mogg. You're normally very timely in responding to constituents. Would you care to meet us again and discuss the latest developments in Brexit? As you know, many - perhaps most - of your constituents voted to remain & are puzzled at how you are representing them  
Just like the #Brexit developments of the last week, our Beyond Brexit webcast today gave us a few surprises. If you missed our live session, you can see the replay at 5pm BST on Facebook Live at  #beyondbrexit #pwcproud 
When Parliament stops judges annulling a referendum that is won with cheating it takes on that responsibility itself. Help us ensure MPs discharge it.  
John Curtice on Chequers Brexit:1. Is unpopular among Leavers2. Has eroded public confidence in Gvt on Brexit (esp. among Leavers)3. Has weakened link between Tories & Hard Brexit 4. Voters have not changed their minds about Brexit 
From Twitter today you’d swear Sinn Féin were running the Westminster government & driving this Tory/Dup Brexit. Opponents need to take a hard look at themselves when criticising SF abstention policy..Particularly those parties that still refuse to stand in the north! #Hypocrites 
We know now that Brexit will hit the North East most, so please sign this petition - we need to take back control & not let lies, deceit & fraud win. RT too, please!#NorthEastHour #VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw 
Jeremy Corbyn tables motion to keep UK in Customs Union.Anna Soubry votes against it.Dominic Grieve votes against it.Vince Cable and Tim Farron aren't even in the building.Jeremy Corbyn is blamed by #FBPE for not opposing a hard brexit. 
Sue is 64 and has chosen to retire to Spain. But that doesn’t mean she doesn’t have concerns.“We’re not all pensioners in Spain and are not all wealthy.” #Brexit  
At least & at last the BBC recognises that stopping Brexit and/or another referendum are realities - increasingly so! “At-a-glance: The UK's four Brexit options - BBC News  
Amazing. Tory Brextremists banged on endlessly about parliamentary sovereignty during the referendum debate. Today they voted to allow the Prime Minister of the day to completely bypass parliament to sign post-Brexit trade deals with no democratic oversight whatever!  
If ‘loss of face’ is the worst thing that can happen for stopping Brexit, then for God’s sake stop it right now. “At-a-glance: The UK's four Brexit options - BBC News  
A second referendum would be a betrayal to millions, the result of establishment resistance to the popular will. Families, communities, parties and the nations of the UK would be divided seriously and bitterly. It isn’t worth it, says William Hague  
We are losing @LibDems members over last night's avoidable Brexit vote shambles - disappointing and damaging. We need to up our game! 
Stephen lives in Poland with his wife and son. “We don’t know where we stand... It’s a whole mess and it’s caused a lot of pressure in our family.”#brexit  
MPs have voted 316-37 against giving devolved authorities a veto on Government trade negotiations after Brexit 
'We need answers from  Boris Johnson and Michael Gove' - Will Dry, co-founder of @OFOCBrexit and Editor of @BrexitCentral @isaby go head-to-head as @vote_leave is accused of breaking electoral law Read more on this Brexit campaign story here:  
Theresa May knows full well the damage a hard #Brexit will do to jobs/living standards, she is a coward, Vote Leave cheated Police are involved, she's caved in to Rees-Mogg and his gang, if she had any bottle recess would be cancelled and Article 50 halted #StopMayRunningAway 
Sarah lives in Romania. “Freedom of movement means everything for me and my partner. We basically won’t be able to work without it.”#brexit  
“...a result won with cheating and law breaking can[not] be said to represent the will of the people in June 2016” Please sign and share this petition. @HackneyAbbott - please, we need you and @UKLabour to step up and speak up - the referendum must be annulled #Brexit #VoteLeave 
So in my hugely unscientific Twitter poll, 90% want a “hard” Brexit/no deal. Actually, I suspect this is near truth. Brexiteers are now fed up of compromise - and didn’t even want that at the start  
@DavidLammy is completely correct here, the @ElectoralCommUK has already confirmed this FACT when they appeared before the @CommonsCMS earlier this year. Watch them explain that Parliament, once given the information, has the prerogative to decide if a vote is UNSAFE.... 
I don’t like to nitpick but the ‘Brexit Dividend’ is not a myth, it’s a barefaced lie. Brexit doesn’t create more money for the NHS...it takes it away...in bucketfuls.  
The campaign to stop Brexit is the Liberal Democrats' biggest ever outside an election. We need you to help make it a success this summer.Get involved here: 
Let me get this straight.1. Despite voteLeave breaking the rules, the courts can't order a rerun of the ref ... because the ref was "only advisory".2. So if it had been binding, we'd now get a rerun.3. But all the parties took it as binding!It's a Brexit Coup via Catch 22  
Matthew lives in The Netherlands. He is a contractor in the IT sector. “There’s a whole group of us who are European citizens in the true sense of being European. That doesn’t negate our nationalities...this is difficult to explain to people who have not lived abroad...”#brexit  
A million signatures please!  There is no “IF” about it any more. The EC’s report specifies the cheating was so deliberate and extensive the Referendum cannot be considered to be a mandate.  
“What do we want?”“To take back control!”“When do we want it?”“...umm maybe later once we’ve got a hard Brexit?”#TradeBill 
"The idea that the current state of Brexit is the fault of Sinn Féin MPs is ridiculous. Ireland's fate will not be decided by Westminster. It will be decided in the ongoing negotiations between Britain and the EU." - @davidcullinane 
Considering how tight the Brexit result was, any break of electoral law during the campaigning period which provided an advantage could have had a huge effect. To respect our democracy and to prevent this in the future surely we need an inquiry. 
MPs have voted 314-284 against an amendment to the Trade Bill calling for all free trade deals after Brexit to be subject to Parliamentary scrutiny and consent 
Mollie is 24. She lives in Spain with her family. “My biggest concern is freedom of movement - the right of living, traveling & working/studying throughout Europe.”#Brexit  
An important video.As @UKLabour try to sway tonights vote to keep us tied to the #EU, it’s worthwhile remembering that @jeremycorbyn is lying & will say anything for votes.This video outs him as being anti #EU despite what he is claiming today#Brexit 
The 'Brexit dividend' money Theresa May promised for the NHS is a myth, Govt.’s official spending watchdog confirms The Office for Budget Responsibility, has confirmed that Brexit is more likely to weaken than strengthen the public finances”  
Nick is 67. He has lived in France for the past 27 years. “The situation is worse for my children. I have 2 children who I brought up in France. I don’t know what their status is going to be.”#Brexit  
CURTICE: Leave voters don't feel Chequers means Brexit.“Voters do not just think that the Prime Minister has been incompetent...they are also having doubts about whether the government is in favour of the kind of Brexit they want in the first place.”  
'What is the point of the Lib Dems if they can't be bothered turning up to vote against Brexit?'  
These are two of our kids. Each is #oneofthe3million and Dutch, born here.Today we completed their Home Office paperwork and a £2K cheque to make sure they're here legally in case of a no-deal Brexit.Real lives, real people#EUcitizensChampion 
Other changes we need to look at:'Imprints' for online political ads, so we know who's paying for them, and why they're targeting usBanning donations via untraceable Trusts or shell companiesCriminal liability for campaign directors so they are held to account #Brexit 
Railways? Chaotic Housing? CrisisNHS? Crisis Police? More cuts Fire Service? More cuts Prices? UpIncomes? Stagnating Brexit? Shambles Theresa May? Trying to take an extra week of holiday Please RT if you think we need a govt. capable of governing  
Pretty cool that the referendum wasn't legally binding and that the winning campaign cheated so we're going to nosedive the country into the sea just so some guys with flags for avatars don't get stroppy. 
Corbyn knew.#Brexit  
#VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw #VoteLeaveCriminals #ThisMatters #PeoplesVote A corrupt referendum confers no mandate.Mrs May is operating in a hung parliament, so now the Electoral Commission has found VoteLeave broke the law, her pursuit of #Brexit is illegal.  
Michael is, by the sounds of it, a proud Yorkshireman! He lives and works in Cyprus. “We worry about the talks collapsing and we lose our rights to be here. My personal finances will not allow me to buy a home in the UK.. we thought we would retire here.”#Brexit  
Rolls-Royce, frustrated at Brexit process, says stockpiling of parts could start in months  
Matthew lives in The Netherlands and works in the pharmaceutical industry. “I am appalled by the British government. They seem absolutely unconcerned about the 1.3m British people living in the EU”#Brexit  
Passionate call from @Wera_Hobhouse for a People's Vote: 'The Tories say Brexit is the will of the people, but the Tories themselves are in disarray among themselves about what the will of the people actually is.' 
Oh look, the Government lied about the ‘Brexit Dividend’. It lied officially, using official Government channels. It lied to Parliament. It forced civil servants to be complicit in lying. Not spin, or selective truth telling. Lying. Officially.  
Holy crap. See below. Daniel is at the Adam Smith Institute...Look, I’m a scientist. Experimenting is fine. Brexit is an experiment.Fine. Give it a go.Have a look-see.But it’s now increasingly clear to a wider audience that Brexit is an experiment going very wrong.  
I’m sure the Brexit Puppet Masters have been very generous to Darren with “expenses” etc, but all good things must come to an end, & Darren needs to face up to the facts & music now.His best bet is to come clean & explain he was young & used by wealthy older men. #DarrenGrimes 
Bravo @Stone_SkyNews. With #OneOfThe3Million trending in the UK today highlighting the lives of @The3Million EU citizens in the UK since the referendum the 1.2m @BritishInEurope and the impact on them is equally important to highlight. #OneOfThe1Point2Million? 
Reporting vs covering:Reporting Scotland lead item was indeed on Brexit. You know how long it lasted? 2 minutes. That's how long the producers felt it deserved. @nickeardleybbc tried his best to get across the chaos of the whole situation but there was no detailed analysis. 
A peculiar thing happened at #EURef & has been continuing since.Remain stopped having the debate about UK contributions to the EU.Why was that, one wonders?#ItsAllAboutTheMoney.#Brexit=Freedom.  
By the way, you won't hear BBC Scotland reporting the fact all Scottish Tories voted the opposite way than their constituents for a Rees-Mogg Brexit that'll destroy rural industries and agriculture 
Former Brexit Secretary @DavidDavisMP:  The EU creates "suboptimal" trade deals and the UK does the least well within them pic.twitter.com/fXwljqGRpO 
The analysis is this: the decision to leave was May’s and May’s alone. The only basis for that was a stunningly corrupt advisory referendum.UNACCEPTABLE 
Lauren lives in Finland. She is a student.“My main concern is the impact on Brits who want to study abroad”#Brexit  
Referendum result unsound. #VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw #VoteLeaveCheated #VoteLeaveCriminals Sign, if you agree and then RT 
When hard brexiteer @bbradleymp admits #Brexit could cause economic turmoil, it is clear the public need a #PeoplesVote to have a say on the final deal 
ToryKip chief whip threatens rebels with ‘Tonight’s vote is much more important than Brexit. It’ll bring down the Tory party!’And there you have it! Tories don’t really give a fuck about anything other than their Gravy Train.Don’t worry though! BBC/Sky won’t run this story. 
Telling it’s folk like Chris Leslie who get into the detail of Brexit in the House, never Corbyn. It’s as if he can’t get his head around it 
Today Winston Churchill's grandson blasted Brexit “cheating” & demanded it is all "blown up and started again".Time for a #PeoplesVote on this pack of rubbish known as Brexit.  
Poll reveals Brits would rather quit the EU with no deal than back Theresa May's Brexit plans  
A few home truths for Sinn Fein...If they had taken their seats last night in the commons for #brexit votes, we’d be in a different space today and successful amendments which adversely affected Ireland could have been defeated. @fiannafailparty 
Clarissa lives in Italy. She is a teacher. “We are not being told what we need to do. We have no idea.”#Brexit  
The BBC’s coverage (or non coverage) of the manifold crimes behind the pro #Brexit campaign has been a disgrace from start to finish. Repeat: these are not “allegations”. They are crimes.  
So, even though Brexit Referendum was advisory the advisory result of it must be implemented against all reason, but because it was advisory any associated wrongdoing  cannot be challenged in the courts.= #VoteLeave really are having their cake and eating it. 
I was proud to have voted in every division last night, but there was a missed opportunity to defeat the Government. We need to be ready every time. Liberal Democrats will be redoubling our efforts to stop Brexit and to give the people the say on the final deal.  
Samuel is 31. He lives in France and he’s a medicinal chemist. “Will my right to work here continue to be valid?”#Brexit  
The independent Office for Budget Responsibility's fiscal sustainability report is out today. It appears to dismiss the idea of a "Brexit dividend" being used to fund extra spending on the NHS.Here's our @FactCheck from June: 
.@theresa_may has moved around from crisis to crisis & her lack of authority means that she appeases everyone.She dances to the #EU’s tune over #Brexit.We have a zombie Prime Minister, who is not in control.My view is that #MAYMUSTGO.#ChequersMeansCorbyn#TuesdayThoughts 
Summary1. Despite Remain's relentless propaganda and deep pockets, the wrong side won the 2016 referendum.2. This sort of thing must never be allowed to happen again.3. In future, we must seek to overturn votes we don't like.4. Oh hang on, we already do.5. That's all, folks!  
As #Brexit talks go on & become ever more bitter, I’ve been listening to concerns of Brits living in continental EU. Don’t dismiss them & assume they’re happy, retired on the . Listen to them in this @SkyNews THREAD. Many different worries but all in limbo, stressed, forgotten 
If the result of the EU referendum must stand despite the gross violations of electoral law by the Leave campaign, presumably we also need to give Lance Armstrong all those yellow jerseys back. 
.@JohnMcDonnellMP says the government "cannot explain where planned extra NHS spending will come from". It's true there’s no Brexit dividend and the government has been vague.But Labour's own plans for the NHS aren't fully costed either. @FactCheck: 
I think you should reflect on why making Remain heroes out of politicians whose policies destroyed thousands of lives and lit the fuse for Brexit will reverse the EU referendum or make Britain a better place for all. #AnnaSoubry 
Excellent thread from @AdamWagner1 on why it will be very difficult to legally challenge #EURef result on basis of #VoteLeave cheating. I agree with him that ultimately what we do about this is a political rather than a legal decision #Brexit #FBPE 
What is the point of the Lib Dems if they can't be bothered turning up to vote against Brexit? | @tompeck 
The remain campaign spent over double what the leave campaign did on #Brexit?Leave spent £13.5mRemain spent £28m  
I fully support this call for an Inquiry. The referendum was rigged. 
Breaking: I just saw Tim Farron here in PARLIAMENT. So unless he has any trips to Dorset planned in the next couple of hours, he should be here to vote today. Anyone seen Vince? #TradeBill #CustomsBill #brexit 
Everyone on Twitter today seems to be obsessed with Trump, Putin, May, Brexit... Didn't you hear @cher is releasing an album of ABBA covers?  Priorities people! PRIORITIES! 
We love Yimiao Shih's piece in the @royalacademy Summer Exhibition 2018 - RABBEXIT (AN HOMAGE TO BREXIT) - which features a nod to "Monty Python & the Holy Grail" #montypython #holygrail #art #summerexhibition 
ALTERNATIVE FACTS - UK STYLE"Now, I've told you there is a Brexit dividend, so there is, don't come back with your pesky facts and evidence"The OBR is the government's fiscal watchdog  
Full list of Cabinet Ministers and Ministers who sat on the Campaign Committee of Vote Leave, the organisation that was found guilty today of cheating in the 2016 #Brexit referendum:  
The problem I have with this is that the referendum has been used to claim a monstrous mandate which continues to be used to shout down any attempt to debate, modify or guide Brexit. Such a mandate could only be based an unambiguous, safe result. 
I'm #OneOfThe3Million. I came to the UK 9 years ago, and immediately felt at home in a way I never did where I grew up. Beyond my own #InLimbo story, I am concerned about the immense damage Brexit is doing to this country, and as a scientist I believe that reason should prevail!  
As MPs debate the Trade Bill and some of their number push amendments aimed at keeping the UK in an EU customs union, this piece is worth a re-read: At the referendum we did vote to Leave the EU’s Customs Union  
'Blow up the whole damn thing' cries Tory in powerful Brexit 'cheating' speech  
Revealed: No.10 pact with ultra-Remainer rebels to pursue a soft #Brexit to keep them onsideWith ERG amendments yesterday, we’re still heading towards the softest of Brexits, but Remainers are threatening to topple government in act of revenge In full:  
Whilst landfill sites up & down the country still groan from the millions of discarded govt propaganda leaflets distributed to help the Remain campaign before the referendum, deranged remaniacs like Maugham try to suggest the referendum was somehow unfair to them.   It’s pitiful.  
These findings undermine the legitimacy of the result of #EURef which the UK Govt are using to justify the economic & social madness of #Brexit & which has thrown the whole UK into turmoil including the countries who didn’t vote for it. Its time to reconsider  
Announcing that the referendum was advisory but that they would stick with the result was a scam in the first place as it meant they didn't have to abide by all the legal safeguards of an obligatory referendum. This has been a stitch up from the beginning. 
Brexit campaign broke the law.  
Parliament should have its summer recess stopped until this Brexit mess is sorted not have 5 extra days off. UK democracy is a shambles led by this awful fuckuppery of a Tory govt.#BrexitShambles pic.twitter.com/782vqdYUmM 
The Tory party can hardly claim they are ‘pro-business’ when they are royally screwing them over with Brexit | @ChukaUmunna 
" But the Referendum was advisory, so the courts likely cannot intervene. "#DavidLammy100% correct.#VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw#VoteLeaveCheated 
“The #ChequersDeal is in the mortuary. It’s no longer a question of whether May will lose her job, but when.If a Conservative Government continues to show contempt for Conservative voters, don’t be surprised if the voters return the compliment”#Brexit 
By cheating on spending rules #VoteLeave broke the law. But the Referendum was advisory, so the courts likely cannot intervene. So, it is up to Parliament to decide if the result is void. We need a vote in this House.  
Fellow Leavers, the European, civil service, legal and corporate establishments won election after election in UK for four decades but in June 2016 they lost a referendum. It’s why their fightback is so ferocious. We mustn’t be exhausted. If they win now, change may never come. 
Please RT if you have seen this man. He wears a distinctive hat and is called Vince. Vince was last seen staring up at a boarded-up post office in his local high street. -He also missed an important vote on Brexit last night & his friends at #FBPE are very concerned. 
I don't understand the logic. In parliament, when debating the referendum, all sides declared that trust in the validity of the result was vital. The law exists to ensure the result is safe. The law was broken. The result, by definition, is unsafe and untrustworthy. 
Members of the Cabinet sat on the Campaign Committee of Vote Leave, which has been found to have flouted the rules of our democracy. We now need a full public inquiry into the Leave campaign, whose cheating calls into question the legitimacy of the entire Brexit process.  
More Tories see @Nigel_Farage as the leader of Brexit than their own prime minister. No surprise - he spent his whole life fighting for it while she backed Remain (and now grovels to Brussels)!Read at Support us at  
I have been clear these past 2 years I am not a party tribalist. The priority for me is stopping Brexit.I've attacked Tories and Labour. So when my own party, @LibDems, fails to attend a vote? Yes, I'll criticise them for such a stupid betrayal. Because they deserve it.#FBPE 
Brexit derangement syndrome is a serious illness & @carolecadwalla has a particularly severe case... 
How the biased BBC uses negative labels to disparage and undermine Brexit supporters:  
Plenty of people are telling me: if you respect democracy, you must accept the result of the Referendum.To which I say: if you respect democracy, you must not allow it to be stolen by cheats and dark money. 
Maybe we don’t need a second referendum. Perhaps we just need the first one without cheating, lies, and Russian influence.  
This is classic. Tory Brexiteer: 'Obviously Brexit is going to cost jobs and mess up the economy, but people voted for it, so what can you do?' Journo: 'But you told them it wouldn't mess up the economy...' Brexiteer: 'But they voted for it...'  
Remainers Threatened No.10 Into Backing Soft Brexit - Then Reneged  
"Brexit means Brexit""We will Leave the Single Market and Customs Union""The jurisdiction of the ECJ will end" "I want us to be Global Britain"  Every promise Theresa May has made on Brexit has now been broken with this Chequers proposal. She cannot be trusted. 
POLL: Nigel and Boris viewed as Britain’s Brexit Leaders over the PM. More Tory voters back Nigel than May!  
Theresa May criticised for taking early holiday without delivering Brexit  
WATCH: Brextremist @bbradleymp admits #Brexit could lead to economic turmoil. We need a #PeoplesVote to give the public control of the final #Brexit deal  
Corbyn's Brexit spokesman, Keir Starmer, called for a full investigation into the Vote Leave corruption at 1.30 a.m. this morning (hours before your comment).  But rather than focus on the corruption in the Leave vote you choose to attack your own party again. 
And that needs a bigger answer than just saying the referendum was advisory or the campaign broke the law. 
Tory Brexiteer admitting he's prepared to carry on with a hard Brexit knowing it will create economic turmoil. Have they no shame, as elected representatives?!  
Isn't it a neat trick @theresa_may pulled off, to appoint a minister for #Brexit...Keep him in the dark, and suddenly pull out of her arse a white paper he had no input into, no say in, written by her adviser (not an MP) and force him at Chequers to agree to it.  
Whistleblower @shahmiruk says he backs @ChukaUmunna's calls for a public inquiry into @vote_leave spendingRead more on this Brexit campaign story here:  
If an early GE is called this fall, it truly wouldn't surprise me if the SNP took nearly every seat. They're the ONLY party standing against hard Brexit in Scotland. 
Zero hour contracts, agency work, people taking themself off the system because it’s making them ill. Continue to spout your lies, try and fob the public off regarding Brexit, but you will be answerable for both in the near future. 
Endlessly baffling that the party that gave us @LGBTLD and unabashed pro-Europeism should choose as their leader Tim "I'd rather go lecture about gay sex than vote against brexit" fucking Farron 
Tory MP Ben Bradley admits this morning on @adamboultonSKY there will be economic turmoil when we leave the EU. I was arguing need to stay in customs union to protect manufacturing jobs #BrexitShambles #Brexit  
I am #OneOfThe3Million I live in England since 1990. I have a Permanent Residence document, but it will not be valid after Brexit. I feel cheated and heart broken.  This is not the country I fell in love with   
#Brexit was obtained through fraud and not through democracy.Anyone standing by the result condones law breaking. It's no different to turning a blind eye to someone burgling your home.MPs backing it are acting in bad faith. It is a dereliction of duty to the electorate. 
So Vote Leave broke the law, nullifying the referendum. Michael Gove admitted that things were pushed too far, and the NHS dividend was a lie. And the leaders have quit.At this point, maintaining the 'will of the people' is just propaganda. The people were cheated and lied to. 
I will say one thing for Brexit. Here we all are: black, white, Jew, Muslim, Gentile, no faith at all, gay and straight, old and young, all now working together towards one cause. Trying to work out how the hell we got into this mess. 
'The Electoral Commission report marks a watershed moment and clearly calls into question the legitimacy of the referendum result. All members of the Government who sat on the campaign committee of Vote Leave should resign'says @jon_bartley 
How do you archive a referendum campaign? Check out this article from the BBC on the steps being taken to make sure everything from the campaign is recorded. BBC News - Etching Irish abortion referendum into history  
Imagine if even one of 'our' lobby fodder Scottish Tories had one hundredth of this commitment to at least consider the Scottish interest in last night's hard Brexit votes.  
Reminding the House of Commons that during the 2016 EU referendum campaign Remain spent over twice as much as Leave did, including using £9,288,000 of taxpayers’ money sending leaflets to every UK address advocating we remain members. 
Vince Cable and Tim Farron missed key Brexit votes last night. Has anybody seen them?Never fall into the trap of trusting the Lib Dem's. When Britain needs them most, they always run away.#BBCdp #TuesdayThoughts 
Big surprise. Roland - a very active “Liberal Leaver” who constantly tirelessly made the case for Brexit on here ahead of the referendum, but also membership of the EEA (ie Norway model)...  
MP @LiamByrneMP declares: "This referendum result was corrupt because it was bought, quite possibly with Russian money" 
LibDems let down the country when they trebled tuition fees.LibDems let down the country when they supported the bedroom tax.LibDems let down the country when they supported austerity.And they let down the country when Cable and Farron didn’t turn up to a key Brexit vote. 
A rigged referendum A PM in office but not in powerFar right on the risePublic services under-funded to the point of crisisA government so fragile it's voting for early leave to avoid total collapseI'm just waiting for Liz to pronounce this an annus horribilis... 
Downing Street says there won't be a second Brexit vote. But @Hugodixon says it's increasingly likely it will happen -- whether the Prime Minister wants one or not (via @CNNopinion) 
Both sides exploited loopholes to maximise how much they could spend. The Remain side also had the advantage of the government machine – and £9.3 million of public funds on its side. If the referendum was unbalanced, the advantage was with Remain – and yet it still lost. 
If you're angry at the Lib Dems for missing a Brexit vote, wait until you hear what they got up to from 2010-2015 
How do those who claim that 'Brexit is too difficult'. Or 'Brexit can never be achieved' explain that 168 countries, 92% of the world (7,000 million people) and 5/6ths of World Trade work perfectly well outside the EU?If Brexit is so hard, how come they all do it?  
This is interesting in a majority Remain area. The main point seems to be that if we are having Brexit, it should be a Brexit that makes the most of the opportunities. It was felt this deal compromised too much to allow that. 
Hold referendum to end religious control of schools, says Labour  
If you voted leave, the Tories are letting you down. Their shambolic Brexit negotiations will damage our economy.If you voted remain, remember that two of the most prominent LibDems failed to turn up to vote.If you oppose a shambolic Brexit what want a good deal: back Labour. 
The Conservative civil war over Brexit  
This has to be right. People accused of electoral fraud should not be allowed anywhere near government, let alone Brexit.  
What's happened in the 7 DAYS since @jeremycorbyn last tweeted about Brexit?-New Brexit Sec & Foreign Sec-Govt Brexit white paper-Trump said May plan ‘kills’ UK-US deal-May ditched plan to appease Rees-Mogg-Real risk of no deal-Vote Leave referred to policeNot one tweet. 
When you think your prejudice is more important than Brexit. #TimFarron  
If we are at a Brexit stalemate, we need a new parliament | Gaby Hinsliff  
Trump's thoughts on Brexit is like a college student trying to pull off a presentation on a book they didn't read  
If the punishment for breaking election/referendum laws is just a fine, then there is no point in having those laws. Might as well have the richest side wins from now on. #bbcdp 
I feel so angry about the time wasted this year...while the gov has been going around in circles on Brexit our public services have been in crisis, we’ve failed to reform our housing system or pay sufficient attention to climate change and the economy has suffered. #MayShouldGo 
After two years rubbishing referendums, remainers want another one, a replay.Overturning the 2016 referendum result before it had even been carried out would collapse all faith in democracy itself.  
This is so serious; a complete undermining of our democracy. Unless the Government acts on this corruption and cheating in the EU referendum, it is complicit. The PM can start with suspending those in her Government who were on the Board of Vote Leave. 
Thought for fellow Brexit supporters - if UK signs up to deal like Chequers proposal then we would likely be in it long term - for good or ill. Whereas, efta + EEA have a clear exit procedure that takes 12 months to enact, if we didn't find it suitable.  
Liberal Democrats admit party 'messed up' over Brexit votes  
The extraordinary and blatant pro Brexit bias of @BBCNews is also no longer an allegation. 
Get your f*cking act together !!!Tim Farron apologises after he and Vince Cable miss Brexit vote#PeoplesVote 
Railways? Chaotic.NHS? In crisis.Brexit deal? Shambles.Theresa May? Trying to take an extra week of holiday.Think we need a government capable of governing? Retweet this   
WATO says there is no way forward for Theresa May’s Brexit strategy.  So how about we just wait till March 29th, then leave? 
Former Brexit Minister @DavidDavisMP: "We're the country that does the least well out of the EU's Free Trade Agreements" 
The PM chose her advisers and chose to hide her secret plan from Brexit-supporting Cabinet ministers  
'How will Brexit benefit me?' It's a simple question and one that should be easily answered if Brexit is a positive change. Yet no politician or leaver has been able to answer it. NOBODY can answer because the truth is that there are NO benefits, only losses. #StopBrexit#FBPE 
There are now two rational Brexit predictions:1. The UK will crash out / hard brexit / no deal.2. Brexit will be cancelled as there's no realistic way forward that's not akin to national suicide.I'm shifting between those predictions roughly once every 3 hours at this point. 
Ireland To Move All Its Oil Reserves Out Of The UK As Brexit Nears  
Even the Tories here in the Commons Chamber are now referring to their colleagues who ran the Leave campaign as ‘shysters and charalatans’! The referendum was rigged, that much is clear, and should be re-run if democracy is to be served #PeoplesVote 
The Electoral Commission has today confirmed Vote Leave broke the law. Their campaign and slogans were dishonest and they were prepared to go to any length to achieve their ideological end game, including, it is now clear, cheating and breaking the law. #FBPE #Brexit 
3 things we’ve learnt about our democracy since 2015: 1) the sanctions the Electoral Commission has are nowhere near strong enough to disincentivise cheating 2) those sanctions are especially inadequate in a referendum 3) electoral law for online activity needs a total overhaul. 
The excellent @NadineDorries on the awful behaviour of @Anna_Soubry in parliament yesterday.In Nadines words “they have lost the plot” and “it was one of the worst moments we have ever seen or witnessed in the chamber”#Brexit#ChequersMeansCorbyn 
So that's both the Tories' slim victory in the 2015 general election and Vote Leave's slim victory in the EU referendum that benefited from illegal overspending? 
Just imagine if they discovered that several Croatia players were using illegal performance enhancing drugs when they beat England, and FIFA said, “Yes, they cheated, but the result stands”.That’s what the UK govt’s position is now on Vote Leave’s illegal referendum campaign. 
Sarah Wollaston - We cannot have confidence that the #brexit referendum was secure so it should be rerun.#FBPE #StopBrexit @sarahwollaston @Anna_Soubry @Andrew_Adonis 
Senior Tory calls for Brexit referendum to be re-run given Vote Leave's 'cheating' - Politics live  
Every day that goes by that Nicola doesnt call a second referendum adds another bit of despair to those who KNOW Scotland can be better than this, however, when she does call that second referendum, YES campaigning is going to explode into life and it'll FANTASTIC and POSITIVE 
BBC Parliament Live Urgent QuestionTime. @DavidLammy stood and asked that, in light of the Electoral Commission report on Vote Leave, Conservative deration be given to the validity of the Referendum and asked if it could be declared void. Chloe Smith dismissed the question. 
In chamber for Urgent Question on Vote Leave campaign. We know they lied and now we know they cheated and broke the law. This goes to heart of our democracy. In referendum with 4% gap between Leave/Remain the overspend was 10%. All more reason for @peoplesvote_uk on #Brexit deal 
May's brought this on herself. Her decline is a result of her Brexit betrayal 
Come for Soames apparently calling for a people’s vote/referendum re-run, stay for the most hide-behind-the-sofa embarrassing answer ever delivered by a minister at the despatch box  
You'd think the left's emphatically pro-EU lobby would welcome the participation of a young working-class lad from County Durham who was brought up in a single-parent household (who also happens to be gay) – but a Brexit-backing homo on the right doesn't do it for them apparently  
I'm sitting on a toilet. I've had a poo.As a Brexit voter, I am waiting for a remoaner to come wipe my arse as they know best. 
"Petition: Rescind Art.50 if Vote Leave has broken Electoral Laws regarding 2016 referendum"It's not longer "if Vote Leave has broken Electoral Laws"This is now a legal FACT, Vote Leave has BROKEN the law and has been referred to the Met Police   
So Vince Cable didn’t vote against the Tories ERG amendments because he didn’t realise it would be so close. The Lib Dem’s blaming Labour for their own astonishing lack of awareness just doesn’t wash. Cable is supposed to be the leader of the anti-Brexit movement. What a shambles 
Labour MP Chuka Umunna says "foul play" could have affected the result of the #Brexit referendum, after Vote Leave is found to have broken electoral law  
Can any rational person in England, honestly blame Scotland for calling a second independence referendum now. 
Govt Minister says Electoral Commission findings on Vote Leave ‘cause for concern’ but don’t affect referendum result. Completely inadequate response - senior ministers sat on board of organisation which lied & cheated to a very narrow victory - validity of result is now in doubt 
One major flaw in Tory Remainer thinking, on their own terms, is while selling out Brexit might, they would think, keep a bit of friction off terms of UK/EU trade, it also gives us John McDonnell as Chancellor for 10 yrs. Do they not see how hugely that would impact the economy? 
I’m fed up with MPs who should know better saying they accept the result of the referendum. To say you accept the result of the referendum is like telling a bank robber they can keep the money. #Brexit 
We have led the fight against Brexit and we will now redouble our efforts.  
The reason why the #VoteLeave cheating is so important is because it's not some minor technicality. That money was used to buy advertising that sought to deliberately mislead the public into thinking they would be better off with #Brexit. They won't. It's a compounded fraud 
“It is the institution responsible for ensuring our campaigns, our referendums and our elections are legal. Undermining that is an insult to Britain’s democratic processes”  @shahmiruk on @ElectoralCommUK role in fines over referendum spending #bbcdp 
I watched a giant Chinese container ship glide into Felixstowe at the weekend and get unloaded by cranes in no time. Frictionless trade into the EU from outside. Today the EU signs a Free Trade Deal with Japan. Seems our face doesn’t fit. #Brexit 
“With the NHS in crisis, the Tory's Brexit negotiations descending into farce and local councils on the brink, the last thing Theresa May should be trying to do is send her MPs on holiday early to try and escape them bringing her down”  
Hats off to @vincecable & @timfarron who were unable to make the crucial votes on stopping a hard Brexit because they were addressing a seminar on how to stop....a hard Brexit!  
Theresa May has massively alienated Leave voters by selling out Brexit. Her reward among Remain voters? A barely perceptible softening of hostility.  
I'll just leave this here shall I? You outspent us 2-1, had the machinery of Government behind you and still lost. #Brexit #VoteLeave 
Binding elections have legal safeguards that Parliament stripped from this advisory referendum. Instead Parliament left it to MPs - but they've gone constitutionally awol. And the consequence is that the advisory referendum has a force that binding elections could never have had.  
"We cannot say with confidence that this foul play did not influence the result" - @ChukaUmunna is asking an urgent question on the Electoral Commission's investigation and fine of the @vote_leave campaignRead more on this Brexit campaign story here:  
Because most proposals for a 2nd referendum include keeping Remain on the ballot paper. It is not therefore an attempt to move the debate on, but to undo the result of the 1st referendum. 
The magnificent @NSoames in the wake of the #ElectoralCommission report on #Leave gross and illegal over spend has just called for the #EU #Referendum to be re run. I agree with him. 
55% support for independence in the north east  and >50% in Glasgow and central Scotland. The referendum must be called. The will of the Scottish people for self determination must be respected. We still have time to avoid the future these tory goons have planned. #indyref 
In a W’minster election called exclusively on Brexit, Sinn Fein received the greatest number of votes, vote share & overall seats of any nationalist party in NI since the foundation of the state. I’d say that’s a pretty clear mandate for their abstentionist stance. 
Can we say with confidence that "foul play" did not impact on result of referendum? @ChukaUmunna asks minister, as he asks Urgent Question in Commons about Brexit campaign group Vote Leave.  
The simple fact remains that the majority of people who voted Leave had already made their minds up years ago and were sitting and waiting patiently. This poured out in our European elections results years earlier and why we ultimately had referendum in the first place. 
'Why should we be a tax collector for EU?' Brexiteer @patel4witham in passionate Brexit defence  
In my lifetime, I do not recall a major U.K. election or vote  that was entirely corrupted by crime.  This story is beyond huge.  The EU Referendum was compromised by fraud.  When Dubya won with “hanging chads” the story lasted years.    
"The Government’s official and independent spending watchdog confirms there will be no Brexit dividend for the UK, despite the claims of ministers. Provisional analysis suggests Brexit is more likely to weaken than strengthen the public finances overall." 
For Pete's sake we've done this to death now. How many times during the EU Withdrawal Bill (aka the Great Repeal Bill) did the Commons and the Lords try to tie us into the Customs Union? Loads! Every time it was defeated. But these remoaners won't take no for an answer. #Brexit  
Bloopity, bloop, bloop. Always knew something was up with this absurd Brexit result. Now we know one of the reasons why. The other being PUTIN.  
I think brexiteers see it for what it is, a rerun of the original referendum. Are the Kamikaze Remainers now in favour of direct democracy instead of parliamentary democracy? 
‘You must accept a bent referendum or our lads might smash you up.’ *lectures a bit on democracy* [/ProjectFear]  
My opponent at the General Election said a vote for her would allow the LbDems to save us from #Brexit How’s that campaign promise shaping up?  
This summer is make or break for the Tories and the Brexiteers. If their govt and their insistence on leaving the EU doesn't survive public opinion until September, then their party and their Brexit will be finished for the long foreseeable future. You all know what you must do. 
I don’t like the idea of a second referendum, as proposed by Justine Greening. But one thing’s clear, the Kamikaze Brexiteers are petrified by it. Which is odd, given they’re supposed to be speaking for Britain. 
PM’s official spokesman unimpressed by OBR claims there is no Brexit dividend. “We have said very clearly that there is”.  
As we continue to see MPs make an absolute mess of Brexit, shout out to @helenhayes_, who is standing up for young people across the country by supporting a #PeoplesVote on the Brexit deal. Helen. You’re a hero   
“Anna Soubry was not attacking the ERG, she was standing up for what she believed…She was standing up in support of the White Paper” @JDjanogly tells @nadinedorries #Brexit #bbcdp 
Nadine Dorries on BBC: 'You know what would fix it?  ('It' being Brexit) 'If only the EU were to be a bit more reasonable and accepted what we want'. Sorry to tell you but it's not the fuckin' EU's problem to sort out the mess the UK's making. Learn to clean up your own shit!  
Labour could have supported our efforts to stop the Tories' Brexit power grab. Instead they abstained. Help us send a loud and clear message to this Tory government – hands off Scotland’s powers.  
LATEST NEWS: Vote Leave broke Electoral Law in the ReferendumRead more here:  
There is no such thing as a second referendum.  We had a referendum in 1975 to go into the EEC and one to come out of the EU in 2016. There will be no third referendum.  
Mark Carney warns of big impact of "no deal" #Brexit. Presumably part of new-style, coordinated "project fear". But I wonder how many people are listening given the abject failure of old-style "project fear" prior to referendum.  
PUTIN: The joining of Crimea to Russia isn't annexation. The ppl of Crimea went to referendum and voted for joining Russia. If this is annexation, what is democracy?   
Nadine Dorries proving once and for all on the #bbcdp that Brexiteers don't give a toss about a frictionless border/jobs/living standards/aeroplanes being grounded, it's all about the referendum result, becoming poorer is just an occupational hazard in their eye's #BrexitShambles 
Theresa May had a 21 point lead on Labour when she took over the Leadership of the Conservative Party. Today she is trailing by as much a 5 pts. Forget the mess of Brexit she is making. These stats alone should worry any Party. They should be slinging her out like a smelly fish! 
Yes, in my view the referendum is invalid. If this were a public procurement contract or a constituency election or a board appointment, it wouldn’t matter if malpractice influenced the result. The process is vitiated. 
The messages in black on our @unitetheunion roulette wheel are clear. These are the very real consequences of the Tories' Brexit chaos. Today I called on the govt to end the infighting and back UK manufacturing by supporting a customs union to secure frictionless trade with EU.  
Nadine Dorries attacking Anna Soubry for delivering a forensic study of the Brexit chaos. Nadine doesn’t have a plan that can end in an agreement.Nadine has finally realised that no deal was always the only option.What took her so long?#remain #FBPE #PeoplesVote 
Nadine Dorries accuses Anna Soubry of being irrational..........and in my kitchen a fight has broken out between the pots and the kettle. #bbcdp #Brexit 
This isn't said enough... we as a country are trusting our futures to a group of ego driven spoilt brats, lining their own pockets with zero understanding of how a no deal brexit would effect working class Britain. There is no compassion or empathy.  
"People who were here during Maastricht tell me it was slightly worse during Maastricht" @NadineDorries "We have not got to the full nuclear everybody not-getting-on terribly well yet" #Brexit #bbcdp 
"@theresa_may must go, we need a Brexiteer in Downing Street to deliver the will of the people" says @Janice4Brexit  as poll reveals that Brits would rather back no deal than PM's #Brexit plan.  
To be clear, 10 Downing Street knew the whole time that Vote Leave cheated to win. Two of Theresa May's senior advisers were responsible for organising this criminal conspiracy. Then they tried to cover it up. Evidence was tampered with. They put Brexit before Britain. 
Here is New Clause 18, which in Third Law Newtonian politics currently afflicting Government is the opposite reaction to Number 10 having accepted ERG “hard Brexit” amendments on customs, VAT and the Irish backstop. We’ll find out if its equal at 6pm tonight. 3 votes slim margin.  
Reminder: the Prime Minister is due to host a conference call of Conservative Association Chairmen tonight as part of the effort to win the grassroots over to her Brexit plan. As I wrote on Sunday, she is appealing for them to trust her just as trust in her is hammered.  
Head of French Region Bordering English Channel Urges for Brexit Talks With UK:  
#VoteLeaveCheated#VoteLeaveLiedWhy do so few people give a damn? I just don't understand it. Void the referendum.#PeoplesVote 
It is official #VoteLeavebrokethelaw.#VoteLeaveCheated.Get signing and RT this petition.Rescind Art.50 if Vote Leave has broken Electoral Laws regarding 2016 referendum. #FBPE #WATON #StopBrexit #PeoplesVote … 
EU has £130bn in assetsUK is entitled to £58bn of that.As always @realDonaldTrump was right.The UK should sue the EU for our share of the EU's assets after #Brexit.Why aren't the Gov demanding our share of the EU assets?We have helped to pay for them. 
What vision? What belief? What faith? The Brexit campaigns broke the law.Stand up for the law if you want parliamentary democracy to survive. 
I believe that this morning's announcement 're Vote Leave campaign being fined by Electoral Commission for illegal spending means we need an independent inquiry URGENTLY into the referendum campaigning. I will be in the Chamber this morning for the Urgent Question on this 
If MPs break for summer early, I'll go & sit in parliament and take over. I'll cancel Brexit first, and then order a criminal investigation into banksters. 
Brexit means breaking the law.  
Brexit Summary:Brexit voters wanted more control but Brexit is leaving us bound by EU law but no longer influencing itReferendum wasn't just filled with lies but #VoteLeave broke the law3 months left to negotiate and the government still doesn't know what it wants 
People to follow to understand the Brexit shit show: @carolecadwalla, @MarinaHyde, @IanDunt, @JolyonMaugham, @GuitarMoog, @mrjamesob, @J_amesp, @EmporersNewC, @andrewrawnsley All ace. 
If this is accurate it emphasises once more how ludicrous Brexit is.  
Tim Farron apologises after missing key Brexit vote to give a talk on how he squares being an evangelical Christian with being a Lib Dem.  
#PeterBone #MP - "#TheresaMay has to change the policy. The idea that  whenever the #EU don’t like something, we roll over and try to find something else that they would like, isn’t what #British people called  for." #Brexit  #BBC #LBC #SKY @Conservatives 
WM trying to tell us that ‘now is not the time’!! They will refuse us a referendum. Could this have something to do with it?! They are terrified of our independence and know how successful Scotland will be! Make sure we get this info to the NO voters.#AreYouYesYet 
Both Tim Farron and Vince Cable missed the Brexit votes last night - some were lost by just 3 votes.  
The state of the #BBC:@KateHoeyMP has appeared live and unchallenged on @BBCNews:'I haven't read the report, but.... the EC are all remainers.... the amount was minuscule... 'Remain' spent more... the pro EU groups are funded by Soros, who's not even a British citizen..." 
Nigel Farage: Get rid of May & Get #Brexit LeaderGo to Brussels, say ‘we are very reasonable & willing to compromise BUT'We must have control of our borders.We must be in control of our own laws.If Brussels reject, we Leave & trade under WTO rules.#EU 
After reprieve, May faces Brexit battle in parliament on trade  
I voted Lib Dem for the first time in 2017 because they were the anti-Brexit party. Disappointing doesn’t even begin to cover it. Absolutely unforgivable.  
I appreciate I don't fully understand the various nuances of Northern Irish politics but I sincerely believe that the Liberal Democrats should end their historic abstentionist policy and take their seats in the House of Commons to fight brexit. 
You've gambled all that you have on one issue and you don't even turn up to watch the cards being dealt. A textbook case in how not to run an anti-Brexit campaign.  
Remain outspent Leave by more than 2:1 during the EU referendum. 
New analysis by @peoplesvote_uk shows the health service is expected to lose 4,500 more EU staff by end of Parliament.Enough is enough. Demand a People's Vote on the final #brexit deal. 
What is the point of the Liberal Democrats if they can't turn up to defeat the Government in the House of Commons? 'Tim Farron apologises after he and Vince Cable miss Brexit vote'  
'Brexit dividend' a myth, Government's official spending watchdog confirms  
Did you know that the remain campaign spent over double what the leave campaign did on #Brexit?Leave spent £13.5mRemain spent £28m  
It’s official: Brexit campaign broke the law — with social media’s help  by @riptari 
The Governments official spending watchdog confirms Theresa May’s ‘Brexit dividend' for the NHS is a myth! Inconceivable she believed a word of what she said, nobody could be that stupid, so will she now resign for again misleading Parliament & the public?  
Very good point. If Vote Leave broke the law to win the referendum, and the Government is pursuing Brexit knowing that, they're aiding and abetting the original crime by ensuring that it bears (poisoned) fruit... (accessories after the fact).#VoteLeave 
UK should be a full part of this EU-Japan trade pact, but we won't be because of #Brexit. Japan is world's 4th largest economy and a major investor in the UK. Another example of how #Brexit will disrupt, not enhance, our trade relationships with the world outside Europe.  
Pathetic to somehow try to blame Labour for your absence. How is a giving a talk on 'intolerance' to Christians more important than a Brexit vote. And where exactly was your mate Vice because 'in a meeting off the Parliamentary estate' is a bit vague for something this important. 
The truth about Brexit: Vote Leave broke the law in order to win. They cheated and they are being referred to the police for it. We now have to ask ourselves why we are continuing with Brexit based on a vote won by cheating and fraud. We need a new vote.  
#VoteLeaveCriminals stole our data, broke our election laws and colluded with a hostile foreign power.It's increasingly clear we've been the victims of a massive, cynical con.Enough is enough.Time to come clean on Brexit.  
Brexit is personal. I am #OneOfThe3Million EU citizens in the UK. I've lived her for nearly 2 decades and I hate the fact that I'll be considered illegal until proven otherwise. Feeling very unwelcome in what I had considered my home.#inlimbo #EUcitizensChampion #BrexitIsPersonal 
Dominic Grieve: “The only objective behind the amendments was malevolent”.  No Dominic. The only objective was to deliver the Brexit we voted for. 
The defence procurement minister Guto Bebb has resigned because he thinks the Government’s anti-Brexit stance doesn’t go far enough.This will help us to highlight the vast scale of the proposed defence procurement giveaway contained in the Chequers Plan.  
So do I have this right?Vote Leave promised a Brexit that cannot be delivered, £350m a week for the NHS that doesn’t exist AND cheated to win the referendum?And Britain still wants to go through with this?#Brexit 
This is a no-brainer: it’s time to stop Brexit. 
BREAKING: I'm writing to colleagues in Parliament today, to seek their support in calling for a public inquiry into the Brexit referendum. If illegality can take place in our democracy, we must bring forward reforms. Please write to your MP to ask for their support!  
This is how serious this #Brexit shambles!  
‘Brexit Psychosis’: UKIP Slams May for Pushing Early Parliament Holiday to Avoid Tory Rebellion   
Countries in turmoil, brexit’s a joke, racism is rife & fascism is on the rise. Troubles in N Ireland are brewing, NHS is screwed & people are dying on beds in corridors & you have zero control of anything but I tell you what Theresa, hows about u fuck off on an early holiday? 
If you have any respect for the integrity of British democracy, you cannot find out that the biggest political shift in half a century was achieved by criminal action and just shrug your shoulders.There MUST be a People's Vote on the Brexit deal.#VoteLeave 
I think Domnic Cummings is a twat of monumental proportions , that Left to Vote Leave the referendum would have been lost but the behaviour of the “”Remain” @ElectoralCommUK has been dismal. We taking them to court and suggest VL do likewise ! 
"Now when I said I oppose Brexit I didn't realise that would involve showing up to fucking vote" pic.twitter.com/vNRMMTq20s 
Whatever Vote Leave spent on the referendum, it is a rounding error compared with what the EU has spent buying off civil society with our own money over the years. #Brexit 
Brexit Deal Impact (pop share)NO DEAL - Scotland will lose 280,000 jobs and £1.58 billionCOMP FTA - Scotland will lose 175,000 jobs and £990 millionSOFT - Scotland will lose 70,000 jobs and £390 millionREMAIN - Scotland will lose 0 jobs and £0#DissolveTheUnion 
Hahaha laughable. Moment I saw a Brexit fan talk about facts, I won't lie, I was instantly intrigued.Only to be disappointed seven words later. It's all you have. Just give up now. 
Darren, serious question, have you taken independent legal advice? And when I say 'independent' I mean independent from that given to you by Vote Leave or anyone associated with Vote Leave....you're in serious trouble fella. 
Just told @BBCNews that those found to have broken the law in Brexit referendum should not be allowed to play a part in any people’s vote to stop Brexit. They can only lie, cheat & spend money illegally once! 
Liam Fox: We need to stop fighting the referendum over and over again  
It's official: #VoteLeave lied & cheated in the Referendum. So...Engineer? Designer? UX? Data scientist? Social Influencer? The Great British Hack-Off will aim at Brexit - July 21-22, London  by @TechForUK & @BestForBritain #GBhackoff #FBPE Pls share! 
My daughter just asked me what Brexit is. Trying to explain it to her was akin to learning Sanskrit in less than 24 hours, translating Hamlet into said Sanskrit in less than 24 hours, learning said play in less than 24 hours and putting it on at The Palladium for a six year run. 
With Gove, Johnson, Baker Grayling, Raab and Fox on board, Vote Leave was the "respectable" face of Brexit.  It 1. Told outright lies - £350 m for NHS Brexit deal the "easiest in history" etc2. Planted fake news about millions of Turkish Muslims coming3. Broke electoral law 
“Keep the faith”? Are you fucking kidding me?Keep the sodding faith? You’ve had 2 fucking years to come up with some semblance of a plan. 2 years to present one single, tangible, unarguable benefit that Brexit will bring.2 years and all you’ve got is “keep the fucking faith”  
Reminder This is deeply disturbing. It appears that the #CambridgeAnalytica/AIQ scandal reaches into 10 Downing Street. The rationale for the brutal outing of Shahmir Sanni by Stephen Parkinson becomes all the clearer. The rot might well go to the top. #StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE 
There’s a deluge of news, but anyone following the news in the US and especially the US media need to pay more attention to convergence of Trump-Russia and Brexit stories and common threads between the two  
Yesterday 'no deal' Brexit became the most likely outcome. Today we see confirmed that #VoteLeave broke the electoral law and has, therefore, now been fined and referred to the policy. So when will responsible politicians stop this madness? 
‘Brexit Psychosis’: UKIP Slams May for Pushing Early Parliament Holiday to Avoid Tory Rebellion   
.@patel4witham: The public want to know that their political leaders will stay true to the promises made to them that Brexit means Brexit  
As the UK slides inexorably closer to the Brexit cliff edge, and the WM tone and language becomes more and more aggressive, it’s worth reposting this . .  
Public reaction to Guto Bebb resignation sums up the Union's attitude to Wales.Main response from non-Welsh people on both sides of Brexit divide has been to joke about his Welsh name.Wales is constantly disrespected. This would be unacceptable with names of any other origin. 
I read in the Guadian this morning that 3000 years before the dawn of agriculture the Natufians were eating gazelle sandwiches. In this world of Trump and Brexit I find that image strangely comforting. 
If the Guardian/Observer did as much investigative journalism about the illegal attack on Iraq as they do about the Brexit referendum, Blair and Campbell would be at the Hague. But Blair and Campbell are the Guardian and Observer’s people. They are the liberal elite’s made men 
So @jeremycorbyn when might you come out and state that the whole Brexit campaign was an illegal far right heist of our democracy? I thought you believed in democracy and hated the far right 
I reported Vote Leave to the electoral commission four months before the referendum over their spending plans.  The original story is below.   
"Brexit is more likely to weaken than strengthen the public finances overall", says the Office for Budget Responsibility (again). There's no Brexit dividend, but there is a Brexit tax...  
Electoral Commission email correspondence destroys its claims that Vote Leave refused to attend its meetings and show the Brexit campaign was deliberately not invited  via @GuidoFawkes 
As Theresa May caves in to the demands of ‘no deal’ hard Brexiters, it appears that she has conveniently forgotten that she warned us about the perils of Brexit while promoting the benefits of being a member of the EU. Here’s a little reminder. 
We fucked this. How can we be seen to be the anti-Brexit party when 2 of our most prominent MPs were absent for non-crucial events?  
If only there was some evidence of massive over-spending by the Remain campaign then I am sure the Electoral Commission would investigate it.... #VoteLeave #Brexit #TuesdayThoughts 
Brexit LIVE: Theresa May’s Remainiacs to strike REVENGE on Brexiteers with customs vote  
How do the working-classes you claim to defend (but which you actually look down on for voting Brexit) benefit from immigration? Why should any working-class person vote in favour of immigration?  
The Brexit vote has been the perfect illustration of the fact that it is far easier to fool someone than to convince them that they have been fooled. 
Disgraceful that Vince Cable and Tim Farron did not show up to debate and vote on Brexit. Last night they had the opportunity to vote against Theresa Mays Brexit plan. They have misled their party and voters and should be ashamed of themselves. #VoteLeave 
Government in chaos, Electoral Commission putting the referendum result into serious question. One party is for a common sense solution to Brexit (and shows up for votes)! Join the Green party today:  
As a former DPP and current Brexit spokesman @Keir_Starmer should be leading the charge on this 
Questioning whether Leave overspend impacted the vote is a diversionary tactic. It's impossible to quantify and ultimately unimportant. If a campaign wins a referendum/election after breaking the rules that are there to protect against buying victory the result should be void. 
Carole Cadwalladr wants to know why the BBC won't report on her Brexit conspiracy theories.The BBC's response? Sorry, but we actually need to see some evidence...  
Brexit is getting too real for some people.. ‘socialists don’t like ordinary people choosing, for they may not choose socialism’ - Margaret Thatcher  
The 'Brexit dividend' money Theresa May promised for the NHS is a myth, Government's official spending watchdog confirms  
Nigel Farage outlines 'best thing' Tories can do to break Brexit deadlock with Brussels  
Amidst this week's ongoing Brexit volatility, our paper is finally in print at @journalEPOP w/ @cjw_phd & Jae-Jae Spoon! We find that preferences for Brexit in Scotland are complicated by support for Independence and the Scottish National Party.    
When the chairman of the @ElectoralCommUK calls Brexit a complete collection of Eurosceptic nonsense and his side kick calls for a second referendum , I think we have some idea of their integrity ! Much the same as yours...  
They're acc mad lmao I have experienced this myself, quick to tell you to go back to your country like Brexit won't done their dance  it's projection... They want English people to like them so they turn on us, little do they know that our history of being hated is longer  
I think a ‘no deal’ Brexit is now inevitable. After 2 years, the government still doesn’t have a negotiation plan and time is running out.We will reach a point where Theresa May announces that she is walking away from negotiations and deflects her ineptitude onto blaming the EU. 
Important task, help needed! Please reply to any and all future tweets from Lib Dems about Brexit with this link:   
I say this as myself, not as a YL representative, but you should not have been allowed, or even have asked, to be absent from any Brexit vote unless it was for health or family reasons. We claim to be the only party that wants to stop Brexit, we need to have our MPs there voting. 
The backlash against a Brexit in name only will be unlike anything we’ve seen for a long time:  #BrexitBetrayal 
Our poll shows that society members overwhelmingly oppose the prime minister’s #Brexit settlement, agreed at #Chequers. RESULTS —• Support: 4.5%• Oppose: 91%• Undecided: 4.5%Turnout: 50% 
Vince Cable and Tim Farron are so against Brexit that they didn't turn up to vote against Rees Mogg/Bojo/Theresa May's hard Brexit plan... 
British Prime Minister Theresa May narrowly staved off a rebellion from pro-EU members of her Conservative Party, following her decision to incorporate hardline Brexit amendments into a customs bill  
Brexit trade negotiation proposal: The Conservative Party transfer Anna Soubry to the Labour Party in exchange for Kate Hoey. 
An appalling decision to adjourn House on thurs which I  will not support We have much work to do outside the Brexit SNAFU.#whoisinchargeoftheclatteringtrain 
So Tim Farron & Vince Cable betrayed LibDem voters by not turning up to a crucial Brexit vote although at #GE17 promised they'd do all they could to Stop Brexit. To be fair though betraying their voters is a LibDem tradition (after what Nick Clegg did) so this was to be expected 
"He seems more drawn to negotiating with illiberal authoritarian leaders around the world than with fellow democrats."Nick Clegg says “the world…has changed out of all recognition” since the election of Donald Trump – and calls for “breathing space to think again” over Brexit.  
I have said from the start that Brexit is a fraud. I'm either insulted or ignored. 
Theresa May's dreadful fake-Conservative government betrays #Brexit and then seeks to go on holiday early to cut off dissent. Any MP with any decency will vote against this motion.  
Will the public ever wake up to the fact that Brexit and Trump are the same show by the same producers? Brought to you using the same lies and illusions 
Frank Field is the chairman of the Work and Pensions Committee, he knows about poverty, his constituency on Merseyside is poor, he's voted to help enable a hard tory #Brexit, which will cause devastation, Mr. Field must resign from this Cttee, he's a disgrace #BrexitShambles 
Lead Brexit campaign group faces police inquiry over its spending  
Remind me again, @UKLabour, why you aren't opposing Brexit? I'm guessing, after this news, you'll create another 'test' to add to your list, right? That'll teach those pesky right-wing coup buggers!  
Small moment in jaw-dropping Putin-Trump presser yesterday. Putin let slip that "we" (ie Russia, not the "Crimean people") held the 2014 Crimea referendum: "We held a referendum in strict compliance with the UN Charter and international legislation."   
Today Darren Grimes, the fashion student ‘given’ £675k just before Brexit vote, was reported to police by Electoral Commission. Guess where Grimes works now? The IEA...  
Sammy Wilson boasting about having voted against the backstop - the bit of Brexit negotiations that protects the provisions of the Good Friday Agreement (which the DUP opposed).  
TFW you see people still not convinced that toppling this Tory government must be our prime concern. Whether your priority is Brexit, austerity, racism, nationalism, Press abuse, prejudice of all forms, this nakedly self-interested mob is an obstacle to change across the board.  
#Labour must back both #JeremyCorbyn and a #PeoplesVote on the disastrous Tory #Brexit , argues @SalmanShaheen 
Every time those #FBPE FibDem Blairite Red Tory arses raise one word of criticism against Corbyn just tweet THIS back to them.  Tim Farron & Vince Cable couldn't be bothered to attend voting on Anti-Brexit legislation. 
Here's my cartoon for @TheNewEuropean from April 2017. With hindsight I was too kind, treating them as hapless birdbrained villains in an Ealing comedy called 'Oi! Brexit!' rather than lying and conspiratorial birdbrained villains.  
Very clear from @robertcourts: "Government’s new approach must be one of self-confidence, & treating Brexit as an opportunity to be grasped, of restoring the control of our elected politicians over the rules that govern us and the choices that they make.  
A useful (calm) thread on the legal implications of Vote Leave's cheating on referendum spending. Short version: there aren't any  
Quitling MPs now not just whispering in Parliamentary cupboards that it's fine to destroy the economy for the sake of Brexit. One of them has just come out in public & said so loud & clear in a discussion with Adam Boulton on Sky News.These bastards are traitors. 
I voted to Leave I voted Brexit. This is getting so drawn out that even I have had enough about tweeting, and talking about Brexit. 2 yrs ago I walked into a polling station it said Leave or Remain in the EU simple enough. Why is this so complicated because i said Leave it's bad. 
Brexit is being well and truly betrayed. It’s absolutely blatant and now they don’t even care how obvious it is. But the battle to free ourselves from the EU will never be over until we leave - with no impediments.  
The official pro-Brexit campaign group has been fined and referred to the police after the UK's elections watchdog found it had broken Britain's strict electoral laws during the 2016 referendum campaign  
Curious really since BBC Newsnight have done two comedy hit jobs on me & a third in the works about my business interests in South Africa claiming Brexit was funded by the Russians ! The @guardian & @carolecadwalla will never get over Brexit and Trump!  
Astonishing weakness from Theresa May - trying to send MPs home early to avoid further embarrassment for her zombie government. A PM who votes against her own Brexit plans has no plan for the future of our country 
The House of Commons does not represent the British people on Brexit and Farage knows it. 
To my friends in UK! Want to get Putin back & trump at the same time! Stop Brexit & call it what it is! Putin's plan to break up NATO & Western Alliance! All those pushing it are against you or Complicit or compromised! Trust me we in the USA are trying to undo this crime too! 
Dover-Calais 'facing economic catastrophe' due to Brexit  
Tories need to elect a #Brexit PM who will de-select all the traitors.Put Tories in their place who will honour their election promises.Call a #Brexit General Election to deliver the Brexit we voted for.Tories would win in a landslide.  
Jacob Rees Mogg is working Theresa May from the back#VoteLeave cheated yet the #Brexit result still standsThe Scottish Tory MPs voted against @ScotParl having any sayWhy is Scotland still in this UK union? This is NOT DEMOCRATIC! #indyref2 
David Davis warns Government will ‘throw away’ opportunities of Brexit if it sticks to Chequers plan  
Incredible. This whole Brexit mess just keeps getting shadier and shadier.  
Brexit is personalI am #OneOfThe3Million EU citizens in UKIn UK for>17 years working as a Nurse#EUcitizensChampion since yesterdayWe are not a faceless mass, we are real people with real lives.I’ve been #inLimbo for 753 days. I still don’t have an answer for my daughter 
Astonishingly, while Theresa May's Chequers fudge falls apart, Vote Leave is fined for electoral fraud & Brexit crisis comes to a head, Radio Scotland is discussing ageism. Important subject but given gravity of situation today almost a dereliction of duty #informeducateentertain 
The UK establishment including most politicians, big business, the civil service and big media actively seek to subvert Brexit. This shows how rotted our democracy has become since we joined the Common Market. 
‘Brexit’s a disaster, the PM's only just clinging on to power, so an early holiday for MPs obviously makes total sense’  
On 23 June ‘16 every constituency in Scotland voted Remain. On 16 July ‘18 every Tory MP representing a seat in Scotland voted with pro-Hard Brexit ERG Tory MPs to reject @scotparl having a say in trade deals, to eliminate backstop option & to make No Deal with EU highly likely. 
Tory MPs 'privately say loss of hundreds of thousands of jobs worth it for Brexit', Anna Soubry tells Parliament  
"The Remain campaign outspent Vote Leave by £6million. It also funnelled money into other campaigns. This is not about big money in politics. This crusade is a blatant elite attempt to undermine Brexit."@Tom_Slater_ on the Vote Leave 'scandal' 
Parliament is stuck. We face a no deal Brexit or a repeal of Article 50.   The SNP should get off the fence and back a People’s Vote. There is no middle way any more.  And if the people vote again for a cliff edge at least they’ll now know what it means. 
BREXIT - Chaos in Commons. Criminality in Leave campaign. Living standards hit. Treason from our supposed post-Brexit closest ally. Might be time to think again @peoplesvote_uk 
Right. That’s it.  After last night’s nonsense the only way out of this mess is to throw Brexit back to the people who caused it.  I’ve opposed another referendum in the past, but after the failure of May’s compromise White Paper - shredded by the Moggs - it’s unavoidable. 
The PEOPLE -of what is ERRONEOUSLY descibed as the UNITED kingdom ,& what the PM refers to as *our precious Union* - are being used as PAWNS in an idealogical GAME being played out in the Tory PartyAdjudicated by ultra rightwingers - calling the SHOTS from the sidelines.#Brexit 
It is clear that the EC have caved to political pressure from those who despise Brexit enough to pour hundreds of thousands of pounds into thwarting it through our courts and backroom channels.Sadly for them I am not going anywhere and will be fighting this, my statement:  
Two thirds of people in Dover and Deal voted to leave the EU. They believed in the opportunities and the kind of Britain that we can build. They believed in better. MPs need to show that same courage -  and deliver the Brexit people voted for.  
For a party which opposes Brexit, in Parliament, on the streets and on the doorstep, join @TheGreenParty. This is crunch time - and you can trust us to take a stand against this Government-induced meltdown. 
These referendum reports of irregularities have been timed to maximum effect to question the legitimacy of the result, nothing more. The fact remains that Remain spent far more than Leave and used the government arm and connections to strengthen their case but they still lost. 
Vote Leave, which campaigned for Brexit in the 2016 referendum, has been fined for breaking electoral law  
Just weeks ago @dominicgrieve and his Remainer cohorts we’re threatening to vote down Brexit legislation humiliating+destabilising @theresa_may in the process. Now Leavers are fighting back and Remainers are squealing about rebels, coups and plots to bring down the Gov.Pathetic! 
TODAY: Isn’t it it curious to see which are the only papers not covering the collapse of Brexit and the implosion of Trump on their front pages...  
Brexit actually can't be done. The sooner May tells the electorate that the better. The country has been hijacked by racist morons. 
In it he appears to state that both the Brexit referendum and the last US election were rigged. He also seems to think that extermination camps are coming. If Fintan is the conscience of the nation, the nation has gone a little demented.  
It would be interesting to find out if their terms are similar to our Brexit terms - annual fee, regulatory alignment, free movement of people, ECJ arbitration, etc.   
The referendum was:*Advisory*Narrowly won by a group that demonstrably lied*Narrowly won by a group that demonstrably broke electoral rules*Advisory*Held before Trump took a huge orange shit on global politicsThe referendum wasn’t:*The irreversible holy will of the people  
Policy on the hoof to save Bacon of Pig-headed MayGovt attempt to end Parliamentary session 5 days early to save May from having to honour her manifesto commitments."She running scared of her own MPs.""She’s in office but not in power...”#Brexit #EU 
Sigh, forced to agree. Given that our "excuse for existing", as Owen so nicely puts it, is stopping Brexit, Tim and Vince should not have been let out.  
Hold on. What was the cost of bringing Obama over to slag off Brexit, the EU propaganda, and Cameron’s own pro remain leaflets???  
Haha @theresa_may voting against her own policy, then desperately trying to close parliament early to stop being booted out. You can't make this shit up #GE2018Now #Brexit @LibDems hiding #FBPE not knowing what's up or down, #ToryRebels a joke #JC4PM now 
The UK government weren’t decent enough to give any public advice on what to do in the exact events we now face (no deal Brexit, war).So, I took a leaf out Sweden’s book and did this for all my fellow Brits. Given the circumstances, I think you’d be daft to dismiss or ignore it  
You couldn’t make this up, Cable and Farron, who have positioned the Lib Dems as the stop-Brexit party, were away from the Commons on Monday night during the vote on amendments tabled by Jacob Rees-Mogg’s hardline European Research Group!  
There is no moral reason to proceed with #Brexit  now.It is the result of a foreign backed coup against British democracy by ultra-nationalists, plutocrats and disaster-capitalists, who conspired to break UK electoral  law. "foreign-backed" means #Murdoch as well as #Putin. 
And John Humphreys @BBCr4today searching question to the Electoral Commission’s spokeswoman? “But you’re not suggesting this affected the outcome of the referendum, are you?”  Didn’t you used to be a half-decent journalist,John? 
Lib Dems Cable and Farron attacked for missing Brexit vote  
Don't want to burst anyone's bubble today, but you need to understand this about the referral of crooked Vote Leave conduct to the Metropolitan Police.No senior political figures will comment now it's in the hands of the police.This will NOT affect Brexit.#CrookedVoteLeave 
Why would Labour respect the result of a referendum in which the winning side cheated on a massive scale & is now facing a criminal investigation? 
Our MPs should think very carefully about the consequences of pushing through the greatest change since 1945 on the basis of a referendum campaign perverted by electoral crime and rule breaking.Is the message to be that crime pays!#StopBrexit #PeoplesVote #Brexit 
Well. Jeremy, you are in a pickle, aren't you? You've been supporting an illegitimate referendum. It was all a big fraud. And you decided to be May's 'little helper' and deliver an economic and social catastrophe to all your loyal (?) #Labour supporters. @OwenSmith_MP 
Almost all Labour MPs voted against the government, except for 4 Labour MPs out of 258 who defied their own leadership. The current and former Lib Dem leaders - the two most high profile Lon Dems - did not vote, when their party’s main reason to exist is Stop Brexit. 
She’s spot on as ever. I don’t believe #PM despite her good intentions can deliver a #Brexit deal that will win support in #Parliament. The people must decide @Peoplesvote_uk 
THE EUROPEAN UNION’S top officials arrive in Japan today to sign the single market’s biggest trade deal ever........Liam? LIAM? L.I.A.M? 
Lib Dem leader Vince Cable missed crucial votes on Brexit last night - party source says he had "an important meeting off the parliamentary estate that was approved by the whips" 
"This yesterday's "we held a referendum" is first-rate & still surprising. Who are we? Russian authorities? On the territory of a neighboring state? Wow. Where else will the "referendums be held" under the sights of unmarked soldiers & who is next "to be ready"?"#Putin #Crimea 
#DailyMail This looks like what we voted for and expected in the Referendum. So why don't we do just that...... Walk Away.  
Brexit was not only sold on deliberate lies & false promises, but also by breaking electoral law.   
Groups now fines for incorrect spending returns for the referendum: LibDemsOpen BritainVote Leave 
As a member of the public so accurately remarked to Lord Adonis during a panel discussion: “The problem with #Brexit is that 52% has been rounded up to 100 and 48% down to zero.” 
can we PLEASE get on this now it's official that #VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw!!! make sure EVERYONE in the UK knows, shout it from the rooftops!#VoteLeaveCheated! they broke our laws and spat on our democracy! it's now a police matter!respect democracy: STOP BREXIT!!   
Vince Cable/Tim Farron who've been very vocal in their criticism of @UKLabour on #Brexit didn't even show up in the Commons to vote down the Rees-Mogg amendments, they're a disgrace, they have no credibility left in any future Brexit debate, but they are yellow tories @LibDems 
Britain voted for self-determination, but in Theresa May’s Brexit the choice of *whether* to be self-determined would have to be fought line-by-line from a starting point of EU compliance.This is not Brexit, this is a Remainer’s revenge.  
Nigel Farage right again ....   Nigel Farage: Brexit backlash will be ‘unlike anything we’ve seen’  
We've now had ample proof that voters were duped into voting Brexit AND that it's going to have a dreadful effect on our country's businesses and institutions, and yet polling indicates that people STILL stand behind it. What will it take!? 
Brilliant summary for Remainer MPs this morning by the best #Brexit team out there. They should read this short article now:   A flavour is below. 
Theresa May’s government survives a Brexit vote with a wafer-thin 3 vote majority.The Lib Dems’ Tim Farron was off at a church hall giving a talk when he should have been voting.“The death of liberalism.” Go figure.  
The conclusion must be the Brexit vote was rigged. But then again so was the 2015 election that enabled Cameron to do the referendum. Tough legislation needed to deter and punish vote rigging.  
The criminal misbehaviour of the Leave campaign is now clear for all to see they cheated in the Referendum & we must now rerun a new untainted Referendum! 
“Respect democracy!” says organisation that lied and cheated at referendum.  
We are continuaslly told that the clock is ticking & we need to get a move on or #Brexit will run out of timeSo what do MPs do?They go on holiday a week earlyWhat message does that send?The message is clear.Most MPs want to reverse the biggest democratic vote in our history. 
Hardline Brexiteers won last evening's Westminster vote because of Sinn Fein abstentionism. Anti Brexit majority in Northern Ireland not represented in any forum.Durkan,Ritchie,and Mcdonnell would have defeated that damaging vote for Ireland. 
So not so much 'will of the people' as 'will of the people with the deepest pockets.'  What a sad, sad place we're in.Petition: Rescind Art.50 if Vote Leave has broken Electoral Laws regarding 2016 referendum  
No Scottish Tory voted to protect Scotland from a hard Brexit!! Even Scottish Liebour failed!! When are yous deluded unionists going to wake up and realise that this is CATASTROPHIC  for Scotland?? If you want this, MOVE TO ENGLAND!! SIMPLES.  
The Brexit backlash will be 'unlike anything we've seen', @Nigel_Farage tells @DavidScullion on the latest BrexitCentral podcast  
With the publication of the Electoral Commission report today into CHEATING by Vote Leave, this clip of VOTE LEAVE CO-CONVENER, Rt Hon MICHAEL GOVE MP certainly became far more interesting...... 
What amuses me most about all this Referendum spending nonsense. It is totally clear that is didn’t make a blind bit of difference. Remain spent the most by far and still lost. 
ah yes, they're getting fined £61,000, is that right? Well, that'll teach them! "We'd better not cheat our way to any more epoch-defining referendum results, it might cost us the annual salary of a deputy headmaster" 
Brexit by fraud.  
This is the awful price of #Brexit. The leave voting north of England is a wasteland now. Nothing grows. Tribes of nomads move from oasis to oasis, but even these are drying up. Only staying in the customs union and single market can save them now.  
Raab is a Randian free-market libertarian who wants to scrap every right we have - workers', health & safety, human rights, food standards. If you still believe May wants a "soft Brexit", yet somehow simultaneously can appoint him to be in charge of it, I have a bridge to sell.  
Yet George Soros, a foreigner, can spend whatever he wants running a STOP BREXIT campaign in the UK with impunityThe answer is simple, from now on we just copy the Soros model and spend billions without fear of prosecution. Job done.  
Official #Brexit campaign Vote Leave referred to police over "serious breaches" of electoral law  
I still favour #Brexit irrespective of how badly executed it is for one simple reason: If we don't leave, the evil shits in Westminster will never give us a say in who governs us ever again. 
#VoteLeave clearly doesn't give a crap about the integrity of British democracy. We believe Brexit voters do. So surely you agree that there should at least be a People's Vote on the deal.  
I was just a normal kind of working mum, dividing my time between the school run and work until I became #OneOfThe3Million after the referendum. The step to being an #EUCitizensChampion was only a small one so you can do it too!  
Electoral commission today announced Vote Leave acted fraudulently & referred to Police for criminal proceedings . They were never playing by the rules . Brexit was never about a deal with EU. HoC must suspend ERG & Gove & rescind A50. #NoRecess#VoteLeaveCriminals 
Danger that we obsess about ‘referendum past’ when its ‘people’s vote future’ that matters!You can’t re-run elections & referendums. Importance of current legal stuff is to clear these appalling people, & the Russians, off the field for the people’s vote next year 
It cost the Vote Leave campaign £61K to cheat the referendum.What a bargain our democracy turned out to be.On behalf of the youth of our nation, resolutely, Fuck You. 
I am #OneOfThe3Million. I have lived in England for 25 years 3 months,in limbo for just over 2 years.I work in risk management, married to a wonderful British man, 2 dual national sons. My life is on hold & I’m worried sick about next year. Brexit is personal.#EUcitizensChampion 
Brexit , according to Leave campaigners, was going to deliver a tremendous financial boost to Britain. Now the Government has been drawing up secret plans to stockpile processed food. Just in case the country starves. 
Two years ago I got a lot of flack for saying this. I stood by it then, and I stand by it now. We ignore what is happening with rise of the right, Brexit & Trump at our peril. We must head the lessons of history. We cannot sleep walk to disaster.  
2010: if we start by setting fire to the stuff nobody cares about, like local government, 2013: you smell burning?2015-2017: NHS seems to be on fire. quick, hold 2 elections and a referendum   2018: trains on fire2018: actual firesJuly 2018: recess 
EU and Japan sign historic free trade deal after rush to agree terms before #BrexitExperts say UK on its own is unlikely to improve on the deal, which will remove virtually all tariffs and covers a third of the global economy#StopBrexit #FBPE 
Hearing on a news channel that  are to be charged for not declaring they were working with another party during the Brexit Referendum.  What about PM Cameron spending UK£9 million on a booklet for every house in UK saying to Remain?  @ElectoralCommUK? 
I don't get it ...Scottish MPs were given only 15 minutes to debate their Brexit future- but now apparently there's 5 days spare for parliament to go on early hols!Tories are not fit to govern #GE18 
absurd. You can't set yourselves up as *the* anti-Brexit party as the Lib Dems have, only for your leader (and his predecessor) to miss crucial knife-edge votes  
“You cannot keep smashing the same people again & again & again and expect them to do nothing.” Insightful discussion on how the origins of Brexit are rooted in the neglect of working class communities on @Renegade_Inc with @redrumlisa and @DrLeeJones. 
Electoral Commission decision causing worst outbreak yet of BDS (Brexit Derangement Syndrome.) Plenty wrong with Vote Leave. But idea that this delegitimises the referendum is mad. Remain took the piss on an epic scale. Deployed full might of the State. BoE. Treasury. And lost 
For all their being a 'distinctive Scottish voice' every single one of the Scottish Tory lobby fodder voted for a Mogg-ist hard Brexit for Scotland last night. Our remain nation must be so grateful....... 
You had the gall to sing 'Where's Jeremy Corbyn' at the #PeoplesVote but where were you last night Tim Farron? A speech in Dorset? I thought you wanted to stop Brexit? Not very much eh! As for Vince Cable he was probably planning for coalition again...Yellow Bastard Tories. pic.twitter.com/uodDotZoAF 
BREAKING: This morning Vote Leave have been referred to the police by the electoral commission for breaking electoral law. One of the many reasons why more and people are calling for a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal. #FFS 
I never thought I would live to see the day when both U.K. and U.S. politicians would choose to wilfully flush their global influence, allies, ethics and reputations down the toilet. The bigotry of Trump and the staggering stupidity of Brexit are two sides of the same coin. 
And the illegal referendum result still stands? "BBC News - Vote Leave: Brexit campaign 'broke electoral law' in referendum  
Irish nationalists and republicans vote to keep politics on their own island. Britain ride rough shod over our peace agreements and democratic votes - but somehow Brexit lemming trajectory is Sinn Féins fault. Partitionist mindset at its finest  
I’m not going to be the only one saying this today but let’s be clear. Vote Leave broke the law by overspending on their campaign which ultimately won by a small majority. Surely this invalidates the referendum? The process needs to be halted immediately. 
#FBPE "No more heroes any more". You wouldn't listen. May has appointed a hard right Randian libertarian as minister for Brexit. The only thing that will stop cliff-edge WTO-rules Brexit & sweat-shop Britain is a Labour govt. with Corbynist economic/social policies.  
Tory MP George Freeman on Instagram: “Brexit is coming home to roost. And it won’t be easy or pleasant.” - If it happens it will be hard and unpleasant for the people of the UK. If it is stopped - easy to do: vote it down! - it'll be exceedingly pleasant indeed. We will rejoice! 
this has cracked me up, especially given Lib Dems were all gleefully revelling in the 'where's Jeremy Corbyn' stuff at the anti-Brexit demo. Absolute mugs and chancers  
TLDR: We now know that the Brexit referendum was won by a series of campaigns and campaigners who broke the law. The question now is how does British politics - and media - react to news that the vote was hacked? 
Nevertheless, the findings are clear - at the very moment that British politics is completely paralysed by Brexit, and hardline Brexiters are trying to force HMG to crash out w/no deal, we can now say for certain that Leave campaigners broke electoral law. 
Eh, no. Both Conservatives and Labour have - w/a few honourable exceptions - ignored the fact that the Brexit vote was won by the side that cheated. There has not even been calls to reform our electoral laws, which have so clearly been shown not fit for purpose 
EU and Japan sign historic free trade deal after rush to agree terms before Brexit  
Nothing to see here. Just the ‘independent’ @ElectoralCommUK doing their bit to overturn Brexit.Ask yourself - Who dictated the timing of this press push? RESIST THE NARRATIVE. You voted Brexit. You know what you voted for.#ElectoralCommission 
Sympathy to all the pundits trying to walk the delicate line between "Labour MPs voting with the government are to blame for hard Brexit - Corbyn must act now" and "deselections are a Stalinist affront to our democracy" 
‘A second referendum would be completely disastrous for Britain’, read my latest @Telegraph article 
official referendum Vote Leave campaign broke electoral law - @ElectoralCommUK. VL had common plan with “Beleave” to exceed legal spending limits. “substantial evidence” re common plan”. Vote Leave’s Halsall & Beleave’s Darren Grimes reported to Met Police re false declarations 
So to all those (eg Humphrys #r4today) saying, ‘Well it wouldn’t have changed the result, would it?’ Why do it then?The Referendum result can never have legitimacy. The ‘winners’ do not have a clean win.#VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw 
Summary:1. If we can’t work together on a deal, we must scrap Brexit.2. Our Deal must involve Britain remaining in Our CAP, Our CFP, Our ECHR, Our Single Market & Our Customs Union.3. As well as remaining in Our EU, of course.4. Talk about Our Good Deal!5. That's all, folks!  
11/ Just to hammer home the point - this shows how the local authority referendum (similarly a general election result) can be overturned by a court. Not the Brexit Referendum though  
Another reason we need ⁦@peoplesvote_uk⁩ to stop Brexit  
Brexit is a fraud.  Vote Leave: Brexit campaign 'broke electoral law' in referendum - BBC News  
10/ So - local authority referendums to decide whether a park is turned into flats - challengeable in an election court if rules are breached. Referendum on whether we should stay in or leave the EU with enormous effects for everyone in the country? Not so much 
This is the end. The deal May has made to keep power at home means the end of a negotiated Brexit deal.It’s now:a) no deal, crash-out Brexit, b) a new vote, orc) a new government. A Tory civil war gave us Brexit. Another Tory civil war may kill it in the end.  
UK Prime Minister Theresa May staved off a rebellion from pro-EU members of her Conservative Party, after she incorporates hardline Brexit amendments into a customs bill:  
You should all be following @carolecadwalla   she’s getting RSI from ringing the alarm bell over Brexit 
So yesterday Theresa May and her government voted against its own policy and ripped up their #Brexit Whitepaper. And some spoofers claim that it was the fault of Sinn Féin.  
I’ve never been a ‘let’s have a second referendum’ person but surely if #VoteLeave have been fined AND referred to the police for breaking the law over their #Brexit campaign there needs to be another one or this whole Brexit thing stopped? 
Liam Fox @BBCr4today: Voters voted to leave the EU; the Ppl gave us a clear instruction.ME: 37% voters voted leave51.8% vs 48.1% isn't clearVote Leave Acted IllegallyThey LIEDYou have No MandateRights 2B Removed w/o CONSENT#Brexit is INVALIDThere must be #PeoplesVote 
Here’s why your mandate lacks legitimacy Liam...•Vote Leave cheated•there is no majority for any one clear Brexit position•your MINORITY Govt has been criminally incompetent and STILL has no agreed plan•promises made were dishonest and undeliverable#r4today#PeoplesVote 
We don't need a judge led inquiry for the history books. We need Parliamentarians to remember they enacted an advisory referendum which can no longer be relied on.  
Liam Fox rather mars his own argument against a second referendum: "When you have a general election you say, well we'll do better next time". @bbcr4today 
Damn those rich old white men. They are all that is wrong with the world. it's a good job none of them are running the EU. #TuesdayThoughts #Brexit  
Every single one of the @ScotTories lined up meekly and voted FOR the ERG amendment, which will lead to a hard, no deal #Brexit.Every single one represents a constituency that voted Remain. 
Too much "pessimism" about Brexit, complains Liam Fox on @BBCr4today on day the Leave Campaign is reported to the Police 
#brexit 17 million voted leave the EU. We voted leave The Customs Union & The Single Market. Why are you on TV trying to DERAIL  Brexit all the time. We’re leaving the EU get over it. Get behind Brexit make a change for you. Give it a rest for one day.  
If a result still stands even when campaigns break the law what is the point in having election laws? There are no two ways about it - this calls into question the legitimacy of the referendum result.  
How many #VoteLeave MPs have money in off shore tax havens? Is this why they want #Brexit because EU was going to clamp down on them? Asking for a friend. 
One question thats bugging me this morning, if extreme Unionism can muster enough money to buy the Brexit referendum and try and hide it, what did they get up to in 2014 during the Scottish referendum, how come Ruth Davidson had a postal vote tally at 10pm ? 
David Lammy: "This news makes the narrow referendum result looks dodgier than ever. It's validity is now in question. Politicians from all parties have a duty to ask: do we want to continue with a policy that will wreck our economy and consume government for the next decade?" 
Much was foreseeable, yes, here’s what I wrote just before the referendum. It has held good. My point is the wider chaos, mostly stemming from early notification of Art50, govt refusal to be transparent, GE, opposition failure to challenge sufficiently etc  
With Trump on his side, Putin admits Russia staged the ‘referendum’ to annex Crimea  
Problem for May is that at least 52% of Brits have Lion Hearts and are not going to capitulate on this one. Our ranks are swelling and passion is turning to anger. For the sake of the nation she had better get on with Brexit means Brexit  
Have to feel a little sorry for Darren Grimes who was a 19 yo fashion student in 2016. He's been used by Elliott, Gove, Johnson & Baker at VoteLeave, & potentially faces jail.On the flipside, he's still at Brexit Central pumping out lies & deceptions, so f*ck him.#r4today @LBC 
I’ve seen some Lib Dem excuses for @vincecable and @timfarron not voting. Claiming it wouldn’t have made a difference. *Even if true*, if there’s a knife-edge vote on a critical issue, you turn up. You vote. It might be futile, but you still bloody turn up and vote! #Brexit 
Leading pro-Brexit group, Vote Leave, unlawfully coordinated campaigning and overspent during 2016's referendum to leave the EU, UK election watchdog says  
Vote Leave fined & referred to the police for breaching electoral law, an utter witch-hunt brought by Remainers who still fight the referendum, these claims rejected by VoteLeave for containing false accusations, do hope Remain spending is given more thorough scrutiny. 
following today’s news, the government should declare the Brexit vote unsafe and unsuitable to follow, then go to EU27 and request the cancellation of Article 50. The fact that they won’t do this is proof they care more about their power and their donors than the British people. 
Is there a case for a wider criminal investigation into all the Leave Campaign groups? Phrases such as "the evidence we have seen does not support" and clear obstruction to civil servants with little power, reveals their difficulty and the contempt they've been shown, see below, 
All the headlines about #VoteLeave being fined £61k for breaching spending limits feels like a storm in a teacup when you compare it to the £9m of taxpayers money spent by David Cameron on sending #Brexit project fear leaflets to each household ? 
Last night @vincecable and @timfarron decided not to turn up to the House of Commons and vote on the Brexit amendments. That's the leader and former leader of the @LibDems personally deciding not to vote on one of the most important votes in modern times. Unbelievable eh, #FBPE 
Hi I'm an importer of UK goods. Have longtime commercial  relationship with supplier. Dont know if I can stay because of tax and tarrifs and delivery time. Have found quality alternative in Portugal and Estonia that will be easier in case of hard brexit. It makes me really sad. 
EU and Japan sign historic free trade deal after rush to agree terms before Brexit  
I warned in February 2016 that #VoteLeave was not the right vehicle for the referendum given ⁦@matthew_elliott⁩’s penchant for dodgy behaviour. Today their groups were fined by the Electoral Commission and referred to the police. 
This uncivil war internal to a political party is trashing an entire country & it’s millions of citizens. “Tory Civil War On Europe Explodes Once More As 'Remain' Minister Quits And Theresa May Avoids Commons Brexit Defeat - HuffPost UK  
8/ So even though Vote Leave cheated (in a major, potentially result-altering way) whether the result will be overturned is a political rather than legal question. It’s up to politicians to decide that the referendum should be rerun as the result was sullied by the cheating 
The news this morning: Leave broke the law & the referendum was stolen #VoteLeaveCheated - the US President is a Russian asset - the PM is Rees Mogg's gimp and we are heading for the most chaotic of no deal brexits 
6/ What principled reason is there that a local council referendum result can be challenged if there is cheating but not a national referendum? None. I did wonder whether that anomaly might be challengeable in court (eg under human rights laws) but would be a tough sell 
5/ Here’s the ridiculous part. The result of the Brexit Referendum - unlike general elections, local elections or even local council referendums - isn’t subject to the the Election Court. So even though Vote Leave broke the rules, the result probably can’t be challenged 
We know Vote Leave lied on a gargantuan scale - we now know they cheated too and it’s official. Did it affect the result? In a referendum where there was a 4% gap between Leave/Remain, they overspent by 10%. Go figure. All the more reason for a @peoplesvote_uk on the #Brexit deal  
So, how does the referendum ‘result’ still stand? “Vote Leave: Official Brexit campaign referred to police over breaches of electoral law - Sky News  
With Brexit in chaos this shower of a Gov’t, that wants to fine & prosecute parents who take kids out of school for a cheaper family holiday, has tabled a motion today to give itself an early summer break! RT/TAG YOUR MP & LETS SEND A MESSAGE TOGETHER THATS NOT ACCEPTABLE!  
Blistering thread of quotes from MPs during the debate on the referendum bill on the need for the 2016 referendum to be fair, and be seen to be fair. It wasn’t. Leave cheated.  
Not a single Scottish Tory MP opposed a hard Brexit.  
At least we have got our country back innit, and the King and Queen can make all our Laws innit #brexit  
Good to hear @heidiallen75, a sensible Tory MP, moving towards support for a ‘people’s vote’ on @BBCr4today. Increasingly clear that @peoplesvote_uk to stop Brexit is way out of the deep crisis we are now in 
The referendum advises MPs. Because the result was delivered with cheating it is illegitimate. If Labour won't say that it is not in Opposition but in cahoots.  
Brexit is personalI am #OneOfThe3Million EU citizens in the UKIn UK for >13 years#inLimbo for 753 days#EUcitizensChampion since yesterdayWe are not a faceless mass, we are real people with real lives.Nobody must be left behind because of BrexitWe remember your promises  
Just going to leave this here this morning. It’s not that the people involved are crooks  #brexit  
Meanwhile, the OBR has been searching for the ‘Brexit dividend’ and hasn’t found it......long term public finances looking bleaker  
Every single one of those leading the Vote Leave campaign needs to be referred by the Electoral Commission to the Police for investigation & held accountable. Boris Johnson & Michael Gove for starters. Then the Brexit vote annulled given this evidence.  
Hard #Brexit will result in 2,800,000 jobs lost. That will either be yours or someone else's who you know. That will devastate yours or their family. Your or their community will feel the consequences. I bet you're hoping it will be someone else. #PeoplesVote 
I am #OneOfThe3Million non British EU citizen in the U.K. who’s life has been in Limbo for over two years. Despite having lived, worked and loved there for close to two decades. That’s why I’m not willing to give up the fight to stop Brexit #EUcitizensChampion 
Darren Grimes referred to the police for Vote Leave breaking Electoral law.Why not .@BorisJohnson @michaelgove et al? The Electoral Commission should hold them all to account. #Brexit 
Brexit is a complete and utter mess. Remainers know it. Brexiters with buyer's remorse know it. Even the government secretly knows it. So @jeremycorbyn - in the national interest, can you now finally stand up and call for a second referendum?  
From satellites to drugs, #Brexit puts these five investments in serious jeopardy GalileoCopernicusEuratomFramework Nine European Medicines Agency  
Imagine getting out of the shower this morning and discovering Brexit never happened! The collective sigh of relief would be deafening!  
Brexit Campaign Group Vote Leave BROKE ELECTORAL LAW. Now fined & referred to the police. I do hope .@BorisJohnson @michaelgove et al al get questioned & held *fully accountable* for this sham they have forced upon the British public. 
Defence minister quits as MPs threaten to back second EU referendumWe voted, Honour Democracy, let’s Leave No Deal, May’s Bad Deal is Not Leaving!  
Whether or not the referendum outcome would have been different if Vote Leave had not broken the spending rules, should not @michaelgove and @BorisJohnson apologise on behalf of the campaign? 
Remember too for any No voting pensioners who can see this!! Another reason for the hard Brexit, is EU were going to challenge UK on pensions!! Enjoy yer wonderful short retirement!! May it be blessed  May hell slap it intae ye!! Ya selfish auld bstrds.  
Both LeaveEU and Vote Leave have been fined and both have been referred to the police for potential prosecution over breaking the law during the EU referendum; the UK is now a sham democracy. 
Whatever you think of Brexit & whichever way you voted, follow .@carolecadwalla Her work over the last 18/12 is shining a searing light on the global networks involved in Brexit, the rise of Trump & Putin’s Russia. She has been threatened, vilified, mocked. Why?#PMQs 
Brexit has become an absolute dogs breakfast! I have never seen such a mess. The government is falling apart and the country is divided, completely. I never thought I’d say this but we have to have a second referendum.  
BREAKING ELECTORAL COMMISSION FIND VOTE LEAVE GUILTY OF CHEATING IN REFERENDUM: From the report, the EC is 'satisfied beyond a reasonable doubt' that all of BeLeave's spending during the referendum was 'incurred under a common plan with Vote Leave' #VoteLeaveCheated 
If I bribe to win a contract, I can go to prison. If I dope in sports, I can be disqualified and barred.If I break the rules of democracy so I can win, why should the result stand? We need to go back to the people and offer everyone an exit from Brexit  
#VoteLeave broke the law, have been fined and referred to the police. The referendum should be declared null and void. Not only was it advisory anyway, the campaign was illegal. Why on earth should the UK #Brexit in light of this? #StopBrexit 
We had a referendum, we voted leave.We had a general election, both main parties promised leave in their manifestos.Who are you Simon Fraser?I have never heard of you.Where is your electoral mandate?  
Those who are worried about the effect on democracy of overturning the referendum result: Are you not worried about the effect on democracy of allowing referendums to be won by campaigns rampantly flouting the law while making wild, undeliverable promises? 
I'm sure Vote Leave will regret overspending by £500k and funnelling £675k into an illegal subsidiary campaign in order to swing a referendum result now it has been fined £61k. 
An organisation that successfully campaigned for a Leave vote in the Brexit referendum has been fined and referred to the police.  
So, it’s official. The law was broken. The referendum was not conducted according to the rules. Anyone telling me now about “the will of the people” can do one. If it was not carried out within the rules it was not a democratic process.  
Brexit’s been a fraud from start to finish 
Tory Rebellion Over Attempt to Break Parliament Up Early  via @GuidoFawkes.Okay let’s all vote to start our Summer holidays five daysEarly.What the hell does the Appeaser think she can get away with now.Sort Brexit out now you coward. 
Today’s report is the culmination of a thorough, detailed and balanced assessment of the evidence which has come to light about the spending of three campaigners at the EU Referendum. Read the report here:   
So the official Leave Campaign, headed by these cabinet ministers, broke the law during the EU referendumThe police are investigating and criminal charges may followThe mandate for Brexit is invalidated and democracy demands a #PeoplesVote 
The Electoral Commission has determined that Vote Leave systematically cheated during the referendum campaign. Given how close the vote was, this cheating could have swung the result. If democracy means anything in this country, the vote should be re-run.  
The Electoral Commission says fine for Vote Leave reflected refusal of Brexit campaign group to be interviewed. Also says individual fine limit to £20k inadequate and says govt should change the law  
Brexit campaign group Vote Leave is fined and referred to police for breaking electoral law  
NEW: @eurelationsappg sponsored,cross party New Clause 18 to the Trade Bill in the names of @S_Hammond, @NickyMorgan01, me, @ChrisLeslieMP, @heidiallen75, Dominic Grieve & others providing for a customs union backstop in the #Brexit negotiations -watch out for this key vote today  
More news. Electoral Cssn reveals that Darren Grimes, the founder of the BeLeave campaign group, has been fined £20,000 + his case referred to the police for false representation of Brexit referendum campaign spending. 
BREAKING: “Vote Leave fined and referred to the police for breaking electoral law” - Brextremists squeaking a narrow referendum result to unleash chaos looks dodgier by the day 
Three @UKLabour MPs Stringer/Hoey/Field, they rescued a tory PM and their hard right Brexit ERG led by Rees-Mogg, they're facilitating a hard tory #Brexit, think about that, @UKLabour MPs voting to make people poorer,I'm in utter disbelief, they sided with Rees-Mogg #StopBrexit 
Electoral Commission concludes investigation into Brexit funds*Vote Leave broke £7m legal spending limit by £500,000*Vote Leave made inaccurate spending return  *Darren Grimes of BeLeave fined £20,000 and reported to police*David Halsall of Vote Leave also reported to police 
BREAKING: Electoral Commission confirms its finding that Vote Leave and Darren Grimes, founder of BeLeave, broke electoral law during the EU referendum. Both referred to the Metropolitan Police. 
Electoral Commission says it has made referrals to the Metropolitan Police over false declarations by Vote Leave in the EU referendum campaign. 
We publish today the conclusions of our investigation into Vote Leave’s EU referendum spending. We found significant evidence of undeclared joint working between the lead leave campaigner, Vote Leave, and the campaign group BeLeave. Read the full report    
Where’s Farron and Cable? Top Lib Dems spark fury and ridicule for missing crucial Brexit votes  
Gove trying to make himself feel better about Leave lies doesn't get him off the hook when they helped sneak a divisive narrow win, unleashed poisonous Brexit chaos and inflammed racism  
Fintan O’Toole: Brexit White Paper puts the UK on a road to nowhere  via @IrishTimesOpEd 
This is Brexit in name only to keep the plebs happy, says Rod Liddle   
Brexit is personal: I am #OneOfThe3Million EU27 citizens in the UK. If you are too, please use the hashtag above *plus* #EUcitizensChampion to show the UK who you are. We’re not a faceless mass, we are real people, real lives. Nobody must be left behind because of Brexit.  
Despite having the opportunity to vote against the Tories Brexit last night, neither Vince Cable or Tim Farron did so. All words, especially when it comes to blaming Jeremy Corbyn. Judge them by their actions. 
This, this is what #Brexit is doing to small businesses thoughout the UK AND the Tories and Corbyn don't give a toss.  
So, #Brexit will lose anything between 700 thousand and 2 million 800 thousand jobs depending on soft or hard Brexit Mr Corbyn @jeremycorbyn, but you are comfortable with that because you must respect the referendum vote that was obtained by cheating and breaking the law?  
While Brexit dominates, the crisis in social care is deepening | Polly Toynbee  
May has been using the elite to stop Brexit, now the people should stop the elite. By crowedfunding to contest all MPs seats in the next Generai Election.Together we can out all the MPs in Parliament. 
France's central bank has dialed up the pressure on hundreds of UK financial tech companies to devise their Brexit strategies.  
An extraordinary mess in which Labour rebels secure a tiny majority for a Tory Government which has failed to satisfy both wings of its fractured party ....#Brexit : Government scrapes through Customs Bill votes - BBC News  
That’s the problem with Brexit, it’s based on blind faith. It ignores all the evidence so it can live in a dream world of past glories. Young people reject it, they have an optimistic, inclusive world view. 
Hey @theresa_may @CCHQLondon @conservatives STOP trying to bunk off early for summer recess. #Brexit is a mess you have created. Deal with it FFS! It’s your job you overpaid underworked lazy bastards. 
The idiots that support Brexit like to refer to ‘Remainers’ as ‘Remonaners’, But all of the moaning, hissy fits and resignations seem to be coming from their side. Remainers are smiling because the lies are becoming apparent and we are winning the argument.  #PeoplesVote #r4today 
If Britain crashes out of the EU with a no deal Brexit, the government’s impact report estimates 2,800,000 jobs will be lost with an 8% drop in GDP.This won’t be the fault of the EU. It will be the fault of our negligent government for creating this catastrophic outcome.  
Wake up today. Putin pulling Trumps strings and Britain being ruled by the right wing DUP and Rees-Mogg with Mrs May with no strings left. This is a disaster and no Opposition. Brexit at any cost, something monumental has happened. But BBC worrying about hosepipe ban! #FBPE 
Been away from @BBCBreakfast for a while... 1st time I’ve worn a tie for weeks! Packed show today - everything from hosepipe bans to @ReeceShearsmith & @SP1nightonly from @LeagueOfGentlem via a little bit of Brexit, Trump & dangerous dogs! See you from 6am  
Here is the Brexit the Hard Right wants. And Labour still pretends it has democratic legitimacy.  
This is one Rees-Mogg amendment that was passed on Monday.It essentially revokes the Northern Ireland backstop agreement between UK & EU.Without that backstop (or alternatively CU & SM for the whole UK) we will get no deal.May just GUARANTEED a WTO Brexit on 29.03.19 pic.twitter.com/WmrLigEr3N 
Students from the UK will miss out on many of the opportunities offered by the EU's Erasmus Programme. Another own goal from Brexit.  
I thought the libdems were against a hard Brexit? A few weeks ago they sang "where's Jeremy Corbyn" at the "people's vote" march... Well Jeremy Corbyn was in parliament voting against hard Brexit... last night Where were the Lib dems... 
Summer madness: Govt wants MPs to go on hols two days early despite fining parents taking kids out of school. May voted against her 10-day old Brexit policy, a Minister quit for backing the official line and 4 Lab Brextremists saved the PM 
No deal Brexit:2,800,000 fewer jobs £158bn loss per yearTrade agreement Brexit (outside the single market):1,750,000 fewer jobs£99bn loss per yearSoft Brexit (EEA & single market):700,000 fewer jobs£39bn loss per year Remain in EU:No impact on jobsNo £ loss per year  
United States this morning...... 
.@SethMeyers hilariously mocks Trump's Brexit gaff thinking Ireland is a part of the UK: ‘I dare you to say that in a pub’  
New Caledonia referendum: call to reject 'colonising power' France  
Ya know the eco defenders @NZGreens so far this term they allowed the Kermadec Ocean Sanctuary to be scuppered, then they allowed more bottled NZ Water to leave NZ & seabed mining exploration inside a marine sanctuary.They did get a drug referendum, that'll help the environment 
"...Fears are growing at Westminster that there is now no #Brexit deal – not the #Chequers plan, nor David Davis’s Canada-style trade deal, nor a no-deal scenario – that could command the backing of a majority of MPs." #BrexitChaos in Parliament 
This is all so wrong.Accepting hardline Brexiter amendments to trade bill on the VAT regime to pacify Rees-Mogg and his ilk.Have any MPs ever dealt with VAT at a practical level as business owners? #brexit 
HQ | Benedict Cumberbatch filming Channel 4's untitled Brexit project this Monday in London:  
Brexit is like the python that swallowed an alligator – it can't handle the monster coming down its oesophagus  
The role of the 13 Tory nodding donkeys in allowing Scotland to suffer a hard Brexit despite that them representing the people of a country that voted massively in favour of remaining in the EU is a national disgrace. 
The cabinet's dead wood has been cleared. Bringing in newish MPs is key to the Conservative's post-Brexit future   
From @bbclaurak It looks a mess because it is a mess. getting harder and harder for PM to get things through Parliament - and while calls for a second referendum are widely rejected, that sentiment could change if this kind of gridlock continues.@peoplesvote_uk 
Just try sticking to your manifesto commitment instead of arrogantly thinking you have a veto over the referendum result. 
During these uncertain times, our great country is crying out for reassurance, and a positive post -Brexit vision. Let us all not lose sight of the belief; our greatest years do lie before us. Brexiteers please do keep the faith. #Brexit will happen. 
#ScottMann says he resigned to be able to properly scrutinize the Government's #Brexit plans to ensure that I deliver on what the people of #NorthCornwall put me here for. I'd like to see the Gov look at Brexit as an opportunity rather than as a difficulty  
3. Hannity is now trying to prove that Trump has no issue calling foreign leaders out. As examples he mentions what Trump said about Brexit, how he has called out NATO allies, etc. He also mentions the way Trump has called out Kim Jong Un..."little rocket man" 
Former U.K. Cabinet minister from ruling Conservative Party calls for new Brexit referendum, an idea long assailed by Prime Minister Theresa May.  
You need to read this very short thread.The trickle is becoming a flood.  Brexit and uncertainty is killing SMEs. 
"there is no parliamentary majority for a hard brexit" Parliament cares a lot about its own view, seeming to forget that it declared it was handing over the decision to the public. There was nothing on the ballot paper saying "as long as the EU gives us a deal parliament likes".  
Wikileaks was all up in the Scottish referendum f*ckery for example  :) Wikileaks activity tracks as you said @LouiseBagshawe , one for one with Russian Intelligence Services activity @thespybrief@TheRickWilson@xtrixcyclex@lauferlaw@ericgarland@LouiseMensch 
Except the 3 Labour MPs that were integral to getting Mogg's Brexit vision passed by a majority of... 3.Frank FieldKate HoeyGraham StringerAnd all the Labour MPs that abstained tonight too. 
When it comes to Brexit, many Conservatives have put party over country   
Brexit: snake oil strikes again - take away the EU dimension and we still have the "double coffin-lid", where the UK is bound by laws at a regional or global level. Regulatory autonomy does not come with Brexit, under any conditions...  #Brexinfo. 
Non EU is the immigration we can 100% control. That proves government has no interest in controlling migration and it was a bogus reason to vote for Brexit. 
'We will just LEAVE on WTO rules!' Rees-Mogg claims Theresa May lacks soft Brexit majority  
Nice to see there’s an American version of BUT WHAT ABOUT BREXIT, JEREMY?!?!  
I wish you luck, and please think of usI knew both Trump and Brexit were madI vastly underestimated how bad and how quickly sanity and decency would collapseAnd how many in positions of power would stand idly by as it happenedGoodnight from broken Britain x 
Oh wow did @timfarron actually miss the Brexit vote because he was talking about gay sex again  
Theresa May's refusal to acknowledge this while trying to force through Brexit legislation has huge national security implications. This cannot be the time to put party interest ahead of the national interest. This is so much bigger than Brexit. 
Given the Lib Dems' sole excuse for existing right now is to be the 'Stop Brexit party', this is off the charts.  
Do you hear that sound?That's the sound of every JIT manufacturer in the UK signing contracts for new factories abroad. That's the sound of hundreds of thousands of jobs leaving the UK. That's the sound of the NHS dying. That's the sound of Brexit.#STOPBREXIT 
This is our national security on the line. The Trump debacle & the Brexit debacle cannot continue on two railway tracks. They are the same debacle. And today Trump plunged us into an entirely new & deeply sinister new era. We MUST recognise how it changes everything for us too 
#katehoey needs to be deselected not for her support of Brexit but Nigel Farage. 
I hear you. Contracts for 2019 are reducing as EU buyers reduce their UK vendor list as a safeguard against Brexit impact. Once you lose an established customer nigh on impossible to get them back. UK gov & people have no idea what’s coming at them down the road & they don’t care 
'Don't back down!' Britons express OUTRAGE at prospect of SECOND Brexit referendum  
It's the same thing. Putin worked alongside #CambridgeAnalytic Bannon to create #Trump and #Brexit. Until people connect this, and read the work of @J_amesp nothing will make sense. #AlternativeWar 
How incredibly LibDemish of Tim Farron & Vince CableAt the #PeoplesVote march they sung "Where's Jeremy Corbyn" claiming he isn't opposing a Hard Brexit yet tonight they did not even turn up to vote against a Hard Brexit whereas Corbyn did turn up & voted against it #PeakLibDem 
Forget economics,forget immigration, forget whatever you thought Brexit was about. It doesn't matter. Because it's not any more. THIS is what it's about. The destruction of the North Atlantic alliance. We are in a new world order. We URGENTLY need to re-frame the Brexit debate 
It seem that Tim Farron missed the Brexit vote because he was talking about gay sex again...  
Tonight Ruth Davidson's Scottish Conservatives could have helped to opposed a hard Brexit, not one of them did. And all we needed was three votes.Shame on the Conservative Party yet again they have betrayed the people of Scotland 
Respect to @Anna_Soubry I can’t believe it’s so rare to have MPs speak the truth - how on earth did we get here?Still time to pull back from the brink of Brexit. And then our politics needs sorting out big time.  
Video: cowardice and chaos so huge May whipped vote against OWN proposal to placate Brexit ultras  
Tim Farron missed a crucial vote which hugely increases the chance of a no-deal Brexit to attend an event about "the death of Liberalism." You cannot write this stuff.  
MPs already get a 6 week break.Now the #Tories want to add another 5 days to protect #TheresaMay from no confidence vote.#UniversalCredit a year: £3,828MP's pay for 6 wk recess: £8,900Humiliated over her #Brexit plans, she should go now. #GE2018 
I really can't believe May is carrying on as if this isn't happening. As if Britain's not right in the middle of it. As if Brexit isn't absolutely part of it. It's not just US citizens who should be appalled & alarmed. This is absolutely our disaster too  
Jeremy Corbyn tables motion to keep UK in Customs Union.Anna Soubry votes against it.Dominic Grieve votes against it.Vince Cable and Tim Farron aren't even in the building.Jeremy Corbyn is blamed by #FBPE for not opposing a hard brexit. 
“Eat it Frank it’s your Brexit”  
My twitter stream is teeming with Brexit, Trump, Musk & other “bleurgh". So here’s a calming pic of an aurora seen from New Zealand to remind us all that ours is a planet of great beauty. Have a great day everyone and try and remember, ultimately, we are all in this together!  
“If we can’t work together on a deal we must rethink the whole idea of Brexit” - Dominic Grieve MPBrextremist MPs are driven by ideology, not reason.So let’s call the whole thing off.#StopBrexit 
Brexiteers aren’t rebels. They’re the ones trying hard to get the real Brexit 17.4 million voted for. The real rebels are awkward squad Remainers who can’t or won’t accept the result.  
Quite literally people are telling me "don't judge Anna Soubry based on her voting record (that is, mostly voting with the government on Brexit), judge her based on her speeches!"OK so from now we judge politicians by what they say, rather than what they do. Incredible. 
I was going to post this gif to illustrate the Tories on Brexit but actually the people being shot are all of us, especially the poor, the vulnerable, the sick, anyone who works in manufacturing or farming, the NHS, universities, Northern Ireland etc etc  
One minister conceded that it was ‘probably true’ that yesterday marked the moment at which May could no longer get any Brexit option through Parliament.  
Anna Soubry has voted over and over against in support of the Tories' Brexit position, opposing Jeremy Corbyn and Labour when they voted against. How does this contorted logic make sense in your head?As for workers' rights, she voted for the Tories' crippling anti-union laws!  
As a Remainer who really does not like Brexit at all, watching those who have never suffered under a Tory government cheering on Tory MPs who a) mostly vote with Theresa May on Brexit anyway and b) keep hammering disabled and low-people people is just vomit inducing. 
I’m old enough to remember when Jacob Rees-Mogg and the rest of the ERG twats were vehemently opposed to Parliamentary amendments that tied the Prime Minister’s hands in the Brexit negotiations.  #BrexitShambles #LeaveLiars #twats 
Before you join daft 'centrists' like @eddiemarsan & the #FBPE mob in lionising Tory MP @Anna_Soubry for the massive shart of anti-Brextremist rhetoric she emitted in parliament today, maybe ... just maybe ... consider her actual voting record on Brexit first?  
She has been far more vocal and effective in opposing the hard Brexit and much more consistent than Corbyn.  If Corbyn and the labour party had opposed this hard Brexit from the beginning instead of trying to find an impossible middle way we might not be in this mess. 
If you cheer on Anna Soubry, who has consistently voted for Tory policies including on Brexit, fill your boots.Just don't pretend you champion the low-paid workers, disabled people, public sector workers or EU citizens she has consistently voted to hammer. 
One way or another the Tories are dead meat. The only thing left for it is to put the country first and bite the #EEA bullet. It honours the #Brexit vote, gets us out of the EU fast and limits the damage the Brextremists would do. It's a solution that can always be revisited. 
If the Democrats fail to take back the House, our country has a vastly diminished future as a Democracy. That referendum on our future is what the midterms are now all about. 
As I said at the weekend in the Observer, I just don't see how Britain escapes the Brexit swamp. Seems now there's no parliamentary majority for, well, anything 
This: Every sensible, rational, responsible MP who cares about this country & it’s people should table a motion to Stop Brexit, & vote for it, ignoring whips & party and everything other than rescuing us from this appalling crisis. This is serious, deadly serious. 
Hi Tim, why did you and your Lib Dem leader Vince Cable not turn up to vote against the ERG’s amendments that now all but ensure a hard Brexit or a no deal?  
Hope still triumphing over experience unfortunately. She has got so, so much wrong with Chequers only her latest mess up. From elxn loss, failure to build one nation agenda and civil-service-driven #Brexit gruel she’s sadly a big part of the problem rather than the solution  
#AlternativeWar clearly explains Brexit and the strategic importance of it to Russia in one sentence:  
David Davis: Britain risk 'giving up a real future' over Brexit  
Before Brexit I don’t remember Chuka coming across as being a mad person, but reading this unhinged garbage is a revelation. He’s clearly become deranged and needs help.  
LibDems hiding behind #FBPE - your current (Cable) and past (Farron) leaders abstained on Brexit votes tonight. Really, what is the point of you? 
Hello, no deal Brexit. I’ve been expecting you.  
Important analysis. May, through combination of incompetence, delusion & lies, has backed herself into a corner with no exits. A new people’s vote is the only escape. Remember that before 2013 nobody was talking about a Brexit referendum. That changed fast too.  
On top of all this, the Government now wants to bring forward Parliament’s summer recess. I can’t possibly go along with that and I don’t see how anyone else could at this critical time with the clock ticking on #Brexit; it would be shameful even to consider it 
Instead, the Government must face up to the #Brexit challenge, be honest with people about what’s possible and what isn’t, #SuspendA50 until it has worked out what it wants - and later offer a #2ndEUref once it has established good, realistic options for our country 
Tonight’s votes in @HouseofCommons on #Brexit were really quite shameful. The Government adopted changes that went against the proposals in its own white paper (that it had only agreed last Friday). It changed its position at the last minute 
Anna Soubry hasn’t just mostly voted for the Tory Brexit position, she’s voted to slash disability and in-work benefits, cut taxes on the rich, privatise the NHS and Royal Mail, for the bedroom tax, and trebling fees.If you think she’s progressive, by definition you’re not. 
Whilst Labour MPs vote against the shambolic Tory Brexit plans, the current and former leaders of the Liberal Democrats abstain.Labour are fighting tooth and nail for a good Brexit deal whilst the Liberal Democrats don’t even turn up.Waiting to hear what #FBPE have to say... 
Hoey, Stringer and Field were whipped by the ERG.Outrageous, wrong and against their party line. Brexit madness has to stop, the country cannot be dragged towards extreme Brexit bc of so-called Labour politicians shoring up Rees-Mogg #peoplesvote @BestForBritain 
Brexit options are now to walk-away with no deal or EEA/EFTA & a customs union. There is no parliamentary majority for hard Brexit 
The Tory Party is still arguing with the Tory Party over Brexit - as it has done for the last 40 years - while the rest of the country and the EU look on with absolute bewilderment, bemusement and embarrassment.End it now. 
What on earth was a pragmatic deal? There is no deal that is better than the one we already have. Any MP with an ounce on integrity and conscience should be doing everything they can to stop Brexit before even more damage is done to the UK.1/2 
"The Brexit dream is dying, Tim. And it is like a dream. A batshit crazy dream after you've drunk too much whisky. Wake up, you've pissed yourself. *That's* the Brexit dream."  
MSM: What's your position on Brexit?LAB: We have 6 tests - let us tell you.MSM: No time. You're not very clear, are you?LAB: We're perfectly clear - here are the 6 tests. MSM: Boring. You keep changing your minds.LAB: No we don't.MSM: What's your position on Brexit? 
Tonight was just one extended episode of their Brexit chaotic cluelessness. I really have no idea what they want to achieve now. The thing is - neither do they. #their #Brexit 
I'm finding this too: a lot of what the BBC is saying to me, when I ask them pretty basic questions relating to Brexit coverage, simply doesn't make sense and they don't seem to care  
“This is a government now in an outright state of degeneration” - former deputy prime minister Sir Nick Clegg argues that the UK is running out of time on Brexit@nick_clegg | #newsnight 
Perhaps the penny is now dropping for all but the most hardcore Brexiteers: Brexit, as it was sold in 2016, simply cannot be done  
Evening @timfarron & @vincecable, why didn't you vote tonight? Apparently the Lib Dems are vehemently opposed to Brexit. I'm sure there's a legit reason why the two most prominent Lib Dems in Parliament didn't vote against right wing Tory Brexiteers in such a crucial vote? 
.@thomasbrake "The Customs Union is essential to the basic stability and prosperity of the UK. Nobody voted for job losses and financial uncertainty. That is why we must now give the people the final say and an opportunity to Exit from Brexit.” #CustomsBill #FinalSay 
The EU is terrified that Britain will make a success of Brexit, says David Green  
To the cry of !Viva Franco!, a spanish policeman violenttly assaults catalan photojournalist @jordiborrás. Borras is author of the successful book "Days that will last for years" which denounces the extreme police violence in Catalonia during the referendum of October 1st.  
“Have you not disappointed and let down the electorate?” Kirsty Wark asks David Davis who resigned as Brexit Secretary last week @KirstyWark | @DavidDavisMP | #newsnight 
Oh, but one last thing:If those tattered fragments can reconcile their differences, unite behind one objective, with one leader...Well, it’s all for taking back.And this applies as much to Brexit Britain and every other EU country as it does to America.United, it’s ours. 
I think that entire Brexit sequence on Newsnight managed to have 0 mentions of the backstop. Which needs to be sorted before EU get anywhere near seriously engaging with future relationship ideas. ¯\_(ツ)_/¯ 
Any belief I had in @BBC impartiality flew out the window during the Scottish independence referendum. It was just an arm of UK gov during that campaign. it was a dry-run for Brexit. 
I recently had similar experience of BBC cancelling documentary in which I was involved because it might offend Mr Farage. This persuaded me that BBC no longer impartial but now an accomplice to Brexit  
In our wildest moments, amidst the deep unease at the referendum result, I don't think many of us could have imagined us exactly where we have landed today. Without effective government, without a proper plan, without preparations for crashing out, without a clue. Unforgivable. 
So @RuthDavidsonMSP's Scottish Tories did defy Theresa May, in a way - they voted with the hard brexit amendments she was forced to put to a vote - and to almost certainly condemn the UK to crashing out of the EU with no deal, with the loss of hundreds of thousands of jobs.  
It’s clear tonight that Theresa May does not have a majority in Parliament for her Chequers Brexit White Paper or negotiating position. This is a Prime Minister in office but not in power. 
Sinn Féin’s seven MPs could be making a tangible difference to the extent of the impact of #Brexit but instead they’re hiding behind abstentionism; while of course drawing down salaries, staff, offices, expenses and much more  
I USED TO defend the @BBC because of the importance of the public having access to unbiased & impartial news, but as @BBCNews has VEERED AWAY FROM IMPARTIALITY as has been well illustrated by THEIR COVERAGE OF #BrexitPerhaps its TIME TO END funding the #BBC via the licence fee! 
Absolute state of this! @KateHoeyMP and @frankfieldteam an absolute toilet and @jeremycorbyn will do sod all about it as he wants a hard Brexit.  
The sharp poll switch from Tory to UKIP at the weekend is a tiny foretaste of what will happen should the establishment try to cancel Brexit 
Looks like Newsnight will go through their full discussion without mentioning the Irish backstop. No wonder the UK is such a mess. Failure to understand the basic process of the Brexit negotiations is endemic. Hard to see it ending well now. 
Liam Fox's Brexit trade bill set to crush disabled people  
And a picture tells a thousand words - effective ERG Brexiter whip recently resigned Brexit minister Steve Baker confers with the Labour MPs who brought victory - Field and Hoey  
What you need 2 know, really, is Brexit is not just about the UK regaining its freedom. It's about ending the EU & the German take-over of Europe. It's about Europe regaining its mo-jo. Its people having a future & prosperity & not being subservient 2 Germany. Worth fighting for? 
Tory rebels at 14 now include new names Guto Bebb and Mark Pawsey...Labour rebels who prevented  government defeat (3) were Hoey, Field & Stringer - Great irony that only last week Rees Mogg was very disconcerted about the Government passing its Brexit on “socialist votes”  
Looks like the Government lives to fight another day after very narrow wins on the Customs Bill. But you have to ask - why bother? The Govt have been tied up in knots by the ERG and the Chequers agreement binned #Brexit #FBPE 
This seems to prove that Parliament could vote for a no-deal Brexit.I have stayed optimistic until now about a deal being reached, but for the first time I now believe no deal to be the most likely outcome.  
So engrained in the Tories and Labour is the instinct to object to anything put forward by SNP, that when an amendement which was already accepted was called, half of the commons accidentally said no and the speaker had to ask it again. | #brexit #indyref2 #scotref @KirstySNP 
We are in free fall. #TrumpPutin #Brexit 
Jacob-Rees Mogg's customs amendment will not be acceptable to the EU. Or to EU businesses. Why would they agree to collect tariffs for the UK?Inflicting Brexit-induced red tape on ourselves is quite bad enough but to inflict that on anyone else cannot be acceptable.#Newsnight 
Many ways to influence Brexit but this limping, clueless, destructive government just won by 3 votes. 10 of our MPs are chasing extreme Brexit & 7 don’t show up - misrepresented or unrepresented, choose your poison   
Tuesday's Times: "May's Brexit plan in turmoil"  #BBCPapers #tomorrowspaperstoday (via @MsHelicat) 
Doesn’t @DominicRaab look like a total mug now? His department eviscerated by an unelected Whitehall mandarin set on stymieing Brexit.The embarrassment. Surely he’ll have to resign. No point hanging around, it’s obvious they don’t need him to do anything- except carry the bags. 
So, let me get this straight, every single Scottish Tory MP that was there tonight has effectively voted to guarantee a hard Brexit? What do you have to say about this, @RuthDavidsonMSP ? 
We are through looking glass now. Uk government has voted against itself to, effectively, junk the Irish backstop. How can EU negotiate w/this? For note- here is how the Brexit press celebrated the December deal. Now it’ll celebrate it being junked as a great national moment  
By 3 votes Commons opposes VAT alignment. Bad for Irish backstop, bad for business, bad for ordinary consumers, bad for any prospect of an orderly #Brexit 
Excl: PM's EU adviser Olly Robbins strips Brexit Ministry of its 50 best negotiating staff in new Whitehall power grab; 
Ouch. Defence Minister Guto Bebb voted with Labour on Brexit tonight, and then resigned his position. This humiliation for Theresa May is becoming a regular thing now. 
"The ERG cabal of Edward Leigh, Christopher “Upskirting” Chope, David Davis, Steve Baker, Priti Patel and Bernard Jenkin who were huddled together near the back of the chamber. A true confederacy of dunces. Six MPs in search of a brain cell." 
BREAKING: FOURTEEN Tories rebelled against the Government over ERG customs arrangement. That's the biggest Brexit rebellion yet, shows the scale of the challenge Theresa May is up against 
Trump's European Trip -Demanded that NATO deadbeats pay their fair shareScolded May on her mishandling of BrexitStated that immigration is destroying European cultureWorked with Russia to reduce the threat of war  Best. President. Ever.  
Not only has @theresa_may caved on Brextremist demands, causing another minister to resign, but the gov't want an extra long summer holiday. Right in the middle of #Brexit negotiations.If you are as angry about this as us, sign our #PeoplesVote petition.  
David Davis warns that the Government will ‘throw away’ the opportunities of Brexit if it sticks to the Chequers plan:  #BrexitBetrayal 
Putin made a fatal mistake at the #TreasonSummit by admitting that it was Russia that held a so-called ‘referendum’ on Ukraine’s territory of Crimea. Putin forgot the propaganda lie claiming Crimeans held the vote. #RussiaInvadedUkraine #CrimeaIsUkraine 
Just one long moving-feast of a crisis. Thought we had moved away from No-Deal Brexit but it is now really towering over us. What was the point of @theresa_may standing up to her #Brexiteers last week and then caving in this week? She needs to go on a parenting course! 
It was always going to happen that @sinnfeinireland votes might actually  have made a difference in an important #Brexit vote & this one was about Ireland. What a waste of political capital  
This is the motion tabled by the Government to bring forward MPs' six week summer break. If it’s voted through, With Brexit in chaos, the Government falling apart & the country in crisis I suggest we all join this shambolic shower & take the rest of the week off  
Who is @JustineGreening  - one of our least effective politicians - to call for a 2nd referendum? If she had any empathy or understanding of the people of this country she’d realise that neither Remainers or Leavers want it  #OutOfTouch 
But even this is not honest, it is only half the truth. The Tory Brextremists want the sovereignty so they can dismantle the welfare state, and hollow out our democracy, passing real control and real sovereignty into the hands of stateless kleptocrats. #StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE 
BBC news. “Since the referendum people are less concerned about immigration”  
Defence minister resigns to support the PM’s Brexit strategy which the Mogglodyte ERG whipped against. Think I’ve got that right  
Labour MP's SHOCK claim Britons should NOT have been allowed 'very complex' Brexit vote. That’s insulting!  
Theresa May’s top EU advisor Olly Robbins stripped Brexit Ministry’s of top 50 negotiating staff  
To those who say Westminster doesn’t matter - wake up. Our future is being torn apart by the British Government. Abstentionism is not acceptable. Sinn Fein gift Theresa May a win over Brexit. SDLP MPs would have been there to stop Tories. 
Justine Greening's call for new Brexit referendum has been rejected by Downing Street. Do you support her views? #IanOnLBC 
Still unable to come to terms with the EU referendum result, and mortified that leaving the EU meaning leaving it, the  political Establishment in Britain is manoeuvring to impose a second referendum on the voters.  They know not what they will unleash .... 
Taking back control going well:Limiting time to discuss Brexit Bills Preventing Parliament having final say on Brexit deal Taking early holiday to prevent further Brexit debates  
It's true that a hard brexit will lead to job losses in the hundreds of thousands. My constituents who voted leave knew this and those that lose their jobs will have the satisfaction of knowing their sacrifice was in the name of sovereignty. 
Brexit: Government scrapes through Customs Bill vote  
Just a reminder that without @patel4witham this amendment would not exist. Good on her and those who supported it. #Brexit  
Moving out and realising why your Mum used to go #Cray for leaving the washing out in the rain when you’re out all day.. #Brexit   
Tories win ERG amdmt vote by majority of 3. What does todya mean? That Tory remain rebels struggling to prove they can combine with opposition and defeat government to force softer brexit. ERG proved earlier today they can force government to change course for a harder brexit 
Govt tables motion to start recess 4 days early... ...shutting down potential for Brexit rebellions.  
Imagine postal workers, nurses, teachers or any workers holding a vote and just giving themselves time off. This is a disgraceful and cowardly affront to democracy. Brexit aside how about homelessness, housing, education and NHS crisis’ to deal with?  
Can I please just take the temperature on this. IF there were to be another Brexit referendum tomorrow, and if L = Leaveand R = Remain, would you 
Your periodic reminder of the awful consequences of a no deal Brexit.  
Project Fear is alive and well as it transpires that senior Remainers in the government colluded with Airbus over its calls to negotiate a soft Brexit.We shouldn't be surprised, yet somehow Theresa May's duplicity gets worse with each passing day. She's an utter disgrace!  
If govt get beaten on this vote in next few mins, having backed down this afternoon to try to avoid getting beaten, that will be a memorable political messup , and only second time they've been beaten in Commons on key brexit legislation - not long to wait now 
Labour MPs saying Defence Minister Guto Bebb's voted with them on Brexit tonight. That's his job gone if he did 
Scotland is not going to get any say, no matter the circumstances of any proposal regarding Brexit. Even reasonably intelligent amendments will be voted down by Tory numbers, and Labour doing it's usual abstention. It's time for Scotland to make her own choice #ScotRef and YES 
So this vote is big one - on @patel4witham and @Jacob_Rees_Mogg amendment - which is widely seen as attempt to blow up the Facilitated Customs Partnership that is at the heart of @theresa_may's Brexit plan (though @MelJStride for the government tried to gloss over that) 
With Brexit in chaos, the Gov’t falling apart,kids going hungry, homelessness soaring, millions in poverty & an NHS in crisis the Gov’t should table a motion to sit through the summer, not rise 5 days early for a 6 week summer break!! If you don’t give a shit call an election!!! 
Can anyone think of a more stunning foreign policy victory in the whole of history than Putin’s in delivering Trump and Brexit? For a basket case like Russia with an economy smaller than Italy’s to deliver disruption at this level, it’s staggering really.  
The vote in UK Parliament, which was basically an ammendment intended to ensure the Scottish Parliament got a vote on matters which effect Scotland on trade in #brexit negotiations was just defeated 36 - 316. Says it all really! | #scotref #fao2018 #indyref2 
I see the same old Tory trolls are out in force talking about respecting the referendum and the Tory Manifesto.Read my lipsI do not respect the referendum as #VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw !!!I reject the Tory Manifesto as it did not command our support when put to the nation!!!! 
The unassailable truth:#Brexit will make the UK poorer. Growth is already down, & among the lowest levels in Europe. We'll not be given favourable trade deals by Trump's America First. There's a real risk of a food & fuel shortage.We're on our own - & nearing the iceberg. 
What a disgusting generalisation Lammy. We've got people that are not old, not white nor guys supporting these amendments and Brexit all over the country and even in parliament. I'm one of those actually.Now take your racist ageist self off Twitter and help your constituency.  
Only to the Mirror would this be a shock.Shock poll reveals Brits would rather have a No Deal Brexit than back May's plan  
Odd then Eddie that she's voting against all of the Labour softer brexit clauses & amendments. Anyone would think she's all mouth.And do you not care about poor or disabled people? Should the leader of the Labour party be voting for cutting disabled payments too?  
This is ⁦@theSNP⁩ amendment we are now voting on. Looks quite reasonable doesn’t it? Tories are voting against & Labour are abstaining #CustomsBill #Brexit  
Georgia is 20.She thinks a carpenter lays carpets.She is a product of the current British education system.Brexit Britain is going to be so much fun... #loveisland pic.twitter.com/c1a5nFE3cq 
B. Johnson resigns as a minister & gets a well-payed job as Telegraph columnist, peddling the far-right #Brexit propaganda of the tax-dodging, Sark-based, billionaire Barclay twins. This is exactly the kind of legalised corruption that is perverting our politics. #StopBrexit 
17.4m people voted for Brexit , dopey  
The strong and stable one has tabled a motion to shut Parliament down for the entire summer, 5 days early, with immediate effect. Vote tomorrow. The Brexit crisis is reaching its critical state. 
Technical but serious Brexit threadThere will be no vote on New Clause 37 - the ERG amendment that prohibits NI being in a separate customs territory from Great Britain.This means the only deal the UK can negotiate (w/o) further legislation) is one that keeps the UK in CU / 
"the political consequences of a second [Brexit] referendum would be disastrous, widening the gulf that already exists between the political class & the population & further undermining the already fragile belief in the value of democratic representation" 
Remind me of her voting record against Brexit related votes, Eddie? 
It's fake news to say Brexit was a 'working class rebellion' against the establishment. Most working class areas of the UK were Remain strongholds: Liverpool, Leeds, Manchester, Newcastle, Glasgow, Peckham.Brexit is an establishment coup against workers' rights.  
Looks like Tory anti-Brexit Remainer MPs now caucusing with Labour, LibDems & SNP to defeat Govt on Taxation (Cross-Border Trade) Bill, b/c Govt accepted Tory ERG amendments.‘Tories’, plotting with Leftists to prevent Govt honouring the manifesto commitment on which they stood 
This simply confirms that we are dealing with #BrexitBroadcastingCorporation in its refusal to report the scandals around Brexit lest it upset the Government & Nigel Farage  
MPs are set to get an extra 5 days off work - all because Theresa May is running scared of Brexit 
There are 2 crises blowing up Twitter now. One = Brexit. And one = Trump-Russia. But, they're not separate. It's absolutely nuts to be dismissing parliament in what is a national security emergency in the US. It's a national security emergency here too. We are part of the plan  
Desperate times call for desperate measures. Looking at that speech and others she is genuinely angry about Brexit and what her party is doing. That type of passion can't be ignored. She's putting our country FIRST not her party. Can't say that for Corbyn or most Tories. 
Tells you everything you need to know about our ruling elite. With the country in crisis and no clear policy on Brexit with only a few months until we leave the EU, our MPs are going to vote to go on holiday 1 week early. Total disgrace!  
After the referendum Farage said that the £350m claim had been a mistake, and that if it had been up to him it wouldn’t have been made. Now Gove says the same about immigration. Wankers!  
#Soubry:  "Nobody voted #Leave on the basis that somebody with a gold-plated pension and inherited wealth would take their job away from them." #Brexit 
The PM has made a complete hash of Brexit. And now the Government wants to go on holiday a week early. It's almost inconceivable how cloth eared to the troubles of decent working people they are.Inconcievable, but apparently true.Join the resistance #ForTheNation #Joinukip 
.@guyverhofstadt please save us from the @Tories who held a reckless #Referendum to settle infighting, causing more infighting whilst ignoring the people of the #UK.We need a say in our own future. Tories are so busy fighting themselves they don’t know we’re here! #PleaseHelpUsEU 
Trump's thoughts on Brexit is like a college student trying to pull off a presentation on a book they didn't read  
Excellent news. Government handling of Brexit has been so smooth and efficient MPs can go on holiday early. Well done everybody!  
Parliamentary summer recess should be postponed until this Brexit show is sorted. 
Instead of sodding off for summer, why don’t MPs stay in Westminster and sort this bloody Brexit white paper mess out?  
Tories in chaos over Brexit tonight. The way they’re going, even an early recess on Thursday might not come early enough to prevent implosion 
Good chance of some argy-bargy in the Commons tearoom after this. Conversative @Anna_Soubry attacks those with “gold-plated pensions and inherited wealth” for not caring about the effects of #Brexit on her constituents 
If we Leave under Article 50 without a deal under UK, EU and International Law we owe NO MONEY at all, not a brass farthing....#Brexit#Moggmentum 
And the MPs wonder why the electorate regard them in such low esteem.Cancel the break altogether and sort out Brexit or the NHS or BOTH.#detention#mustdobetter 
.@AmberRuddHR makes first critical intervention in Commons since resigning as Home Sec, raising fears @Jacob_Rees_Mogg insistence EU collects tariffs for UK could damage Brexit white paper. Gov denies but this is moot. Tory Remainer rebellion on ERG amendments could be big 
Two years on and #Brexit is still a shambles. NI accounted for 0.5% of the total vote in that referendum and received buggar all attention. Don't be surprised that a UK govt would ignore us now. 
Btw if you've been following Brexit and debate about news coverage, do read this  
104 pages of the #Brexit #WhitePaper reduced to 10 slides.Especially for those concerned for @BorderIrish, @BelfastAgmt, & with more sense than time.@DPhinnemore & I have scrutinised the WP in light of #JointReport commitments to NI/IRL & the UK's alternative #backstop.1/10 
"I knew Margaret Thatcher. My honourable friend ain't no Margaret Thatcher."　Conservative Brexiteer Sir Edward Leigh lashes out at Remainer Anna Soubry after she used Margaret Thatcher's example to back her arguments about Brexit.  
Having just watched, on & off, MP after MP pretending to accept Brexit while still blatantly doing their damnedest to spike it, another shout-out for this, by me:'Just Why Are The UK's 'Liberal'-Elite So Irredeemably Europhile?' 
Clarity:- no single version of Leave commands substantial support in the country or the HoC- Remain is by far the biggest block- any form of Brexit is bad for the UKSolution:- stop, reconsider, lower the temperature of debate#SuspendA50 
ERG trying to rule out any kind of customs deal in Brexit at all - their approach would hit Yorkshire manufacturing hard with extra border delays, customs bureaucracy & costs. Spoke in Commons debate today to support Yorkshire manufacturing & customs union deal 
 Tonight the extreme right of the Tory party are trying to drag the UK towards a hard Brexit and pull Scotland out of the Single Market. SNP MPs will fight for Scotland's place in the Single Market.Here is why the #SingleMarket is so important. 
In light of the continuing shenanigans at Westminster, where it looks like a no deal/ hard border Brexit, is it time for those of us who are not from a traditional nationalist background to have a serious discussion around a new Ireland in all of our best interests and #think32 
Having listened to the debate in HoC today, it is blindingly obvious UK MPs have no idea how to provide for #Brexit or the logistics involved.WTO has a simple set of rules, used worldwide.We'll just go to those, thanks.No Deal can be quantified, these clowns in WM cannot. 
More sense in this one clip than Corbyn has made on the whole of BrexitThat's fucking tragic!  
Brilliant speech @KirstySNP, absolutely nailing the ludicrous factionalism in @HouseofCommons over Brexit, furious at the UK Government for caving in to hard line Brexiteers when there's a majority in Parliament for staying in the Customs Union and Single Market. #BrexitShambles 
You should try watching @c4news you might learn something about impartial journalism. As an ex BBC staffer I have massive respect for the corporation and its work, but @BBCNews has lost my trust for its non questioning, biased approach to Brexit. 
A smart, usually optimistic Tory minister on the current Brexit state of play: "I don't have any insight, other than it's a big fucking problem." 
UK Parliament can't be held hostage to 50 Brextremist MPs, Mogg, May and Corbyn.It's about time all sane 550 MPs to unite, do their job allow 3rd EU ref. We want #PeoplesVote @JustineGreening referendum on the deal. 
Theresa May giving in to hard line Brexiters on the Customs Bill only a week after releasing her white paper shows that there is no strategy to her Brexit, only chaos.If you want the final say on the deal and option to stay in the EU, add your name:  
Don't worry Anna we will remind @BroxtoweCons that you give more praise to Chuka Umuna than any Tory and that your attacks are more scalding on Jacob Rees Mogg than on Corbyn and that you have spent the last year trashing what your constituency and the country voted for. #Brexit  
For our place in the European family of nations, for your country, for your community, for your family, for your enlightenment values, fight #Brexit. Talk to your family, neighbours and work colleagues, we can win this! It’s up to us! 
Just watched the tremendous @KateHoeyMP on @SkyNews - A truly great principled Labour politician - A #Brexit hero to 17.4 Million people.....and a really nice person! 
Repeat. "Labour + Tory MPs working together to choose best chance of defeating govt tonight, after No 10 backed down to Brexiteers"Some Conservative MPs want to destroy their Party and collude with Corbyn rather than honour Brexit.  
In Commons making the case to back the referendum decision by the British people who believe in the kind of independent land of opportunity we can build - and why MPs need to show the same political courage as the voters. 
Watching the Trump press conference, and watching MPs from all sides of the Brexit debate acting like children in a playground, I'm more convinced than ever that we are heading for something truly terrible in our politics and our democracy. 
Something needs to come to a head to stop this debacle. Parliament is broken over Brexit. The problem is, Brexit is undeliverable. PR the only way forward to prevent such a mess in the future. 
So much for that promised Brexit for the people. If you’re not already awake to this, wake up, you’ve been had!  
3/ @Anna_Soubry on why a WTO hard type brexit won't fix the NI_IRE border issue.  
Did you vote leave thinking it was best for your family by helping you economically? Then watch this from @Anna_Soubry and consider what those MPs who back hard brexit truly think. Angry? Dismayed?Why not be a #remainernow & help UK change course #PeoplesVote #StopBrexit 
Bet Boris Johnson & David Davis are raging they resigned. Their mates in the ERG have basically shown everyone they run the UK and want a Hard Brexit. Never has there been a better example of a puppet leader than Theresa MayScotland this isn’t as good as it gets 
It is time for MPs to stand up and do their duty to protect the wellbeing and livelihoods of the British people. Stop Brexit now, work within the EU to facilitate change and benefit from ongoing peace and prosperity. 
Sick of hearing the lie that the govt is “honouring the referendum result.” For every 17 Leave voters, there were 16 Remain voters, 12 who didn’t vote and 3+ who were disenfranchised. Time for MPs to stand up and represent the whole country. 
A second referendum would be completely disastrous for Britain, writes @WilliamJHague 
5 years ago today my neck was broken & I was paralyzed. But it opened up a path to found @ucampaignupdate which helped @tedcruz win Iowa, Brexit pass, & @realDonaldTrump win the White House. This week we delivered our 10,000,000th grassroots action. Never surrender! #DeoGratias 
Ken Clarke, an arch remainer, has declared his support for Theresa May's Chequers agreement.Now we know. If Ken likes it.The Chequers agreement is leave in name only, no more, no less.More reason than ever to support @UKIP for a Brexit that means freedom & independence. 
Tory “soft” Brexiteers have caved in every time they have had UK G on the run. If they want to avoid a No deal Brexit tonight would be a good time to stand their ground 
We did sign love, with a fecking big X but you didn't like the outcome, we didn't need a faux petition because we were given a referendum, that's true democracy. You'd do well to remember that.  
Nobody believes you. 2 years of zero critical analysis. 2 years of failing to fact check.2 years of rigged QT audiences. 2 years of pro brexit Marr, Humphreys, Robinson and Neil. You've lost the confidence of millions of us who wanted to still believe in BBC integrity. 
If you're hard right, and what you actually hope Brexit will deliver is enough nationalistic division for you to build an authoritarian society, it's actually all going brilliantly 
Now that the ERG mob has taken charge & they've admitted that 100s of thousands of jobs will be sacrificed to achieve Brexit, I expect Jeremy 'not a single job lost' Corbyn's delayed reaction is because he's furiously planning his devastating attack to stop this calamity  
Dominic Grieve - Throughout the whole process of #brexit we are collectively going through an exercise both in deception & self deception about the implications of leaving the EU... if we're going to make rational choices we need to avoid self deception. #StopBrexit #FBPE 
Twice as Many Brits Back ‘No Deal’ over May’s Brexit Plan  
The rigged housing market is a far bigger issue for ordinary working people than Brexit. People need to get their heads out of their arses and see what's really going on. #Dispatches 
“Let us work together to build a leading aerospace nation. A nation where, post Brexit, we are considered the best place in the world for the aerospace industry to base its business.” - PM @Theresa_May 
The PM has effectively signalled today she will legislate for “no deal” because:a) she has no backboneb) it’s how she can cling to power until hardliners ask for morec) she thinks she’s negotiating with the ERG, not the EU27Choice emerging: no deal or *no Brexit*  
Two years on from David Cameron’s referendum  - what Michael Portillo called the greatest blunder ever made by a British prime minister - and we have reached a new low in the Commons today.  
“No one wants to admit it but Trump is right about Brexit. He is right that Theresa May is failing to adhere to the public vote and is selling out the British people.”Brendan O’Neill on Sky Australia  
.@DavidDavisMP demolishes the arguments against leaving the customs union in his first speech since resigning as Brexit Secretary - watch in full:  
Matthew Parris is right: Theresa May’s Brexit plan is terrible says Rod Liddle  
BORIS JOHNSON PREPARING a bombshell speech to deliver in Commons as @theresa_may sits there!  Tories lining up to dump her as leader, because of her lies to voters.       @borisjohnson #boris johnson  #BorisJohnson #Brexit  
Four days ago Theresa May ignored Trumps own recorded words so she could suck up to him for a fantasy trade deal. Today Trump buddied up with a thug who launched a chemical weapons attack on British soil this year. Wonderful choice of friends Blighty, wonderful. Enjoy Brexit. 
Brexit has hit peak confusion. A new vote is the solution | Zoe Williams  
This. This is what #Brexit has come to. Bannon suggesting #Brexiters take up arms and go to war. Why hasn't @metpoliceuk been called in. This is a criminal offence. 
When Putin says “we held a referendum in strict compliance with the U.N. charter,” he is simply lying.So you hold a "referendum" under foreign military occupation and it should be fair? Crimea is Ukraine. And Ukraine should take it back, one day. It will.@Kateryna_Kruk 
#Putin on #Crimea: we held the referendum in strict accordance with international law, with the Charter of the United Nations. For us, for the Russian Federation, this issue is closed.#Crimea #Russia #Trump #Helsinki #HelsinkiSummit #TrumpPutinSummit 
The threat to Brexit has never been so severe. @Theresa_May is setting us up for a fudge. We will sign a very bad deal on a 'temporary' basis. But don't be under any illusion... it will become semi-permanent.  Read my view on @HuffPostUK: 
Off she spouts again. That great "Tory rebel" @Anna_Soubry The Tories are a shambles. @theresa_may is a cowardly shambles. Brexit is a shambles.We need a LAB govt. #GE2018Now 
We now have in government a bunch of Tory MPs that know full well hundreds of thousands of lives are gonna be ruined by Brexit, if not millions, and they simply couldn't give one toss as long as *they* get their Little English BrexitOf course they won't be harmed by it, we will 
Former Brexit Secretary @DavidDavisMP explains why the issues around the Irish border are eminently soluble - by technical means and cooperation between the UK and Ireland 
Theresa May’s Government Implodes as 9th MP Resigns over Soft Brexit Plan   
Many of the top Brextremists in politics are wealthy and unaffected by the UK economic consequences of no deal or hard Brexit. For some eg amongst some of the hedge funds it's more sinister that they may actually profit from the damage to the £ or Treasury bonds & equity markets  
The ERG have grabbed control of the Brexit White Paper like a bunch of raging incontinents squabbling over the last sheet of toilet paper in a third world dunny. A shitstorm is coming if the rest of Parliament don't come together and stand up to these self serving shits. 
David Davis speaks out on the importance of the UK having full control of its trade policy in his first speech since resigning as Brexit Secretary: "We're the country that does least well out of the EU's trade agreements. They almost never involve services - our primary trade."  
Theresa May ‘is a Remainer who has remained a Remainer’ claims Jacob Rees-Mogg as he blasts her Brexit plan  
There is a long hard road yet to a clean Brexit & a complete break from the EU, but we will get there by putting grassroots pressure on Theresa May. Keep it up folks we'll get there yet 
Dear @Anna_Soubry,I don't have a gold-plated pension; nor do I have inherited wealth. The "reality" of Brexit for me is about about democracy and accountability (which some term 'sovereignty'). You appear to be "ideologically driven" in your EU zeal to ignore millions of C2/Ds.  
Dominic Grieve (live) and Anna Soubry (recorded) on Channel4News criticising Jacob Rees-Mogg for disloyalty to PM on Brexit  
Often a bit uncomfortable with adoration of Anna Soubry - she voted for Tory cuts like the rest of them - but she is bloody magnificent on Brexit.     
The message from conservatives to @theresa_may is clear: we will support her if she supports us, and that means a full #BrexitLIVE: Remainer anger as PM accepts #Brexiteer demands 
During today’s press conference with @realDonaldTrump in #Helsinki, #Putin said about #Crimea: “We held the referendum according to the international law”.  How could the #Russia|n government be holding a referendum on the territory of #Ukraine? 
Anna Soubry made a remarkable comment during her speech in the Commons, hard brexiteers in her party have had private talks on the job losses their hard #Brexit will cause, but they don't care, they just want sovereignty bk, these are the ppl May capitulates to, think about that 
We can still stop this madness that is #Brexit read this thread and RT.  
Remember, UK:Trump is Brexit. Brexit is Trump.They are both the result of the same hostile campaign against Western democracy, funded and masterminded by Putin.The US have put a Russian puppet in the White House, and we are crippling our economy and nation. It's the same.  
Complacent, evasive reply. The BBC is a disgrace, not least for inadequate balance for Political Parties and views on Brexit. 
Why do some Remainers1) Claim to respect the 2016 referendum2) Say repeatedly the UK cannot thrive unless ruled by Brussels3) Do everything they can to subvert the will of the people4) Undermine the UK government, AND5) Do the EU's bidding at every turn?  
Sen. Warner estimates that the cost of Russia’s meddling in the United States, the Brexit vote and the French election is less than a single F-35 fighter jet 
Theresa May could sue the European Union for not doing enough to stop no-deal Brexit chaos  
BETRAYALWe've just witnessed UKG run roughshod over Good Friday Agreement. They've now set us on a path to a hard border, job losses, loss of access to healthcare & denied our young people education opportunities Remember this moment #Brexit 
They would have 300,000 fewer members, 100 fewer MPs, no chance of stopping a hard Tory #Brexit, and @JolyonMaugham would be making excuses for why Liz Kendall's strict adherence to austerity and neoliberalism has failed to resonate with the public. Still, bloody Corbyn, eh? 
Utterly unconvincing. Your own recent tweets, the massive promotion of Farage, and the way that Brexiters are rarely held to account or their misleading comments corrected (eg. Paterson on R4 yesterday) means that you are no longer trusted. BBC is one of Brexit's many victims. 
Ken Clarke - During the referendum some of us tried to raise the threat to our international trade & inward investment that leaving the EU would involve.. I debated Daniel Hannan... it was easy to debate him as Dan wasn't advocating leaving the single market.#StopBrexit #FBPE pic.twitter.com/58eROgetAG 
The way Anna carries on, anyone would think that the Remainers had won the Referendum, and that Jacob Rees Mogg was trying to subvert democracy...  
You can be damn-well sure that May isn't running the country.Nor is Jacob Rees-Mogg.The person who is running the country is situated over in Brussels and Brexit-fudge May is trying to keep it that way!  
Conservative MP @Anna_Soubry attacked  "ideologically driven" colleagues with "gold-plated pensions and inherited wealth" for ignoring the "reality" of Brexit.  
Justine Greening says the final Brexit decision should be given to the people, is she right? @Nigel_Farage is live 
PM @Theresa_May’s #Chequers #Brexit plan is dead. Commented @Jon_Danzig, "Theresa May has a jellyfish backbone. She is the servant of the far right of her party." RT our report. Link:  #PeoplesVote #ExitBrexit 
"If Brexit is not delivered and the will of the British people is ignored, watered down or put to a second vote, then Britain can no longer claim to be a democracy."@FraserMyers on the calls for a second referendum 
Two years on from #Brexit and #Trump the governance of both the UK and the US is in complete turmoil. Laws and systems will have to change to create a new polity on both sides of the Atlantic. It will happen because the people are wiser and more tolerant than their leaders. 
If you think the debate about Brexit is never ending so too is that about the BBC’s coverage of it. Here’s the BBC’s response to @NickCohen4’s recent criticism 
I'm afraid I cannot celebrate the implosion of the Conservative Party. They are currently running the country and could bring us all down with them in a No Deal Brexit. The damage to the UK is already incalculable. No deal would be catastrophic to all but the very rich.  
LP can’t  expose Tory lies on Brexit by coming up with the lie of a job’s first Lexit. How patronising can they be?We don’t care if your communities are devastated & you lose your jobs,we know what is best for you, so we won’t tell you the truth we’ll just tell a different lie.  
David Davis' former chief of staff says the PM "was not forthcoming" when DD sought to find out truth about her Chequers customs plan. @IainDale asks if May lied to her own Brexit secretary, Stewart Jackson replies "I don't think she was fully candid with him" @LBC 
#Brexit is now just an internal battle within the Tory party. Jobs will be destroyed and families wrested apart just to satisfy the egos of a few multi millionaires. They don't give a toss about the public or the carnage they create.#Leavers you are the enablers of this madness 
Soubry complains the government is in danger of “losing the plot” over #Brexit after May caved into 4 demands from #Brexiteers todayMs Soubry also said "I’m getting a bit tired of being called a traitor"If the cap fits 
Sorry to keep on tweeting about the #TreasonSummit but the West crossed a Rubicon today and these events are 100% entwined with Brexit. Like electing Trump, breaking up the Western alliance is a Russian foreign policy goal and they are succeeding beyond their wildest dreams. 
Should a General Election be held to allow voters to take back control and decide whether they want a Labour or Tory #Brexit?Please RT after responding 
Former David Davis chief of staff @BrexitStewart lets rip in conversation with @IainDale on LBC. Says betraying Brexit will end in electoral 'catastrophe' that will make 1997 'look like a Vicar’s tea party' 
TM now clinging on until the summer recess with #Brexit & Tories falling apart. This is not a government, it is a bad joke. Senior Tories now calling for #peoplesvote. Even they accept it is the only way out of this mess. #FBPE 
'Why should we be a tax collector for EU?' Brexiteer Patel in passionate Brexit defence  
Watch @JustineGreening calling for a #PeoplesVote on the final #Brexit deal  
#Brexit is turning into a total disaster before our eyes - as we warned. If something isn't done, we're going to end up with no deal, a ruined UK (if the UK still exists), and the rights of millions of citizens in absolute tatters.Good work, Brexiteers #StopBrexit 
Clarke [Con]: If we leave with no deal, we will be the only country in the developed world that doesn't have a trade deal with another country #Brexit 
An effective opposition would go to town on @Anna_Soubry’s revelation that Brextremist colleagues have privately said hundreds of thousands of job losses “worth it” for (illusory) prize of post-Brexit sovereignty 
Remain voters feel ignored by the Conservatives.Leave voters feel alienated by the Tories.Ordinary workers aren’t benefiting from Tory policies.And now businesses have lost faith in the govt Brexit plan.The Conservatives are letting Britain down. 
Stewart Jackson warns the Conservatives face electoral catastrophe if Brexit is betrayed and tells @IainDale Theresa May has handled negotiations “about as badly as possible”  
The ERG's fanatical pursuit of a hard #Brexit is just one part of a transatlantic scheme to dismantle democracy, and replace it with the kleptocratic rule of a super-rich elite and their political hangers-on. My thread:#StopBrexit #FBPE 
Brexit and Trump are the same phenomenon. A policy of self harm masquerading as patriotism. 
Last year, during Kurdistan's referendum, Arabs painted kurdophobic & antisemitic propaganda on the walls of #Basra. They accused the #Kurds of treason for wanting to leave Iraq. Now the Basrawis themselves are being beaten up by Iraqi forces, in front of the very same paintings. pic.twitter.com/quXPYShUOW 
Top scoop from @tpgcolson: in an unpublished letter to Theresa May, business leaders warned that her post-Brexit customs proposals were “not fit for purpose” and littered with "ambiguous or conflicting wording” — more here  
First @JustineGreening calls for a second referendum, now Dominic Grieve says call the whole thing off. Remainers rallying...  
#Brexit is not a glorious liberation from the EU, it is a shambolic retreat from Europe by a confused & frightened country that has blinded itself to the realities of the modern world with false pride, lies and delusions.Save Britain #StopBrexit!#PeoplesVote 
Westminster: Pleased that the Government have accepted amendments I’m supporting to the Customs Bill effectively ending its mistaken ‘Chequers agreement’ which would’ve weakened the UK’s EU negotiating position and delivered Brexit in name only. Commons sense, for now at least! 
I'm on @RTUKnews 7pm tonight talking Brexit, Chequers, May Must Go and she's the vassal state we need to get rid of. Tune in. 
Remainer Business Secretary struggles to name a business that supports ReMayner May's #Brexit planOn the other hand, more than 100 businesses have criticised that plan.And May's justification for #BrexitBetrayal was that business needed to be appeased. 
.@DavidDavisMP says in his resignation speech that neither UK nor Irish Govts would ever need to impose a hard border but is unable to give a satisfactory answer when I ask why then he agreed to the need for a #backstop provision #Brexit 
How about a rolling daily referendum where we each decide whether we want to be in the EU every morning and for the rest of the day we're either in or out. 
Very dangerous point in Brexit process. Gov’t undermining own flawed Chequers plan & making  very difficult to agree Irish backstop - risks GFA & return of hard border. Withdrawal agreement/transition deal in jeopardy. Catastrophic no deal much more likely 
Every time I think Brexit is the stupidest, most dangerous thing happening in politics, Trump pops up like a whack-a-mole turd to stink out the place. That press conference was a disgrace. 
Theresa May needs to prove she is not a total coward. Reports suggest she is now ruling out the backstop (probably at the behest of the DUP) - this will effectively drive us to a 'no deal' Brexit & probably a hard border in Ireland. That is not acceptable to democratic Ireland. 
It is becoming ever more likely that #Brexit will split the Tory party. Given FPTP this will almost certainly result in the electoral annihilation of the political right and a decade of Labour hegemony with significant gains for the LDs in Tory areas. #StopBrexit #PeoplesVote 
Caved to those who want to implement the referendum result? Unbelievable. The Tory Remain rebels are the ones destroying their own party. x  
The Chequers plan signalled that May had had a good long lingering look over the no deal precipice and had realised it would cause untenable harm. Now she is surrendering to the Brexit Jihadis. We'll get to pay the price for their hubris and her cowardice. 
Read from former Conservative staff member why a #PeoplesVote on #Brexit is necessary:   
Always remember.1. A #PeoplesVote would be advisory.2. If it's advisory, it doesn't need to be binary.3. We can therefore have three clear choices:A. Revoke Article 50 and Remain.B. Accept the Government's Brexit deal.C. Leave the EU and all its institutions with no deal. 
About to do @LBC I’m sure @IainDale is coming round to @peoplesvote_uk given the total chaos of Brexit. Hope we get to discuss Putin owning Trump too cos that matters for Brexit too. 
Presumably they’re taking an extra long break so they can make their personal plans for the no-deal Brexit - shifting investments offshore, arranging jobs overseas etc etc. 
Putin: «...we conducted the Crimean referendum in full compliance with...”. Hey, Vova, your official lie until now was that locals did it? 
Proof that the kids don't want #Brexit!!!!!!Well done to the #BollockstoBrexit team in Durham! You got the kids on message and the Leavers rattled = RESULT! 
Government in chaos over #Brexit.  Clock ticking.  Theresa May's solution?  Hit the beach early  
Things getting pretty heated in Commons this evening over #Brexit as real intentions of the extreme Brexiters like Jacob Rees-Mogg are laid bare... Time for @peoplesvote_uk 
During the EU referendum, we were told "the government will implement what you decide". Its unwillingness or inability to implement the first Brexit vote is no reason to have a second.Me on Justine Greening's call for a 2nd referendum in @spikedonline 
A quick glance through the @scotlandinunion twitter page reveals they are running terrified of a Scottish Independence referendum. Tweet after Tweet is a warning that Indyref is coming. Yet not a single tweet telling us why the Union is so wonderful. The game is up#ticktock 
Last week I said I thought a no deal disorderly Brexit now seems 75% likely. Today that feels optimistic. All paths to an orderly Brexit under this government look to be blocked. And Parliament voted against giving itself the power to take back control. We really are so screwed. 
Just take today. The #TrumpPutin show. The PM caves in to Rees Mogg, a govt beholden to its fundamentalist edges. An explicit warning from a close ally that they can’t trust the relationship we crave to be the “highest level of special”. Brexit is dangerous. Gotta call stop.  
After taking two years for the British government to publish its Brexit proposals it has taken less than two weeks for those to disintegrate under pressure from Tory hardliners.  #BrexitChaos 
Brilliant speech from @Anna_Soubry in the Customs Bill debate - the Chequers White Paper is a good move by the PM for a sensible Brexit & Government should have no time for ERG wrecking Amendments 
.@theresa_may's proposals can hardly be described as a 'soft Brexit', given the damage that will be caused to the economy by taking the UK out of the Customs Union and Single Market. But even this is not a tough enough stance for the Brexit ideologues who have quit in a huff. 
- Agreement on NI backstop needed to secure exit deal & transition- EU27 will not budge on integrity of single market- There's no parliamentary majority for any one feasible Brexit plan - Everyone, on all sides of UK debate, is running out of road as exit date looms 
Have no doubt about what the Tories have in store. The Brexit Secretary's new chief of staff wants to "turn back the clock" on workers rights  
Donald Trump calls the EU his biggest enemy. Starts to lay the groundwork for pulling the US out of NATO. Pushes for a Hard-Brexit. Backs Putin over his own security agencies. All while his campaign is being investigated over collusion with Russia. What could it all mean... 
Benedict Cumberbatch filming "Brexit" across Lambeth Bridge in London. ( @DailyMailUK) 
A complete meltdown in leadership by the Prime Minister.   Whether you agreed with her last week or not, her vision for Brexit, which took 2 years to achieve, agreed at Cabinet, has lasted barely a week. Is the ERG effectively running our govt now?  
Interesting: as @Anna_Soubry makes the point that trading under WTO rules would require a hard border on the island of Ireland, @PhilipHammondUK sits on the Govt frontbench in the Commons just now nodding away in agreement #CustomsBillDebate #Brexit 
I would not be at all surprised, if we were to have a 2nd referendum on the EU, there would be calls for EU citizens in the UK to have a vote also. 
2nd referendum !!! Yet right , so the remainders can fraudulently change the results .... I should coco !!!!!  If remainder May hadn’t been fannying around we should sorted by now ... so what do folks want another referendum and if they don’t like it , the best of 3 FFS !!!!!! 
I'm no tory (as you all know) but i must pay tribute to @Anna_Soubry, she has skewered the hard Brexiteers in her party on frictionless trade, the single market, she's told them in no uncertain terms their hard #Brexit will cost 1000s of jobs, take a bow Anna Soubry #StopBrexit 
We are witnessing the Tory party tear itself apart over #Brexit right now as Leave-supporting Conservative MPs tear into Remain-backing Anna Soubry over trade with the EU after Brexit in the House of Commons. It is brutal. 
Don’t worry, this means May’s chances of negotiating a workable treaty are now approaching zero - so goodbye Brexit, after a @peoplesvote_uk 
.@Anna_Soubry attacks MPs with “gold plated pensions and inherited wealth” who advocate hard Brexit 
Brexit-related. Does anyone else feel utterly sick to the bottom of their stomach? The security of our democracies is unravelling in real time, on TV. #TreasonSummit 
How are you pretending Brexit is still a good idea? 
Tory MP @scottmann4NC says he resigned to be able to properly scrutinise the Government's Brexit plans "to ensure that I deliver on what the people of North Cornwall put me here for.""I'd like to see the Government look at Brexit as an opportunity rather than as a difficulty"  
Students support @JustineGreening call for a #PeoplesVote on the final #Brexit deal:  
The horrifying #TrumpPutin axis that's emerged in Helsinki makes it all the more insane that Britain is leaving a successful association of friendly nations.#Brexit: a badly bleeding nation jumping into shark-infested waters.#PeoplesVote #TrumpPutinSummit 
"There isn't a majority in the House of Commons for any Brexit option. The alternative is to go back to the public." @vincecable on Justine Greening's support for giving the PEOPLE the final say on Brexit.If you want to #ExitfromBrexit add your name:  
Unfucknbelievable Dominic Raab skips first day of Brexit talks to attend a Tory Summer Garden Party for drinks!!! You What!!!!  
The Tory party can hardly claim they are 'pro-business' when they are royally screwing them over with Brexit  
The ERG doesn’t five a damn about N. Ireland. They stand to make too much money out of brexit to be bothered with trivial details like Ireland. 
Jacob Rees-Mogg - "Leaving on WTO terms means we trade with the EU in the way that we trade with the rest of the world, which is nearly 60% of our trade.“And then we don’t have to pay them the £39 billion. So there’s nothing to be fearful about it.” #Brexit  
Liam Fox's Brexit trade bill set to crush disabled people  
So if there WAS a 2nd referendum and the country voted Leave again  - what miracle solution would the Gov come up with then that they can’t come up with now? Government Remainers only want another one because they think it would go their way 
Tory MP @Anna_Soubry says she's going to vote against two Brexit amendments to Customs bill which govt has accepted. Customs Bill debate under way in Commons now... 
So will you @michaelgove apologise to the immigrants & EU27 citizens whose lives you have thrown into turmoil, & who you have caused to be exposed to an upsurge of hate & bigotry. And will you then resign & cleanse the stain you cast across our political life.#Brexit #StopBrexit 
Anna Soubry on Brexit: ‘History will condemn those who haven’t tried to stop all this nonsense’  
Tonight at 10.45 on @ITV, @piersmorgan asks @realDonaldTrump about his thoughts on #Brexit, the Queen and a trade deal with the UK. Piers, The President and Air Force One - an interview not to be missed.  
Yet another nail is about to be hammered into the #Brexit coffin! Watch this space for news which will prove most uncomfortable for @BorisJohnson @michaelgove @KateHoeyMP & other Brexiteers!#BrexitJustice will be done: @Lord_Sugar @carolecadwalla 
Press got copies of the Brexit white paper last week at 9am, but opposition MPs didn't, says @PeteWishart as he applies for an emergency debate on the ministerial code (which sets out that statements shd be made available to opposition in advance). 
Julia Hartley-Brewer - "Theresa May became leader of the Tories, she became PM, scraped through an election last June, on the basis of delivering Brexit."She’s not going to deliver #Brexit, she needs to go."  
When the Brexit shit hits the fan, make sure you are as far from the fan as possible. Boris and Davis have already scarpered. Now Gove is putting distance between him and the mess he's caused. Over the next weeks, watch all the other Brexit con men scuttle away ...  
.@GeorgeMonbiot warns chaos after a poorly-executed Brexit could lead to a "hard fascist" revival within Britain:  
On the other hand, Orwell’s “Shooting an elephant”, while written with imperialism in mind, is the best allegory to Brexit possible: the protagonist shoots a no-longer dangerous elephant because it was the people’s will, and in order to not look foolish.  
please, whatever Brexit you wish or don't wish for, please don't desert the people of Northern Ireland. Those of us old enough to remember the Troubles never want to see a return to those dreadful days. 
If the UK public don't want chlorine-washed chicken, hormone-fed beef or GMO food in a US trade deal, according to @LiamFox , they won't have to have it. If we leave the EU, I will hold him to that promise. #Brexit #FBPE 
I can't help feeling those pointing the finger at Vladimir Putin over alleged #Brexit collusion wouldn't be better off going after Murdoch, Dacre, Desmond and the Barclays. Not to mention investigating the cause-and-effect of 40yrs of unbroken neoliberalism on British society. 
“and thus democratically excluded”Well given your confidence in the size of public support for Brexit (biggest evah!)* - then what’s the harm in including a wee option for a minority? *[addressed in thread]  
I’ll be with you Heidi. Having made great strides with her #Brexit #WhitePaper to meet the needs of business, the PM has allowed it to be wrecked by caving in to the hard no deal Brexiteers. Seems Jacob Rees Mogg is running Britain. 
Britain's misunderstanding of Brexit in a nutshell. It is not a negotiation, let alone a 'divorce' (between two equal partners). Brexit is a withdrawal. It is a legal process and will be conducted as such.  
Trouble is that the #Remainers always back down and cave it. @Jacob_Rees_Mogg has nothing to lose, he's destined to remain a back bench nobody and will no doubt lose his seat at the next GE. For him it's all about leveraging #Brexit to make more millions, then to cut and run. 
EU shill Remoaners have a 2-pronged approach to conning us out of #Brexit:1) Force a 2nd Referendum & split the Leave Vote.2) Kick our March 29th deadline into the long grass.Beware the snake-oil salesmen, for they are rife amongst us.  
UKIP's @Nigel_Farage tells BrexitCentral: Brexit backlash will be ‘unlike anything we’ve seen’  
#Brexit is an all-out attack on the rights, freedoms & prosperity of the communities the left is supposed to represent. Join Manuel Cortes, Zoe Williams, Marina Prentoulis + others next Thurs for the #Bristol leg of The Left Against Brexit summer tour:  
We know the government has made contingency plans for a no deal Brexit, that include stockpiles of processed food and barges carrying thousands of electricity generators. In other words, it believes the package Theresa May has just accepted could lead to collapse. 
It’s good to see remain tories correctly being called rebels againBrexiteers are representing the will of the nation and the Conservative manifesto#ChequersmeansCorbyn #RespectTheResult #Brexit  
Pure panic within FG now, making one last attempt to flog the unwanted Toxic monster.... Where's our referendum...?  
It's pretty fucking clear that #Brexit is nothing more than the will of the ERG. They have taken control from the Prime Minister, to serve their own agenda, like a smash and grab ram raid in a care home for incompetent MPs.   
This is a crisis! We're heading for a hard border !! What happened to protecting NI and the Good Friday Agreement? If UKG/DUP adopt this amendment, NI is in serious trouble ! #Brexit #Backstop @PeterKGeoghegan @SarahLudford @OwenSmith_MP @ChukaUmunna @Andrew_Adonis 
So giving the Ppl a #PeoplesVote where ALL voters get a #FinalSay to Confirm if they still want the #Brexit Deal/No Deal or now to #StopBrexit #Remain & #Reform damages Democracy?If a majority of ppl no longer want this #BrexitShambles do you believe it should be stopped? 
.@theresa_may having capitulated to the rebel Brexiters of the ERG, the rebel Remainers are now so incensed that they are planning to vote tomorrow to force her to sign up for customs union. May is out of Brexit frying pan and into Remainer fire. Ouch 
A No-Deal Brexit is the beginning, not the end! It will allow us to be free to trade, assist Italiexit & Frexit with ready deals for French & Italians From there, we will kick over the entire EU and start a much better era. #WalkAway 
Michael Gove, who personally whipped up anti immigration sentiment with his ridiculous & exaggerated claims during the referendum campaign is now trying to wash his hands of it all. We must not let him get away with it!  
Dominic Grieve on Brexit. If doesn't work, ditch it:"In a deeply divided country we must either work together to get the best deal we can — and this needs compromise — or accept that Brexit cannot be implemented and think again about what we are doing." 
Do you agree with @JustineGreening’s call for a second referendum? 
It’s taken 11 days for Jacob Rees Mogg to destroy Theresa May’s brexit plan.  
The #Brexit choice, always binary, as I've written so many times, is crystalising into a choice between a diamond-hard Brexit....or no Brexit at all. Not clear now that the politics on either side is prepared to buy into the necessary fictions needed to find a middle road. ENDS 
Theresa May’s Government Implodes as 9th MP Resigns over Soft Brexit Plan   
That awkward moment when someone proudly tells you they voted for Brexit & you just think 'You Fucking Idiot' pic.twitter.com/JFNXJpT67U 
So the big picture question of the day - notwithstanding things we haven't spotted / unexpected events - seems to be:Was today the day Theresa May lost her ability to get her brexit through Parliament? 
No amendment is good enough!  We do not want a deal with the EU.  Our referendum was in or out, we chose out. These amendments will still keep us tied to the corrupt EU!   NO DEAL!  SACK MAY!                   #fo2eu 
The Chequers Brexit plan puts the Tories in a perilous position as Theresa May's party sinks in the polls, says @Hariboconomics  
Imagine a @theresa_may and Angela Merkel WhatsApp message exchange about the #Brexit #Chequerspaper...I imagine that it would go something like this #ChequersMeansCorbyn#MAYMUSTGO#KeepMayGetCorbyn 
Thank you @JustineGreening! The Government's handling of Brexit is a complete shambles -- the only way forward is to give the people the final say and a chance to #ExitFromBrexit 
May's Brexit climbdown shows Rees-Mogg deciding government policy, says Labour - Politics live  
Former Brexit Secretary @DavidDavisMP on the Chequers plan: The inevitable consequence of the proposed policies will be to make the supposed control by Parliament illusory rather than real. 
The ERG is merely trying to get the Brexit we voted for delivered. A manifesto commitment that all Tory and Labour MPs were elected on. ERG Tory and DUP MPs are delivering their democratic mandate. Real question is why other MPs are not.  
Farage backtracks on 350 million NHS lie a day after the Brexit vote. Boris Johnson continues to peddle the lie, then makes a strategic move to swan off into a Cameron sunset. Davis quits when it matters. Michael Gove...says “it’s a difficult one.” What a bunch.#Brexit 
David Lammy is against Trump. He is also categorically against Brexit. He sees the connection, and calls it out for what it is. David Lammy has more intelligence, courage and moral authority than the whole Labour front bench put together.#StopBrexitSaveBritain 
I hope for a day when all those involved in the dirty networks across the globe that are pushing forward Brexit for their own gain, that got Trump elected, & continue to make a mockery of democracy are held fully accountable and that the people truly do get to “take back control” 
Ever since she became PM, May kicked the can down the road on Brexit because she knew that when she finalised her position it would so upset Brexiteers orRemainers orDUPThat she would probably be oustedThe moment is nearThe MSM should have pointed this all out 2 years ago 
'@ABridgen MP says Theresa May's position won't be tenable unless she drops the Chequers Brexit proposal.'70% of our membership won’t support it.' 
As PM is accused of making “a pig’s ear” of Brexit, one man daydreams about what he’d like to do to that pig’s ear  
Some very level headed and extremely well informed people now see no way through for the government. No majority for a backstop. No majority for any form of Brexit. Therefore: a) No deal; b) No Brexit;c) Extension of A50 
Justine Greening is effectively saying that because parliament is refusing to implement Brexit, we must have a second referendum. What a perverse, anti-democratic argument, says @FraserMyers 
"It's time for Parliament to get behind a People's Vote on the final Brexit deal."  
The parties should put their Brexit plans to the nation and let us have a General Election. The Tories have already breached multiple parts of their manifesto, so let the people decide. #GE2018Now 
Hahahahahahahahahaha.  And to think David Cameron called a referendum to heal the rifts in the Conservative Party and stop the rise of UKIP. Didn't get the result he wanted.  We voted out. 
Indeed they don't - but bigger point is that it was power play to show they have numbers to vote down chequers' style final brexit deal post the negotiations, and govt has indeed backed down  
You can keep saying ‘We are leaving the European Union’ till your statement necklace falls off. It doesn’t make #Brexit the right thing for our country 
“There is a sense at the back of my mind that we didn’t get everything absolutely right. It’s a difficult one.”[.@michaelgove ] There’s nothing difficult. The real question is why you, Boris et all aren’t in court due to breaking electoral Law.#Brexit 
This kills meaningful Brexit negotiations with immediate effect. You can't seriously negotiate when the leader of the other party does not have the domestic support for what might be needed to reach a deal. 
The political and media failure to explain the reality of no deal Brexit is an appalling dereliction of duty. Their/our role is to inform the public of reality, not the other way round.  
Michael Gove is a charlatan, during the referendum campaign he whipped up and demonised migrants on an industrial scale, he now thinks immigration is good, he's a lying/scheming/odious/vile rat who will say and do anything to succeed May, don't trust him #ToriesOut #StopBrexit 
I think most of the public have just given up trying to follow the twists and turns of brexit and no wonder. And it's all about trying to find a position the Tories can agree on, not one Brussels could ever agree to. Absolute wallopers. 
A happy guy lol#BenedictCumberbatch in character and dancing joyfully!#Brexit  
What Buhari won as referendum from Ekiti people , Nigerians, and international community is shame, big shame. 
Michael Gove admits leave campaign wrong to fuel Turkey fearsHe was the oil on the anti-immigration fire. The 3.6m EU citizens have been at the receiving end of this since the beginning of the referendum. A short 'sorry' wouldn't go amiss. 
The only reason some Brexiters agreed to the PM’s plan is that they trust the EU will reject it, there will be no deal and they’ll blame Brussels rather than themselves.  The Brexit campaign claimed to be about taking back control- these plans would give Britain less of a say. 
1.) Looks cool2.) Given UK defense budget + fiscal realities of Brexit, this is fan fiction.  
.@Theresa_May explains why our Brexit plan is the best for Britain's jobs  
For flip sake, the Chequers Brexit plan seems already to be a dead parrot. Beautiful plumage though  
"Gove believes the referendum vote helped to puncture popular concerns about immigration and “burst the Ukip bubble”.His betrayal of the vote and voters has resulted in a 5% rise in our vote in only a week, while immigration is still out of control.  
Oldest and easiest trick in the book is to scapegoat immigrants. It’s the first thing you learn in GSCE media studies. What fucking hurt about #brexit was seeing up close how these sordid methods work.  
I spy Dave too! #Brexit  
'That's why I'm fully behind @theresa_may'This obsequious creep is the one who voted Remain, whose constituency voted Leave, who stood on a manifesto promising to implement Brexit, but who now wants @andreajenkyns denied access to social media for trying to hold the Govt to it. 
IN CASE YOU MISSED IT: England legend @GaryLineker hits the sweet spot again by backing a #peoplesvote on the final Brexit deal.Are you with him? Share this post.  
Michael Gove used horrific immigration rhetoric during the referendum in what was an attempt to further his own career. He is now trying to water it down and change his stance to reposition himself as a future PM (AGAIN). Here is the slow/not so slow progression of his views:  
BREAKING: The Government are now accepting wrecking amendments which directly kills the Chequers agreement. What is Government policy on Brexit now? One way out of this mess - call for a #PeoplesVote on the final brexit deal.#FFS 
Theresa May confirms there will be a second referendum...  
Justine Greening in today’s Times - death knell of Brexit  
Now the government accepts the ERG amendments, "Chequers" is dead. The government no longer has a Brexit negotiating position. #puppetonastring 
During the EU Referendum campaign #michaelgove happily spread the flames of racism and is now showing that he's a political chancer who see's the tide is going out on hard brexit. Politics would be better without him.  
"I'd like to see the government look at Brexit as an opportunity" - Conservative MP @scottmann4NC has resigned from his post of private secretary over #Brexit plansFollow the latest politics news here:  
Lots of people who are presently annoyed about the denial of a second Brexit referendum are fully in favour of Scotland not getting a second independence referendum. 
Young people in the NE are not backing brexit. These students pictured at the weekend #EUloudandproud saying #bollockstobrexit Nor are many older people now that the facts against brexit are coming out for that matter. #FBPE 
Struggling to follow this, but I think that means that a core element of the Chequers Proposal - the FCA - is killed off? If right, what actually is Govt's Brexit proposal to the EU now?  
UK's Prime Minister May vows to 'build a leading aerospace nation' after #Brexit  
Right. Better start preparing for a second referendum then... 
Our petition for a #PeoplesVote is now has over 220,000 signatures! We're getting closer & closer to a quarter of a million backing a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal. Please RT:  
Scott Mann: "I would like the government to look at Brexit as an opportunity rather than a difficulty...." 
Video: May flaps as she’s exposed not knowing or understanding own Chequers Brexit ‘deal’  
As May has said again freedom of movement within the EU will stop for the British people.Mean while we have a labour leader who is facilitating the tories in getting a brexit.Both leaders are completely deluded. Do you agree with this?#StopBrexit#FBPE 
Brexit won't mean Brexit until we've taken back control of our laws, money, trade and borders. Join our campaign today.  
"Having been a passionate supporter of leaving the EU for many years, last night I concluded reluctantly but decisively and clearly that I can no longer support Brexit and I now firmly believe we should remain in the EU." (Michael Gove October 2018?) 
During the 70’s and 80’s it was @UKLabour that opposed Tory policies that decimated the NE region. Now, we have the same party actively supporting a policy that will decimate jobs and living standards.Betrayal doesn’t come more destructive than Labour’s support of Brexit  
You wanted to win the referendum so much you were willing to throw immigrants under a bus and embolden our home-grown racists.Fuck off with your apology. You don’t mean any of your words.  
I was very impressed that Theresa May announced her new #Brexit team so soon after the last one all resigned.  
"I think parliament has reached an impasse. Only the British people can give us the clear decision that we need."　Former Conservative cabinet minister Justine Greening calls for a second referendum on the EU.  
'Brexit will decimate the UK on the global stage – and everyone but the government has realised this' 
Theresa May needs to change her approach to Brexit! Read, sign and retweet our letter demanding that the PM drops plans for a soft Brexit! 
BBC News - Justine Greening's call for new Brexit referendum rejected by No 10 . Foolish Mrs May rejects a second vote in any circumstances. This must be the most insane stance. It put her logic on a par with Trumps. Afraid of the result.Stop Brexit. # FBPE 
Don't let thisl charlatan Michael Gove get away with washing his hands of the anti-immigration bile he personally whipped up during the EU referendum.Michael Gove's fingertips were all over the lies and hatred whipped up over immigrants. Don't let him get away with it.  
this isn’t nowhere near as bad as when Rihanna was yelling “where y’all at” to a half empty room. & cause of Brexit? I have to laugh. Wembley wasn’t the only underperforming date which is why those “soldowt” boxscores still aren’t posted.  
Maine state House Republicans uphold Gov. Paul LePage's veto of a bill that would've provided start-up funding for the Medicaid expansion voters approved in a referendum:  
So we need a new Brexit White Paper BEFORE the EU had a chance to reject the old one?This is all going Titanically. 
The government clearly prefers violent fascists to peaceful democratic protesters. Our government would appear to be on the side of democracy's enemies. #Brexit #StopBrexit #FBPE  
Theresa May has ruled out a second Brexit referendum, in the same way she ruled out a snap election early 2017 
New pictures of Cumberbatch filming his Brexit drama  
Theresa May has stated:THERE WILL BE NO SECOND EU REFERENDUM, WE WILL HAVE THE HARD BREXIT SHE WANTS@NicolaSturgeon i guess now you and Scotland know the terms of Englands Brexit.#ScotRef please.  At least 47% of us will say Yes, i'm sure we can convince 3%+1. 
Norman Tebbit: Theresa May's approach to Brexit is collapsing under the weight of its own contradictions  
Should @theresa_may  resign or stay as prime minister?#Brexit #PMQs #BrexitShambles #BrexitReality #uk #England #Eng #PrimeMinister #PeoplesVote #Labour #LabourParty #Gateshead #Newcastle #London #Manchester 
From what I see, it’s the Remainers who are claiming they are unsure what Brexit meant... haven’t met any Brexit voters yet who were unsure what LEAVE meant... 
So, No. 10 has definitively ruled out, under any circumstances, a further referendum on the final Brexit Deal...Time for the bookies to start shortening the odds on the #PeoplesVote I’d say.  #fullconfidenceinthemanager 
A no-deal Brexit could lead to a catastrophe for science in the UK  
Because outside the media/Twitter bubbles, most people I talk to say they voted for a "hard" Brexit (totally leaving EU) before the term even existed. It was "in or out" and they voted "out". Black & white to ordinary folk 
BREAKING: I understand the Government is going to accept all four ERG amendments to the Customs Bill. #Brexit 
UK's SECRET BREXIT WEAPON: UK can secure 10-yr TARIFF-FREE trade with EU if no EU dealUK could carry on trading with EU without any tariffs for 10 yrs if a free trade deal has not been reached after Brexit negotiations.Why aren't media telling us that?  
As overheard on #bbcsp "Brexit is like watching your library being burnt down by people who never learned to read". Spot. On. #StopBrexit 
I put it to you, if it is time for a Second Referendum, as we’ve already decided to leave the EU, we only need to decide how. Hard Brexit, even if that meant no deal? Or Theresa May’s compromise? Over to you 
I voted for end of free movement, end of ECJ, ECHR, and all other EU rules and laws, to stop sending billions to a dictatorship, to take back our fishing waters.  I want my Brexit and I want it hard! 
Brexit was a coup. Remainers have a powerful argument why Britain must remain in the EU, in our economic & geopolitical interests. But we are muted in the media, have almost no voice in Parliament. We can't just rely on hope of #PeoplesVote. We must inspire a counter-coup by MPs 
The grassroots of the Tory Party could ultimately be the ones who decide whether or not May continues as PM. If MPs think they'll lose their jobs over her Brexit plans, they'll have to get rid of her. 
Things which are clear to see:• Trump only cares about strengthening US and weakening EU.• Putin only cares about strengthening Russia and weakening EU.• Brexit will weaken the UK and EU, while strengthening Putin and Trump, at a time when we need the EU more than ever.  
The more we find out about the activities of Cambridge Analytica and Facebook, the more alarming this story gets. And yet both Washington and London insist we continue living in the reality they helped create... Trump as US President, #Brexit in the UK.  
"Fears are growing at Westminster that there is now no Brexit deal – not the Chequers plan, nor David Davis’s Canada-style trade deal, nor a no-deal scenario – that could command the backing of a majority of MPs."#Brexitshambles 
People are sick to death of Brexit.Most sensible British people can see it's an utter disaster and as I've argued all along - the only way to resolve this civil war is to have that final and decisive battle. Nobody wants to fight another referendum - but anything else is a fudge 
Roland Smith, author of 'the Liberal case for Leave' has withdrawn his support for Brexit due to political "Incompetence" & the "Madness of Brexiteers"  
Getting a few of these from readers today"Unless T May is replaced and Brexit is negotiated correctly with a plan in place for no deal I will reluctantly vote for UKIP." 
Yes, I do recall there was a referendum in 1975. The result was respected and implemented, and the losing side waited decades for another say.  
Here’s a Tory MP openly calling for a second referendum on the #Brexit deal, whilst the Labour front bench refuse to contemplate one. Respect to her, but, as I called for in my last tweet less than an hour ago, it’s time for Labour to step up to the plate.  
The results are in!Last week we asked if you think the public should be allowed to vote on the final #Brexit deal.88% of those who voted said YES. 12% said NO. Book your place to join the debate with @Andrew_Adonis: #LoveQUB 
WATCH: @JustineGreening calls for a #PeoplesVote on the final #Brexit deal  
David Davis accuses Theresa May & her allies of being “astonishingly dishonest” by trying to argue there’s no alternative to her Chequers plan, he said my dep’t did draw up plans for looser ties, too many concessions to the EU have undermined Brexit negotiations. 
. @NadineDorries is putting foward a fascist serial criminal as a future PM. If the Tory party does not expel her it will be sending the message  that criminal fascism is an acceptable Tory doctrine.#Brexit #PeoplesVote #StopBrexit 
.@theresa_may dismisses calls for 2nd Brexit vote as ninth parliament member resigns  
Observation: "The Leave vote was for sovereignty, regardless of economic impact" is not compatible with "Remainers/the EU is/are responsible for the economic impact of Brexit". Pick a lane, ERG folks. 
The LibDems really are Cassandra, aren't they?They opposed the Iraq war, when everyone else said, 'Yeah, great idea.' They oppose Brexit, yet still no-one votes for them.Condemned by a curse to speak truth yet never to be believed. 
'We will just LEAVE on WTO rules!' Rees-Mogg claims Theresa May's #Brexit plan will be voted down in the House of Commons unless she agrees to scrap it, as both Remainers and #Brexiteers believe the deal would be detrimental to the UK. 
Brexit LIVE: May hit by ANOTHER resignation as Brexiteers rebel ahead of MP vote TODAY  
I am so keen to see how MPs vote. As has been widely reported, if @Theresa_May’s #Brexit plan fails, the U.K. may have to stay in the EU. That’s what the “Stop Brexit” brigade want, surely?Why would they then vote with/for Theresa?I am watching. Agendas will be laid bare. 
Justine Greening - #Brexit is too important to have 1000s of people feel like their MP somehow did the wrong thing.. everybody deserves to have their say on such an important issue as brexit that will shape all of our lives for decades to come. #PeoplesVote#StopBrexit #FBPE 
magine gon ae yer gran’s bit hinkin yer gonny get a nice bit a lentil soup or homemade tablet, n she hands ye a fuckin ‘FREE TOMMY BREXIT NOW’ tote bag, n drags ye doon ae a ‘free tommy protest’ where she gets aw up in passing muslim’s faces shouting n spilling her can a stella pic.twitter.com/yLC3ilCtzF 
“We also acknowledged that the questions read out by Mr Salmond were not ‘invented’ as alleged by the complainant and that only one of the six tweets and emails referred to Brexit, the matter raised by the complainant in this case”.Ofcom Decision paragraph 5  
Venom with which Tory right turning on Govt is a joy to behold. Just done debate with top Tory blogger who said Mrs May had sprung her Brexit plan on her own ministers ‘in secret, just like her disastrous social care policy in last year’s election.’ Well, we know how that ended 
There will be an Article 50 extension of time and during that extension of time there will be a second referendum and after the second referendum we'll stay in the EU.And everyone will be very nice to each other. 
#quote "May told Brits who voted with their hearts to leave the EU to wake up + ACCEPT a soft Brexit yesterday."TMay telling Brits what to do? She forgets that politicians take their instructions from the people, not the other way round. *such* arrogance. 
I hope @piersmorgan is watching @SkyNews right now. @AyoCaesar backing up her fantastic showing on @GMB by talking absolute sense reference #Brexit  
The point of Brexit, which is to deregulate, is explained in the book 'Britannia Unchained'. It is to enable no minimum wage, reduced workplace rights, poorer health and safety standards and even lower corporation tax, so that the UK can be “competitive” with developing nations. 
We’re facing five possible options:A no deal A hard Brexit via Labour.A slightly softer hard Brexit via the Tories. A soft Brexit (EEA plus CU)No Brexit.The only one that will protect jobs & the economy is a No Brexit. Labour & the Tories know this yet they don’t care. 
Shock poll reveals Brits would rather have a No Deal Brexit than back May's plan 
“THIS ISN’T THE BREXIT I VOTED FOR! I DON’T WANT THIS BREXIT!”Which did you vote for? The sovereignty Brexit? The anti-immigration Brexit? The NHS Brexit? The trade deal Brexit? The anti-Turkey Brexit? The banana Brexit?“I VOTED FOR A UNICORN BREXIT! I WANT MY UNICORN!”  
I’ve done a video blog about the Brexit white paper.It’s my first one so go easy if it’s shit. pic.twitter.com/ih0nU03bag 
New Brexit Secretary Dominic Raab skips his first day of Brexit talks to attend right-wing think-tank summer drinks  @dontbrexitfixit @thesilverfox971 @Andrew_Adonis @BrexitBin @ThatTimWalker @MutliRaceMan @PatrickBHenry @HowarthJudd @acgrayling @chunkymark 
This morning @LowTaxChloe accused @Femi_Sorry of being part of the political elite trying to go against the will of the people on Brexit. It didn't end well...   
She has dismissed the manifesto she fought the GE on. She has misled her Brexit secretary. She has misled her MPs and the public. She has consistently said we’ll leave the SM, CU, oversight of ECJ and end FMOP. All of which she has U turned on! 
Rethink it anyway. It’s toxic in any form. “If we can’t work together on a deal we must rethink the whole idea of Brexit - Dominic Grieve - Evening Standard  
Why calls are growing for a second Brexit referendum  
I know it's @bbclaurak's job as political editor to focus on May’s survival.I just wish sometimes she'd step back and look at Brexit's implications beyond that — what the factions are actually proposing (if any) and what that means, including for jobs.That's political too.  
We’ve got the establishment blaming Brexit and the Trump election on Russian collusion without an ounce of evidence.  
Dear @elonmusk. I have invented a machine that I believe can help rescue the  people of the United Kingdom currently trapped inside brexit. (see blueprints attached). To make this dream a reality I am looking for an investment of £40billion. Thank you.  
Today’s billion dollar question. What is “the Brexit the people voted for”?  
Dominic Grieve points out Chequers Brexit plan ignores services, which make up 80% of economy. "Single market in services raises the issue of freedom of movement for those services to be delivered, something Thatcher created and we are now abandoning" 
Brits would rather quit the EU with NO deal than back Theresa May’s Brexit plans  
#UK : WE MUST COMPROMISE Theresa May tells Brits to wake up and accept a soft Brexit in another bitter backlash!  Are you in favour of knuckling under to this Tainted Remainer?           #fo2eu  
I'm getting really annoyed at this 'apparent' warming towards a second referendum.  We've fucking had one, we voted to leave, not have an endless neverendum...Get one with it you dolts.... 
Scott Mann, charismatic ex-postman from North Cornwall bravely steps down as PPS. I fought seat for UKIP in 2005 & persuaded UKIP to back Conservatives on Referendum pledge. With such tight majorities we can’t risk losing seats like this over Chequers deal  
No Anna I think you will find the electorate condemn those who stand on a manifesto commitment to do one thing and then spend the next year doing exactly the opposite and insulting all your colleagues. p.s. Those eyes....that stare....chills#Brexit  
Moving house. V v stressed. Movers have told me to stay out of way and relax. Checked Twitter. Lots of Trump/Putin/Brexit. More stressed than I was to start with. Going back to movers to relax. 
Dominic Grieve says we may need to "think again what we are doing" on #Brexit. Clear that momentum is building for a #PeoplesVote: 
Good grief, we’ll still be part of the European alliance after Brexit, just not part of the EU. This is really basic stuff.  
If we can’t work together on a deal we must rethink the whole idea of Brexit | Dominic Grieve  
#TheresaMay rejects new #referendum “under any circumstances “ - even if people want it ? - no matter how bad the #BrexitShambles ?- even if no parliamentary majority for her #Brexit deal?What arrogance! 
Another day and another resignation. But Boris’s ‘devastating speech’ has been postponed apparently till at Least Wednesday while David Davis makes ludicrous remarks saying Theresa May is a good prime minister. I fear he was probably too dim to be an effective Brexit Secretary. 
Conservative MP Justine Greening has called for a 2nd referendum on #BrexitGreening has said it’ll have to have 3 options.Chequers Deal (Soft Brexit)No Deal (Hard Brexit)Remain in EUIf a Second Referendum were to be held, how would you vote?PLEASE RETWEET THIS POLL 
The theme this year is “Free, Safe, Legal”, a slogan we have always rallied behind. This will be a celebration of the emphatic referendum win as well as a show of strength for support for access to abortion for anyone who wants or needs one.  
Theresa May Rules Out 2nd Brexit Referendum 'Under Any Circumstance':  
Roland Smith, author of 'the Liberal case for Leave' has withdrawn his support for Brexit due to political incompetence in the negotiations. The government's Brexit plan is pleasing nobody, making it more crucial than ever that we have a #peoplesvote on the final deal. 
There won’t be a 2nd EU referendum.But all Parliamentarians who are dissatisfied with the Chequers deal should fight and call for a snap election.All parties should put their Brexit plans to the country - let the people decide via a real people’s vote: a general election.  
Confirmation of a second referendum.  
Holy mother of god (I’m Irish) when will we wake up ???#brexit is part of a bigger global picture and we are collectively sleep walking into it, pretending this is #democracy. Bannon, Brexit #Trump, Putin even Tommeh are all part of this. We aren’t in control #FBPE 
Scott Mann, the Parliamentary Private Secretary at the Treasury, has become the ninth resignation to quit because of Theresa May's Brexit plan.  @ShelaghFogarty asks: Is it time for a people's vote 2.0? 
Here we go. Dominic Grieve says the UK should "think again" about Brexit if May cannot get her Chequers plan through Parliament. As expected, not quite as unambiguous as Greening, but it doesn't take much detective work to figure out what he is suggesting.  
Question - if people didn’t respect the result of the first referendum, how on earth could we trust them to respect a second?  #Brexit 
About to go on @bbcradioulster to discuss Justine Greening’s call for @peoplesvote_uk to keep us in the EU. Polls show more than 70% in Northern Ireland want to stay in EU, so they will welcome this important move. I’m in Belfast this Thursday & Fri to campaign against Brexit 
And it's Trump's friends & allies who paid for Brexit. This is key, key point.  
If there's a #PeoplesVote instead of a GE it will strengthen the Tories & either facilitate a Tory hard Brexit or hand Tory leadership to another useless fucking hypocrite Tory with same ideology whether in/out of EU. The only peoples vote is a GE & a vote for Labour 
This is a v good point. Britain voted for Brexit before we knew about Trump. Before we knew about Putin. Before we realised truth about Farage. Would UK *really* vote for Bannon's vision of Brexit as perpetual warfare led by Tommy Robinson? Because note, Bannon's pals paid for it  
Tories will be remembered for putting the UK at risk by pushing for a hard-Brexit but left-wingers helping them will go down as collaborators. Hard Brexit is the biggest threat to jobs for decades.Sitting on your hands so Tories destroy themselves is negligence. #PeoplesVote 
Because:you never accepted the result of the first referendumthere were multiple breaches of electoral lawLeave has no credible plan or common goalthe result was advisoryLeave advances Putin and Trump’s goals, not the UK’sParliament cannot agree on the way forward  
You peasants didn't vote the way the Establishment wanted and they are throwing everything at it to stop Brexit. Fear, fear and more fear. They are sending out their attack dogs to hit you at every angle possible.Resist Resist RESIST! 
Here are six of the most ridiculous claims from #ProjectFear about the impact of a clean #Brexit on businesses, prices and jobs. I’m paraphrasing to make my points, but all are staples of the #Remain camp. (1/8) 
The IEA sets out its alternative Brexit White Paper - Britain's economy could be boosted by 7% if it makes a clean break from EU red tape!  
After Brexit, budget holidays will be a thing of the past. Here's why  
The crucial bill in front of @HouseofCommons this evening is the #CustomsBill. It’s a Treasury dept bill under Philip Hammond. His PPS resigned this morning. It’s all unravelling #Brexit #WhitePaper 
I am glad to see this sort of thing from prominent Brexit-backers. What would be nice, however, is a bit of respect and acknowledgement for the Remain voters who did sufficiently account for most of this.  
#IsabelOakeshott corners #Remoaner #DominicGrieve on his anti-#Brexit meddling. "You stood on a #manifesto which said we would #leave the #EU, the #singlemarket, and the #customsunion!"  #MayMustGo #BBC #LBC @ConHome @CCHQPress #ConservativeParty @DCBMEP 
Twice as many voters want Britain to quit the EU without a deal than back Theresa May's #Brexit plan, a Mirror poll has revealed.More evidence that #ChequersMeansCorbyn 
'Brexit will decimate the UK on the global stage and everyone knows it'  
@JustineGreening Any second referendum should ask only 2 questions.1. Do you support the Govt. Brexit position?2. Do you prefer to trade under WTO rules.We already voted to Leave in 2016.  
There is no transition period if there is no deal, nor an agreement on NI or Brexit citizens.  Nothing is agreed till everything is agreed  
There's going to be a second referendum on Brexit then.  
"I don't think it's workable, but I think it won't last" @JustineGreening on #ChequersDeal and calling for another referendum #bbcdp 
Justine Greening's proposal on 2nd ref splits the vote in favour of Remain.1 Brexit - May's package2 Brexit - no deal3 RemainNo. 3 should be removed, that's already decided & consequences for democracy of running a once in a generation vote 2 yrs later unthinkable.#bbcdp 
The bottom line: as long as Theresa May has backing of 159 out of 316 Tory MPs for her leadership & her Brexit, she can do it 
We accepted the result in 2016 but now know - dirty tricks and dirty money involved- almost certainly Russia involvedand believe - democracy didn’t end in 2016- we deserve another vote now we know all the above PLUS the facts about #BrexitWhat are you afraid of exactly?  
Donny, glad you've done your "NEVER been worse" research (Cuban missile crisis, U2 spy plane incident, B59 submarine incident, Able Archer) While literally blaming the US for everything.Looks good for holding Vlad to account for Ukraine, US election, Brexit, Crimea, novichok 
Just heard May's caved in and agreed to Jacob Rees-Mogg's amendments to her BREXIT Chequers plan 
As talk ramps up about a #PeoplesVote, & the need for a high level of informed debate, the FT editor @lionelbarber & former Guardian editor @arusbridger have both commented on a deeply critical @NickCohen4 piece called “How the BBC lost the plot on Brexit”.  
Brexit LIVE: May hit by ANOTHER resignation as Brexiteers rebel ahead of MP vote TODAY! @theresa_may Why don’t you explain to the 17.4 million British voters WHY it’s your job to betray us all!! You stupid people make us all feel sick! Resign NOW!! 
It's amusing to see people who are apparently incapable of accepting the result of one #referendum trying to tell us that they will genuinely honour the result of a second, regardless of the outcome, if only they can tweak the rules a bit more, honest... #BREXIT @JustineGreening 
Brexit has always been a fantasy based on lies, which will make the poorest worse off.That's why I've been calling for a #PeoplesVote on the final deal, since the 1st day Parliament sat after the 2016 referendum.Back then, people laughed. I'm glad many are now catching up.  
Computer analyses all possible Brexit outcomes and delivers results pic.twitter.com/GlgeQjJhl7 
Thought @PickardJE's 'no deal' #Brexit story about floating diesel generators keeping the lights on in NI was far fetched, because they wouldn't cut us off? Well, Ireland's withdrawing its strategic oil stocks from the UK to cut its 'no deal' risk:  
I thing annoys me more than Brexiters who add the Tory and Labour votes at the 2017 GE and assume they were all voting for Brexit. We were not. @Labour4EU @Remain_Labour 
At least we have got our country back Innit, and the Queen and Duke can make our own Laws innit #brexit #votetory #ukip 
Interesting new Brexit angle - outspoken Leaver Andrea Jenkyns threatened with de facto deselection at the next election by Tory leader on Wakefield council Nadeem Ahmed, who says her "showboating" is "very immature" and damaging.via @DavidSpereall 
Brexit has always been a divide and conquer tactic ... with same team controlling both sides of the narrative. Divide and conquer Civil unrest as one of goals Illusion of choice Rothschilds bankers , Masonic Orders , CFR, round table win every time  
Justine Greening calls for second Brexit referendum  
It’s funny - before the vote a lot of the brexies banged on about how great Swiss/Norway/EEA would be. Now it is Full English Brexit or anything else is TREASON. 
From the person who said that there wasn’t going to be a general election and that there wasn’t a magic money tree. #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal never looked more likely. #FFS 
Etching Irish abortion referendum into history  
 NEW @iealondon paper: To harness the opportunities of #Brexit - including free trade agreements with countries outside the EU - the UK must have regulatory autonomy so it is able to be a credible trading partner.Read it here:  
Until and unless Labour or the Tories win a UK general election on a manifesto to hold another EURef, then there won't be one. The only Brexit referendum will be between No Deal and whatever May cobbles together. It's disaster either way for Scotland. Only Indy can save us. 
The @CONservatives are making a mess of #brexit deliberately to keep the UK in EU, @UKLabour and @Libdems don't really say much because remaining in EU is what they want as well. 17m people got screwed over. #bbcdp 
 I have added my name to a number of amendments to the Taxation (Cross Border Trade) Bill, including an amendment to ensure that there is no customs border down the Irish Sea after Brexit. 
Wow. Author of "The Liberal Case for Leave" has publicly withdrawn his support for Brexit. Refreshing to see straightforward honesty & humility in these crazy times. #PeoplesVote 
Prime Minister inspects new kit for party whips at Farnborough Air Show. #Brexit  
Paris' Eurostar station is set to be rebuilt to cater for additional border checks in the event of Britain leaving the EU according to a report in the independent. Brexit will means lengthy delays and disruption for travellers. Spread the word. 
Excellent & damning thread about the state of truth, & hopeless level of debate which we haven’t managed to escape in 2+ years. A sobering reminder that Remainers didn’t win on facts before. For another referendum to resolve the stalemate, informed debate is critical. But how?  
'Brits voted to LEAVE!' Priti Patel BLASTS May as soft Brexit plan faces FRESH rebellion  
Lonely (?) Remainer view... I don't want a new Brexit referendum. 1) I doubt Remain would win, tho it's certainly possible - but I can't imagine victory would be worth it for the discord sowed and 'betrayal myth' created 1/3 
The public are now backing a No Deal #Brexit. The British people voted to leave the EU and a No Deal Brexit is increasingly looking like the only way to deliver this. #bbcdp 
Lots of English politicians from English parties on Englands BBC #bbcsp discussing what type of Brexit they want. No Scottish, Welsh or NI reps.....again. 
.@Nigel_Farage: “We’ve got the establishment blaming Brexit and the Trump election on Russian collusion without an ounce of evidence.”  
If we do have a final vote on #Brexit, could it be for everyone 16 and over, so those whose lives are most likely to be improved or blighted by the result get a chance to have a say? 
For #journalists everywhere. Could have done with this common sense @rte during #repealedthe8th - but will be critical for #brexit #PeoplesVote 
Theresa May has said there definitely won’t be another referendum. Definitely. Absolutely no chance. So we can all relax. There will be a second referendum. 
Anyone else notice #BrexitWhitePaper has just 1 paragraph, which is 10 lines long, on prospects for new UK services trade deals with countries outside EU after #Brexit ? 
Number 10 on Justine Greening's call for another vote on leaving the EU. PMOS: “The British public have voted to leave the EU, there is not going to be a second referendum under any circumstances.” #Brexit 
Most of the establishment - across parties - don’t believe in the people’s vote for Brexit and arrogantly see it as a problem, not an opportunity. Today in our elected House of Commons I will be supporting an ambitious global Britain vision and so a stronger negotiating position. 
.@AMDWaters on Brexit: No European country will ever be free of the European Union while there is a European Union. We need to face that reality.MORE:  #outsiders 
Please stop deluding yourselves over anymore votes on Brexit. It is happening. And it will be without a deal.Over the coming years the EU and NATO will reshape around one another, and the US and UK will not be allies of either. 
Macedonia Says "Greek businessmen" allied with Russia paid $13,000 to $21,000 to “commit acts of violence” ahead of a crucial referendum on the name deal  via @jlfeder 
.@Nigel_Farage: “We’ve got the establishment blaming Brexit and the Trump election on Russian collusion without an ounce of evidence.”  
 NEW IEA PAPER: Freedom to Flourish sets out an alternative roadmap to the #Brexit White Paper that will deliver regulatory autonomy and unleash the competitive potential of the UK economy!Find out more here:  
Fantastic that @JustineGreening is supporting a public final say on Brexit. The PMs Chequers Agreement is a fudge and the people need to have their say on the Brexit deal, with the option to stay in the EU. Agree? Add your name:  
Justine Greening is right. The final Brexit deal should decided by the British voters.The first EU referendum was a vote on no details. A second EU referendum would be a vote on the actual details. Brexit is too important an issue to deny the British people their democracy.  
PM’s speech at Farnborough Air Show - expands on the shift at Chequers to requiring maintenance of fully frictionless trade with EU after Brexit for Rolls Royce, Airbus etc - “ongoing harmonisation” with EU rules .. remaining “part of” EU agencies such as EASA, ECA, EMA  
We need a Brexiteer at the helm, a believer in #Brexit Britain and the opportunity it presents.Time to submit your letter.  
Brexit will lead to increased taxation to placate the public as a result of the lie on that bus.You’re welcome.  
Looks like a second referendum may well be in play, folks...  
As Brilliant as it would be to see you with a set of pom-poms.... What do you think we've been doing for the past two years. Brexit is the only thing happening in Westminster. Personally I think it's time we got on with fixing the NHS, Housing crisis and North-South inequality.  
May is getting bombarded by both the Remainers and Leavers in her party. Lack of majority means there is nothing she can do that won't lead to constant revolts.She can say there will no second referendum but right now she has no room to manoeuvre - watch this space imo. 
Second referendum is imminent then.  
Second Referendum HERE WE GO! :D  
Tory MP @bernardjenkin on a second vote:  The EU always tries to bully countries into another referendum until the people get the decision right  
POLL: More Brits back No Deal Brexit than May’s EU plan. Full independence must be delivered as promised!  
Here is the reality of #Brexit - an incompetent , internally fractured Tory party by its action & inaction causing real damage to small ( and large) business that is getting worse every day.  Meanwhile a delusional Prime Minster gabbles about a “successful” process  
... there's going to be a referendum next week isn't there  
Because the Brexit campaign spread lies and half the people have resigned leaving the country in a state where the PM has no majority and cannot get a deal with the EU.We want another referendum that isn't based on lies. 
"Growing numbers of people like Justine Greening take the view that we're now deadlocked. There's no way of reconciling the different views other than going back to the public and giving them the final say on Brexit."Add your name if you agree:  
Oh good. So that’ll definitely be a second referendum on Brexit. Excellent. 
You've heard Bannon incite civil warfare, now watch him.....encouraged by Farage, has he gone too far this time? 
Theresa May's spokesman says "there will not be a second referendum under any circumstances". So keep all your Thursdays free for the foreseeable future.  
PM spokesman says there will not be a second referendum “under any circumstances”. There wasn’t going to be a snap election either was there. #JustSaying 
Breaking: Mays office has just said that under no circumstances would there be a second referendum and her deal for #brexit is the only one that will be put forward. So I guess that means that we now know the terms of brexit @NicolaSturgeon - Worse than mays plan or no deal. 
 The UK voted to leave the EU. you can't demand a re-run of a referendum just because you don't like the result. This is exactly the same for those agitating for #IndyRef2. #RespectTheResult 
Re the case for a 2nd referendum in Britain. The original case for one made by Blair et al. was that there would have to be a major shift of public opinion against Brexit.That has not currently happened.  
Photos of Benedict Cumberbatch shooting his Brexit drama  Fail link 
Prime Minister Theresa May's spokesman says there is not going to be a second referendum on Brexit under any circumstances 
And again, I’m accused of being a centrist. I’m not. I criticise Labour’s policy on Brexit from the left. It’s too right wing for me. It’s *because* I care about the NHS etc that I criticise. Brexit makes helping the NHS far, far, far harder. Blocking FoM in particular!  
Preference for...Delaying Brexit beyond next year's deadline if we can't get a good deal by then: 43%Leaving the EU on 29th March without a deal (hard Brexit): 39%via @DeltapollUK, 12 - 14 Jul 
Another little-known member of the government quits in carefully-choreographed #Brexit troublemaking. Presume wants some kind of Canada-style deal with hard Irish border & chaos in Kent, but obviously like other hardliners refusing to clarify vision beyond tendentious cliches  
Anyone researching the political culture of conservatism is gonna have a fun time explaining why it went from "if you raise corp tax 2% or min wage 10p businesses will just leave" to "they prob won't mind if Brexit torches their entire business model" 
It is crucial people read & understand this. It’s what @M_AndersonSF has been flagging for months. Any diminution of rights must be resisted. Our entitlements, our citizenship, the GFA & our expressed democratic opposition to #Brexit must be upheld. @campaignforleo @simoncoveney 
EU rulebook?  ECJ jurisdiction?  Don’t kid yourself, Andrea, that’s not the Brexit we voted for.  It’s not Brexit at all.  
When will politicians realise that the British people voted to leave on 23 June 2016, and that they now expect the Government to get on with it. Justine Greening is wrong to call for a divisive and unwanted second referendum.  
New Brexit Secretary Dominic Raab skips his first day of Brexit talks to attend right-wing think-tank summer drinks  
Very sad, but not surprising given #BrexitShambles. Good time to repeat the FM's message to EU nationals post-referendum: you remain welcome here, Scotland is your home and your contribution is valued."EU net migration falls to lowest level since 2012/13"  
An MP’s life is a constant personal struggle between principle and hope of preferment. The reason @theresa_may’s Brexit plan is so under threat is her MPs see her as a short-dated PM, such that the carrot of preferment & threat of retribution are robbed of their persuasive force 
I'll be speaking about @JustineGreening's idea of a second referendum to end all fudge for good on @bbc5live at 1pm. Guess what I think about the idea of a 2nd ref? Here's a clue; 
I see that another mann nobody has heard of has just resigned: presumably all these Brexit exits are being co-ordinated like a rather low budget firework display on a rainy night 
Scott Mann, MP for North #Cornwall, has resigned as a PPS over #Brexit, citing the views of his constituents.Dear @scottmann4NC, we've been talking to your constituents. Many who voted leave can now see they were lied to and think Brexit is a complete mess.  
I'm withdrawing my support for Brexit. Did not sufficiently account for: the incompetence of UK politics; the madness of Brexiteers; the deep aversion to EEA; NI; Customs; and of course Trump. Not switching to Remain but if we do now remain I'll shrug. /1 
Theresa May Threatens the Nation: 'Accept My Brexit, Or Risk No Brexit At All'  
Greening: I am your new hero.Me: But you used expenses to claim TEN PENCE towards a bus ticket, twice, & voted to take £30 a week from people suffering with Cancer & Parkinson’s, & thought nothing of it.Greening: The brainwashed forget all that stuff, it’s Brexit.Me: *nods* 
It is now clear that Trump is not going to bail Britain out if our economy takes a massive hit from Brexit. We should focus on getting a good deal with the EU.  
People are joining UKIP at this time because of May's betrayal of Brexit.I spent many years supporting UKIP, and I know the fight to stop the Islamic advancement was delayed because of them. #ForBritain 's  leader @AMDWaters will never let you down 
Justine Greening proposes three-option referendum on Brexit: Private Eye was there last week. To read tomorrow's policies today, subscribe:  
Breaking: Another Brexit resignation. Scott Mann, Private Parliamentary Secretary to the Treasury and MP for North Cornwall, says he won’t accept a watered down Brexit. #ToriesInTurmoil #ScottMann 
If the hard-right Brexiteers truly believed the majority of the public wanted a hard Brexit - and all the risk that entails - then they'd agree with Justine Greening on a #PeoplesVote.If not, they are clearly just con artists creating noise to pull off their scam 
BREAKING: @GaryLineker has come out in support of a #PeoplesVote on the final #Brexit deal. See his tweet below.Join Gary in your support for the campaign by signing our People's Vote petition at . Please retweet to help us spread the word! 
"A second EU referendum wouldn't be more democratic. It would be the political equivalent of double jeopardy. Just as the state shouldn’t be allowed to try the same person over and over, nor should politicians be able to endlessly re-run democratic votes"  
Look at the people who oppose #Brexit and tell me you want to live in Britain side by side with them. The EU Referendum pretty much singled out everyone who wants Britain to become part of the hideous EU project that is turning Europe into a liberal shithole. 
The Conservative party has plenty of MPs with backbone and principle who care more about democracy and honouring a referendum vote than their position and pay. Well done Scott   
May hit by another PPS resignation as Tory MP says he won't accept 'watered down Brexit' - Politics live  
"I very much hope that science gets a really good deal out of the negotiations." - Our President Venki Ramakrishnan speaks to @guardian on how Brexit might affect the sciences  
I'm not going to accept calls for another referendum from people who clearly don't respect the result of the previous one. #PeoplesVote #Brexit 
Lots of people you’ve never heard of resigning from posts you never knew they held. #their #Brexit  
Another resignation over Fake Brexit.  
Engineer? Designer? UX? Data scientist? Journalist? PR? Social Media Influencer? Hate Brexit? Join us! The Great British Hack-Off summer festival hackathon will aim at Brexit - July 21-22, London  #GBhackoff by @TechForUK & @BestForBritain #FBPE Pls RT! 
"Justine Greening"Pretty much every politician from every party appears in an interview and states 'We respect the result of the Referendum' than immediately goes away and tries to find a way to scupper it. #Brexit 
Justine Greening: "In a second referendum we vote for a soft Brexit, a hard Brexit or to remain in the EU." Julia Hartley-Brewer: "We've already voted to leave. Why add remain again?" Watch again ▼@JuliaHB1 | @justineGreening |  
May hit by another PPS resignation as Tory MP says he won't accept 'watered down Brexit' - Politics live  
It seems Labour & Corbyn don’t understand the effects of Brexit or even the Brexit strategy they advocate. Brexit WILL lead to less jobs. BrexIt WILL hurt the job prospects for the young. Brexit WILL lead to fewer skilled jobs in the economy. It seems Corbyn’s all rhetoric  
Daley correct:There would be no going back from May's Orwellian Soft-Remain (non)-Brexit 'deal'.>>Which is why she's so determined to impose it, whatever the cost to herself, her party, her country, and democracy itself. 
This Tory Govt is so divided that it cannot deliver a coherent Brexit deal. Labour has a well thought out & workable Brexit solution. Tories should call a General Election now & let the people choose what happens next. #GE2018Now 
Davis's plan relies on asking the EU to reconfigure itself to suit what he wants.  That's not negotiable.The fact is that many leave campaigners thought Brexit would be a fatal blow to the EU that would force them to roll over in negotiations.  That has failed. 
GONE: Tory PPS @scottmann4NC resigns over May's 'watered down Brexit'.'I fear elements of the Brexit white paper will put me in direct conflict with views expressed by a large section of my constituents.' 
"The only way we can find a path forward is to go back to the British people."WATCH: Justine Greening on Sky News this morning explaining why she's backing a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal. Please RT:  
Tories threaten to defund Andrea Jenkyns because her constituents views don't match Tory policy. Osbourne threatened to punish us if we voted the wrong way. May says we won't get Brexit if we don't back her traitorous plan. The Tories have become modwtn day fascists. 
I'll try again. Can a Hard Brexiteer please explain what their strategy is for Brexit, and how they propose getting it through the House of Commons. 
It’s not another referendum which is needed it’s another government, one which delivers on its promises. 
The Tory hard Brexit rebels' 'resignation-a-day' briefing was a lot more exciting when it wasn't clear they are all PPSes 
Tory MP Scott Mann has resigned as a Parliamentary Private Secretary at the Treasury over the Prime Minister's Brexit plans. 
The Royal College of Midwives says that the staffing crisis in the NHS is being made worse by Brexit, as new research reveals that 4,500 EU nurses are set to quit by 2022. This means longer waiting times and patients at risk. Please share  
If a brown Muslim foreign man did this he'd be banned from the UK. If a British Muslim had done it they'd be on a terrorism watchlist or prosecuted.@nazirafzal#SteveBannon Calls for Brexit Supporters to Take Up Arms & Fight to Take Back the U.K. 
BREAKING: Another government aide resigns over Brexit policy. Scott Mann is MP for North Cornwall and was a Treasury PPS  
Putin is masterful. Russia’s economy is smaller than Texas. No real military might. He set up the UK and US, via Brexit and Trump, to trigger their own destruction from within.Stop being reactive to Trump ... Follow the money laundering. Trump in debt to Putin.#TreasonSummit 
@mrjamesob  as the person that launched the people’s vote at the march in London a few weeks ago -it’s essential there is a vote to remain - we won’t have a “deal “we have run out of time - regardless of what amendments the brexit MPs get ! No deal is a catastrophe innthe making 
So some MP’s now calling for a 2nd  referendum because they can’t agree on a Brexit plan. The people of this country made their decision. It’s not their fault we have a supplicant, indecisive weasel of PM who has destroyed trust in democracy and trashed the Tory Party. 
UK parliament vote to reveal extent of anger over May's Brexit plan  
What do you want more? #GE2018Now#PeoplesVote What would the second referendum ask? 
This is a major intervention from @JustineGreening. Yet another blow for @Theresa_may's #ChequersPlan, which in Justine's words is "the worst of both worlds." We must have a #PeoplesVote to end the deadlock of May's failing Brexit strategy  @peoplesvote_uk 
A final decision on #Brexit should be taken away from politicians and put "back into the hands of the public"Conservative MP @JustineGreening calls for second referendum  
Here's my Guardian piece on the threat to people's rights in the north of Ireland when Brexit arrives, available in full online  
What needs to happen,May and her Remainer agenda thrown in the trash bin.A solid pro Brexit PM elected and a No Deal put to the EU in unambiguous terms.Sit back and watch what happens. 
James Joyce, an Irish cittizen, was hanged for two words - Germany calling.Theresa May, a British Citizen won´t be hanged for her three words - brexit means brexit even though it is has been a mass deception and betrayal of Britain and her people. Good eh! 
The irony of people who don't respect referenda, calling for additional referenda. #Brexit  
Due to popular demand I am providing the link to the 'Road to Brexit' based on the all day experts seminars we held on October 16 2016.  
.@Citi and .@BlackRock have decided to move their operations elsewhere amid economic uncertainty in the UK. Unfortunately, this will happen many more times before and after Brexit, and the PM’s plan does nothing for financial services which are being sacrificed in negotiations. 
Because Brexit is a disaster and you know it.If you Brexiters weren’t so stubborn, you’d humbly accept the opportunity for the nation to climb out of the hole that you have all dug for it. The history books will be kinder to you all if you do.  
The whole remainer political establishment has created this pigs breakfast on Brexit. The instruction was clear and they’ve contrived to screw it up. I’m afraid it will transform people’s view of our democracy and all the parties forever.  
Waiting for someone to explain to me how legislation for a second Brexit referendum can be passed in time for a referendum to be held before March 2019. Because that’s your first - of many - hurdles. 
CAJ letter warns that Residents in north risk losing citizenship rights linked to GFA under draft BREXIT policiesThese include:access to the EU Health Insurance Card;access to EU student fee;the right to vote for MEPs DUP preventing you getting EU preferential treatment  
The population of the EU is about 512 million people. The number of people who voted for Brexit, about 17 million.So 3% of the population of the EU want the entire club to rewrite its rules on freedom of movement just for them.Enough! Why is this conversation still going on?  
There's no point in voting on 2 options the EU does not accept. The real referendum was abt 2 straightforward options-stay in on current terms or leave. The EU agreed to both under their Treaty. We voted to leave & were told  by Parliament & Govt voters were making the decision. 
Former UK minister calls for second vote on Brexit to end stalemate  
#LBC Bloody James cry baby   I hate Brexit O’ Brien on now.         Brexit bashing 3 hours everyday 5 days a week. Don’t you ever talk about anything else you idiot. Talks to himself in his sleep  I hate Brexit every night. Change the record you bore FFS.  
The latest call for a referendum between leave, the White Paper terms & Remain is a non starter. We made our decision in the original referendum & need to get on with implementing it. The EU will not accept the Govt's opening bid in the White Paper so it is not a real  option. 
'It's time to accept we remainers lost referendum' Couldn’t disagree more strongly with @ThangamMPParliament is grid-locked with no majority for any optionWhen deal with EU becomes clear we should have #PeoplesVote between that and staying in the EU 
All those anti-democrats propounding a 2nd referendum - be careful what you wish for.  
This is your Monday 16th of July reminder that both Leave campaigns deliberately broke the law to win the Brexit referendum including possibly treasonThis means@BorisJohnson@michaelgove@Arron_banksBroke the law, should be in jail#VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw#VoteLeaveCheated 
Since 1973 there have been eleven referendums held in the UK.  The EU Referendum 2016 was the first one not to have any decision criterion.  It was the first referendum enacted by Parliament purely as an opinion poll to inform debate in the House 
Ex-Minister: Brexit Dept Is ‘Potemkin Structure’, ‘Establishment Elite Working to Overturn EU Referendum’   
May’s #Chequers Deal is not only terrible for #Britain but clearly unpopular with voters. Commons goes into recess this week until September. Tory MPs must act fast to ensure we get a proper #Brexit or face defeat at next GE  
Today's the day when the far-right Brexiters have to choose whether to vote down Theresa May's Customs Bill. I'm betting it's the day when we find out Jacob Rees-Mogg is nothing more than a double-breasted suit full of hot air. #WestminsterHour #Brexit  pic.twitter.com/ty5VRo2RIk 
May is promoting the Chequers Agreement as if it were the Brexit deal. It isn't and won't be. Not just because it infuriates Brexiteers but mainly because it is unacceptable to the EU27. The Tories are bald men fighting over a comb. 
Problem with JG’s three-choice referendum — one among many — is choice (c) ‘Remain in EU on current terms’ isn’t available. EU’s price for suspending A50 would, at a bare minimum, be giving up our vetos.  
TOP QC RIPS MAY'S DEAL TO RIBBONS. Says May has sold out Britain, enslaves us to EU, all for their benefit not ours!  @Theresa_May how could you?@borisjohnson #boris johnson  #borisjohnson #Brexit 
More Tory rebellions. Justine Greening recognises the Chequers Agreement for what it is: a fudge. If you want the final say on this chaotic Brexit, with the option to remain in the EU, add your name:  
Lots of talk of a second Brexit referendum but not a word about the vastly more important second Scottish independence referendum. 
Justine Greening calls for new Brexit referendum.The PM’s proposed deal is a “fudge”, says former Education Secretary.Let the public break the deadlock - hold a #PeoplesVote with an #OptionToRemain. 
Dominic Grieve has penned an article for the Evening Standard in which he joins Greening in calling for a referendum on the final Brexit deal, I've been told. Expect his language to be slightly more careful and ambiguous, though. 
IEA: Brexit Britain needs regulatory autonomy to seize economic potential.“Chequers deal as it is would prevent the UK creating its own regulation and signing advanced trade deals. It would badly hinder economic growth.” 
Jacob Rees-Mogg tells Julia Hartley-Brewer a no-deal Brexit is 'nothing to be fearful of' and may be a better option than a deal MPs don't support. Read more ▼  
For anyone following the tangled tale of Russian collusion with the Trump and Brexit campaigns this is a compelling read.   
High profile MPs are joining the hundreds of thousands of voters in demanding a #PeoplesVote as it becomes more apparent that the Government's Brexit deal satisfies nobody: 
So we should have a referendum every week?  Every month?  Every year? At least have the decency to allow the results of the last one to be enacted. We had to wait 41 years to be asked a second time.  You can wait until 2057 for another referendum. 
Didn’t even know there was a Minister for Sexting — let alone that @SebastianEPayne held the post before quitting because UK will keep EU sexting rules after Brexit.  
Bannon calls for Brexit supporters to take up arms and fight to take back the U.K.  
"Another referendum would be disastrous"; "Ignoring the 2016 referendum would be disastrous". These are fair points. But I can only take them seriously from people who recognise that *keeping on sailing for the rocks will be disastrous* too. We must find *some* way out. 
Why Tories are tempted by Justine Greening’s second referendum, by Robert Peston:  
Totally agree Daniel! I hate it when people don't listen to referendum results  
Early days but if we weight this vote to the referendum proportions (48:52) then 57% of people currently want second referendum to 43% against.(And yes before anyone tries to troll me, I know this isn't statistically representative, it's just a wee fun news poll)  
Nicola has been right all along. Let the disaster of #Brexit become known to everyone in #Scotland then offer the option of a prosperous future in our own independent country.  Latest Panelbase Poll shows 54% support for Scottish Independence #indyref2 
Justine Greening endorses second Brexit referendum  
Expecting a post-Brexit tax haven a la Mogg: “Huge jump in number of super-rich immigrants applying for UK investor visas - The Independent  
Theresa May's Brexit has always been about appeasing the Tory party.Nothing to do what is best for the country........  
Amid claims of Tory MPs plotting against the PM on Whatsapp, the former Brexit secretary @DavidDavisMP - whose resignation heaped pressure on @theresa_may - had this to say  
Justine Greening calls for second Brexit referendum - BBC News  
May’s Brexit plan at risk as top Tory calls for second referendum  
see so many posts from old farts complaining about ‘millennials’. here’s the thing, you lot gave us trump and brexit. we hate you lot more than you hate us. 
Britains in invidious position of being walked down road by vocal minority that’ll isolate them frm allies&establishd trading partners That’ll destroy its GDPThat could break up UK&reignite NIBut if they go back they think they look weak  All while being bullied by US #brexit 
We've had two votes now - a referendum and a general election, where 80% backed pro Brexit political parties. Even Labour committed to a #CleanBrexit by taking Britain out of the single market. You want another re-match with the British public? 
Better if Greening got behind the referendum result & started supporting the democratic will of the people. Her ridiculous suggestion of a second referendum is simply a ruse to try and split the vote with three options, thus ensuring we don't leave. We're not stupid Greening. 
Are you deaf or blind?  They want what was promised umpteen times. Out of single market,customs union and end of ECJ. Full brexit no ifs, buts or halfway house! 
Don't remember your EUsceptic lot ever accepting UK 1975 EEC Referendum result won on a much larger majority and a franchise which didn't impact so badly on so many disenfranchised people as there weren't so many Brits in EU or EU cits in UK or Commonwealth citizen voters in UK. 
Theresa May hit by her eighth resignation over Brexit plans in nine days, as ministerial aide who took over David Cameron's seat quits  
Why would anyone expect the losing side in a "2nd referendum" to respect the result any more than the losing side did in the 2016 referendum? 
pendulum is starting to swing - more and more people are realising that #Brexit will have disastrous consequences for the UK and hardly surprising to see Justine Greening coming out this morning saying that the people should have the final say @peoplesvote_uk 
Why should we listen to calls for another referendum from people who, by definition, don’t accept referendum results? 
The only thing in the national interest is to Stop Brexit. This undeniable truth is recognised by all but the headbanger Brexiters whose own personal interests take precedence by far over the nation’s interests. 
Why do establishment  Remainers find it so hard to grasp that, while there is no majority for Theresa May's Dog's Brexit, the default in a second referendum will be a hard Brexit (and never, ever the no exit option?)  via @FT 
Today's Twitter poll: The papers are front paging @JustineGreening proposing a 2nd EU referendum with 3 options.In (ie remain), out (leave, clean break) or shake it all about (leave with compromise deal). Do u support that idea?(% in each option not total split's what counts) 
Important thread from @davidallengreen and discussion with @GuitarMoog. Many difficulties with REF2, but perhaps not insurmountable. Of course all Brexit scenarios now have severe difficulties. REF2 perhaps the worst option except for all the others.  
Probably the most ashamed of two of my "fellow countrymen" than I have ever been. Watch them plot with the EU to subvert, corrupt and overturn Brexit. Stars A C Grayling and a "British" MEP.  
The view from here ...(Life’s quite pleasant when you live in a Brexit-free Trump-free argy-bargie-free zone)  
David Davis slams May’s Brexit plan  
Coming up on @bbc5live to talk about the push for a 2nd referendum. Can't believe that 2 years on I'm still having to defend the largest democratic mandate in British history. 
Greening asking for second bloody referendum. When will these idiot's realise we have voted the result was out, Leave means Leave. These politicians should be ousted from their constituencies whatever they voted. MPs ignoring Democracy it's an absolute disgrace too Politics. 
The @peoplesvote_uk campaign is growing by the day. Sign the petition to stop the farce and give the people a vote on the Brexit deal.  
What Robbins has done with Brexit is a well established civil service operation that I’ve seen them use before very effectively when there is a risk of them not achieving their agenda. It is the sort of action a skilled general would use in war. Not even covered in Yes Minister.  
Justine Greening who has called for a second referendum on the EU should be investigated by police for her disgraceful corrupting of children with her disgusting compulsory sex education for minors as Education Secretary. The woman has no shame and should be barred from politics. 
Andrew Marr: "It’s Fake sovereignty, it’s NOT real sovereignty!In theory, we can go to Brussels and say ‘do you mind if we change these rules’.In practice, once the common rulebook is in place, we can’t, not in the real world."#Brexit #Leave #EU 
Excellent. Brexit becomes ever more impossible & its collapse ever more inevitable  
And you will respect the result of another referendum? I find that hard to believe when you haven't respected the result of the last one. Fool me once..... 
Justine #Greening is right that the #Chequers Agreement is unacceptable but wrong about a 2nd #referendum. The country voted for an In / Out #EURef in 2015, and it was held in 2016. By telling the people to vote again, on different terms, it will seem like an #EliteStitchUp. 
Theresa May: "#Brexit means, well staying in the #EU" 
Brexit won by a 3.8% margin, with every single Leave campaigner promising that we would get a *better* deal with the EU. Do you think that would have been the case if "no deal" was what was on offer?Side note: Are the opposition "ruled out" forever when they lose an election?  
Older people who voted for Brexit - and were promised their homes would rise in value by the Daily Express etc - are having a rude awakening  
This feels very significant. A senior Conservative MP, who was very recently a Cabinet Minister, backs a People's Vote on the Brexit deal. Our campaign has real momentum.  
Have read entire #BrexitWhitePaper. Too complex & wd leave us half in half out. Plus a chilling list of things that need sorting. Clear proof that there is no good form of #Brexit. @JustineGreening correct: vital to have a public vote before March 2019 with option to stay in. 
It's amusing to see people who are apparently incapable of accepting the result of one referendum trying to tell us that they will genuinely honour the result of a second, regardless of the outcome, if only they can tweak the rules a bit more, honest... 
It's been obvious for a while but can we now assume the Free Tommy campaign is being funded & promoted as part of the global Project Chaos which also brought us Trump & Brexit?  
Jacob Rees-Mogg repeated yet again how Brexit is "enormously positive, a huge opportunity for the country” . Could we please have some evidence for this against all the professional evidence and his own financial dealings to the contrary? 
More ladybird #brexit books to read to your kids at bedtime  
So: Deliberately create political instability by creating a proposal that no one, not even the EU, will accept. Support calls for a second referendum as the only way to break the gridlock, but make sure you split the Leave vote by offering two leave options and one remain option! 
Theresa May Threatens the Nation: ‘Accept My Brexit, Or Risk No Brexit At All’   
Tory Eurosceptic rebels set up whipping operation to thwart May's Brexit plan | May hit by eighth resignation in nine days | David Davis slams May's Brexit plan | May tells Brexiteers to wake up and accept a soft Brexit  
Can we have an 'Advisory Referendum' to suggest people we'd like to send into space? I have suggestions (see below) #spaceport 
OK, I've asked this a few times, with no response. And it's a genuine question. Can any Hard Brexiteer tell me how they propose to get their preferred Brexit through the Commons. Seriously. Not just "May has to go!" or "No betrayal!" responses. A genuine plan. 
Leaving aside the "Hard Brexit" tosh, a) there's no majority for the cancellation of Brexit you want, nor b) for the Chequers fudge, c) I think a sensible resolution on the basis of what was proposed in the Conservative manifesto could carry sufficient support 
Bernard Jenkin on BBC R4 Today this morning claiming, yet again, that WTO terms would be "a sensible framework" for UK after Brexit. It would not - it would be hugely disadvantageous. Here is why  @bernardjenkin 
POLLDo you prefer to:A. distance Britain from EU, and take a huge economic hitB. stay close, but have to follow EU rules without having a say on them. C. cancel Brexit, now we’ve looked at the alternatives 
Ironic that people who dishonoured one referendum are clamouring for a second one. #democracy 
PRESS RELEASE: IEA sets out alternative Brexit #WhitePaper that could boost GDP by more than 7 per cent in 15 years 
"How Brexit Is becoming a political disaster for Britain"  
Former education secretary @JustineGreening says a public vote is the only way to break the #Brexit impasseFollow live updates from the Brexit fallout here:  
I think May chose not to appoint JRM to her Cabinet because he would have exposed her #Brexit treachery at an earlier stage.Any final deal reached with the EU will be all the poorer, given the absence of direct input into it by the Brexit hero Rees-Mogg  
Over two years of platitudes later, we have reached a stalemate where some kind of Brexit for the sake of any kind of Brexit, no matter the consequences, is what Parliament may be faced with.A #PeoplesVote, & properly informed debate, now the only plausible option on the table. 
The Tories held the #Brexit referendum to resolve a Tory dispute & now want to ignore that result & hold a 2nd referendum to stop their party falling apart.The country is not here for the convenience of the Tory party.It is time for a General Election. 
Jacob Rees-Mogg on a second referendum: “Voting until you get the result the establishment wants is not particularly democratic”@JuliaHB1 | @Jacob_Rees_Mogg 
Have I got this right? £2 billion carrot dangled to Airbus. Mrs May's government does an "AC Grayling" and asks Airbus to say they are leaving the UK to panic the Brexit public, which they do. Britain awards £2bn to US. Airbus cross. LOL!  via @telebusiness 
RETWEET if you think the government's Brexit White Paper needs serious changes  
Right on time - Just as Theresa May betrays Brexit, Justine Greening calls for a second referendum.If you gave the Tories the benefit of the doubt and have seen your trust betrayed, you're welcome to join @UKIP. We will fight for a true #Brexit 
I'm not convinced about a second referendum, and particularly Greening's referendum. Say you end up with 40% Remain, 30% May's deal, 30% no deal. Remain wins with 60% wanting Leave, which is a mess. 
Could not disagree more with @JustineGreening in her calls for second referendum to settle #Brexit She really needs to respect the wishes of all citizens not just the liberal elites of London @SkyNews 
Hey @JustineGreening - you ran on a manifesto that promised to deliver Brexit. It's Conservative party policy to leave the EU. If you don't like it, perhaps consider joining the @LibDems ? 
#Remoaners are morons but @JustineGreening is pondlife.After spending 2years saying that people are too stupid to vote on a simple question,she wants them to vote on a more complex one.& if she thinks this 2nd referendum wouldn’t be still more divisive she’s away with the pixies  
Today MP Justine Greening, calls for a 2nd referendum, but not a straight yes or no. She wants 3 questions answered plus 1st & 2nd preference, just in case she needs to confuse the electorate even more. Another remainer ploy to undo the will of the people. It won't work. 
Justine Greening calls for second Brexit referendum -  
‘Brexit is much bigger than our poll ratings. It is about the UK’s place in the world & securing a deal with the EU in our national interest...a deal designed only to kill off UKIP will be a very bad deal for the UK’s future prosperity.’ Me for @ConHome 
There really are Conservatives who think tax haven UK is what Brexit is all about.  via @richardjmurphy 
If the UK pursues a path of harmonisation with the EU, it will hobble its economy and prevent the British people achieving the great opportunity that Brexit represents, warns @RadoTylecote @iealondon 
"Parliament is at stalemate...it's time to go back to the people."MP Justine Greening wants a second vote on #Brexit with three options:No dealThe Prime Minister's Brexit dealStay in the EU#5liveBreakfast 
BLOCK: Conservative MP Justine Greening calls for second referendum. Make no mistake about it: the establishment are still doing all they can to stop Brexit completely.  
So the DUP want written into law that NI will not be treated differently post Brexit?? Does that mean SSM is coming? Or abortion rights? Or is this an attempt by the DUP to impose a hard border in Ireland @SorchaEastwood @naomi_long  ?? 
The overwhelming majority in this clip clearly don't even recognise the #Chequers plan as being #Brexit at all... "We voted to leave so we should leave". The PM is in a difficult position but first priority should be to fulfill that promise from the referendum and our manifesto!  
As of this Thursday, the House of Commons shuts down for 6 weeks after which the Government will be consumed by its own Party  Conference that begins at the end of September. It then has a few weeks in which to agree a Brexit deal with the EU27.  Best of luck. #BrexitShambles 
Tory MP Robert Halfon tells Julia: “We’ve heard of fake news... A second referendum would be a fake referendum. It would be almost like becoming a banana republic” @JuliaHB1 | @halfon4harlowMP 
“A hopeless way to negotiate” by a “Remainer who has remained a Remainer”Watch Jacob Rees-Mogg’s devastating diagnosis of what lies at the heart of Theresa May’s disastrous approach to Brexit negotiations.  
We refuse to lie down and let our progressive values, our living standards and our options in life be run over by a big red Brexit bus that doesn't even seem to have a driver! 
Instead. Let's have a general election. A real people's vote. Your disasterous party has had 8 yrs in government & 2 yrs to sort Brexit. Time to move over & let LAB have ago......  
I fight Brexit so my children and my children's children can enjoy what I have enjoyed for many years.  #StopBrexit #FBPE #PeoplesVote 
A furious MP said: “Theresa May had the chance to be the Prime Minister who delivered #Brexit. Now she’s the Prime Minister who f***** it up.” #MayMustGo#ChequersMeansCorbyn#KeepMayGetCorbyn 
Since Justin Greening has put a 3-option referendum on the agenda, time for this again: a reminder of why there's no way to guarantee a stable outcome:   
Tony Blair: The problem is [a Clean Break Brexit] vision was sold as short term painless and with substantial immediate gains like extra money for the NHS. What has now become apparent is that this was a false prospectus. Read and share:  
Remarkable how the No Deal Brexiters like Bernard Jenkin are happy to put us in the hands of the entirely unelected (unlike EU) World Trade Organisation but don't think that would make us a 'vassal state'. #r4today #Brexit 
The choice remains, full political freedom with borders and likely economic hit, a member of the EU, which we know about, and a Norway style relationship where we are outside political framework but in the economic one. We can't have a referendum until we have this debate 9/ ends 
Former UK minister calls for second vote on Brexit to end stalemate  
Spot on from Justine Greening. Parliament is gridlocked and we need the people to decide whether they want Mrs May’s botched Brexit - or whether they would rather now stay in the EU. #PeoplesVote 
Dutch "direct-democracy" group @geenpeil, which organized the anti-Ukraine referendum in 2016, lost 59% of its followers in Twitter's purge of fake accounts. The voice of the people  
DAVID DAVIS, FORMER BREXIT SECRETARY,is expected to make a damning resignation speech this afternoon.Theresa the Treasonous Appeaserwill receive considerable flak from his vitriolic broadside!She will deserve every syllable! 
Justine Greening saying Parliament is unable to take Brexit forward. This is because a majority of its members fraudulently represented to the electorate that they supported Brexit when they didn't. This was a coup by the political class against the electorate. 
Yet again @BBCr4today fail to challenge the blatant lies of the egregious Bernard Jenkin. No the referendum was not based on a record turnout. 
Lack of immigration since Brexit has already caused the UK economy to collapse by £1bn - it is forecast to fall by a further £12bn! The forecasts are by the Office for Budget Responsibility! This is an utter disaster for the UK. Immigration has always been a net benefit #r4today 
Against this backdrop it's hard to see a referendum helping do anything other than divide further. First we'd need some honesty and leadership about the real choices, which is unlikely to come from the PM or the leader of the opposition 8/ 
So do about 600 members of the House of Commons. I suspect that Brexit itself is now dead  
More rubbish from Bernard Jenkin in @BBCr4today. We did not have a referendum because parliament was stalemate. Only about 160 out of 650 MPs voted to Leave 
For me it says a lot about a news source if they call it a "second referendum".For me it means they're either trying to paint it as a mere repeat of the 2016 referendum, or they genuinely believe nothing has changed since (deal/no deal/#TurdBrexit), or they're verbally careless. 
MPs should be careful in todays Brexit white paper vote, if they vote for Mays white paper they will be voting against what the people voted for in the referendum, this could cost them their seat in a general election. 
Theresa May moves to see off Brexit threat to Britain’s aerospace industry with funding boost. Found another money tree Teresa? Got one for Rolls Royce too? And Nissan?  via @PoliticsHome 
Theresa May’s Brexit deal doesn’t satisfy anyone and it will not survive. So it’s time to accept - as many key figures acros the EU already do - that the Article 50 timetable must be extended. My latest @FT column: 
Since the referendum we've seen several attempts by the political elite to stop Brexit/stay in the EU by the back do/re-run the referendum.Could it be because Brexit is about disempowering politicians/bureaucrats and giving ordinary citizens more control? #Democracy 
‘We need to have a proper Brexiteer prime minister who puts in place a proper offer to the European Union’@Nigel_Farage talks #Brexit with @GMB 
There have been many outstanding reports about Brexit in the media, but the dominant media narrative has been one of clashing personalities, each equipped with their own facts, rather than trying to help establish a single truth 5/ 
You'd have to be brain dead not to see this as choreographed manipulation of the voters. Democracy is dead.Greening calls for second Brexit referendum  
People often say that no one cares what grassroots members are thinking. We may be a relatively small Association, but our views have been heard. Let us all make the positive case for Brexit and the many opportunities that it brings.  
Both sides have continued from the referendum in seeing the UK as equal to the EU, like we can have whatever we want. The group in the middle who always wanted to leave to join the EEA, were at least mostly honest in seeking a compromise approach 4/ 
A second referendum is the one thing that can potentially deliver the country from all of this mess. No other solution can work. It would reset the 'will of the people' argument completely. That's why brexiteers hate the idea more than anything. 
Look, if you don’t yet understand why Trump is attacking NATO, or why Brexit is strategically important to Russia, or that we have all just been through a hybrid war, just, for your own sake, read this book. What you do afterwards is up to you. But you need to know.  
Again, what's fascinating is the way Kamikaze Brexiteers can't see the trap they're falling into. Once 2'nd referendum starts getting traction, their line is going to have to be "No, we can't trust the British people to make up their own minds on the deal. We'll do it for them". 
As a former cabinet minister, Justine Greening's backing is very significant. There's nothing inevitable about Brexit. Politicians and activists from all parties now support a #PeoplesVote. 
.@VinceCable on @Sky_SunriseUK growing numbers of people like Justine Greening acknowledging we’re now deadlocked over Brexit - which is why there is increasing support for the people to have the final say on any Brexit deal 
Theresa May has an “insoluble problem” that Heseltine hopes “will lead to the collapse of Brexit.”  
There is no Commons majority for any form of Brexit. So that means either Train-crash “no deal” Brexit or indefinite extension of negotiations (half in, half out). Or just maybe - no Brexit at all 
Donald Trump tells @piersmorgan he discussed Brexit with The Queen and thinks she is a "beautiful" woman during an interview onboard Air Force One  
"CLOWNS TO THE LEFT OF ME, JOKERS TO THE RIGHT" - The forgotten #Brexit menace of the EU Parliament.  Read what they said about the Olly Robbins 'Wet Remain' White Paper:  
Justine Greening say other senior Tories back her call for a second referendum @BBCr4today 
#Brexit creates the kind of turmoil in which extreme views can flourish. Do you want: (Please RT 4 better stats). 
#R4Today Justine Greening saying give the decision to the people. And if the we “get it wrong” again? Parliament gonna start listening and implementing like they are now? Of course not.She’s condescending but transparent. Only interested in getting Brexit overturned & remaining 
There you go. Justine Greening finally lets the cat out of the bag. "I would vote Remain" she says. Remember the line that was peddled. "We're not trying to stop Brexit". They were. They are. And ironically, thanks to the Kamikaze Brexiteers, they may well do. 
Justine Greening does realise that the Prime Minister’s Chequers Plan isn’t the final deal and needs to be negotiated, right? There isn’t time to hold another referendum and how does, if it’s a vote for No Deal, secure support from a pro-EU parliament? #r4today 
Justine Greening shows support for second Brexit referendum  
Have to say Justine Greening has changed her tune on the PM's Brexit plan. She went on Pienaar's Politics last Sunday saying MPs should unite behind it. 
The Brexit people voted for in 2016 has been changed by the politicians.We support a #PeoplesVote on whatever they come up with this year.We don't think people should be silenced while politicians screw up our futures, because we believe in democracy. Do you? 
Just overheard: "Brexit is like watching your library being burnt down by people who never learned to read". #BBCbreakfast #gmb 
EVEN IFBrexiters hadn’t misled voterselectoral rules hadn’t been brokenRussia hadn’t interfereddodgy data hadn’t been usedthe UK had prepared for Brexitthe EU offered a great dealTrump is enough of a game changer to rethink leaving the EU and chaining ourselves to the US. 
David Mundell MP (Secretary of State for Scotland):  "To reveal the truth about impact studies on the effect of Brexit on Scotland's economy would risk causing a second independence referendum".What does that tell you?  
You should never mistake Twitter’s views for what the wider public think. Twitter never sees thinks like President Trump & Brexit coming because it’s too busy howling self-righteously.  
Enough is enough!.@Theresa_May’s coalition of chaos has done so much damage. “Former education secretary Justine Greening has dealt a blow to Theresa May’s efforts to win support for her Brexit plan, saying it offered the “worst of both worlds”...” 
. @BorisJohnson in rallying cry after Brexit: 'It's time to believe in our Great Britain'  
Anyone else getting a real ,tangible sense, that Brexit will go to a #Peoplesvote  ?Justine Greening is absolutely right!#Peoplesvote is the only democratic and just solution to this Tory bunfight that is crippling the UK.Start campaigning now. Stay positive. 
Theresa May’s hopes of winning support for her Brexit compromise have been dealt a huge blow as Justine Greening has become the first senior Conservative to support calls for a second referendum  
So how about this Jeremy.  Still want Brexit #StopBrexit #FBPE #PeoplesVote 
Justine Greening arguing there is a deadlock in Parliament. No, it's simply MPs reneging on their manifestos and promises to abide by the result of the referendum. #GMB 
Well said ⁦@JustineGreening⁩ Politicians have fluffed Brexit, the final decision should be with the people Option to stay in the EU has to be on the table #peoplesvote ⁦@BestForBritain⁩ #optiontostay #NoBrexit 
Post Chequers, post Trump visit, the Remainers are mobilising.  A people’s vote on three options: clean break, soft or stay with the EU #Greening #Brexit 
No matter whether he’s right or wrong on Brexit I despise Michael Hestletine he announced in 1992 the closure of 31 coal mines in one day with no decent jobs to replace them & devastated the villages and towns built around them that are still suffering today...NEVER FORGET  
How are we going to win a #peoplesvote and what will we do in a Britain without #Brexit? We need a positive vision. We need to offer real change. Join us at The Great Northern Stop Brexit Conference where an array of top speakers will share their ideas.  
Key aspects of the government's White Paper must be changed - or else it's a Remain Brexit that nobody voted for.  
Utterly brilliant story of how the BBC, and journalists in general, have failed in their duty to hold the shysters to account.That's why we have journalists. Too many of them have forgotten integrity during brexit, particularly those at The Telegraph. 
The num of nurses & midwives working in the NHS from the EU will be slashed after Brexit. Replacements will not be ready for many yrs.Vacancies will soar & capabilities of the NHS will be drastically affected. Those who voted leave to save the NHS have done the opposite! #r4today 
Let’s end this process where is started: with the people. Welcome @JustineGreening call for a final say on the Brexit deal  
Another Tory can't support Theresa May's "Brexit fudge"...... "The worst of both worlds." Brexit is the Tory parties Kryptonite. It is killing the Tory party.At least that is one positive of Brexit eh....... 
News Daily: Trump-Putin summit and Greening Brexit attack  
THERESA MAYThe Prime Minister has emerged as a chronically secretive & devious politician. Her "soft" Brexit deal is a sham. She has trashed the Conservatives' fragile poll lead as staunch supporters storm off in disgust & MPs in marginal seats are prepare for early retirement.  
Excellent development - Justine Greening adds support to the campaign for a #Peoplesvote, saying: “only solution is to take the final #Brexit decision out of the hands of deadlocked politicians”  
My FT column in which I argue that the EU has no interest in a Brexit reversal.  
You’ve already compromised our national interest by failing to prepare for “no deal” and by making concession after concession to the EU with nothing to show for it.  You should stand down in favour of someone who believes in Brexit and who will fight for Britain.  
Wow! Look! Carole politely reminds us how we were the test run for the presidential campaign. I will not respect the #Brexit referendum vote result based on clear evidence of meddling, manipulation, cheating & breaking the law. I will not be a traitor to my country. #PeoplesVote 
Welcome @JustineGreening to @peoplesvote_uk You join a growing band of #Conservatives @sarahwollaston @DrPhillipLeeMP You’re right “Give the British people the final decision on Brexit”  
May’s Brexit position will crumble so Article 50 should be delayed  
Ireland set to remove oil reserves from Britain as Brexit deadline looms closer  
There is no "Brexit deal", just a proposal from the UK government. But the constant use of the word "deal" is an attempt to suggest that there is such a deal and it will be the fault of the EU if it is rejected. Setting up its excuse for failure. 
Holy sh*t. #Brexit  
In the last week, sufficient correspondence and debate has told the @Conservatives Party the mood of the Country and members. They have not listened to the referendum, election or members. If MPs fail to act this week, they don't deserve to be in Parliament. 
No matter how many times it takes, the UK is going to keep voting on Brexit until the (leftist) people's voices are heard!  
Bannon Trump's former adviser, in interview with LBC calls for Brexit supports to “ take up arms and fight. This is war.”  
May promises to protect planemakers' supply chains in Brexit  
(14) Far more supporters and curious locals came out to watch the Presidential motorcade on its way to the airport near Glasgow than those who tried to protest on this leg of the visit. The Brexit vote was strongest in Scotland, Wales, Northern Ireland & rural England. #Freedom 
Theresa May braced for showdown with Brexit rebels  
Democrats need to fight the Kavanaugh nomination the right way: making the nomination fight a referendum on Mr. Kavanaugh’s past actions and on President Trump’s character  
Parliament vote to reveal extent of anger over May's Brexit plan  
Growing our trade and investment ties with  through a free trade agreement will create more  jobs and grow Australia’s economy. I will visit London to strengthen ties with the UK and discuss the state of Brexit negotiations.  
President Trump kicks the crap out of NATO gets $40 billion increased spending,  then flies off to the UK where he tells the PM her opposition would make a great PM and she is doing it all wrong with brexit, meets the queen , plays a around of golf and then flies to meet Putin. 
Parties don't have to merge to stop #Brexit.They just have to form a temporary #BrexitCoalition to ensure the 17.4m have just ONE candidate to vote for in each constituency.If we can mobilise the 17.4m to vote for #Brexit one more timewe can change politics in the UK forever.  
3. Pre-election, she should be laser focused on her constituents and their particular issues. She's not a pawn nor symbol -- nor should she wish to be. Anyone who truly cares about flipping seats in conservative districts should not be making this a referendum on Bernie. 
I just logged in and tried to opt out and the system failed. #auspol #MyHealthRecord How about we have to opt-in instead? Make the next federal election a referendum on government interference. #TheProjectTV 
The way you guys move the goalposts, you will say that if we haven't declared war on France; it isn't true Brexit.  
How to #Brexit:UK: Hey, we're leaving.EU: What deal are you offering?UK: No Deal, we're just leaving....EU: Hey, UK. Wanna deal?UK: I'm not bothered either way, but I'll hear you out. 
Justine Greening says May’s Brexit deal is ‘worst of both worlds’ and calls for second referendum  
The EU digests Britain’s new Brexit plan  
Narrator: Any form of Brexit will compromise our national interest.  
Told Labour Red Tory toadies to look up Pyrrhic victory definition on the night of Referendum in 2014. They thought they had won. They actually lost. Big time. They lost respect and support from young people and working class communities #IndyRef2 
When Trump was in the UK right after #Brexit, he spoke repeatedly about how the British had voted to "take their country back."Trump reiterated that during his #TrumpUKVisit--he warned of the UK "Losing their culture."We had a clear preview two years ago as I wrote here: 
"Don't follow the herd" is disgusting coming from someone who knows how hard the struggle has been to get #Brexit I doubt you realise that you have just stoked already hot fires. #ChequersmeansCorbyn #MayMustGoNow 
Theresa May Says Brexit May Not Happen At All  
Labour has taken a lead in multiple polls after Theresa May's Brexit plan resulted in ministerial resignations. How can Labour turn their new poll lead into an election win? #DarrenOnLBC 
May's stern Sunday: PM pledges unwavering devotion to Brexit in bullish Mail on Sunday piece   
The US antagonized Europe on politics and military spending; China on trade; Russia on sanctions; the Moslem world on Jerusalem; the EU on Brexit. It would be unwise for Trump to go further. He needs a good summit with Putin to show the world he is a leader, not a spoiler. 
This week:President Trump nominated SCOTUS JusticeMade NATO increase spendingForced Thereasonous May's hand on Brexit & tradeHad tea with the QueenPlayed golf at TurnberryFlown to Helsinki for Pivotal meeting with PutinAll while Mind Controlled Sheep hurl abuse at him.  
The UK is engaged in difficult negotiations with the EU on the terms of Brexit. Trump's advice to Theresa May? Sue the EU!In times of disagreement, the US president's first instinct is towards harassment and coercion, not the calm pursuit of mutual benefit. Worrying psychology.  
Justine Greening shows support for second Brexit referendum  
Yeah, because white nationalists and neo-Nazis who support the America first movement demand #Brexit because ??? #TheResistance 
This is a sinister move, calling for another Referendum.Seeing Tory MP's mention it all of a sudden.Everything to delay us getting out is a bad thing, can't be trusted.They'll put more options on it, split our vote, or something.#Brexit is March 2019, we can take stock then. 
Theresa May REFUSES to budge on Brexit deal as rebels circle to vote down KEY bill TODAY  
The Govt must recognise the growing voice that stands for #SuspendA50 & #2ndEUref. It must take responsibility for our future. It‘s not good enough to plan for no deal, or to force a Brexit that pleases nobody & undermines our future. The Govt must take notice 
We need time to determine the future of our country, & what our final Brexit position should be. We then need to put this back to people in a new vote. We must be sure that the Brexit we decide on (if we take this direction) is right. We mustn’t rush or act on this irrationally. 
With more turmoil looming over #Brexit this week, it's heartening to see support growing to #SuspendA50 and hold a #2ndEUref - most recently from @JustineGreening. What’s best for our country must be at the front of our minds 
Trump visit rams home truth that the British are European in their values and instincts. There was never deep enough cultural roots for Brexit: it was a protest by left-behind Britain that must be heard and acted on.Stop Brexit: Change Britain - the argument of “Saving Britain”. 
Actually it was live TV we all saw it, like we saw the protests & we saw how rude the Nazi & the hooker were to the Queen. We heard him lie in a taped interview then deny it, we heard him call the BBC fake news & we saw Theresa May laughing this morning at his Brexit comments. 
Message in a Bottle: We are trapped on an island and being held hostage  by a group of "Tory psychopaths." #Brexit #BrexitBritain #ToryBrexitShambles 
Theresa May was handed 2 gifts. A referendum result that wiped out the UKIP vote and Jeremy Corbyn. She hasn't allowed that to distract her. From day 1 as PM she's been trying hard to grasp defeat from the jaws of victory. In the past week it looks like she might have succeeded 
Parliament vote to reveal extent of anger over May's Brexit plan  
Justine Greening calls for second Brexit referendum  
Back second Brexit vote says Conservative MP Justine Greening  
rebranded existing UKTI staffachieved zero of the 40 trade deals you promisedcelebrated record exports while in the EU despite claiming that the EU hampers tradesent staff to EU capitals to be laughed at as they Britsplain the ‘opportunities’ of Brexit.#nicetry 
BBC News - Theresa May: Brexit plan will protect UK aerospace The Appeaser thinks offering money to aerospaceProjects is going to get her out of trouble.Only an Airhead would think she can fool The British people ever again. 
To stop jobkilling brexit and save our jobs, NHS and pensions from the hedge funds and Trump- has it it occurred to anyone that maybe what we need is "a" labour party, not "the" Labour Party? 
Newspaper headlines: 'Second Brexit referendum needed'  
New Brexit referendum 'is only way to end deadlock'...  
UK PM May promises to protect planemakers' supply chains in Brexit  
One of the most patronising, condescending tweets ever. From someone who once professed to be a fervent champion for Brexit. They are following the herd now. The very people who not that long ago were among her supporters. What an utter, utter mess.  
Is Brexit now formally a mass suicide cult?  
Mrs May has the wind up. The UKIP electoral threat secured the Referendum. To secure Brexit we need to be an a electoral threat again. Join UKIP, make us stronger. Make it happen.  
#r4today will surely be interviewing Justine Greening on her desire for another EU referendum.Yes?So, as this is extremely important & we would like to hear what Ms Greening has to say without interruption, please can the interview not be done by John Humphrys?  
I'm absolutely disgusted @andreajenkyns has been treated like this for simply standing up for #Brexit. I had the enormous privilege of working as an intern for Andrea last year & she is one of the most decent, passionate & hardworking people I've ever met.  
Remember when they were laughing at us when we said Rihanna's Wembley show flopped because of Brexit. But FIFA came back to bite. Poor Beyhive pic.twitter.com/f1E0m9HdnB 
I suspect that like everyone else, he didn't expect to win...and therefore come under this kind of scrutiny...bit like our Brexit/Russian agents of influence here... 
How would you vote in a 3 way #PeoplesVote for a #finalsay on #Brexit? Please vote and RT for bigger sample size... 
So says @andrealeadsom, the lady from the previous @Conservatives leadership contest who talked the #BRexit talk, but then stepped aside at last minute to give #remain-er @theresa_may an uncontested victory. What price was paid then? What price now? ANOTHER 30 pieces of silver? 
It's great to see more Tory MPs come out in support of a #PeoplesVote on #brexit. Thanks @JustineGreening, history will judge you kindly.  As more and more leavers come out as #remainernow it is vital others are encouraged to join them. 
Hear hear Robert.Chairman @BrandonLewis disappoints if he’s making threats like this to MPs. That’s not the way to further the party’s interests and attract members.If you have to threaten to get it through maybe the #Chequers #Brexit BRINO plan is not any good. 
Tory chairman accused of threatening to cut funding from Brexiteer opponents of Chequers deal Support Brexit and you’re out? I’m familiar with that. 
Brexit has delivered up some strange bedfellows and this is one of the biggest #StopBrexit problems.Many on the left cannot accept that somebody like Greening can be on the right side of this.To succeed, we have to ditch tribalism and fast.#PeoplesVote 
An advisory referendum has informed the Brexit debate tremendously well. The irrefutable evidence is that it was a stupid decision, and should be consigned to 'the dustbin of  history' -like the liars and charlatans that promoted it. 
Dear MPs of Britain. If you gutless morons can't see the the Brexit crisis is likely to cause war in Northern Ireland, allow fascism to take firm hold of the UK and destroy the UK...don't bother coming back to work after your break. Otherwise..forfeit your break for your country. 
Important to note: @JustineGreening is in a marginal seat and her local Students' Union with 9,000 students supports a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit Deal. Students and young people making a difference once again.#FFS 
This "deadlock" consists of the voters saying we want to leave the EU and many of our political class determined to thwart that. How would a second referendum help? Either we accept the biggest democratic vote in our history or we don't. #Brexit #PeoplesVote #PeoplesBrexit 
A second referendum would be a recipe for delay and uncertainty at a time when the majority of people just want politicians to get on with delivering Brexit.  
Princess Charlotte wanted to know what face you made when Boris Johnson and David Davis resigned last week, right after you announced your cabinet had agreed a "collective position"? #brexit #Wimbledon #WimbledonFinal 
Desperation. And so it begins. The future of the Conservatives as a credible, viable party or not delivering a proper Brexit and condemning the UK to being a vassal state of the EU. Think carefully.  
"It's time to believe" in Brexit, says man who is so confident about it he's quit the government a year before it even happens. 
A referendum where people know what they are voting for. How very democratic.  
Were @theresa_may any colder about Brexit there would be an iceberg in Downing Street. @andreajenkyns is spot on. 
Donald Trump as the true Master of a #brexit Britain  
Before #brexit I had never signed an online petition before.I’ve literally lost count of how many I’ve signed. This one looks worth the effort.  
Sorry Andrea but your wrong brexit means brexit that means out of the EU completely #MAYMUSTGO 
Tomorrow's front page: New Brexit referendum ‘is only way to end deadlock’ #tomorrowspapertoday 
Wow. Justine Greening becomes first Cabinet-level Tory to back people’s vote. She correctly notes May’s soft Brexit fudge will please no-one. We don’t want to be EU27’s subordinates but their equal partners. The only way to deliver real-world sovereignty for Leavers is to Remain.  
I've no issue with England wanting Brexit, I have a massive issue with a government we never vote for, a PM we did not vote for, a Brexit we did not vote for, being imposed on my Country against my will. This voluntary union must end. #DissolveTheUnion now. 
Don't you understand the simple reality Andrea that if the Conservative Party do not deliver the #Brexit that the #British electrorate voted for, the voters will never forgive them.#ChequersNotBrexit#ConservatriveActivistSince1979#NoTrustNoVote 
#JustineGreening sat in Cabinet as recently as January. If she can now support a #PeoplesVote - then the @UKLabour leadership certainly can.Help our grassroots movement convince @jeremycorbyn & @Keir_Starmer to have the courage to stand against #Brexit 
What's the EU ever done for #Cornwall?Here are just a few things from a much, much longer list.There's no chance Westminster will make up the investment we will lose with #Brexit, with the economy crashing around its ears.We need a #PeoplesVote! 
I think people are getting weary of being told Brexit would be a shining success if only they believed in it more. Time for empty slogans is over - @JustineGreening calling for #peoplesvote in @thetimes rather more interesting and significant 
The herd? Who would that be? The 17.4 million people who voted for #Brexit the promise made in our manifesto and the Brexiteer MPs fighting to deliver on that promise?  
Boris Johnson’s Brexit solution? ‘To Believe’. Yep, that’s it folks. To paraphrase John Hume, ‘you can’t eat a verb’  
"The only solution is to take the final Brexit decision out of the hands of deadlocked politicians, away from the backroom deals, & give it back to the people." @JustineGreening makes the case for a People's Vote brilliantly - hope she's able to persuade colleagues to do the same 
Let's hope Brexit is entering its dismal end game.  
"But on Brexit, it’s clear we have a parliament in stalemate that can’t deliver a clear choice for the future. So it’s time to let the British public do it instead."MUST-READ: Why Justine Greening is backing a #PeoplesVote. Please RT: 
The impressive ⁦@JustineGreening⁩ brands Chequers Brexit proposal as “worst of all worlds” and backs #peoplesvote with remaining in EU as an option. Eminently sensible and highly significant   
The rest of the world believes in Britain. It’s time that we did too  #Brexit  
BREAKING: former Cabinet Minister & senior Conservative Justine Greening is the latest to back a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal.As Justine says, it's time to let the British people have their voice heard on this issue. Please RT:  
BREAKING NEWS: @JustineGreening backs a #peoplesvote on the final Brexit deal, adding that the government's proposal will satisfy nobody. A hugely courageous decision, send your thanks and spread the word.? 
Andrea Jenkyns says the Prime Minister is ‘passionless’ about Brexit and warns that the consequences for the Tories will be ‘catastrophic’ 
Both Greening and Mandelson have now condemned May’s plan as a fudge too far.The Remain strategy will now be to secure a second referendum on ‘no deal or full EU membership’. Let’s just replace May and go for no deal. We don’t need the hatred that a second referendum would create 
On the left are a couple of enigmatic politicians capable of running modern 21st Century democracies. On the right is a Brexit despot plunging her nation into the 19th Century.  
Jenkyns says that Theresa May is pursuing a ‘sub-zero’ Brexit - and warns that the consequences for trust in politics will be worse than the fallout from MPs’ expenses 
Far-right multimillionaire scumbag Steve Bannon says Brexit voters should take up arms to fight for a hard Brexit. If he wasn't a filthy pox-ridden old piss head I'd fight him myself.  
Former Cabinet minister Justine Greening comes out in favour of another Brexit referendum. I’m led to believe some more Tories could follow her lead in the coming weeks. And Labour still won’t rule it out.  
TGE TIMES: New Brexit referendum ‘is only way to end deadlock’ #tomorrowspaperstoday 
.@JustineGreening becomes powerful voice in favour of a further EU referendum, first mainstream Tory to do so - and savages @theresa_may’s Brexit plan  
The referendum was the biggest fraud ever perpetrated on British voters. Here’s the graph where you can see Cambridge Analytica, Putin’s interference & criminal overspending actually committing the fraud.  
So if 1) Cambridge Analytica data was viewed from Russia during Brexit campaign & if2) Cambridge Analytica was working for Trump campaign & if 3) Russia had loads of hacked Dem data & if 4) Trump Tower was communicating with Russia's Alfa Bank and ...Oh .... my ....  
Theresa May’s hopes of winning support for her Brexit compromise have been dealt a huge blow as Justine Greening has become the first senior Conservative to support calls for a second referendum  
Why Justine Greening wants another EU referendum | By @Peston  
We need to protect the environment after Brexit. I’ve added my name to let the Government know we need a strong #GreenWatchdog and an ambitious #EnvironmentAct to help restore nature - if you haven't yet, will you SIGN & SHARE today with friends & family?   
'what @POTUS said about Brexit was true; what Theresa May said was false' - more on that tonight @NextRevFNC join us 9pm ET and in the meantime watch this great conversation with @HowardKurtz: 
The English unregistered parties in Scotland are quite prepared to sacrifice Scotland's economic survival at the altar of an English brexit shambles we did not vote for, without any mandate from their constituents, the people who pay their wages. #justsaying 
Liam Fox is becoming the Brexit bus of trade deals, he promised to sign 40 free trade deals the 'second after' Brexit & now, with just months to go, excitedly announces he’s  “opened up 14 informal trade dialogues”  
. @BorisJohnson makes his return as a columnist for The Telegraph with a rallying cry for post-Brexit Britain  
For the PM to undermine  the result and delivery of a democratic vote is just beyond belief. Her position in office is surely untenable, as of those that have been compliant in supporting her and her decision to betray democracy and Brexit.  
Why has Bannon not been arrested for inciting terrorism?#Brexit #StopBrexit 
Theresa May can’t be allowed to push ahead with a Brexit plan that ignores the wishes of voters  via @Telegraph 
Doing a Nazi salute: legal.Holding a democratic referendum supported by 80% of Catalans: 30 years in prison.Welcome to S-pain.  
Theresa May hit by her eighth resignation over Brexit plans in nine days, as ministerial aide quits  via @Telegraph 
Did @theresa_may's government seriously leave #chequers last Friday with a hop, skip and a jump and think that they would get away with this sellout? Really?Utterly bizarre.#ChequersMeansCorbyn#MAYMUSTGO#Brexit  
WARNING: Bannon is the ultimate Russian asset. He’s the Lord Haw Haw of Moscow funded White Supremacy spreading across Europe to destroy democracy, NATO, & global trade. #Brexit is your doom. Listen to this fool & you will break up the United Kingdom. #SaveDemocracy @Plot2Destroy 
Theresa May could sue the EU to get a better Brexit deal just like Trump said - and here's how:  
Steve Bannon literally making a call to arms to the far right everywhere...Farage making not so subtle threats that anything but a hard brexit will have riots on the streets...not a great exaggeration to say democracy itself is under threat  
I urge all Conservative Party members to telephone, email, write or visit your local Conservative MP and complain about Theresa May’s awful plan for Brexit. Do it TODAY.....your country needs YOU! 
I consider you to be totally dishonest. You were quite possibly one of the most trusted and respected people who campaigned for Brexit. We stood by you when other Tories stood against you. Yours is the biggest betrayal. 
#durhamminersgala2018 where the crowd seemed overwhelmingly to be in favour of stopping Brexit #PeoplesVote now required 
#Trump praises Hungarian #migration policy and doesn’t back down from his claims mass #migration caused #Brexit 
MAY IS BACKED BY PARTY GRANDEES who do not believe in the right of ord. ppl to decide #Brexit.  SHAMEFUL SELLOUT.     Against Democracy and Parl. Law. @BorisJohnson #borisjohnson #boris johnson  #Brexit @theresa_may 
David Davis accuses Theresa May of astonishing dishonesty over Brexit  via @MailOnline 
This bizarre, topsy-turvy re-writing of history is a precedent of the stab-in-the-back Brexit narrative that is developing on the Tory right.  
Bannon. Having been given a platform to preach his doctrines today by LBC has asked the middle England to take up arms to get the Brexit they voted for.Really?Time for people to call this out for what it is and disassociate themselves rapidly. ERG politicians,Any thoughts? 
Georgia's Republican primary for governor pits a wealthy businessman playing up his far-right persona against an opponent who was secretly recording calling the race a referendum on "who could be the craziest"  
Voting for Brexit is to politics what mullets and perms are to hairstyles, embarrassing to admit that you did it, but felt so trendy at the time.... 
Steve Brannon branded Jacob Rees-Mogg "one of the best thinkers" in the global conservative movement, but warned that it's "now time for action" on Brexit. 
think we should call off #Brexit and hold an enquiry into Vote Leave cheating and breaking the law. Right now.  
Brits would rather quit EU without deal rather than back PM's soft Brexit plan  
Ireland set to remove oil reserves from Britain as #Brexit deadline looms closer.Tankers will transport Irish oil back home or to other EU member states as Government braces itself for a 'no-deal' scenario  
Theresa's threat is also targeted at 17.4m Leavers. That either we submit to her Chequers cave-in or be denied the #Brexit we voted for. Well Mrs May, now you have revealed your plan to deprive us of a genuine exit from the EU, we will not back you! 
Excellent meeting with members of #Yorkshire @UKYP to plan establishment of a @SheffCityRegion Youth Combined Authority. We also discussed Transport, Brexit, Culture, Education/Skills, #MentalHealth & . A very impressive group  
Having spent the past year begging Corbyn to explicitly commit Labour to “the single market”, suddenly May effectively backs that and Blair now claims this is “the worst of all worlds”. It is, the public agree, so just as well the leadership ignored Blairites on Brexit   
Trump's Sun interview wasn't a mistake. This is his administration's policy: support hard Brexit and white nationalism in the UK  
After fixing #Brexit with the help of #CambridgeAnalytica and Putin, Bannon continues to try to interfere with British democracy and the rule of law. 
Theresa May faces rebellion from Brexit hardliners in customs bill vote  
As this story heats up #Brexit stooge, Louise Mensch keeps falsely accusing people who are exposing the truth, like Chris Wylie & @peterjukes of being Russian assets...  Why?#CambridgeAnalytica #TrumpRussia #BrexitShambles 
Britain turns against Theresa May on Brexit, Sky Data poll finds  
PIERS MORGAN IN AN INTERVIEW ON AIR FORCE ONE FINDS OUT WHAT TRUMP REALLY THINKS OF THE PUTIN, BREXIT, KIM JONG UN AND THE QUEEN 
It's so silly people dropping people over politics. First mid term election is normally a referendum of their sitting presidents first two years in power it will be interesting this time around when there is so much ammunition against the Democrats 
Theresa May hit by her eighth resignation over Brexit plans in nine days, as ministerial aide quits - The TelegraphThis afternoon.   
Anna Soubry on Brexit: ‘History will condemn those who haven’t tried to stop all this nonsense’ 
The British on the street 2018...#PeoplesVote march -peaceful funAnti #Trump march -peaceful funFar Right - Violent And who do the Govt & Opposition give succour to with a dystopian #Brexit?You both got it wrong...time to #StopBrexit..back the real majority.#FinalSay #FBPE 
#TheresaMay has no intention of delivering #Brexit She should quit.Please sign and RT petition hereThe people expect the Government to deliver what we voted for #UKIP @Nigel_Farage @LeaveEUOfficial @Arron_banks#MayMustGoNow 
Trump praises Hungarian migration policy and doesn’t back down from his claims mass migration caused Brexit  
The DUP who so boastfully said they were acting in the interests of NI now seem to be manoeuvring themselves toward the hardest of Brexits or no deal. Happy to be proved wrong, but it seems as if they're hellbent on not only having a hard border, but decimating NI & GFA #Brexit 
I asked my son (aged 12) what his view on Brexit was. He asked if it was a cereal bar...  
.@jeremycorbyn Is partly responsible for the rise of the far right in Britain because of his failure to fight Brexit and it's  inherent racism and xenophobia.Stop Brexit. 
Not as much as the North East car workers who are going to lose their jobs. That’s why they need a leader of the opposition who wants to stop Brexit, or at least give them a vote on the final deal, not one who has been ideologically committed to it all his political life.  
#Brexit is like leaving a 3 course meal at the #Ritz for a #CheeseBurger. What do you fancy? #BrexitShambles #PeoplesVote #FinalSayForAll 
Watch #BorisJohnson come out for  a #SoftBrexit (whatever that is) or even go back to #Remain...which he once was. He knows that #Trump & #SteveBannon   have killed  #Brexit as we know it ...except for hardcore  who will shelter  in #UKIP-the #Tories rightwing  holding Party, 
The "Not my Brexit" narrative is going to run on and on as large parts of the UK political and media class work hard to avoid questioning their own contribution to the crisis of the British state  
Is it time to oust Theresa May and get on with BrexitIf you believe that  it is time then please retweet this 
Sunset swim, everyone is still hanging about on London Fields and the French lads are singing le marseillais in the pub on the park garden. Calling it - nobody would have voted Brexit if we’d been having this kind of summer in 2016.  
Not all of the UK voted Brexit, but that hasn't stopped the government and the press pretending like we did... 
I'm guessing very soon there'll be a Tory leadership election. One thing is clear. The new PM MUST be a Brexiter. The favourite, Sajid Javid, is a remoaner. He must be beaten. After all, he supports May's Brexit plan. He's still in government. Javid will give us more of the same. 
Vive la France! Best team won. Victory also for Macron, openness, diversity, Europe, youth -- against intolerance, xenophobes, Brexit, nationalists, nativists and the rest. Chapeau also to valiant Croatia, great side! 
Paris may gain an extra 10,000 jobs from London after Brexit, business lobby group says  
Didn’t they commit political suicide after they’d been in coalition with the enemy for 5yrs? Inflicting the most gruesome policies our vulnerable ppl have ever seen! When did those Yellow Tories rear their gruesome heads again? Oh yes,when they created #FBPErs to ‘Stop Brexit’  
75% of Britons think Brexit's being handled badly. (YouGov)  
'She HAS TO GO!' Brexiteer urges May to STEP DOWN after failing to deliver swift Brexit 
Both the Brexit vote and — less than six months later — the presidential election of Donald Trump were unprecedented acts of political, social, and economic self-harm, writes @mehdirhasan. 
Brexit revolt DEEPENS: Cameron’s Witney replacement QUITS to vote AGAINST soft Brexit  
Dear @jeremycorbyn why are you supporting #Brexit when Trump, Putin and their super-rich cronies want it as a major step forward in their project to replace democracy with kleptocracy? Whose side are you on Jeremy?#PeoplesVote #StopBrexit 
The Scottish wants 8 years old to explain how they are going to affected by Brexit!!8 year olds!!!  
Tony Blair comments on the Government Brexit white paper: “It is not making the best of a bad job. It is the worst of both worlds. This is where True Remainers and True Leavers make common cause.” Read his article and retweet:  
May suffers yet another resignation as Robert Courts quits over her Brexit plan  
and it confirms that this is a Remainer's Brexit.  
David Davis brands PM ‘dishonest’ over his Brexit alternative  
We know nobody would be cruel enough to intentionally vote to limit their children's options in life.... But that's what's happening. Unless we get a #PeoplesVote on the Brexit deal. If you vote to restrict free movement, it cuts both ways. 
The grassroots need to unite and prepare as I fear the foundations are being laid for yet another referendum.  
Brexit: Theresa May suffers eighth resignation over her negotiating strategy  
Probably the best video yet on the three proportional voting systems in B.C.'s referendum this autumn. Would love to see a video that explains the pros and cons of FPTP and the three PR systems. #bcpoli #pr4bc 
While this is self evidently true it’s odd how almost nobody in UK mentions that whole world order upon which Brexit was based was pulled down by Trump’s election. The June 2016 version of World simply doesn’t exist anymore  
The great Alan Bennett on Brexit  
Julian Assange, his paymasters and supporters carefully nurtured a conspiracy theory that it was murdered DNC staffer Seth Rich who had leaked the @HillaryClinton emails and DNC voter analytics...... #MuellerIsComingForThemAll cc @Nigel_Farage 
Russia. Brexit. Trump. It’s all connected. And everyone involved is running scared cause there’s badass women coming after them.  
Sadly summs up the entire Brexit debacle. Somewhat unsurprising for those like me who understood the complexity of disentangling 44 years of joint UK EU working and the scale of the Brexit lies told the electorate  
America. There's another piece of the Trump-Russia puzzle being pieced together in Britain. These are new insights from data investigation into Brexit. And this is major news about how it links to both Trump & Russia. 
*Everything* Trump says about UK, and especially Brexit, needs to be read in this context. His stated enemy is the EU  
Let’s be absolutely clear, these are the people @theresa_may ‘s #Brexit white paper is meant to appease  
So it's curious isn't it... After more then TWO YEARS, there is NOT A SINGLE BREXIT POLITICIAN who has distinguished themselves in any way, manner or form.  NOT ONE. They have shown themselves to be neither brave, intelligent, humane or even hard-working... Let alone moral. 
What is being played out is a civil war in the Tory party which has little regard to the impact on jobs from getting Brexit wrong. They should end the civil war, protect jobs and communities by staying in the single market and customs union as the SNP are arguing for.  
Oh, yes, Bannon.I am fighting every single day to get my country back out of the hands of you, Trump, Mercer, Bolton and their little puppets, Farage, Mogg and co.I shall not stop until we have succeeded. 
"#TheresaMay’s #ChequersPlan is #Brexit in name only. It is not what 17.4million people voted for - she is taking the public for fools." and betraying all of us!  @jowilliams293 on #SkyNews!  #MayMustGo #BBC #SKY #LBC @ConHome @DCBMEP @andreajenkyns #UK #EU 
Without the EU referendum concessions that ⁦@SteveBakerHW⁩ managed to get from David Cameron, Leave would never have won the referendum. It’s going to be interesting to see how this all plays out. Life isn’t boring at the minute is it?!   
Theresa May on Brexit: "Let's just keep our eyes on the prize here."What a prize.  
If you aren't aware what's going on here, history is repeating itself. Exactly a century ago the Nazi party formed their thugs into the Sturmabteilung. This weekend their genetic descendants were on the streets of London and Farage & Bannon were intentionally fanning the flames. 
PM is in mess due to contradictory red lines. DUP helped back her into this corner. A hard Brexit will be very damaging to NI economy & political stability. Soft Brexit/EEA still an option. Or being honest & recognising Brexit itself is a really bad idea. 
This would be the majority of Brits if Brexit were dumped.  
Theresa May made it sound as if Donald Trump told her to sue the EU. Typical May. Takes his words out of context to make him look stupid. The way she lied during that press conference with Trump about her plan on #Brexit was a disgrace. No shame. Looks hideous as well. 
Robert Courts, MP for West Oxfordshire.Approx 70% voted remain.Thinks May’s #Brexit is way too soft.So, big boy, ideological loony, with no plan and an anti business agenda.Why did you not bother to learn anything about the GFA or WTO rules in the last two years?Too lazy?  
During the referendum debate, it was all like “Switzerland & Norway are outside the EU & doing brilliantly!”Now, if we were to have anything like Switzerland or Norway, we’re told that’s effectively “inside the EU” & “betrayal” of the Brexit promise. 
Sorely needed - a poll which draws up a list of the things policy experts say would happen in "no deal Brexit" scenario and asks people how likely each would be to happen in event of no deal. We really need a sense of what public knows (and doesn't) re: this 
Local Members oppose the Chequers Agreement:27% Favour73% Against As an Association we would urge the Government to look again at this proposal to ensure that the Referendum Result is respected, delivered and seen to be delivered. 
If national media outlets spent less time uncritically giving platforms to white supremacists and more on explaining the real-life implications of things like no deal Brexit, I suspect the country wouldn’t be such a mess. 
Theresa had ultimately banked upon the scaremongering of big multinationals and the timeframe of negotiations to kill off any electorate desire and will for #Brexit. Theresa's reluctance to entertain a no-deal resonated through Whitehall and was reflected in her final deal. 
The government’s implosion over Brexit has handed the Labour Party a massive ‘giftby @chrisjarvisdiy 
Brexit latest  
One of the things Brexit has exposed is that our politicians, having had no power over trade for the last 47 years, have unlearnt its language, its concepts, its practice and its theoretical underpinnings. They’re suddenly all experts but in fact they need some 101 seminars.  
Listen to May at 55 secs.She just admitted that her #Brexit plan is (still) a negotiable compromise.Yet she has been repeating the manifest untruth that her white flag paper is non-negotiable.Expect more concessions to be made on the command of Barnier  
Theresa May has not only boxed herself into a corner but her party & the country. The weak & deliberately delayed approach to #Brexit negotiations combined with the deal put forward has made her position as PM untenable & ultimately bought into question British democracy. 
Two thirds of voters now want a second referendum. Repeat: TWO THIRDS OF VOTERS NOW WANT A SECOND REFERENDUM.  
Peter speaks for all of us, Thank you. @theresa_may has betrayed us ALL! #MayMustGo #BBC #LBC @ConHome @CCHQPress #ConservativeParty @DCBMEP @andreajenkyns @BorisJohnson @BrexitStewart @LiamFox @DavidDavisMP #Brexit @Conservatives #TheresaMay #TORY #TORIES #ChequersBetrayal #UK 
Yet another @Conservatives has resigned his position due to #BrexitShambles . Even looking down the back of the couch to find a replacement won't work now @theresa_may.  There can't be many Tory MP's left off your political Z List to offer positions to, surely. #Brexit  
Sat 14th July at the "Durham Miners Gala"The people there were very happy to see the Anti Brexit/Pro EU people arriveMen & Women from all works of life where thereNurses, Miners, teachers, gays, union officials, suits/skirtsOver 11000 Bollocks to Brexit sticker given out 
I "cannot support" the Government's Brexit plans.......Robert Courts MP resigns as a ministerial aide!                   #fo2eu 
“The only resignations from the Government have been Brexit-backing MPs, and not a single Remainer has felt it necessary to go.“ What does that tell you about the Robbins-May Plan? Reject it.  
Should @theresa_may #RESIGN? Please #RETWEET and #SHARE, Thank you. #BBC @BBCNews @daily_politics #SKY @SkyNews #LBC @LBC #Conservatives #Labour #UKIP #UK #TheresaMay #May #ChequersPlan #WhitePaper #Brexit 
This lot will be the Sturmabteilung, the ‘Brown Shirts,’ for the alt-Right when their attempted Brexit coup starts turning even more nasty because it’s collapsing -  
Blair nails it again - (and just forget your beef with the man FFS). We need his clarity of communication and analysis now more than ever. We need to beat brexit and not focus on anything else until it's done. Everything else requires a good outcome to this fight  
Theresa May’s appeal to Tory MPs to back her Chequers plan in tatters as EIGHTH minister resigns over ‘soft Brexit’ proposals  
Fascism 101: Dismantle free press. Fascists like referendums & Goebbels coined the phrase ‘the will of the people’.Those that did Trump / Putin / Leavers bidding now you’re in their sights . @DailyMailUK @daily_politics @GMB  you’re next. #Brexit#VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw 
I have been asked by a number of colleagues about the PM’s #Chequers plan for #BREXIT - I must be clear like many other @Conservatives voluntary colleagues, I do not feel it will deliver the best deal for Britain - and so with regret - cannot support it. 
The people voted, they don't care what you think Brexit should be.Your personal views are wholly irrelevant.  
Faced by Trump, the EU must stick together. To be a state on one's one is to be a dwarf that Trump can easily dominate. [#Brexit Britain]  
So #brexit voters if remain had won with criminal overspending a military grade psy ops campaign by Cambridge analytica the support of tax evading Johnny foreigner billionaires and the interference of a hostile foreign power would you respect the result? 
Sorry David Davies you no longer have a right to be heard on Brexit. For almost 2 years you were in charge. Your own team produced analysis that proved you were wrong & you tried to suppress it. Then you walked away like the lazy coward you are. So no, time for you to be quiet.  
#May has more neck than a giraffe. After ambushing Cabinet with her non-brexit - brexit plan she threatens them with if you do not approve it there will be no brexit - her intention from the start. it is a lose lose choice.  
Blimey, while you're watching the #WorldCupFinal another one resigns. Only a humble bag-carrier but the fact he took over Cameron's old seat makes it a little more interesting. #Brexit #TheresaMayEndDays 
Brexit revolt DEEPENS: Cameron’s Witney replacement QUITS to vote AGAINST soft Brexit  
Why are Bannon, Trump and the rest, over here? Because in #Brexit they sense a fertile breeding ground for their creed of hate, division and Fascism. And they’ve spotted the useful idiots like Piers Morgan, @LBC and @BBC happy to give them a platform. 
“Easiest deal in history.”“No downsides, only considerable upsides.”Brexit is eating us from the inside - politically, diplomatically, economically, socially. Time to give it up.#StopBrexit #BrexitChaos@ 
If i hear anyone who voted brexit celebrating France's win...  
She is trying to deliver the only Brexit that she thinks can get through Commons. I’m thoroughly miserable about it but Tory MPs didn’t act after elxn loss to change leader and begin to get a political strategy that MIGHT have altered context.  
"May’s deal is Brexit in name only. It is not what 17.4million people voted for - she is taking the public for fools."@jowilliams293 on Sky News 
.@jeremycorbyn will be the next @UKLabour PM. .@theresa_may cannot deliver Brexit as she can’t satisfy her coalition of chaos. It’s dead. The @CONservatives have wreaked havoc on our country. Enough is enough.It’s time for a Labour Government who will work #ForTheMany! 
Tony Blair: “In any rational world, and I understand that is a big caveat in today’s politics, this would go back to the people for resolution.”In a new essay TB sets out the case for voting on the proposed Brexit deal. Read and share the article:  
Labour takes commanding poll leads as Tory vote slumps amid Brexit chaos  
NEW Theresa May hit by fresh resignation over Brexit plans 
Putin had his thumb on the scale in the Brexit vote, the French Presidential elections and the US Presidential elections. 2 out of 3 ain't bad. Putin & Trump have been conspiring from day #1. #SaveDemocracy 
I'm a Lib Dem voter but I'd vote Labour if @DavidLammy were leader. Clear message from the start on Brexit, immigration, Tory cuts and abuses  
British Prime Minister Theresa May says Donald Trump told her to sue the EU over #Brexit  
The disruption from a no deal Brexit is much more severe for the UK than the EU. And given we’re a services exporter, severing us from the Single Market is just not clever stuff. 
Make no mistake the current rise far right groups within Europe are being financed covertly to destabilise the EU politically, and Brexit + Trump's tariffs are part of the same concerted effort/agenda to destabilise the EU financially.To combat this we should remain put. 
We are delighted to announce that @eloisetodd, CEO of @BestForBritain will be speaking at the Great Northern Stop Brexit Conference in #Leeds on 8 September. "Creating a Vision of a New Britain Without #Brexit". Tickets available now:  
Hey, that's Brexit! But it STILL doesn't explain why one of you STERLING brexiters failed to step forward, shoulder some responsibility and guide the country to the brexit fatherland, does it?Instead your guys just stand on the sidelines releasing hot air. Like snowflakes. 
Eurosceptic Tory MPs (believed to number more than 100) have set up 'party within a party' whipping operation run by former #Brexit minister @SteveBakerHW to fight Chequers agreement  via @Telegraph 
Stay strong Brexit supporters remember the last time the Germans thought they could bring us down..... Fail!  
As per my latest Brexit Blog post () I think HoC numbers mean Ref2 will become seen as way to cut through the mess. It's not a great option - there are no great options - just the least-worst, and the outcome is uncertain - could be even messier situation. 
Brexit: Theresa May suffers eighth resignation over her negotiating strategy  
Theresa May’s appeal to Tory MPs to back her Chequers plan in tatters as EIGHTH minister resigns over ‘soft Brexit’ proposals  
Dawkins and Cox deceive themselves and dwindling audiences. Science has nothing to say about Brexit. To say otherwise is to admit that science is about the 'ideology' and 'gut feeling' Dawkins claims to have transcended.  
Going through passport control at Heathrow’s Terminal 5 just sucks the life blood from you. God only knows what it will be life after Brexit 
I remember in the EU Ref when Leavers were outraged when I dared to lump Trump together with Brexit. Now the two are indistinguishable. 
Honestly think if we’d got to the final our 6-0 loss would’ve prompted the hardest Brexit you’ve ever seen. 
This brexit is not like the one in the brochures.  
.@Simon4NDorset is worried he will lose his seat. He is not worried about the betrayal of #brexit  
Wow. The man who is basically running Liam Fox’s trade department, Crawford Falconer, has said publicly that there’s no way anyone can deal w/Trump administration. That’d be same administration Brexit trade hopes rest on  
With all the ignorant and dangerous talk about betrayal, why not simply admit that #Brexit is and was always going to be complicated? Pretending that there are easy answers to complex problems and attacking officials and judges who can’t answer back: the essence of populism. 
Dear HoC MPs, the majority of you are #Remainers. May has said if you reject her plan, there will be no #Brexit. It is back in your hands. Do the right thing. Reject her childish cakeism plan. #StopBrexitSaveBritain 
Here's the lad in charge of "Love Both", the hardline anti-abortion group opposed to Ireland's referendum pouring out the transphobia. So what's the significance? Well, he's also the lad responsible for making fake trans accounts on twitter in the months leading up to the 8th ref  
Saying we shouldn't defend one of the most valuable transparency advocates on earth because we don't like his attitude toward women is like refusing to let a fire fighter pull you out of a burning building because they have a bad take on Brexit.  
If U are going to change the decision just because U want Remain, what was the point of the Referendum? U R cheating voters!  @theresa_may 
And as @MsMariaT noted on the eve of the Brexit vote John Bolton was at the Vote Leave headquarters  
Brexiters have committed political arson against UK democracy by deliberately stoking impossible expectations around Brexit and then saying that democracy will be damaged if those expectations are not met. #LeaveLiars #BrexitShambles 
Theresa May could sue the EU to get a better Brexit deal just like Donald Trump said - and here's how 
Thought for the day.Mrs May @theresa_may will propose a cake and eat it Brexit to the EU which will be rejected.Mr Corbyn @jeremycorbyn dreams of a cake and eat it Brexit which the EU will reject.We already have cakeThought ends. 
There’s no way that the people of Oxfordshire are for hard Brexit. So much of the science & innovation infrastructure in Oxford benefits massively from our European collaborative structures. 
We're going to The Great Northern Stop Brexit ConferenceWhen we win a People's Vote, we must offer change and hope to the nation. The status quo has failed, let's rebuild our country with every person in every community in mind. via @EventbriteUK 
.@JuliaHB1 Why haven't you accepted the terms of the EU referendum which democracy gave you? >"it does not contain any requirement for the UK government to implement the results of the referendum"  
A message to Conservative MP’s:Do you really think that May’s plan is #Brexit?  If you value your seat (which you will lose if this goes ahead). Then by all means back her and face the inevitable backlash. The dole queue. 
Report suggests that the loss to the public finances is the equivalent of more than 23,000 nurses or 18,000 doctors.Go write that on a red bus, what an absolute travesty that Brexit parties think or suggest otherwise.  
This is what we're up against. Plums like this who call us Brexit voters stupid and then make stuff up that wasn't even on the ballot paper to justify their b/s. The contempt they have for the people and the result is breath taking.  
DD: May’s Chequers Plan Is Not Brexit -  
Mrs May has no intention of honestly delivering Brexit - she intends to scupper it or deliver a faux Brexit which she believes she is a skilled enough liar to con the British public into thinking is genuine!  Will her ruse work?          #fo2eu 
Theresa May: "I've been very clear on Brexit: Brexit means Brexit and it will be the Brexit that every individual wants but it won't be hard or soft, but you all need to get behind it or it will get cancelled, but it definitely won't be cancelled. Everyone knew this" 
The core question of the referendum was Who Governs Britain?Britons thought it ought to be elected representatives.What we now know is it's a small cabal of EU lackeys and their vested interests in big business.Why vote for establishment parties ever again?#BrexitBetrayal 
A key part of the Trump Russia story—that the US media has barely covered—is investigating & reporting on people/entities behind the Brexit referendum and the Trump campaign - a point @carolecadwalla highlights in this article on Elizabeth Denham 
If there is any doubt in your mind that Trump is playing divide and conquer with Europe via Brexit, please watch this. #Marr 
Nigel Farage interviewed his friend Steven Bannon on @LBC  - who today described Brexit as “war” - if we start to normalise & accept this, given all that has gone on with con that is Brexit, we are moving into very dangerous times. Division & hatred is being spread like wildfire. 
Theresa May tells @BBC @realDonaldTrump  advice to her (that he said she wouldn’t follow) on Brexit was to skip negotiations and sue the European Union. Maybe that’s what you might do in a real estate deal? 
WTO is not some comparable alternative to the EU single market which is considerably more sophisticated. Moving to WTO is the equivalent of replacing the most advanced operating system in the world with windows 95. #Brexit 
I understand. We were cyber attacked by a hostile foreign power whose objective was to divide and weaken America and Europe. Brexit is a result of this attack as well. tRUmp is beholden to Putin. #MoneyLaundering#UnderagedProstitutes#MuellerInvestigation 
#TheresaMay confirms that she won't walk away from #Brexit negotiations. That  means #nodeal is off the table, a terrible negotiating strategy & one that will leave us with the worst possible deal. How could she get #Brexit so wrong? PATHETIC!  @ConHome 
As the Tory Brexit continues to push farms to the brink, this photo is heartbreaking  
DD: May’s Chequers Plan Is Not Brexit Those Brexiters still backing the deal should take a step back and remember this is the former Brexit Secretary saying it is not Brexit…#BrexitBetrayal via @GuidoFawkes 
If that were even remotely true, then you'd tell EU you were revoking #Article50, you wanted the deal they agreed with Cameron back on the table and you'd give #Brexit the dignified death it deserves.But you won't & the UK will go on haemorrhaging jobs, wealth & prestige.  
Trump told Britain to "sue" European Union to speed Brexit, prime minister says  
A warm welcome in Durham today, speaking with @paulmasonnews at the Momentum National Conference. Talking Industrial Strategy, alternative models of ownership, Brexit and my path towards becoming a Labour MP.  
Why pick on May ? Brexits wasn’t her idea. Why not get the redoubtable Neil to do detail with all the protagonists - starting with No Mates Nigel and Boris the Bounder who delivered Brexit 52% and don’t even try to do detail on how we get to their promised land 
Robert Courts, PPS at the foreign office, becomes latest government member to resign over Theresa May's Brexit plan  
Robert  Courts resigns as Foreign Office ministerial aide over Brexit  via @MailOnlineBLIMEY !! ANOTHER RESIGNATION !! 
Theresa May: Trump told me I should sue the EU instead of negotiating Brexit  
His bias in favour of Brexit during the Referendum campaign was unacceptable.  
Government ministerial aide Robert Courts has resigned over his 'discontent' with Prime Minister Theresa May's Brexit strategy 
Another one bites the dust.....There will be lots more resignations. Brexit is destroying the Tories.....  
'It's FAKE sovereignty!' Marr DISMANTLES May's Brexit plan pointing out simple FLAW  
Jacob Rees-Mogg accused of being UNPATRIOTIC by going against May’s Brexit plan. By that little twerp Duncan!  
You mean the Lib Dems.The party that got into bed with the Tories in 2010 & inflicted sickening austerity on us all. Cable is now backing May's Brexit getting into bed with Tories AGAIN.Every anti LAB vote ushers in a vile Tory govt emboldened to deliver ever crueler austerity  
Dear @robertcourts - you represent a constituency which voted against Brexit. You have a responsibility to us before positioning for a job under a new Tory leader  
Theresa May has now lost eight members of her Government or party vice-chairmen in the nine days since the Chequers #Brexit agreement was published. a a rate of nearly one a day: two Cabinet ministers, one minister, three Parliamentary Private Secretaries and two vice chairmen.  
NEW Donald Trump is right! Theresa May could sue the EU to get a better Brexit deal, says leading barrister  via @Telegraph 
“He told me I should sue the E.U.,” Theresa May said was President Trump's advice on how to negotiate Brexit  
Six members of the Government have now quit in the nine days since the publication of the Chequers Brexit deal. Worrying. #Brexit  
What have you actually doneLets see, you wanted the refYou enabled the Tories to get us to the place we are now at.You didn't want another vote but if it gets you votes, now you doYou will also jump in bed with the Tories again at the drop of a hat, brexit or no brexit.  
The nation is not in favour of a hard Brexit. Get out of your bubble and try looking at the evidence for why the UK needs to stay in. 
Thank you Robert Courts. The #Chequers ‘deal’ has caused huge discontent for a reason. The way Mrs May has gone about #Brexit sidelining ministers & DExEU and erasing every red line & pledge, has lost the trust of the electorate.  #MayMustResign 
In 2016 Trump & #Brexit defeated the establishmentBrexit is now in intensive careWe need to box clever to save itWe need a #BrexitCoalition to put up just ONE candidate in each seatWe can then elect a #BrexitGovernment to deliver Brexit we voted for & stop the #BrexitBetrayal 
Tony Blair: "A genuine ‘soft’ Brexit would obviously be less damaging than a Hard Brexit, though it would highlight the ‘what's the point’ nature of this choice. But this Brexit is just mush." Read and share his essay:  
Thugs. Is this how we want our country to be seen? Oppose #Brexit with all your might!  
Why are May, Mogg et al allowed continually to trot out that Brexit is a ‘marvellous opportunity’ when all factual evidence, including the government’s own analysis proves this to be a lie. Won’t one ‘journalist’ challenge them? FFS. 
Another principled MP standing up for his electorate and his principles against a Remain Brexit cooked up in secret by back room Sir Humphrys like Olly Robbins.@OllyRobbins #ChequersBetrayal 
OK, Helsinki. The U.K. started the necessary work with Trump.Can you Finnish him?P.S. Sorry about the Brexit thing. Some of us are trying to sort it out. 
Looks like the rolling Brexit resignations have begun again. You may not have heard of Robert Courts, but it feeds into the narrative of a PM completely at the mercy of her MPs.  
Brexit is happening in 8 months, but the UK government is in crisis.  
BREAKING: Another ministerial aide quits government role over Brexit policy - Robert Courts is also David Cameron’s successor as MP for Witney  
Trump tell’s Teresa May  to take legal action against the EU instead of negotiations over Brexit deal. @realDonaldTrump #TrumpWorldGroups  
If America can elect a Trump, why not England, with a similar sense of angry grievance, exploited with impunity by the Mail, the Telegraph, the Express, and the national humiliation of Brexit still to play out? For the first time in my life, the possibility feels very real.  
Could there be anything more Brexit than David Cameron's successor as an MP quitting the government payroll to try and force a harder deal?  
Bollocks to Brexit at the #DurhamMinersGala. 
And the Brexit press freely refer to migrants as rapists, murders, job stealers and benefit tourists.  
British Prime Minister Theresa May says Trump told her to sue the E.U. over Brexit  
U.K. Criminal investigation into #Brexit has shared the data regarding Russia’s access to Cambridge Analytica servers with Special Counsel Robert Mueller.  
Rees-Mogg:  "The Prime Minister said people voted with their hearts and she was doing something ‘with her head.’ In the view of most #Brexiteers, head and heart come together. #Brexit is enormously positive. A huge opportunity for the country." 
Theresa May tells BBC that Trump urged me to "sue the EU" in Brexit talks  
You brought this on. Keep going!The more you attack May’s plan, the more Tories go to UKIP -and the more Labour stretch ahead.And if you take over with a harder Brexit, it’ll be the same as no Brexit is workable within UK politics now.Brexit is imploding.Time to ditch it. 
Your Brexit vote is crumbling Mrs May.Didn't the Tories think this was going to happen if you double crossed on Brexit?The smart choice would be to change course very soon 
Significant that Mail on Sunday, editor Geordie Greig, editor of Daily Mail from Nov, backs Theresa May's Brexit plan  
I keep reading people worried the @Conservatives are splitting.  I can't remember the last time they were not split.  Ironically, Cameron tried to heal the rift and keep out UKIP with the referendum. Failed. Now May has split them even more.@BorisJohnson @Jacob_Rees_Mogg 
Alan Duncan - The economic cost & pain of a no deal #brexit will be very severe... if we don't have access to our closest market(EU) & largest market that will set us backwards in economic performance. Seems a good argument for remaining. #FBPE #StopBrexit #marr #ridge 
Labour has opened up its biggest poll lead over the Conservatives since shortly after last June’s general election, as the government’s move towards a so-called soft Brexit has led to a dramatic fall in support for the Tories – and a sudden revival of Ukip  
Dear Philip LeeWe've had a referendum. Now please clear your desk you no longer represent us.Kind regards Bracknell.  
Steve Baker is right, Mr Corbyn will win if Mrs May will not deliver Brexit.  
“Trump was actually right about May’s Brexit plan. It is so soft, so compromised, so cowardly that if America did a trade deal with us they would really be doing it with the EU. It shouldn’t take Trump to remind us that May has betrayed democracy.”Brendan O’Neill on Sky  
May has backed herself into a corner with her infantile #Brexit plan. The #Brexiters in her party don't like it because it's too soft. The #Remainers across the HoC don't like it because it abandons 80% of the economy. The EU won't like it because it's cakeism. What comes next? 
JACOB REES-MOGG has been accused by Europe Minister Alan Duncan of “turning on his country” if he goes against the Prime Minister Theresa May’s Brexit plan. What an idiot the man is. Since when has crapping on your country for political reasons been patriotic? 
Why do the mainstream media and their ilk never hold Nigel Farage and his ilk to account over their duplicity?They promised the public a Norway-style soft Brexit before the referendum, now they're pushing for the most damaging hard-right Brexit possible.  
So May will stop Brexit. What are the implications of that after a democratic referendum? Sounds like the actions of a dictator. 
‘No deal’ Brexit planning gathers pace, Brexiteers insisted on more visible preparations for a disorderly exit, more convincing threat to EU of disorderly departure, as a condition for agreeing to back May’s planSelf-harm as a convincing threat? 
It has become clear that PM May is very uncomfortable with her BREXIT mandate; hence this watered down white paper probably scripted by EU. She’ll be seriously under the cosh with TORY brexiteers. However she did well on Marr, but Boris waits in the wings tomorrow - discredited? 
8) the EU is not perfect, but it's our best defence against fascism in Europe.  #Brexit was not a working class revolt but a creed of division & populism that fooled a few whilst appealing to the base instincts of the worst of us.And again, read some history 
The EU is going to 'go after' Britain's tax havens if it doesn't meet its Brexit trade demands  
Stable Genius Advises Teresa May How to get out Brexit. Sue Them!  
Theresa May says President Trump told her to 'sue the EU' over Brexit 
And it has been very notable that after meeting with Bannon, Rees-Mogg has hugely stepped up his output of lies and far-right propaganda. Rees-Mogg and his ERG allies are not Tories, they belong with Bannon on the fascist far-right. #StopBrexit #Brexit #PeoplesVote 
3) as successive Tory PMs have learned over & over, you can't placate far righters - populists & zealots don't do compromise, any olive branch is a sign of weakness.Labour party position on #Brexit is exactly that kind of appeasement 
EU migrant crisis:- Nationalist governments: Denmark, Poland, Czech Republic, Slovakia, Hungary, Austria, Slovenia, Malta, Italy- UK: #Brexit - Sweden elections: nationalist party ´Sweden Democrats´ leading in polls  
The crisis around #Brexit is only going to get bigger so our response needs to match it. Join us on October 20 to march for a #PeoplesVote:  #PeoplesVoteMarch 
Heads up Mrs May @theresa_may, #Brexit is not in out national interest, it never was, it never will be. Never was the will of the people. The right deal for Britain is the one we already have.A #PeoplesVote would confirm this. 
Tom Watson drops fresh hint Labour could back second Brexit vote amid Tory chaos 
Interesting critique of the Chequers agreement by @Bromund. “For anyone who supports Brexit, and views it as a once-in-a-lifetime opportunity to make Britain a new and free player in the world’s trading system, it is neither acceptable nor desirable.”  
2) this is plain bizarre.  Brexit, nationalism, alt right, authoritarian gov. - it's all connected, it's all part of the same fascist beast.Protesting about bits of it is like saying "I don't like the look of that Lion's paws but I'm perfectly happy with my head in its mouth" 
CONFIRMED on Marr TV . From the lips of May "we" have been working for SOME time to on proposals for Brexit does NOT mean BREXIT?  
David Davis:"It augured a bad day when the cabinet decided by a majority of about three to one to make concessions to the EU that were so fundamental they risked undermining the whole #Brexit process None of this really amounts to taking back control" 
Theresa May has revealed Donald Trump told her to "sue the EU" and "not go into negotiations" over Brexit  
1) #Brexit, alt right & Labour positioningOne for the @OwenJones84 @mattzarb and @jeremycorbyn 's of the worldThe seems to be a weird disconnect in Labour & it's commentatorsThey'll protest about a certain recent visit & about far right supporters of RobinsonBut not Brexit  
The governments of this country, left and right alike must shoulder the burden of blame. For a brief time, since 1975, we were doing better but still the governments ignored the causes of Brexit. Now here we are, still ignoring the causes of Brexit while we #Brexit  
No Sarah, it is you who is confused.We had the debate, we had the referendum, your only task now is to deliver that result, not change it to something you feel you would like it to be.Your reference to 'honesty' is also a tad ironic.  
Dear all, as many of you know Bannon is part of the poisonous machine behind Trump, Brexit & the rise of the Right across Europe. He is a chief spreader of hate. #leavers should be made aware of the type of person they have backed to help them understand the #BrexitReality #FBPE 
May he rest in peace. Can't help recall cruelty of Bertie's FF-PD referendum where 79% voted to reject citzenship rights for Irish born children like him.9 year-old Irish boy with sickle cell dies during deportation battle. Mother now faces deportation. 
I think what many people are missing regarding Yes/No numbers is the fact that many ppl are keeping their powder dry until Brexit kicks in. I think thatafter March 29th 2019, the floodgates will open on the Yes side. I've spoken to a few "ex hard no" peeps who say "i'm caving." 
#Brexit is now on life support.We need radical action to save it.The 17.4m need to unite behind just ONE candidate in each constituency.We need a #BrexitCoalition to unite behind.One party on its own can't do it.@UKIP got 13% of vote  in 2015  but only got ONE MP. 
For as long as people like her and IDS want #Brexit, the Tory Party will head towards defeat. The core of UK politics is not far right or far left. It's time for the moderates to Take Back Control.#StopBrexit #PeoplesVote #fbpe 
Still celebrating the absolute vindication of this, my book of last year about Trump, Brexit, Bannon, Farage, Cambridge Analytica, cryptocurrency, hacking, Nato, hybrid warfare and Russia. Brought it home better than any #WorldCup2018 victory ever could. 
Alternatively...Those pushing for a 'semi' Brexit need to admit they're not being true to the referendum result. People voted to take the risks inherent in leaving. Politicians need to reflect that courage and stop being such pathetic cowards.  
Theresa May says that Trump told her to sue the European Union over Brexit: "He told me I should sue the EU. Not go into negotiation, sue them." (via BBC) 
British PM Theresa May reveals President Trump told her to “sue” the EU in response to her tense negotiations over Brexit  
33,577,342 votes were cast for the #EU referendum.  The rules were clear.  Winner takes all.  You MAY not like the result, but it ought to be respected for the sake of the longevity of #UK democracy. 
Trump telling Mrs May ‘sue the EU’ for Brexit - like Britain telling the American colonies ‘pay tea tax or we’ll invade.’ George III took that advice, against Edmund Burke’s brilliant speeches on peace & confederation. Big mistake 
She's right.She's not going to 'compromise the national interest'She's already given all that away.There is no 'Brexit deal'.Just a surrender proposal. We pay £35,000,000,000 and beg EU to rule us forever.Madness.@10DowningStreet 
THIS IS IT: the Govt NEVER really intended to deliver #Brexit.Steve Baker, who quit over May's #ChequersPlan, exposes the truth that talk of keeping the promise of respecting the result was always a sham!Does May's govt have any legitimacy left?#BrexitBetrayal#MayMustGoNow 
We need just one #BrexitCoalition candidate in each seat.The 17.4m can then unite behind & elect a #Brexit Government.It is the only way to get the #Brexit we voted for.This is too important for party differences to get in the way.We MUST break free from the  EU dictatorship.  
David Davis has said Downing Street is being “astonishingly dishonest” for claiming there's no alternative to her Chequers plan for Brexit. @MaajidNawaz asks: Is Brexit under Theresa may doomed?  
Theresa May: Trump told me I should sue the EU instead of negotiating Brexit  
In an interview with The Telegraph, former Brexit Minister @SteveBakerHW says the Government is now in a “pathetic” position of “supplication” to the EU. He warns that if Mrs May were to pursue her current plan, public trust in democracy would be lost. 
Both Trump and Brexit are neo-fascist. I will never understand British politicians who demonstrate against Trump, but not against Brexit. They have no power to affect Trump. But they do have the power to affect Brexit.  
Have I got this right?May has now said that if parliament rejects her White Paper proposals there will be no #Brexit.So there, MPs, you have it.#StopBrexitSaveBritain 
Yes, Mrs May is wrong and @johnredwood is right.  We published 2 articles about the seminar where it was discussed.Distinctive #Brexit research & news daily:  
May’s Brexit plan raises UKIP from the dead | Conservative Home  
Yeah...so if the British government is banking on a trade deal with Trump to bolster a post-Brexit ‘global Britain,’ they might want to be aware that Trump just...says things...and doesn’t understand any of what he is talking about beyond even the most superficial level.  
Deeply misleading to claim Britain had no influence in the EU. This is why EU diplomats find Brexit so hard to fathom, because they think it makes no sense for a country that had such sway and  special status to give it all up for the slogan of 'take back control' 
So the Russians either engineered or hoodwinked us in the states by electing trump and UK got Brexit. Just great. And putin is loving every minute of it. Which kind of tells you everything you need to know… 
Hopefully @Jacob_Rees_Mogg will replace @theresa_may He should then de-select all the #REMOANER Tory MPs & replace them with Tories who honour election promises.He should then call election calling for a majority to implement #BrexitHe would get a landslide majority#HappyDays 
Now there's a surprise. People want Brexit, not BRINO.  
Big @iealondon paper out tomorrow, which offers an alternative roadmap to the Brexit #WhitePaper. Previewed by today's Sunday @Telegraph and by former Brexit Secretary @DavidDavisMP in the @FT! 
Prof. Alan Sked - "If we walk away then we wouldn’t have to pay them (EU) the  £40billion that Theresa May has promised, and that would really upset them." “Secondly we could just say we are going to exist on WTO rules and perhaps cut taxes." #Brexit  
May says her plan must prevail because that's the only game in town and dares Brexiteers to come up with a better one. There is a better plan, Mrs May, are you listening?#Brexit 
50% of voters believe that the public should be given a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal, against 33% who don’t. Everyday, more and more people agree with students and young people that Brexit isn’t inevitable. #FFS 
1/ A short thread on how I think we should respond to the torrent of Trump-Brexit lies. Firstly, reasoned and factual responses will, with a few exceptions, be washed away in the torrent of falsehoods. So how should we respond?#StopBrexit #Brexit #PeoplesVote 
Theresa-and-Angela's white paper says there'll be annual negotiations on quotas and 'the sharing of fishing opportunities...' What bullshit. How can UK fishermen invest in their industry based on annual negotiations? They're our waters. They revert to our ownership post Brexit.  
The ironic thing is May’s plan isn’t even an especially soft Brexit- but her early rhetorical position was so hard she set up a standard which she could never meet. Though she faces very taxing circumstances she made her own job almost impossible from day one. That lies with her.  
Back my plan or face no Brexit at all, Prime Minister Theresa May tells rebels!  Is it time to SACK this traitorous, remainer, crooked old cow?                 #fo2eu 
Julia Hartley-Brewer - "Theresa May will accept anything at all and the EU knows it and everyone else knows it, that is why we are going to get the worst possible deal." #Brexit  
Adolfo Suárez, #Spain's president during the transition, in '95:"Most foreign heads were asking for a referendum on #Monarchy or #Republic. We conducted surveys and found we were losing..."The #Spanish population would have voted in favour of a Republic, so the State cheated. 
Donald Tusk & Angela Merkel, pictured after having been sued £900 for a brexit they never ordered  
We crushed your kind of fascist scum in 1945. We will again. #StopBrexit #TrumpProtest #Brexit  
Planemakers plot course through trade, Brexit worries to air show deals  
Thought PM performed well on Marr. But in truth she sowed the seeds of the betrayal narrative which is now ubiquitous. With “Brexit means Brexit”, “No deal is better than a bad deal” and her public justification of the election she helped write the script which now threatens her. 
In 2016 @theresa_may became PM.She said Brexit means #Brexit.At 2017 Election Mrs May promised that Brexit means Brexit.We now know she was lying through her teeth.What she really meant was,'Brexit means we stay IN.'The biggest betrayal in the history of British politics. 
Brexit Britain is out of options. Our humiliation is painful to watch | Nick Cohen  
** MAJOR ANNOUNCEMENT ** The Great Northern Stop #Brexit Conference - Leeds, 8 September 2018Creating a Vision of a New Britain Without BrexitTickets now on sale. Speakers to be announced shortly.This debate is long overdue. Let's get to work. #gnsbc 
Out of control Bannon, listen to him here, he's promoting warfare...how desperate are they going to get? 
REVEALED: Senior Cabinet Remoaners told Airbus to make its dire, unnecessary warnings shortly before #Chequers to hoodwink Brexiteer MPs to giving in to May's non-#Brexit plan. Ministers think the nation's not watching?#BrexitBetrayal 
PM @theresa_may on why the Brexit #DealforBritain, agreed at Chequers, is in the national interest and delivers on the referendum #marr 
“How the #BBC Lost the Plot on #Brexit” via @nybooks 
Your view?PM Theresa May has shown herself to be seriously impotent when it comes to EU negotiations and #Brexit Is it now time she stood aside and let a pro Brexit MP take the lead? 
The Prime Minister has abandoned her “Brexit means Brexit” mantra, wasted taxpayers’ money by “pretending” she would deliver Brexit and is a “Remainer who has stuck with Remain”, says Jacob Rees-Mogg  
Phase 1 is obviously over, the country is in a shambles, looks like they're working on phase 2....Is this @Nigel_Farage involving himself in incitement? Sounds to me like Bannon is encouraging the hard of thought to take up arms - Bannon "ABSOLUTELY" 
I for one am shocked that the woman who sent out the Go Home vans and who desperately needs to keep in with Trump whatever he says because of Brexit failed to condemn his racism.  
A bit surprised no-one mentioned @RobertSmith's support to the #EU during @BSTHydePark last weekend #TheCure #Brexit #EuropeanUnion 
Should UK be a rule taker or a rule maker?Options:1 Rule taker - vassal state of US - hard brexit (ERG)2 Rule taker - vassal state of EU - soft brexit (Chequers)3 Rule maker - remain full member of reforming EU (as we are now)Please retweet for widest poll size. 
David Davis has come out firing this SundayCalling the PM dishonest, liar and indirectly calling her out for sabotaging Brexit from the beginning. Exposing how she chose Civil Service over elected Cabinet to make policy and negotiate.Unbelievable how TM is still PM.... 
The "Brexit at all costs" attitude of politicians shows it's just a game to them.They know leaving the EU without a deal is on the cards. They know what that (or Brexit in general) would do to British peopleBut they're OK letting it happen so the Daily Mail doesn't turn on them 
As she lied to us Has she been running a parallel secret Brexit dept Did she always plan to keep us tied to Brussels Has she deliberately wasted our cash Well 33% of Conservative members believe so 30% say they will not vote for @theresa_may while 3% say they vote other 
It all comes down to data. Mueller is following the data trail. & Denham is following the data trail. This is vast, complex & transnational. And these 2 firms at heart of Brexit - Cambridge Analytica & AIQ - are linked not just to one another. But also to Trump. 
This week I wrote to @theresa_may calling for her to quit over her #Brexit betrayalWe voted to leave the #EUNot a #Brexit betrayal#brexit #MayMustGo #Marr 
clearly the way to solve brexit is a second referendum conducted using an AV system with all 74 possible outcomes offered 
David Davis issues a stark warning about Theresa May's #Brexit plans.British democracy and our future prosperity are now at stake, he adds.Sounds like DD is willing to fight May's betrayal tooth and nail.#MayMustGo 
Ireland to move oil reserves from UK over Brexit: Sunday Independent  
This is the problem for the “people support a second referendum” argument: they do, it’s just they mean very different things by it.  
Rees-Mogg tears strips off May's misleading Brexit plan  
This is President Donald Trump's former chief strategist calling for middle England to rise up and protest against Theresa May's proposed Brexit deal.Me: "That sounds like a call to arms."Bannon: "Absolutely." 
Theresa May is saying people didn't vote for the UK to stay in the Customs Union. Where did it say that on the ballot paper? May is once again perverting our democracy with her lies!#JailTheLeaveLiars#StopBrexit #PeoplesVote #Brexit 
Most Tory MPs be like ...#Brexit#ChequersMeansCorbyn#MAYMUSTGO 
Factbox: What do British PM May's critics say of her and her Brexit plans?  
Let’s just all let this sink in for a moment. And then could we stop pretending there is no link between Trump, Brexit and the rise of fascism. Thank you to courageous journalists for telling the truth #BrexitRussia#VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw#StopBrexit#TrumpProtests 
How hardliners within Prime Minister Theresa May's Conservative Party threaten her Brexit plan  
You never even had your own plan for Brexit.You knew you couldn’t write one that a majority of the public would accept.So now you’re blowing up your only vehicle to get any Brexit.Not my prob. Just observing you blew it out of greed.Now let’s ditch Brexit outright. 
Labour's @tom_watson warns Theresa May’s Brexit plan is currently “not good enough” for Labour to back it and doesn't rule out a 'People's Vote' 
Ross is genuinely arguing with David Coburn about who put in more effort to try and push Aberdeen towards becoming the hardest hit city in the UK as a result of Brexit. Beyond parody.  
Trump advised May to sue EU over Brexit, prime minister reveals  
We were threatened with all this and voted to leave regardless. Stop this Labour-esque whataboutery and deliver the instruction from the referendum as promised.  
Lest we forget... Towards the end of last year, Jacob Rees-Mogg met up with Steve Bannon. Now Rees-Mogg is justifying Trump's attempt to manipulate the outcome of Brexit. And he has the gall to accuse others of being traitors to their country... #c4news 
Was at a meeting in the DC yesterday where people said “oh Brexit won’t happen, they can’t agree on anything in London”. So here’s my reminder: If nobody can agree on anything in London, by operation of Art. 50 Brexit happens. Automatically. No-deal Brexit then.  
Does anyone who voted Leave (or any Remainer who respects the outcome of the EU referendum) really need anything else to convince them that Theresa May isn’t going to deliver Brexit?  
New from @carolecadwalla - Mueller and #Brexit investigations appear to be converging“A source familiar with the FBI investigation revealed that the commissioner and her deputy spent last week with law enforcement agencies in the US including the FBI.”  
“Have you been involved in a Brexit that wasn’t your fault?”  
As matter of economic necessity. The only Brexit any future Parliament would stick to is one that left us with similar laws to the EU, given that they're the closest, biggest and cheapest place for us to trade with.So, in that respect, I guess you're right.... 
No - “prize” can be used in this #Brexit context only with the word “booby” in front of it ….  
Was soft Brexit planned all along?  
Next week I’m taking @peoplesvote_uk campaign to Liverpool on Weds, Belfast on Thursday, Derry on Friday, & walking the non-border Sat & Sun. Quite a week. Real momentum now to stop Brexit across the UK! Vital we don’t slow down just because it’s the summer 
Theresa May ‘is a Remainer who has remained a Remainer’ claims Jacob Rees-Mogg as he blasts her Brexit plan  
Please watch this - it shows just how wrong the whole thinking on #Brexit has been among Brexiteers. They got it wrong, they're still getting it wrong. Time is running out, we have to get real NOW!  
The fact that Brexiters are turning to the likes of Bannon to validate their #FreeTommyRobinson Brexit is a sure sign of desperation and that Brexit is on its last legs. 
U.K. Prime Minister Theresa May: Trump told me to "sue the EU" over Brexit  
“In international affairs, the strong do what they can and the weak suffer what they must”: Thucydides. “Trump is an America First protectionist who doesn’t believe in free trade”After #Brexit, we’ll find this out good and hard.  
Labour pull ahead in polls in wake of May publishing Brexit plan  
I'm normally the first to ignore polls, but polling trends, especially those beyond the typical 3% margin for error are worth taking note of. Down 6% in Opinium, down 4% in DeltaPoll, even down 2% in Tory-run YouGov, May's gamble on a softer Brexit shows she can't deliver.  
'It's FAKE sovereignty!' Marr DISMANTLES May's Brexit plan pointing out simple FLAW  
New Brexit secretary Dominic Raab has voted against climate change prevention measures and been supported by climate deniers  
British PM May says Trump told her to sue the EU over Brexit and not go into negotiations, an advice she says she ignored  
If you want the reality of EU rules, rather than scaremongering peddled by Brexiteers, please read this mythbuster  It is really important to study this carefully, so you can see how dishonest so many #Brexit claims are @RCorbettMEP 
“Britain, in effect, would be entrapped and the more you think through the implications the more the whole thing looks less like a soft Brexit than a national humiliation,” warns Labour peer Lord Mandelson  
Boris Johnson's talk of a "dying dream" proves that Brexit is all a cult.  
This is important. Trump/Brexit investigations converging. And so are the lawmakers. @markwarner is vice chair of Senate Intel Committee in the US, @damiancollins heads fake news inquiry here. They meet Monday to discuss Russian interference 
When those who have pulled out all the stops and spent a fortune to stop #brexit are happy with Theresa May's Chequers deal, you know we are being well and truly shafted. #Brexit #MayMustGo #ChequersMeansCorbyn 
Say what you like, but:1) Your Brexit deal is not the ‘right deal’ for Britain if it has vanishing support at home.2) Your Brexit deal is not in the “national interest”; losing policy voice & taking economic damage at same time. There’s no up-side. It’s #PeoplesVote time. 
Our country needs @afneil to interview Theresa May on Brexit. We need to see some proper interrogation of the detail. 
Are you British? Angry? But not a gammon?Angry about how the Govt has treated @The3Million EU citizens since the referendum?Angry about how they have treated your EU friends, colleagues, neighbours?Channel your energy - be like @davidschneider and become an #EUcitizensChampion 
Theresa May once again fudges her Brexit plans on #Marr. How can the British people trust the PM with so many unanswered questions?If you want the final say on the Brexit deal and the option to stay IN the EU add your name and share:  
Alan Bennett on Andrew Marr talking about Allelujah @_bridgetheatre & being brilliant on Brexit, Trump, Johnson and everything.  
This is hilarious. "Sue the EU".What court? On what grounds?Bad news for anyone who thought Trump may have offered May a magical Brexit solution.  
Theresa May's Brexit plan would mean the UK could not run its own economy, David Davis writes in the FT.   
Why does the BBC Sunday or Daily politics visit Leave voting constituencies and not Remain voting ones? @BBCNews #bbcsp #Brexit 
May does make lot of threats without any real weight; "If I lose just 16 seats Corbyn will be Prime Minister", "If you vote against chequers they'll be no Brexit", and "If you don't take my threats seriously I'll threaten you again". #Brexit #marr 
Changing planes in London en rte Beijing, reading big Sunday Times piece on post-Brexit UK global trade, glorious chance to focus on China, E Asia growth mkts, free of EU shackles. Odd thing: Germany a champion exporter to China. And last time I checked, is in EU.  
To harness the opportunities of Brexit - including free trade agreements with non-EU countries - the UK must have regulatory autonomy to be a credible trading partner, with the ability to improve its own domestic system, says @ShankerASingham of @iealondon 
From a Tory voter, you have lost my vote. You need to stand down in favour of a positive Brexit-supporting PM. 
#BREAKING: THERESA MAY SAYS TRUMP TOLD HER TO ‘SUE THE E.U.’ IN BREXIT TALKS. The “American President” is openly hostile to the world’s greatest global alliances of democracies. From NATO to the E.U., Trump is a greater threat than even Putin himself. 
“Brexit is enormously positive, a huge opportunity for the country,” the problem is that the Prime Minister “is a Remainer who has remained a Remainer,’ says Jacob Rees-Mogg on Theresa May's Chequers planWatch the full interview here →  
"I say to the British people today: I am not going to Brussels to compromise our national interest; I am going to fight for it. I am going to fight for our Brexit deal – because it is the right deal for Britain." - PM @Theresa_May  
Beware this morning’s “swing” amongst the Blair-crowd (Mandy Rawnsley et al) against #Chequers #Brino They speak with forked-tongues and we know where those tongues have been #BrexitBetrayal #Brexit 
Nice fella, apparently police officers are traitors, according to him at the end of the clip - what do we always say? Point a finger at someone and you're pointing three at yourself....just sayin' 
A government we did not vote for.A Brexit we did not vote for.The Scottish Parliament did not consent.What reason is there to continue in a voluntary political union that disrespects and runs roughshod over it's partner?  Answer: None!#DissolveTheUnion #WeAreScotland 
Fintan O'Toole: There is only the horribly complicated, utterly compromised and ultimately humiliating Brexit offered in this week’s White Paper. Would the British people ever have voted for that? There is only one way to find out – ask them. 
British Prime Minister Theresa May says Trump told her to sue the E.U. over Brexit  
Mr Raab is there to deliver Brexit. The Labour FB says that they will deliver Brexit. Both Tories & Labour are bent on harming the UK by Brexit.Will Labour change & support a #PeoplesVote to #StopBrexit ?There is no jobs first Brexit. There is no Brexit dividend.  
Today’s Sunday Times has an EIGHT page magazine piece on ‘Team Brexit’, inside Liam Fox’s Department of International Trade. Great, I thought, I’ve been writing about DIT for 15 months+. But then I read the piece (thread alert)  
A reminder: the reason we have elections& referendum is to prevent people feeling they have to resort to violence achieve the political outcomes they seek. Ignoring democracy has profound potential consequences: there is no real reason why the UK would be immune in perpetuity. 
#bbcsp The #Labour party has already made clear that #TheresaMay’s #Brexit plan, which would tear 80% of our economy out of EU singlemarket and destroy jobs, is unacceptable.  Parliament must take the lead says @Keir_Starmer 
Theresa May brought in ‘establishment elite’ to DESTROY hard Brexit plan, minister reveals! About time the truth was told about the traitors within!! @theresa_may the #NotWhatWeVotedFor Lying traitor!!! 
#Marr @BorisJohnson will be Prime Minister and lead Britain through the Brexit we all voted for. You cannot dupe the people and not expect a REVOLUTION Mrs May. BoJo will lead the peacefull kind. Step aside. The real deal is on the way.  
Trump told Britain to "sue" European Union to speed Brexit, prime minister says  
Donald Trump tells British PM Theresa May his solution to resolve the tense Brexit talks: "Sue the EU"  
Video: a tale of two Toms – Watson’s five-day about-face on May’s Brexit deal  
May repeated on #Marr 'no deal is better than a bad deal' - but the #WhitePaper already cedes major benefits of Brexit - and it's the starting point for negotiations! As talks move forward, it is becoming less and less clear what the PM would consider a bad deal to be. 
UK PM May says Donald Trump told her to sue the EU over Brexit  
MISLEADING: @Jacob_Rees_Mogg tears strips off Theresa May's secretive, clandestine handling of Brexit.'Apparently, we are still taking back control of our laws, money and borders...we will do no such thing.'  
Bed n Brexit#RejectedHostelNames 
Teereza the Appeaser has lied to all sides Brexit Betrayal  
"Brexit can be an opportunity to become a much more competitive economy — not a halfway house that will stifle wealth generation." Former Brexit Secretary @DavidDavisMP previews new IEA report, out tomorrow, in the @FT!  
1. Our current thinking is that the Chequers plan is totally unworkable. It is impractical and incompatible with EU and international law. The EU will reject it - but not immediately. It will use the time to plan for a no deal #Brexit 
David Davis wants a hard brexit wuth a hard border with EU, hugely reduced EU-UK trade, substantially lower growth  & to hammer both goods & services - & deregulation galore plus mythical benefits of other trade deals. This is the brexiter agenda.  via @FT 
"Can we get 1800 watt hoovers....do we get our light bulbs back" Sarah Smith.Cutting edge stuff on Brexit from the BBC as usual 
Donald Trump's former chief strategist Steve Bannon tells LBC Theresa May completely missed the point of the US President's negotiating advice on Brexit to "sue" the EU. Mr Bannon says it's a "weapon, a tool, to go in hard" and "the central point of Brexit is independence." 
Those pushing for ideological version of ‘clean’ #Brexit need to explain how they would deal with the realities of protecting jobs, supply chains & safety. Instead of sabotaging this pragmatic White Paper they shd be honest about the actual risks of their no-deal Brexit 
Brexit plan under THREAT: EU has ‘considerable doubts’ over customs plan, MEP claims  
Theresa May Says Trump Told Her to ‘Sue the E.U.’ in Brexit Talks  
What are the opportunities John? Will Brexit bring better jobs, cheaper cars, better infrastructure, healthcare, education?Do feel free to tell us 
Our Union flag is banned at a British summer gala in #Durham.Unbelievable, MUST SEE!Please watch & Share. #British10k#TheGreatBetrayal#RiversOfBlood#FreeTommyRobinson#FreeTommy#WearAllTommy#marr #Brexit#UKIP#ProactivePatriots 
WATCH | @Jacob_Rees_Mogg: "The government believes that Brexit is not a good thing in itself... She is a Remainer who has remained a Remainer." Support us at  
Trump told Theresa May to SUE the EU: PM reveals 'brutal' Brexit advice from President  
“The Chequers U-turn, failure of the Mansion House test & abandonment of #BrexitMeansBrexit has broken trust. It would’ve been more straightforward to admit that no real Brexit was the intention all along” @Jacob_Rees_Mogg#MayMustGo #ChequersMeansCorbyn 
Tony Blair: “This [Brexit] solution – half in/half out – won't work, won't end the argument and will simply mean a confused outcome... Parliament should reject this decision decisively.” Read and share his comments on the Chequers deal and white paper:  
Brexiteer @Jacob_Rees_Mogg tells @daily_politics he “doesn’t think the PM has respected” her own red lines in her Brexit white paper. 
Incredible that the runaway Brexit Minister argues there could be "significant economic gains for all" when his own departmental reports showed ANY Brexit as detrimental to the country and to living standards.People are sick of the lies.#PeoplesVote 
Theresa May is an EU puppet who has betrayed Brexit. Like and RT if you agree.  
The media is talking about the Chequers 'deal'. It isn't a deal, It's a proposal for a deal full of pie-in-the-sky nonsense cobbled together to stop the govt falling apart. The EU will reject much of it & the UK will stagger on towards a no-deal disaster.#PeoplesVote #Brexit 
Labour Brexiteer @JohnMannMP says @JeremyCorbyn will "lose the working class" if he endorses a second referendum on #Brexit  
DISHONEST: David Davis slams May's Brexit betrayal."None of this really amounts to taking back control." 
If May's goal on #Marr was to sell the #WhitePaper as 'Mansion House tweaked', it was not a successful outing to the BBC. The divergence from original Brexit promises has now been exposed completely. 
Shed a tear for poor old Airbus - agreed to do the Government's dirty work for it on Brexit and then didn't even get a look in on a new RAF contract. Whatever happened to good old crony capitalism?  
6/ short term unity list continued... e) stigmatise racism and xenophobic narratives; f) regime change at Brexit Broadcasting Corporation - end editorial policy of suppressing debate about Brexit because "a done deal" - May clear that not leaving is on agenda 
German judges demolish the legal, political and media strategy against the Catalan referendum  
I am told wrongly we have not worked out a White Paper to match the Government’s.  In 2017 we published a 108 page document entitled “The Road to Brexit” based on the all day experts seminars we held on October 16 2016 and 27 January 2017. 
If the civil service just waved those flags a little harder. Im sure the Brexit unicorns would come galloping over the hills 
5/ Here's my outline of what Labour, Libdems and progressive nationalists could unite on: a) a second referendum b) vote down Brexit white paper c) joint mobilisations for these two objectives d) break up right wing media monopolies... 
House prices in my area have been declining steadily since #brexit.  I'd like to sell my house. Racists are actually costing me thousands of pounds. Who do I go to claim that back? Can we have a racist tax?  
Lexit means Brexit. Don't be taken in by accelerationists who hope they can starve the working class into a revolution. 
Complete nonsense.  Firstly & for the umpteenth time , there is no such thing as a “successful #Brexit”.  So this isn’t “the right deal “ for anyone let alone Scotland - for us this is actually a disastrous deal.  And as for Trump’s endorsement of you as a negotiator…….  
If, two years after the referendum, @theresa_may STILL has to preface every interview answer with “I’ve been very clear...” then the one thing she definitely hasn’t been is clear. I think we can all agree on that. 
The fact that Trump apparently thinks litigation is the answer shows (1) how little he knows or cares about a post-Brexit arrangement, (2) also how he sees the world in zero sum terms, (3) how warring parties and a no deal Brexit would suit his interests  as it undermines the EU 
Sold us outSold your own #Brexit team out#ChequersMeansCorbyn#MAYMUSTGO 
Now its not even a soft Brexit as it's Angela Merkle's Brexit White Paper she is now pushing on our UK.  
What is undeniable is the civil service as a whole have taken to the task of trying to find as many  difficulties as possible that they think might delay or impede Brexit, and have been very shy about finding and tackling all the opportunities that a clean Brexit brings. 
On #Marr @theresa_may sets out why our plan for Brexit is in Britain’s interests, delivers on the referendum result and is negotiable.  
Letters: Theresa May can’t be allowed to push ahead with a Brexit plan that ignores the wishes of voters  
Jacob Rees-Mogg in unprecedented attack on ‘secretive’ May: She ALWAYS wanted soft Brexit  
So after 2 years in the job, Davis still doesn't understand quite basic issues. But these claims will feed the narrative that hard Brexit was perfectly possible, just as easy as Brexiters had always claimed, but the dream (sic) was betrayed. Stand by for many years of this.  
Hearing a Government say "keep your eyes fixed on the prize of Brexit" is like hearing a restaurateur say "keep your eyes fixed on the prize of food poisoning."  
WHY DIDN’T YOU JUST DO YOUR JOB at @ukhomeoffice ?If EU immigration is the issue - that’s your fault.If non-EU immigration is the issue - that’s also your fault.You were head of the @ukhomeoffice for 6 years, in Cabinet, & now @10DowningStreetBrexit is a con!#StopBrexit 
#Ridge John Mann wrong to say only choice will be #theresamay deal or No deal. If May deal is rejected Parlaiament must chose between renegotiating (for a different deal) or reconsidering #brexit entirely. 
BREAKING: UK Prime Minister Theresa May says President Donald Trump told her to "sue the EU" in Brexit talks 
I hate Brexit bc I love Britain 
What right does the PM think she has to take away UK citizens freedoms? I don’t remember that being on the fabricated referendum agenda? 
Season 4 of Brexit. The one where they ran out of ideas and just started writing mad stuff.  
Jesus Christ. John Mann says he's going to prove his socialist credentials by voting for Theresa May's disgusting #Brexit plan. #Ridge #DeselectToryEntryistJohnMann #StopToryBrexit 
Brexit Britain is out of options. Our humiliation is painful to watch | Nick Cohen  
& lastly frictionless trade arises out of Single Market rules and common enforcement for non-tariff barriers..actually Tory Brexiters have started to make the argument that leaving it and CU will “of course” lead to some trade frictions, but that is Brexit. PM can’t say that. 5/5 
Tory MP: "There are literally people ripping up their membership cards. We used to think Theresa understood Brexit, she clearly doesn't." 
Listening to @lbc and farage .. nothing but negativity- if they can’t find anything positive from brexit how on earth can it be sold to the rest of the UK ? Brexit is dying - put  it out of its misery once and for all . 
At last reality dawns.@theresa_may acknowledges that #Brexit may not happen. Mail on Sunday article recognises that staying in EU is default position if warring #torymeltdown factions don't support her. #FBPE #PeoplesVote 
can't believe it's not Brexit  
NEW: Mueller’s investigation reaches Britain. Exclusive insight into UK’s forensic referendum data investigation which is now working with FBI. Cambridge Analytica data ‘accessed from Russia’ 
It looks like those millions of UKIP voters that THOUGHT the Conservatives could be trusted to deliver on Brexit are abandoning May in their droves. UKIP shoot up to 8% in the polls and rising. This will destroy the Conservatives at the polls. #ChequersmeansCorbyn 
Prime Minister Theresa May revealed that the advice President Donald Trump gave her on #Brexit was to "sue the EU."  
British PM May says Donald Trump told her to sue the EU over Brexit  
Poll: Will @theresa_may keep her red lines on #Brexit? She says she will, David Davis claims she wont.Please RT for a larger poll sample 
Trade experts offer alternative that would allow May to tear up 'common rule book' >> the Sunday @Telegraph trails new IEA report out tomorrow, which offers an alternative roadmap to the Brexit #WhitePaper 
Brexit is kind of like getting on a plane BEFORE deciding exactly where you're going, flying around in circles, arguing in flight over the destination, running low on fuel.......and if we don't return to where we started soon.....disaster awaits.#exitfrombrexit 
PM went on #Marr in last ditch effort to shore up her #BrexitBetrayalDidn't workShe just confirmed we're heading for #Brexit in name onlyWe need ONE #BrexitCoalition candidate in each seat to ensure the 17.4m can vote in a #BrexitGovernment to deliver the Brexit they voted for 
U said #Brexit means Brexit but what U really meant was Brexit means remain, the plan all along was get a bad deal so we can vote again & hey presto we remain part of greater Germany, The Torys wont recover from this & your legacy of worst home sec ever will also be worst PM ever 
Theresa May's message to critics of her #Brexit plan: I will deliver for people who "feel passionately about leaving the EU"... but "I've got to be hard-headed and practical" #Marr 
This is a key and fundamental point that #Brexit supporters keep ignoring or simply do not understand.  
WATCH | May confirms that she won't walk away from Brexit negotiations. That means no deal is off the table - a terrible negotiating strategy and one that will leave us with the worst possible deal. How could she get Brexit so wrong? Support us at  
Typical BBC interview: Hard Brexit fan #Marr asks Theresa May critical questions about the negotiations but never questions the wisdom of Brexit. Then at length he wants to know about the UK's abilty to do its own trade deals. No questions to the pm about the UKs failing economy  
Thought @theresa_may was extremely good on #Brexit #Marr. I welcome the #WhitePaper (tho it has failings) - certainly big step in the right direction ie facing up to #BrexitReality & needs of our manufacturing sector@#jobs #prosperity 
Once the terms of the Brexit deal are known, there...SHOULD be a public vote between accepting the deal or leaving without one: 25%SHOULD be a public vote between accepting the deal or remaining in the EU: 25%SHOULD NOT be a public vote: 33%via @OpiniumResearch 
Our plan for Brexit means that we will deliver on the referendum result, regaining control of our borders, laws and money - whilst also protecting jobs and our prosperity Find our more at  
#marr To elaborate: PM May said she rejected President Trump's suggestion to sue the EU instead of negotiate with them;she added that he advised once you start negotiating, then do not walk away or else you're "stuck". So "no deal" should not be an option in #Brexit  
EU institutions can be “sued” of course by individuals via the EU Treaties & the direct jurisdiction of the ECJ. A rules based order which Trump’s politics seek to trample all over #marr #brexit 
Theresa May’s threat — that people should prop her failing political career up or we won’t get Brexit — is the least smart of her moves in recent months.WE, the people, have decided we wanted to leave the European Union. It will happen with or without you, @theresa_may. 
Point being there was never any intention whatsoever under Theresa May of walking away from the table and the EU knows it, what she's actually done is secured a softest of soft #Brexit as the backstop that's still up for negotiation, disastrous.#Marr 
BFE: @peoplesvote_uk March for the Future takes place on October 20th! You can express YOUR plan to JOIN US here:  and once you've done that, sign and share the petition calling for a PUBLIC VOTE on the Brexit Deal:   
JUST IN: British Prime Minister Theresa May says President Donald Trump told her to sue the European Union rather than negotiate over Brexit 
It’s clear that this deal does not give us the freedom to market ourselves independently to the rest of the world - a key benefit of Brexit.It is a halfway house that will leave us subject to the EU’s rules – whatever they are in future – with no say in their formulation. #Marr 
As Theresa May tries to explain her botched Brexit plan on #Marr, here's reminder of who she has chosen to lead the negotiations... 
Donald Trump's #Brexit advice to Theresa May?"He told me I should sue the EU" #Marr 
Trump's advice to Trump on brexit talks:  Sue the EU////He thinks brexit is a property deal for which both sides should 'lawyer up'#marr 
There is no majority in Parliament for the Prime Minister’s Brexit, a Jacob Rees-Mogg ‘hard Brexit’ or a ‘no deal’ Brexit favoured by many of the ERG, but there is a Commons majority for the UK to participate in the EU customs union if some Tory MPs put country before party #Marr 
It’s easy to attack the White Paper as not hard Brexit. It isn’t. The scrutiny of the white paper should  be 1) does it fulfill leaving the EU (the referendum question) ? 2) is it as good for Britain as possible while fulfilling 1) ? #marr 
The PM can chant as many times as she likes that her Brexit proposals are a good deal for the UK but she is royally screwing services businesses by leaving them - 80% of our economy - out of her plan. Today’s Tory party: anti-worker and anti-business. Quite an achievement #Marr 
“So if we’re going to find something that was in Britain’s interest, that delivered on the referendum and that was negotiable – we had to make, what is a compromise but is a positive.” @theresa_may #marr 
Here's a thing. Over 3 million EU citizens are affected by Brexit and they need our support. Become an #EUCitizensChampion and help at . Cheers! 
Listening to Theresa May and her latest chaotic deluded plans for Brexit the only thing you can conclude is - what an absolute disaster for us, Scotland. #Marr 
Reminder that while May tells Marr viewers she is keeping to her red line on ECJ, the former Brexit Secretary, former Dexeu minister and former Dexeu chief of staff say she isn’t 
WATCH: Alan Bennett, History Boys author, says that in a #PeoplesVote, the public would vote against Brexit because "they're so bored with it". We were told Brexit was going to be easy. As new facts come to light, we need a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal. Please RT:  
TRUE: People will feel 'royally shafted' by Theresa May's Brexit plan, says Tory MP @OwenPaterson."If this is the deal that's being offered, I will definitely vote against it." 
Selling innovative jam to Vietnam won’t offset loss of Airbus, car industry and our financial services.That’s Brexit in a nutshell. 
Boris' support from mendacious US figures like Steve Bannon and the President himself come as no surprise. The same shadowy network that created Trump also created Brexit. We need to #Resist both. 
I don't normally weigh in on politics,  but I notice in the Sunday papers that Theresa May appears to claim something like "Back me or Brexit won't happen."Isn't that like your mother saying "Clean your room or I'll give you loads of chocolate."? 
@theresa_may the worst Conservative PM in history. Because of her and her pet snake @michaelgove I've cancelled my @Conservatives party membership. Lies, lies, lies, faux brexit, faux Conservativism #Marr #MayMustGo 
#TheresaMay wrestling with the key dilemma of #Brexit - distance Britain from EU, and take a huge economic hitOR- stay close, but have to follow EU rules without having a say on them. Neither is good for #Britain#ChequersPlan does the 1st for services & the 2nd for goods 
Take a good long look at @theresa_may on #MarrEither she goes or Brexit is crushed,A sad apology for a Prime Minister. 
Good to see Sadiq Khan, Mayor of London & senior Labour Party figure, keeping open the idea of a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal #Marr 
Britain’s Brexit dilemma: are Leavers losing faith?  
BREAKING NEWS: In the UK, Brexit Boredom is now the third commonest cause of death 
Alan Bennett: "If there was another referendum people wouldn't vote for #Brexit because they're now so bored with it."He's right. Brexit is a monumentally stupid waste of time and energy. The worst thing that's happened to our country since the war.#Marr 
So May says:Option 1) Hard Brexit is not on the table. The ONLY Brexit isOption 2) May's  #ChequersFudgeBrexit. It's neither hard nor soft. It's chewy, sticks in your throat & worse for you than sugar. The good news is if we reject it, we getOption 3) No Brexit at all3) Pls 
The marvellous Alan Barnett on #Brexit @AndrewMarr9 #Marr “the idea that with one bound we’d be out was nonsense then and is nonsense now” 
Read this & watch more on @gmb tomorrow. With more insight on Brexit, trade deal, immigration. Trump spilling his private conversation with the Queen. And.- with his critics in mind - an explanation by @piersmorgan of how he conducts these interviews. 
SURGE: UKIP is rising in the polls, currently on 8%.The Brexit-blocking establishment better watch out. 
DD: May’s Chequers Plan is Not Brexit  pic.twitter.com/Ww2xoyckMH 
No better example of how the BBC is biased for Remain; Andrew Marr describes the fringe and flatlining #PeoplesVote and #FBPE movement as "large and growing". What rubbish! #marr #brexit  
Taking Back Sovereignty ... The Brexit Way!  
This country is on the brink of the most radical progressive once in a lifetime dream, Politics of Hope Corbyn in No10as Tories Slump in the Polls Theresa the Appeaserthe Betrayal of BrexitEU HumilationWankingTrumpBozo#marr 
That was the point of Brexit  
Sadiq Khan refuses to back a second EU referendum and says what he wants is a good Brexit deal. London voted 60-40 for Remain. 
Have been saying for a while now that UKIP voters who backed Con in 2017 would be likely to turn against them at some point because their expectations re: Brexit were impossible to meet. Perhaps that point has arrived. Need more polls to confirm though.  
I say to the British people: You have betrayed Brexit, betrayed the National interest and are fighting for the will of Brussels. Resign.  
BREAKING: Jacob Rees-Mogg in unprecedented attack on ‘secretive’ May: She ALWAYS wanted soft #BrexitWhy are you not one of the many that has written a letter to the 1922 Committee then @Jacob_Rees_Mogg ?#MayMustGo #GetHerOut 
I'm British shall I tell you what embarrasses me:Brexit Poverty Katie Hopkins UKIP Homelessness Racism Tommy Robinson fans What doesn't embarrass me:A giant balloon and 250,000 people marching against racism, bigotry and facism. #TrumpUKVisit #Marr 
SCATHING: Ex-minister Steve Baker says there's a 'cloak and dagger' establishment plot to thwart Brexit.'It does appear to me that there has been a year’s worth of cloak and dagger to land us into the Chequers position.' 
Her analysis is spot on - @ayeshahazarika @AndrewMarr9 @BBCOne We have reached a #Brexit impasse with @theresa_may #WhitePaper stuck up a cul de sac - the only way out is @peoplesvote_uk 
chlorine chicken and hormone beef make an appearance on #Marr. These are at the heart of Brexit - a deal with the US means slashing regulations on food safety, workers rights and the environment. A deal with the EU (or staying in the EU) means retaining them. What do you want? 
Ex-DEXEU minister, Steve Baker launches a scathing attack on the Government, revealing how the Brexit department was a "Potemkin" structure with the real strings being pulled by the Cabinet Office Europe Unit - run by Remainer Olly Robbins - who wanted a fake Brexit all along.  
“I” love my job more than Brexit  
Theresa May: My deal is the only Brexit deal - wreck it at your perilTory MP in marginal seat: *looks at latest polling*Tory MP in marginal seat: Back your 'deal' or lose my seats? I know what I'm going for 
Gov't should try to implement Brexit, not placate Parliament; if they collapse in the process, the people can step in, end the farce, make the ensuing GE about Brexit and ram Parliament with Brexiters.Where there's a will, there's a way. 
Platell says Mail has had "sackloads and sackloads of mail" attacking May's #Brexit.The Mail's ageing readership hasn't discovered email yet, let alone texting! #Marr 
The political cliff edge is a longer drop than the economic one. #Brexit  
It's in our national interest to remain in the EU: as a full member of the top-table with all of our hard-won rebates, opt-outs and vetos. Brexit of any kind will be hugely damaging to everyone except a rich minority and our enemies. 
#MarrShow - err, nope millions of us agreed with #Trumps comments on Brexit during his visit - we did not feel remotely feel sorry for #May who is doing her utmost to derail #Brexit 
He also lied to say he was at his Scottish golf course the day before Brexit referendum and predicted the result. There’s ample proof that he literally arrived the day AFTER the vote. He’s a shameless liar. He then repeated the same lie despite the evidence 
Great to be back at @MarrShow where I’ll be speaking about how time is running out for the Government to secure a #Brexit deal that works for business. Watch live here: #marr 
Oh look. Theresa May so desperate she is to use #MARRSHOW to try and convince her MPs to embrace her betrayal of Brexit. Watch her lie with a straight face. 
The prime minister has issued a stark warning to MPs that failure to back her plan for Brexit would risk the UK not leaving the EU at all  
Back my plan or face no Brexit at all, Theresa May tells rebels | David Davis brands Downing Street ‘dishonest’ | Steve Baker exposes Whitehall’s secret 'cloak and dagger' plot to foil Brexit | Jacob Rees-Mogg makes his most outspoken attack yet on PM  
Brexiters Baker and Davies rage - but May is forced to half-in,half-out Brexit to avoid economic calamity at price of surrendering control. Instead we must remain and retain control.Peoples vote inevitable. But to win it we must promise to change Britain  
Theresa May's Brexit in Name Only is worse than staying in the EU. Much worse. We are being conned 
Project Fear is alive and well as it transpires that senior Remainers in the government colluded with Airbus over its calls to negotiate a soft Brexit. We shouldn't be surprised, yet somehow Theresa May's duplicity gets worse with each passing day. She's an utter disgrace!  
Been banging on about this for a while but here it is again: an all-party group should be negotiating Brexit deal, not just one minority party. Otherwise, what we’ll get will be a shit-up. 
British PM May warns rebels: Back me or risk 'no Brexit at all'  
Theresa May: 'We risk ending up with no Brexit at all'Yippee!!!!!   
If May seriously believes that her White Paper has outcomes that are “non negotiable” then she is in for a bitter disappointment ....PM Theresa May warns party not to put #Brexit  at risk - BBC News  
How dare she say that she will cancel Brexit. How dare a PM say that the delivery of a referendum vote will be denied. That alone makes the tories unworthy of a vote.  
Please be aware. Theresa May's offer to the EU27 is not a Soft Brexit. It's Hard Brexit cakeism. It's only Soft Brexit if it includes Single Market membership, which requires freedom of Movement.#FBPE 
It’s been reported that if @theresa_may’s “deal” is rejected then there will be ‘no Brexit’ NOT ‘no deal’. So, here’s the question:Why would those @UKLabour Centrists, who have been so desperate for @jeremycorbyn to “stop Brexit” now vote FOR Theresa’s deal? #Marr #Ridge 
Wouldn't it be better to admit, while there's still time, that all the Brexit options point to disaster, and the campaign in which you were instrumental was simply a huge mistake?  
Time is running out to secure a #Brexit deal that works for business. I’ve written to the Prime Minister about the misguided Brexit White Paper which ignores the importance of services & risks damage to jobs & our economy. Tune in to @MarrShow for more: 
Rees-Mogg:"The Chequers U-turn, failure of Mansion House test & abandonment of ‘Brexit means Brexit’ has broken trust.No real #Brexit was the intention all along...Perhaps we ought to have realised earlier on that a Remainer would stick with Remain.”#EU 
London this weekend.Anti Trump march and demos.Anti racism unity march.Free Tommy Robinson demoPro Trump rally.Anti FaI was part of or witnessed all of them. At one point 3 of them at the same timeMPs wake up!Brexit is a tool of the far right. You know this.#StopBrexit 
Theresa May's 'back me or no Brexit' threat is the final nail in the Tory coffin. It's one thing to have Brexit thwarted by Parliament, quite another to thwart it herself. 
There were No Arrests, and NO litter after the #peoplesvotemarch.The only agro came from Tommy Robinson nazis, verbally abusing some pensioners.@theresaMay ..these are your 'Will of the People' people.You are doing Brexit for them. And Trump. And Fascist FarageMazel tov! 
Liam Fox says those who protested Trump's visit embarrassed themselves and the country.We stood up to a tyrant, in defence of ourselves and allies. We did this without violence or weapons.After 2 years of his Brexit mess humiliating the country, we gave it back some pride. 
Reports suggest that there are enough Labour ‘centrists’ willing to vote for Theresa May’s brexit plan ‘in the national interest’ to see it through. Outside of a war situation, under any and all circumstances, Labour must vote against the Tory Party. There is no common interest. 
I’m still on holiday but I found your Brexit dream and it’s not looking well @BorisJohnson @BorisJohnson_MP 
As I’ve been explaining for some time, the government line is now take whatever deal May gets. The alternative is no Brexit, not no deal, says Downing Street. ‘No deal better than bad deal’ is yesterday’s slogan. Tory Brexiteers not yet convinced.  
You cannot please the fanatical Brexiters. That was always a lost cause.Your only hope is to side now with Remain, and keep us in the EU. @theresa_may, you honoured the referendum - you gave it your best shot. But no-one is obliged to promise the impossible.Withdraw A50.  
So May and her key allies deliberately procured the alarmist words on Brexit from Airbus. The more we learn of her ways the worse it gets.  
Morten Morland on Donald Trump’s criticism of Theresa May over her handling of Brexit in an interview with the Sun - Political Cartoon Gallery in Putney  
This blistering, & right. Fortunately there IS a door out of the burning building: the Stop Brexit option. And we must do everything - everything - in our power to take it. “Brexit Britain is out of options. Our humiliation is painful to watch | Nick Cohen  
My view on the #ChequersPlan has “evolved” into one of extreme worry and concern that the Brexit my voters backed simply cannot be delivered if we follow this plan, writes Tory MP @nigelmp 
This is right. However because Brexit is taking all the energy from our politics none of these issues are being addressed. Time to get tough on Brexit tough on the causes of Brexit  
The poll results vindicate - yet again - Corbyn's highly intelligent and nuanced approach to the thorny Brexit issue.  
Betty thinks Brexit’s a “very complex problem” Trump told ⁦@piersmorgan⁩. She’s also discovered water is wet 
Why this pathetic attempt to convince us you're doing the right thing?  I've read the white paper in it's entirety, and conclude it's most definitely not #Brexit....Just a rehash and name change of things. No pro-Brexit MP's in cabinet? Speaks volumes.  Just resign eh? 
PM says"We can #LEAVE in name only."Or"We don't #LEAVE at all."There is a third way Theresa.You could deliver the #Brexit we voted for.No more Single Mkt or Customs Union.No ECJNo open door immigrationNo payments to EUGet ALL our fish backNo more EU laws & regulations  
In over 2 years the Brexiters have utterly failed to come up with a plan for Britain post-#Brexit. So we are going to take back control. We will make our own plan for building a better Britain without #Brexit. Watch this space for our announcement later today! #gnsbc 
Mail promoting Jeremy Corbyn as leader of the anti-Trump movement. Theresa May holding hands with Trump after he slagged off her #Brexit deal. Novichok story unravelling. Douma "chemical attack" that wasn't. 4% Labour lead in latest poll. All-in-all, a good week for Corbyn. #Marr 
I say to Theresa May today (and every day): Brexit is not in the national interest. And, shamefully, you damn well know it.  
Your paper sold #Brexit outYour paper sold your own Brexit department outChequersMeansCorbyn #MAYMUSTGO 
May: "We risk ending up with no #brexit at all"Or put a different way. "We could end up guaranteeing the security and the economic future of this country for generations to come".Sounds ok to me #marr  #bbcsp 
I say to the British people today: I am not going to Brussels to compromise our national interest; I am going to fight for it. I am going to fight for our Brexit deal – because it is the right deal for Britain.  
Surely Airbus can't have somehow been led to believe that attacking Brexit as ministers wanted would win the company a favourable hearing on public contracts?  
What is standing in the way of the Brexit sunlight uplands? Reality? Nope, it’s Irish border farmers. Dominic Lawson....  
Sunday Telegraph’s dynamite splash by @edwardmalnick: Theresa May's secret 'cloak and dagger' plot to foil Brexit revealed by minister who quit in protest  via @Telegraph 
This is what happens when the Tory party has to confront some realities —  the fantasist UKIP faction they absorbed now splinters off again.Brexit is politically unworkable *within* the UK. Time to ditch it.  
Grateful to have such friends as you in England, Katie.There is an awakening English, Irish & Scottish Silent Majority, thanks to the brilliant efforts of you and other greats in the transformative era of Trump and the dawn of Brexit.#MAGA #Trump #Brexit #TrumpVisitsUK 
Twelve arrests as Tommy Robinson activists descend on WhitehallBritish fascism is back as Brexit unleashes dark nationalist sentiment and undermines the rule of law#StopBrexit 
Government has promised a world-leading watchdog that will deliver a green Brexit.  But current proposals are too weak and our environment will be less protected – you can help change this:  #NatureLaws 
Something for all Tory MP's to think about. PM May's "Back me or no Brexit" Why is PM May threating the voters of UK but not the undemocratic EU? One can only surmise she works for Brussels.  
Despite Steve Baker’s self-aggrandisement he should never have been in government and was the architect of Vote Leave illegal spendingHis attempt to slur the ‘establishment’ is a classic misdirection away from the #Brexit power grab#Brexitgate 
Photo caption: "An anti-Brexit demonstrator outside the Houses of Parliament."Dear @paulkrugman @nytimes @nytopinionThank you for excellent article on Brexit.You really should come meet Steve Bray at @SODEMAction protest every day outside parliament. 
Does Mandelson actually believe this? Has he interrogated its truth?Brexit must never become a game wealthy ideologues play to win. We must never make common cause with those who would deregulate away the NHS. And it's never right to co-opt the narratives of our opponents.  
#Brexit is like going back to Windows 3.1 
Brexit would be easy they said.  
This country is on the brink of the most radical progressive once in a lifetime dream, Politics of Hope Corbyn in No10as Tories Slump in the Polls Theresa the Appeaserthe Betrayal of BrexitEU HumilationWankingTrumpBozo 
Jacob Rees-Mogg in unprecedented attack on ‘secretive’ May: She ALWAYS wanted soft Brexit  
"A secret source in the Kremlin, who two years earlier had regularly provided information to an American official in the US embassy, had warned that a massive operation TARGETING WESTERN DEMOCRACIES was being planned." 
Nigel Farage Says Brexit Betrayal Falls On Theresa May: ‘She’s Not Up To The Job’  
Did anyone ever figure out why Trump decided to take that bizarre 36 hour trip to Scotland right around the Brexit vote? Considering Papadopoulos was running around Britain during the spring and summer of 2016 trying to arrange a Russian meet w Trump someone should look into it.. 
Cracking article on #Brexit: 
Good!  Keep going Remainers - keep refusing to accept her "deal".@ChukaUmunna @Anna_Soubry that includes you - stop blithering on about soft brexit and get in the fight to #stopbrexit full stop 
Brexit is sentencing the UK's financial services industry to a long slow death  via @bopinion 
I think Davis should have insisted that Robbins, Winter, Brockbank and Billing were removed from the Brexit team as soon as he realised they were undermining him and cooperating with the EU to get a KitKat Brexit. He should not have allowed them to continue sabotaging Brexit. 
Brexit: Theresa May warns EU exit may not happen 'at all' if rebel Tories don't play ball  
GB, Deltapoll poll:LAB-S&D: 42% (+1)CON-ECR: 37% (-4)Field work: 30/05/18-01/06/18Sample size: 1,013#Brexit 
The thing is, it is possible to see that Corbyn is a Brexit supporting fraud and not like the Tory party.  Congratulations on being yet another Corbynista drone who hasn’t realised this.  Oh and no, it’s not our fault if the Tories get elected, we don’t owe Labour our vote. 
Theresa May's secret 'cloak and dagger' plot to foil Brexit revealed by minister who quit in protest  via @Telegraph 
"Politicians across parliament know it but dare not say it. The referendum result prevents them from speaking out, as it prevents them from even having a Mueller-style inquiry into Russian interference in our referendum." 
Easily the most relevant and important piece on journalism and its essential purpose in the current polity. How the BBC Lost the Plot on Brexit by @NickCohen4  via @nybooks 
As BBC hosts hard-right tax averse money-hoader @Jacob_Rees_Mogg on @daily_politics for the millionth time (despite only being a backbencher) would decent people ask him how much he would gain from an insane hard Brexit?I've asked him 11 timesPls RT  
We need scientific minds to tackle Brexit because our politicians ‘can’t think clearly’, says Prof Brian Cox | The Independent  
Theresa May warns there could be 'no Brexit at all', as Donald Trump says he spoke about it with the Queen  
OPINION: ANGELA Merkel’s virtue signalling has weakened the European Union, fuelled Brexit and spurred the far-right. The US President is the only one with the audacity to say it, writes @MirandaDevine. 
"Gov is betraying 17.4m #Brexit  votersNo surprise that people are now switching their support to UKIPPM has to finally start listening to her MPs  & publicNeeds to do it fastOtherwise it won’t be just her that’s toast – but the Tory party too”Yikes… 
#MayMustGoNow you @CCHQLondon decided Theresa May was the answer to YOUR question. "How do we stop Brexit?"You sidelined @DavidDavisMP & covertly used Olly Robbins.Now YOU face 17.4m people TELLING YOU, #BRINO or REMAIN ARE  UNACCEPTABLE.@BorisJohnson 
‘Theresa May has presided over a “cloak and dagger” plot to undermine Brexit, in a move that will “blow apart” public trust in democracy, the Prime Minister’s former Brexit minister has told The Telegraph’ 
Trump says he will run for reelection, had Brexit chat with Queen Elizabeth  
May warns there could be 'no Brexit at all' - Mail on Sunday  
Justice is coming for you, Julian Assange.#TrumpRussia#Brexith/t @911CORLEBRA777 
Whoever would have guessed that deliberately spitting in the faces of 17,410,742 votes and trying to play them for fools over 'Brexit' would not be a vote winner?Well, clearly Theresa May didn't.She's toast.Viva Real Brexit!@theresa_may 
What President Trump said about Prime Minister May, Brexit and "England"  
Canada's @JustinTrudeau has openly stated that #Canada and the #UK can go beyond a #Brexit agreement for “an even larger or more impactful deal”, potentially including visa arrangements & freer movement.#CANZUK #cdnpoli #auspol #nzpol #UKpolitics 
May in an article today claims that to vote against her Brexit plan would risk no Brexit. She also plays up Trump’s ludicrous claim that she is a tough negotiator and says she will not compromise with Brussels. Is she mad? She has done nothing but compromise or surrender. Out! 
The original Brexit  
TRANSLATION: As complicit treason-weasels in #Hollyweird continue to demagogue the Globalist Left for "another victory notch in the #NWO's belt & another milestone in our enemies' campaign to tear America apart"-UK Patriots welcome @POTUS to their nation. #MAGA  #Brexit   
Please support @ClaraPonsati via  link below.  Academic at #UniversityofStAndrews  & Education Minister of #Catalonia, she faces poss. lifetime in prison 4 her part in allowing her constituents to express their opinion on self-determination in a referendum  
Latest polling shows Corbyn playing Brexit hand just right  
#MayoVotes Your messiah has deigned to descend on a cloud of big money to save you from socialist solar panels,Tesla batteries, penalty rates, minimum wage, social security & the ABC. She absolutely loves Margaret Thatcher, Brexit & Trump so you get extra lucky!  
The #British people are now waking up to the fact that #TheresaMay has been running a #FakeBrexit #SCAM for two years so #Britain never leaves the EU! She is now trying to #BLACKMAIL all of us into accepting her #TURD Deal! #BREXIT #MayMustGo #BBC #SKY #LBC @ConHome @CCHQPress 
#TheresaMay has plotted with Foreign Powers to destroy #BREXIT! She is now attempting to #BLACKMAIL the #British people! @theresa_may the TREACHEROUS LYING SCUMBAG must GO! #MayMustGo #BBC #SKY #LBC @ConHome @CCHQPress #ConservativeParty @Conservatives @DCBMEP @andreajenkyns 
If Trump has helped push Theresa May into a more icy #Brexit, suspect Her Majesty, who quietly supported #Brexit, will welcome the Trumps back with open arms #LeaveMeansLeave 
Theresa May warns Brexit may not happen 'at all' if rebel Tories don't play ball  
A devastating and damning indictment of the Prime Minister's EU-friendly Brexit proposals. Conservatives must stand up and defend the Brexit voted for by the British people.  via @Telegraph 
Nobody is coming up with an alternative to May’s Brexit. Errr......#remain? #FBPE 
I’ve seen this guy at various demos recently. He was forming a counter demo at the ‘people’s vote for Brexit’ whilst encouraging what seemed to be his teenage daughter to elbow elderly protesters in the back. 
Jacob Rees-Mogg in unprecedented attack on ‘secretive’ May: She ALWAYS wanted soft Brexit . Well said Jacob. Welcome back. Now sling her out and save the Tory party because most tories won't vote with her as leader.  
‘It’s my way or the highway’ says Theresa May.  We’ll take the highway thanks, a proper Brexit leaving under WTO rules.  ‘No deal’ means we fall back on the same rules that the EU uses for 6 out of 10 of EU’s largest trading partners - including USA & China - WTO rules..  
Fred Rogers used to say that in dark situations - "Look for the helpers"And in these days with tRump, Putin, Brexit, white supremacy, the resurgent mysogeny of anti-choicers, etc...Look for the Resisters!#TheResistance #NotMyPresident 
Nigel Farage ~ Theresa May GONE in the Next Two WeeksWatch this video here: #QAnon #GoodbyeDemocrats #WhatIsQ #GreatAwakening #Brexit #Treason #PresidentTrump 
And maybe Cambridge Analytica was nothing more than cut-out for Russians to elect Trump & Brexit.  
“This is not the Brexit that people voted for" is the one phrase that the British Government did not want Trump to say. His intervention has come as a bombshell to the establishment. - @Nigel_Farage 
I voted for the UK to be free of all direct and indirect eu control. Don’t you dare tell me Brexit is off because your Brino deal offering is the only option I am absolutely happy to vote the tories out on your betrayal of the referendum and Brexit delivery. Vote UKIP  
“Or No Brexit at all” - PM  
“...brexit won’t happen”. Not only is this not a thought crime, it’s now an openly touted option from the PM herself. So have we, really, decided to do it you have to ask!? 
Soon Jeremy Corbyn will offer us all a wonderful version of Brexit. One that is unbelievably palatable but will still be at the ‘wish list’ fase and not agreed by the EU. He will however want you to vote for him first and take him on his word. That would be foolish  
The @BBC has all but ignored the scandals around the Brexit referendum. Now, the editor of the @FT and the former editor of the @guardian are sharing this article on @BBCNews’s woeful Brexit reporting:  
Oh, the other thing that made me laugh tonight on #bbcpapers was ex government minister #StephenBaker resigning over #Brexit because it was being undone by "establishment elites."But he was a government minister, wasn't he a ...#bbcpapers 
I'm in UK it was huge, Big Screens with great speakers & guests.@potus was honoured on Screen.Strange no #MSM unlike yesterday, which was the anti Brexit lot. Media shows us real time it's PROPOGANDA! You're support has been fantastic.   
Not worried enough to tell the truth about the damage Brexit would to the NorthEast and throw his weight behind stopping it. All because he’s scared that being honest might lose him votes. Corbyn is putting party before country, just like the Tories. #stopBrexit #savejobs 
Donald Trump when asked about Brexit: “nobody had any idea how complex that was going to be.”  
The task for Theresa May and the EU is to ensure that Brexit does not descend into anarchy   
Brexit Britain is out of options. Our humiliation is painful to watch.“Brexit Britain is a burning building with no exits. The alarms ring but no rescuers come,” writes ⁦@NickCohen4⁩.We need to find a way out. Hold a #PeoplesVote to #StopBrexit. 
Theresa May: "Our Brexit deal is not some long wish-list from which negotiators get to pick and choose. It is a complete plan with a set of outcomes that are non-negotiable."  Apparently she is embarking on negotiations about something that is non-negotiable. Good luck with that. 
RW press are itchy …. Theresa May has allegedly said (words to effect of) "back my Chequers Brexit plan or Brexit might not happen"How would you feel if Brexit didn't happen? RT THIS THANKS! 
Sounds good to me Mrs Brexit means Brexit.Now just sod off and take your dodgy #Brexit with you.#GE2018Now 
May has deceived not just us, but even her own MPs.All while she was mobilising them to defeat Lords' Brexit-wrecking amendments in HoC, so as to preserve a plausible-*sounding* Brexit, she was presiding over the secret plot to bypass DExEU & procure a Soft-Remain (non)-Brexit. 
Trump was right about May's phony Brexit. Revealed last week, May’s plan doesn’t really take us out of the European Union. It’s BRINO—Brexit in Name Only.   
@POTUS makes no secret that the slow Brexit will effect trade with UK. Brits voted for Brexit, and Theresa May needs to work for her nation; not against it.In UK, Trump throws fuel onto Britain's fiery political debate over Brexit 
LISTEN FRIENDS... #PatriotVet & LOYAL TRUMP SUPPORTER ~ he’s got a word for ya & #Brexit too #BeTommyRobinson #IngloriousPatriots #KAG#Cult45 #AmericaFirst .@realDonaldTrump @Nigel_Farage  
German court is not cooperating with Spanish court to criminalize such democratic proces as a referendum. Democracy is not rebellion, it's fulfilling of will of citizens.  
Doesn’t she understand? We don’t want ANY ties to the EU! If they want a deal after Brexit, they can get in the queue. The EU has a lot more to lose than Britain   
There's going to be a tipping point, the BBC's Brexit bias is going to be a massive scandal with long term repercussions for it.  
Too bad your first priority wasn't stopping austerity before the EU referendum because then there would have been a chance that this madness would never have started.  
Britain's May warns there could be 'no Brexit at all': Mail on Sunday  
It’s a bit of a blow to our national democratic credentials that last year over 80% of electors voted for parties promising full Brexit and now it turns out nearly 80% of MPs are unwilling - or too timid - to deliver it. As EU might say, “There will of course be consequences.” 
@BBCNews has failed the country on Brexit. Casuistically invoking a bogus version of "impartiality" - as if truth/lie, bald assertion/verified point, honesty/dishonesty were equally valid - it has not held to account, scrutinised with due diligence, or exposed clanging falsities. 
I may have mentioned before that Corbyn is a complete fraud. Been out with some Corbynistas tonight and none of them knew he was pro Brexit, all they could do was slag off Blair. This is what we’re up against. I despair.  
Find me a poll that says a party that opposes Brexit in all of its manifestations will win the next general election. You can't b/c the people don't want that. But what does exist at is Labour polling at 40% to the Tories 36% You don't want to stop #Brexit,you want to stop Corbyn  
“Back my Chequers Plan or Brexit won’t happen “? The woman’s insane! Maybe HER Brexit won’t happen, hopefully not  because her plan is NOT Brexit in any way shape or form We’re happy to leave no deal WTO. Massive deal with USA and over 100 other countries! @Conservatives WAKE UP! 
Resigned DExEU Minister of States Steve Baker's revelations tonight about May's leadership of the pro-EU Establishment plot to foil Brexit have blown this pack of lies out of the water.No-one should believe a word she says.   
Theresa May has threatened Tory MP’s to back herWhite paper saying if they don’t  the U.K. may remain in the EU.What a surprise.It’s time for Brexit backing MP’s to give her her cards.She is despicable and has lied repeatedly to the BritishPeople.Please impeach the bitch. 
Wow. Seems this will be a bombshell interview on many levels when it airs. But in particular on #Brexit - @realDonaldTrump - “Oh I think we’re going to have a great trade deal, I’ve really no doubt about it. We’re going to get it.“ cc @piersmorgan 
Why have you never voiced the benefits of Brexit? Why have you never shown an ounce of enthusiasm for the opportunities that Brexit presents? Why did you agree to the EU agenda at the start? @theresa_may 
More front than Brighton pier !!Theresa May has to go, clearly not fit for high office.#Brexit  
Tonight things are looking more hopeful. It's obvious that a large chunk of #Tory MPs won't back @theresa_may so the only logical conclusion is... #Brexit won't happen. Meanwhile we keep banging the drum to #stopbrexitsavedemocracy#FinalSayForAll #PeoplesVotePetition 
Stephanie, are you planning to delete your bizarre lie trying to cover up for Trump's lie when he falsely claimed that he was in the UK before the Brexit vote? It is painfully clear that he arrived on June 24th, the morning after the vote. Please delete your tweet and correct it.  
Newspaper headlines: PM warns 'there may be no Brexit'  
You might be @jeremycorbyn but unless you start opposing Brexit you will not get  votes-#StopBrexit #PeoplesVote #FBPE 
First of all, there is no Brexit anyway due to her EU appeasing deal and the EU couldn’t possibly water it down any more since she’s given them everything they wanted. They’re all too busy laughing and high fiving each other over her weakness and stupidity. #MAYMUSTGO 
Here is my letter to all Tory MPs re our position on Brexit - time to unite and back Britain.  
I love the UK but we need to understand who really are our Allies. Donald Tusk has said since Brexit that the EU wants us and sees us as incredibly important to the EU, Trumps USA is trying to destroy years of alliance. What is his agenda? 
The Queen, as ever, spot on. Brexit is a very complex problem,’ Trump says she told him. As good as her ‘why did no one see it coming?’ after the financial crash 
Thresa May admits for the first time that Brexit could be cancelled.Check her article on the Mail on Sunday:We risk ending up with no Brexit at all.About time!!!!!  
The BBC’s reporting of the scandals around the Brexit referendum is not biased or unbalanced: it barely exists.   
OMG, it gets even worse. After inveigling Airbus into issuing dire warnings about Brexit, Govt then turned round & shafted them by awarding a £2bn RAF contract to Boeing instead.What a bunch of duplicitous shysters.#SackThemAll#MayMustGoNow  
And therein lies the problem. Brexit means Exit. But Mrs May cannot accept that. 
• President Trump’s views on the Queen• Brexit • Kim Jong-Un• Exclusive footage of Air Force One  Don’t miss @piersmorgan’s EXCLUSIVE interview with @realDonaldTrump FIRST @GMB Monday at 6am @ITV 
I hope Penny Mordaunt does quit. She was a great campaigner in the referendum. In her heart she must realise how the PM  is behaving is profoundly wrong  
Got to turn #SkyPapers off.That's not a paper review, that's a #Brexit propaganda session, by a paid shill.We can still smell the death from before, @rachshabi, but you intend to continue lying about NI until we must smell it some more.Will it touch your life? Obviously not. 
He’s run and done nothing , nasty little spad without a clue who hates Brexit @GavinBarwell 
Wow . Latest Brexit crisis now starting to alienate support.     (Worth reading this: two big things buried in it:  A: 2/3rd’s of voters now want a 2nd Referendum. B: When asked which of the Cabinet frontrunners should succeed if the PM were to go, 47% say “none of the above”  
Peter Mandelson has criticised Mrs May's brexit plan. Imagine turn8ng on your own leader like that #redtory 
May threatening to pull the plug on Brexit will knock another huge chunk off the Tory poll rating. She has totally lost the plot. Boris resignation statement in Commons could be a humdinger. 
One of the gulfs in US-UK political discourse is that many people in UK have thought  special trade deal w US is a plausible outcome (to offset Brexit), while virtually no one in  US does. In a statement controversial at the time, Obama explained why:  
Rees-Mogg PRAISES Trump's Brexit criticism for pointing out holes in May's white paper  
Theresa May CLAIMS"I'm a tough negotiator. I am not going to Brussels to compromise our national interest. I am going to fight for our #Brexit deal - because it is the right deal for Britain."Theresa May will then DO - the exact opposite. 
Theresa May's secret 'cloak and dagger' plot to foil Brexit revealed by minister who quit in protest  via @Telegraph 
Theresa May warns Tory rebels seeking to wreck her blueprint to leave the EU that they could be left with "no Brexit at all" unless they fall into line  
It is now confirmed that Theresa May who took on the task of implementing Brexit after the people's verdict has been threatening Brexiteers there will be no Brexit at all unless they back her sell-out. Scandalous arrogance and disdain for the British public. Get her out. 
May has delayed Brexit for over 2 yrs in a bid to distract,deceive , defraud, dupe and cheat everyone who voted to leave the EU in its entirety ! The woman is a traitor to Britian and needs to GO along with all associates in on her doublecrossing plot  
Implication is that senior ministers asked Airbus to say a hard Brexit would force it to leave the UK. Another nail in the democracy coffin. 
PM Theresa May warns party not to put Brexit at risk  
EXCLUSIVE: What President Trump told Theresa May to do about Brexit:  
Tomorrow’s  Sun on Sunday poll shows 53pc don’t like PM’s Brexit blueprint and 62pc think she should go before next election at latest. 
This caught my eye for 3 reasons.1. Can the public ever trust the Tories again, after Cameron and now May?2. What happens to the Conservative Party if it splits? 3. If Corbyn cataclysm is so bad, where will 17.4 million Brexit voters find their political home?#Sovereign 
Brexiteers must stand together against May's betrayal. We have been led down the garden path by Theresa May and her Europhile Cabinet. Time to replace her and get Brexit back on track!  
Farage on Trump's UK visit, May's handling of Brexit @Nigel_Farage 
He could support the people having the final say on the deal then.Or he could have properly opposed Brexit in the referendum. Saying you're worried isn't a substitute for actually doing something.  
Prepare for no-deal Brexit, German business groups tell members  
Theresa May says that Brexiteer Tory MPs who vote against her Yellow Paper next week “put Brexit at risk”. But she’s already destroyed the chance of Brexit with her non-Brexit plan. 
In 2016, #Tories gave us an unwanted, unnecessary ref. on #EU membership, because a few #xenophobes threatened to leave the party. Now nearly a 1/4 OF A MILLION people have signed a petition demanding a #peoplesvote for a #finalsay or #Brexit. Should we get one? Please vote & RT 
The #FBPE lot have been quite quiet.They said rejecting Brexit would lead to a surge in the polls for the party who back it - and the only major party committed to a 2nd referendum is the Liberal Democrats.Now UKIP have almost overtaken them (both 8%, UKIP were 3% last time).  
An extraordinary parade of media grandees lining up to attack the BBC's cosy coverage of Brexit.  
Theresa May: Back my Chequers plan or Brexit won't happen  
Theresa May’s ultimatum to the Country, “back me or there will be no Brexit at all” so desperate she resorts to threats like her mates in Brussels, should know the British people won’t be bullied. 
Incredible from former Brexit Minister @SteveBakerHW: “It does appear to me that there has been a year’s worth of cloak and dagger to land us into the Chequers position.” What does it say about our democracy that Civil Servants are calling the shots now? 
UPDATE: Tomorrow's Mail on Sunday carries extensive revelations from my world exclusive interview with President Trump aboard Air Force One - re Brexit, Theresa May, The Queen, Vladimir, Putin, Kim Jong Un, Prince Harry, & much more. Full online version will start running soon.  
Polls carried out before David Cameron announced the #EU ref showed #Leave were trailing by up to 13 points. Nobody wanted it.Now, hundreds of thousands of people have signed a petition asking for a #peoplesvote and it is being denied. This is wrong.#BREXIT#FinalSay 
Political dynamite in the Sun Tel from Steve Baker tomorrow - how May secretly plotted against Brexit behind the backs of him and Davis. 
Theresa May's secret 'cloak and dagger' plot to foil Brexit revealed by minister who quit in protest 
The May betrayal of Brexit revealed, from within. She cannot stay. She must fallThe will of the 17.4m must prevail  
It’s tentative but Labour’s strategy of allowing the Tories to cannibalise each other over Brexit could work. 
Sunday Express: Betrayal of Brexit #tomorrowspaperstoday 
.@SteveBakerHW quit Government with @DavidDavisMP, after discovering that for months an “establishment elite” had secretly been pursuing a plan for a much softer Brexit than the one they had been working on#MayMustGoFull article in thread  
North of the UK standing up against the insanity of Brexit. We hope to see many people from around the UK joining us in Leeds in September.#StopBrexitSaveBritain 
A clear and consistent 10 point swing from #Leave to #Remain giving remain a 5 point lead.@theresa_may. At what point do we get a #peoplesvote ? Or are referendums only held to settle arguments within the #Tory party?#Brexit 
Brexit Britain is out of options. Enfeebled and isolated, its humiliation is painful to watch—either to stay so closely aligned to the EU that there is no point in leaving or to suffer a shuddering economic shock and a catastrophic fall in global standing 
Het #GoldenShowerBoyLIE: Trump boasted before the world & British Prime Minister Theresa May on Friday that he’d predicted the Brexit decision at his Turnberry golf resort in Scotland the day before the historic vote.FACT: Trump arrived at Turnberry the day AFTER the vote. 
Wow @theresa_may has presided over a “cloak and dagger” plot to undermine #Brexit, in a move that will “blow apart” public trust in democracy, the Prime Minister’s former #Brexit minister has saidWell done @SteveBakerHW for speaking out#MAYMUSTGO 
'Steve Baker' the mastermind behind Vote Leave's plan to defraud the nation through illegal activity, cries to his Tory audience 'there's a plot to undermine the democratic right of the public!' You simply couldn't make it up!!!! 
And here it is. The consequence of Theresa May betraying Brexit. Voters do not swallow her waffle and support is seeping to UKIP. Remove her or the electorate will remove you, Conservatives.  
Theresa May's secret 'cloak and dagger' plot to foil Brexit revealed by minister who quit in protest 
Pleased to be a confirmed speaker for the Great Northern Stop Brexit Conference in Leeds. @thomasbrake @thatginamiller @RCorbettMEP @acgrayling 
Even remainer and #EU fanatic Lord Mandelson, says that Theresa May’s latest #Brexit blueprint would lead to “national humiliation” and leave the country in a worse position than if it turned its back on the entire European economic system.#MAYMUSTGO 
EU joke Theresa May's "Brexit" deal looks more "like a membership application" than an exit process. She's turned Britain into a laughing stock. She has got to go! Support us at  
Trump spoke the truth in saying Theresa May is not delivering the Brexit that people voted for:  #BrexitBetrayal 
Let’s assess the gravity of this.@theresa_may’s Government requested that airbus exaggerate the impact of #Brexit to justify pushing forward with a soft Brexit.Not only have the Government encouraged false info, an EU company has also done this to impact Brexit#MAYMUSTGO 
The Times reported this as an issue on 19 June, Airbus didnt go public on Brexit till 22 June. Clearly the Govt Delorean got up to 88MPH, went 3 days into the future and came back without flying hover-boards to punish Airbus...  
Just imagine what those who fought in two world war would say to see how Britain has come to this 
Brexit is an impending national emergency and all any of them seem to think about is sex.  
Wow. This is as if tbe Government are using false information to justify a soft brexit. Is this the work of @PhilipHammondUK, @OllyRobbins or @theresa_may herself? 
What the actual hell!!! This has to be the FINAL straw. @theresa_may has to go and the @Conservatives had better do something about this FAST!! I’m sick to the back teeth of watching this county fall apart because of weak leadership. #Brexit 
Disgusting: The Telegraph says Airbus warning that it could be forced to leave the UK came after discussions with senior Remainer ministers preparing for the Chequers summitThis is A Remainer’s Brexit, an exercise in paying lip service to the referendum  
Here is why the Tories might push Britain over the no-deal cliff - to stop a damaging proportion of their voters defecting to UKIP. The Tories have a very clear choice - their party or the nation. #Brexit #peoplesvote #StopBrexit 
Wow, more lies and deceit"Airbus bosses are furious after the Government spurred them to publish a dire forecast of the impact of Brexit before handing a prize £2bn RAF contract to US rival Boeing without a competition."#MAYMUSTGO 
The Trump march seemed pretty peaceful as did the Brexit one (both predominantly left wing) Last two marches for Robinson have seen violence 
Worth recalling here that the execrable Daniel Hannan blocked me for sharing a chart that disproved his lie that concerns over migration did not motivate the Brexit vote. A chart provided by none other than his friend @LordAshcroft 
1/ We are always being told that Remainer MPsOutnumber Leave MP’s...that is wrong632 Constituencies voted in Referendum401 voted to leave231 voted to remainOf the 231 Remain only 83 had Tory MP’sLeaving a large number of Tory MP’s in Leave constituencies.Please read on. 
Tell those children about how you want them to lose their European citizenship, their Freedom of Movement, their future opportunities, job prospects and prosperity. Tell them what Brexit means for the NHS, or for aviation, or the future of the UK.  
Do you agree or disagree that Donald Trump is right to say Theresa May has wrecked Brexit and her plan is not what people voted for?Agree 45%Disagree 38%Don't know 17%ComRes July 13 
Not all brits are against trump. I wish we had someone like him leading the brexit negotiations. Its been a shambles from the start due to the bias. 
Sarah Wollaston, another Remoaner claiming that the #Brexit dream was a fantasy. I guess she hasn't seen the latest poll showing that support for the Tories has fallen by 6%. She underestimates #Brexiteers - We will fight tooth and nail to keep the Brexit dream alive.  
I’ve just seen the disgusting footage of far-right protesters in London today. @jeremycorbyn I don’t care if you spoke yesterday - THIS is who you are supporting with #Brexit.#StopBrexitNow #StopBrexitSaveDemocracy #stopbrexit #peoplesvote #davidlammy4pm #StopBrexitSaveBritain 
No-deal Brexiteers try to bring down the government, calling this a Brexit betrayal and treachery, and then blame others for a possible UKIP resurgence? Incredible. 
Next show match my team will be mibr made in brexit 
The UK is discovering that Brexit isn't leaving a club....it's replacing the operating system, w/a model created on the hoof from YouTube videos of questionable origin. My review of week in Westminster from today's @Independent_ie 
Tories have lost 6 pts to UKIP in the latest Observer poll, most probably due to their soft Brexit plan.If Labour had listened to some, who advise ignoring the EU ref result, UKIP would be back in double figures. These same people jeer Labour for not being 20 pts ahead... 
The betrayal of #Brexit is already devastating the Tory vote. Blairites want to prop her up! #GeneralElectionNow 
Shame our MPs couldn’t see this coming!! We have all of these to thank for it  All determined to block #Brexit Yes, May is ultimately responsible, but these MPs have been threatening her throughout  
Well done! It is long past time for @theresa_may to go! Every day she stays, the more damage she does to democracy and the @Conservatives , who stand no chance of re-election if this faux Brexit continues. We need a PRO-Brexit PM!#MayMustGo#VoteNoConfidence#BrexitBetrayal 
If you guys were sensible enough to support a pragmatic Brexit I think enough soft  Remainers like me who are horrified by Corbyn would have been won round. But you have to have your hard Brexit. So you won’t get that, we’ll get Corbyn, and we’ll all lose. 
Half of voters now want a referendum on any final Brexit deal, against 33 per cent who do not, according to ⁦@OpiniumResearch⁩ poll 
Remainer MPs et al have taken to saying: "You don't have the Parliamentary votes to avoid a Chequers-type Brexit. Adapt to reality." But a Corbyn govt will ditch Chequers instantly. The "reality" is: You don't have the GE votes *for* Chequers. Are you going to "adapt" to that? 
This is what happened in 1997. A group of Tory MPs thought if they pitched themselves as eurosceptics they would be protected. They weren’t. A Ukip surge, and all Tory MPs, regardless of their stance on Brexit, will burn. And so will the country. 
A hard Brexit may mean Britain's GDP loses up to 7% annually over 15 years, former World Bank chief economist says  
No, let’s cancel Brexit and stay in the EU.  
It always amazes me that people keep getting away with calling Brexit the "biggest democratic mandate". Forget whether it was advisory or not... It was a 3.8% margin. Hardly a landslide. And even that 3.8% reverses by 2021. So let's not get carried away.  
Construction of ⁦the newest ⁦@LeanderISD⁩ school is underway (Elementary #27 in Larkspur). Thank you to our community for passing the November 2017 bond referendum. #1LISD 
Nigel Farage lays into the Maybot as he describes the typical career politician; she says what you want to hear and does the exact opposite!We're sick to the back teeth of her lies. It's time for a leader who believes in Brexit! Support us at  
I urge all Conservative Party members to telephone, email, write or visit your local Conservative MP and complain about Theresa May’s awful plan for Brexit. Do it TODAY.....your country needs YOU! And the answer to your question is....yes! 
Cancelled my membership to the Conservative Party. May’s handling of #brexit has been an utter shambles. 
Britain's financial industry slams Theresa May's latest Brexit plan, with some calling it the worst outcome possible  
‘The BBC’s reporting of the scandals around the Brexit referendum is not biased or unbalanced: it barely exists.’ Another piece - angry and excellent - questioning the BBC, “impartiality” and Brexit.  
Tory party has one last chance to survive:Force May to resignApologise to the nation Appoint a Leave caretaker PMNegotiate Exit Deal with the EUTrade on WTO terms until new realistic post-Brexit EU relationship is developed. Anything else destroys the Tory Party 
Brexit Britain is out of options. Our humiliation is painful to watch | Nick Cohen  
Unbelievable! The more Khan and his stooges oppress us, the more people are red pilled around the globe! #Brexit #Freedom #MAGA #FreeTommy #EqualJustice #FireKhan We Love Trump! @Potus 
David Davis, the former #Brexit Secretary, is prepared to join Eurosceptic MPs and vote against the Government next week in a move that could force ministers into a climbdown.  
The UK's Secretary of State for International Trade says he is "under no doubt" that the United States will want a trade deal with the UK after Brexit. 
‘51% now think Brexit is one of the most important issues facing the country – up markedly from 42% last month’  
#Brexit was only ever intended as a means to unite the creaking Tory Party. Thanks to David Cameron and the hard Right & Left, it has become a battle for the soul of the UK. It's going to be a long struggle. Bring snacks.#PeoplesVote #FBPE #EU #LibDems #Greens #PlaidCymru #SNP 
Someone needs to remind @theresa_may of the Magna Carta. Everyone is subject to the law, even the prime minister who attempts to deceive & go against the publics democratic wishes. Perhaps we've got another King John on our hands. #Brexit #MayMustGo #BrexitmeansBrexit #Brexiteers 
But I'm totally fine with a Brexit that will divide Europe and end our freedom of movement.  A Brexit that both Trump and Putin want to see happen. I'm helping that happen by refusing to oppose it.  
 @epaluzie There aren't only prisoners and exiled politicians. There are 100's of prosecuted in a continuous inquisition since September, when they decided to try and stop the referendum by all means. They failed. We voted and won. #FreeCatalonia 
History books will not treat those behind #Brexit kindly. They have divided the country with lies and deceit, trashed our international reputation and insulted our friends and allies.#StopBrexitSaveBritain#PeoplesVote 
Now that's a good point but if only the febrile emotive political climate of Brexit were open to such a logical  conclusion   
I WONDER IF PEOPLE CAN DIE OF SHAME.  Because if they c;an, #DominicRaab, @AndreaLeadsom#LiamFox, & most of all @michaelgove won't B with us for much longer.  They betrayed #Brexit!  @borisjohnson our hero.  #borisjohnson #boris johnson 
Somewhere in Tory high command the strategist who said "I know, let's be the Brexit party that sells-out Brexit" is shifting uncomfortably in his chair. 
This press conference lasted 50 minutes and I managed to lie about:- NATO Spending- My Own Brexit Statements- U.S. Troop Numbers in Europe- U.S. Trade Deficit with Europe- U.S. Trade Deficit with China- U.S. Oil Exports- German Energy Imports- North Korean Nuclear Tests  
Strongly suspect there will be 2nd referendum, not for any noble reason, but because MPs will desperately want to hand the screaming, defecating, vomiting baby back to its parents — the electorate — & let them decide what to do with it 
I can confirm. I'm sorry Ciaran. Construction is being hit hard and many projects are being put on hold - all cost plans I've read recently contain large segment on negative effect of Brexit on prices at the start. It's horrifying 
The Tories are trapped. Their 2017 strategy was to absorb ex-Ukip voters driven mostly by Brexit. But a hard Brexit can’t be squared with avoiding a hard Irish border or not damaging the Tories’ big business base. So now their hard Brexit supporters are angry and disillusioned.  
Unionist broken record soundbitesNatzisCybernatzYou'll have to use the Euro(pre #indyref) You won't get into the EU(#Brexit) You'd be leaving one union to join anotherYou can't use the £You won't have a currencyThe oil is running outPlease add to this listRT TY! 
From everyone at UKIP I would just like to say to the Brexit-betraying political establishment: "Wooohaaahaah!" 
When the history books are written they will say that @theresa_may was given a once in a lifetime chance to seize a new path of independence and prosperity for Britain.And that she ran away to hide in the cupboard under the stairs instead.Viva Real Brexit!  
New poll illustrates potential long term problem for the Conservatives. 2015 election strategy=absorbing liberalish middle class voters. 2017 strategy=absorbing working class UKIP/Labour voters. Brexit and then the Brexit deal alienates both groups and nullifies either strategy.  
UK, Opinium poll:LAB-S&D: 40% CON-ECR: 36% (-6)LDEM-ALDE: 8% (+1)UKIP-EFDD: 8% (+5)Field work: unrevealedSample size: unrevealed#Brexit 
Wow. May Brexit betrayal is arsenic to the Tory vote share and has supercharged UKIP - now level with the Libs. I predicted this. BIG story.  
I will continue to vote for @SteveBakerHW because his principles deserve supporting but I have rejoined UKIP until we #Brexit as it was voted for! If we cannot make trade deals because still hamstrung by the EU Rule Book then we have left in name alone! 
Whatever you may think of myself and others attending anti Brexit protests- we have never done this. We protest peacefully and thank the police for their involvement, not try to attack them.Think that speaks of how we are average, grounded people. Not dangerous extremists.  
Using children to advance his totalitarian agenda. He is shameless and must never get into Government. But the longer Theresa May remains the greater his chances! Boot her out, deliver Brexit, exile Corbyn!  
London's house prices keep falling as demand slumps  
The grovelling sycophancy shown to Trump by Theresa May, the Tory Brextremists and the right-wing press tell us loud & clear that if #Brexit takes place the UK will become a subservient vassal state of the USA.Restore pride! Take back control! #StopBrexit!#TrumpProtest 
New poll in tomorrow's Observer: "50% of voters think the electorate should be given a public, or #peoplesvote – another referendum – on any final deal that is bought back from Brussels by May, against 33% who do not." We must prepare now to #StopBrexit. 
McAfee LiveSafe provides anti-virus, identity theft protection, and more of the features you need to help you protect what matters. 
Lord Michael Spicer, founder of the Europhobic ERG, wants a split in the Tory party over Brexit (good!) but is wrong to say the country wants to leave the EU. Polls since last August show consistent Remain majority  
Great news Vince Cable is proving an excellent leader. With Tory government making a hash of Brexit & Jeremy Corbyn’s Labour moving too far left, a credible liberal alternative needed more than ever before.  
“On every issue in which Trump has challenged mainstream thinking (climate change, Iran, trade), the UK has found itself on the same side as its EU partners.” Hmm, maybe we should ponder that & draw some conclusions about Brexit & Trump. #BrexitMeansTrump 
'EU Should Hang Their Heads in Shame' - Lawyer on Catalonia Referendum Handling:   
When our #Conservative association reps stand down because of the PM's #Brexit shambles, it is time that our MPs took note   
The two-year campaign to depict Trump and Brexit not as legitimate expressions of democratic will, but frauds perpetrated on the US and UK publics by a cabal of nefarious foreigners, is gathering steam  
The North East has lost industries before and bounced back. However, MP Phil Wilson argues with Brexit there will not be that opportunity.  
Today Corbyn said he's very worried about jobs at Nissan post-Brexit. But he has the answer: 'a' Customs Union (not going to happen); and access to the Single Market (available to just about every country in the world. #BrexitShambles 
More @Conservatives members resigning their positions. When will @theresa_may do the decent thing and step down. #MayOut #MayResign #CCHQ #Brexit #BrexitBetrayal #MayMustGo 
The Brexit Taliban should stop whining about being despised and produce a plan.  
You will be very very busy in the coming years Mr Corbyn @jeremycorbyn, attending rallies at the former Airbus, Toyota, Nissan etc premises to commemorate the jobs you helped to send to Europe as part of your 'job first' Brexit. I doubt you'll be giving the thumbs up mind.  
Here's what we know:Vote leave cheated.Leave EU cheated.Boris Johnson lied.Nigel Farage lied.Aaron Banks lied.Russians interfered.#Brexit is a disaster.Jacob Rees-Mogg is a time traveller.Sorry, when I say we, I mean just me and you, @BBCNews haven't woken up yet  
Prepare for no-deal Brexit, German business groups tell members  
NEW: Jeremy Corbyn is ‘very worried’ about jobs in the North East’s car industry after Brexit.My report from Durham Miners’ Gala at 1815 tonight on @itvtynetees. 
Dear @JamesCleverly you appear unaware that Trump attended a Sinn Féin fundraiser months before IRA attacked London. The photo shows him shaking Gerry Adams' hand.#TrumpProtest #Brexit #StopBrexit 
With our focus on Russian meddling and Brexit, this is a good time to re-up this thread as a reminder of the role the alt-Right played in our current circumstance.  
Who benefits from Donald Trump's extraordinary intervention on Brexit?  
Dyson announces its Brexit dividend  
Brexiteers still have the freedom to vote.Let's stick together, let's form an alliance of Brexit parties. Let's decide a strategy for each ward & constituency.Then vote Brexit party that's standing. We have the power in our hands to change British politics. We can do it together 
You can stop pretending, now, brexity Labour/Momentum, low-tax libertarians and racist Conservatives, that we have anything to fear from abandoning brexit. *This* is an clear indication of the shambolic protests we can expect. The brexit food riots on the other hand ...  
At the heart of #Brexit White Paper is a howling, fundamental economic error. It assumes our prosperity depends on staying shackled to the slow-growing EU. In doing so, we squander the opportunity to unilaterally develop closer ties with much more buoyant economies. Unbelievable. 
True, but Brexit also happened because of spin & lies put about by the leave campaign & the right-wing tabloids, using scaremongering and tapping into the base fears of the stupid and racist. Should never have been a referendum, a simple yes/no to a complex issue was ludicrous. 
Of course they are. She's negotiating for us to remain as an Associate Member in order that we can regain full membership (and integration) at the first given opportunity. She's reversing the referendum result. She's defrauding the electorate. 
Trump is probably the biggest active threat to Brexit Britain. Here's why: 
Don’t support Stephen Yaxley-Lennon aka Tommy Robinson.Don’t support TrumpDon’t support BrexitDon’t feed hate.  
May: I am absolutely clear that I cannot countenance parliament being able to overturn the will of the British people.Goebbels: There is no possibility for parliamentary interference to obliterate and render ineffective the execution of the nation's will.#Brexit #PeoplesVote 
Theresa May follows Mussolini, Goebbels and Oswald Mosley in invoking the authority of the "Will of the People", a concept which delegitimises & demonises political opponents as enemies of the people.(Thanks to @SimonBruni)#StopBrexit #Brexit #PeoplesVote 
And the reality is that indictments are coming for Farage, Banks and Wigmore.Brexit and Trump are indistinguishable. That is why your interviewing is so troubling. 
Deeply sad, but spot on from @MPphilwilson.Both my sisters got their first jobs at Nissan. Almost everyone in the North East knows people who work for it or in its supply chain. Brexit is not the beginning of anything but yet more misery for the region. 
Exec has, in recent weeks, seen images of @policescotland officers cavorting with nationalist marchers, tweeting highly generalised and offensive abuse about Brexit voters, and high-fiving protestors with obscene placards about Mr. Trump. This undermines trust and must stop. 
We've had a positive response at the @fosischannel Annual Conference with many calling for a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal. Muslim students are clearly worried about their futures after Brexit as young people and as members of the ethnic minority community #FAC55 
Dear Liam FoxHere are some things I think embarrass the UK:1. You2. Boris Johnson3. Brexit4. Theresa May5. #bbcnews adherence to a failed govt6. Daily Mail headlines7. Our dying democracy8. Our acceptance of Murdoch interference in our democracy #bbcnews 
When Trump tells May “how to do it” on Brexit it should be remembered that he’s had to file for bankruptcy several times and would have done better financially if he’d put his inheritance in a decent tracker fund. 
Young people at the #DurhamMinersGala show they don’t want a Tory or a Labour Brexit they want a vote on the final #Brexit deal. @peoplesvote_uk @jeremycorbyn @BestForBritain @TheNewEuropean @_Britain4Europe @Femi_Sorry @ChronicleLive 
If I choose a specific medical treatment and then I see the doctor filling the syringe with a liquid marked "will definitely kill you", I have the right to say this is not what I asked for.If the Brexit deal isn't fulfilling the promises that were made to you...#PeoplesVote 
IN light of the FACT that Steve Bannon & Nigel Farage COLLUDED to create a petri dish and SHAPE and DISTORT our society in line with a HOSTILE environment that DELIVERED BREXIT I urge every single person to contact LBC to STOP THEM GIVING RUSSIAN ASSETS A PLATFORM  
“Donald Trump…may be responsible for many things, but not the resignation of Boris Johnson and David Davis.”Conservative MP Jacob Rees-Mogg says President Trump was within his rights to comment on the UK’s Brexit negotiations.  
Given Belgium have beaten England twice, if it is a hard Brexit does Brussels get to keep England if they beat them a third time :)) #MixingSportAndPoliticsBadly#ENGBEL #eng#BEL 
Nigel Farage - The Net Closes...We were told over twelve months ago, by a person in a position that makes them very familiar with the referendum scandal, that Farage is up to his neck in this!  
"...it will be clear—crystal clear at the end of this negotiation that the best situation and the best relation with the EU will remain to be member of the EU," said Chief #Brexit Negotiator Michel Barnier at CFR. Watch the full discussion:  
Trump seems to understand it better than Theresa May who claims that her soft Brexit would allow independent bilateral trade with the US. It wouldn’t. Such a deal would still require EU approval *after* May’s faux Brexit.  
Always felt the Conservatives would betray the majority will of the British people when it came to Brexit. The curtain has slipped. The Conservatives are out for themselves and the majority will of the people will always come last.  #predictableTories #BREXITsham 
Use the 2019 Elections as a Referendum for the land question.RT to appreciate EFF @EFFSouthAfrica 
Eliminated from World Cup. Brexit woes. Government turmoil. Trump visit. Queen snubbed. Theresa May clash. Lose 3rd place play-off.It’s been a rough week for England. 
Now Hammond has sold out the City.  City boys backed the wrong horse, they have been shafted, welcome to our world!   @borisjohnson #borisjohnson #borisjohnson #Brexit  
'For the first time since the 2016 vote for Brexit, I think a second referendum could be possible' | Andrew Grice  
Mixed feelings at Durham Miners' Gala. On one hand: home, history, roots, community, solidarity, fun in the sun. On the other, tired and corny 'Revolution comrades!'-style speeches from Corbyn, Thornberry & co. to remind us that Labour are nowhere in 2018 Brexit Britain.  
They're chanting "Brexit's coming home" in my local in Brussels lol.#BELENG 
Another interview with Marr and the BBC in the space of a few weeks. Last time we got the ‘BREXIT Dividend ‘.  Is the PM avoiding others like @SkyNews 
Key difference: Obama sent over during short period to interfere in UK referendum. Trump here on working visit outside of regulated period.And he didn't say we won't get a deal but that we CAN'T do a deal if we're not in control of our own trade policy.But you knew that...  
This is one of the smaller, stupider lies of his Britain visit. He wasn’t in Britain the day before Brexit. But the fact that the White House continues to repeat an easily verifiable lie is just wild. Don’t ever let this become normal.  
250,000 (Evening Standard) protest against the visit of Trump - no arrests.A few thousand at the 'TommyRot in Jail' & Pro-Trump Rally and there's violence on the street, as there was last time.These are the  morons who want a hard Brexit & "their" country back?'kin 'ell! 
"Biggest challenge since WW2", "darkest hour moment", "engineers, technologists, medics & science teachers denied entry to UK" powerful @newscientist editorial on why No Deal #Brexit will be UK crisis @Labour4EU @EK_EuropeanMove 
Quietly, the Government has dropped its promise to ban live exports post-Brexit  
Funny how Russia funded Brexit, Trump and Tories yet the BBC tried to gaslight the public that it was Corbyn who was a Russian stooge. It Failed. People are waking up. 
Even #Remainers can see that #TheresaMay's #Chequersdeal doesn't deliver on the #referendum result. Good for @piersmorgan to tell it like it is! #BREXIT #MayMustGo #BBC #SKY #LBC @ConHome @CCHQPress #ConservativeParty @Conservatives @DCBMEP @BrexitStewart #ConservativeParty 
There is another point: #PeoplesVote is the way to preserve public confidence in an age called post-truth. The 2016 Brexit offer was a lie.  The real option(s) should be on the table.   
Obama intervened in a crucial referendum,  Trump did not, says @johnredwood 
"One of the basic tools of fascism is the rigging of elections – we’ve seen that trialled in the election of Trump, in the Brexit referendum and (less successfully) in the French presidential elections." ~@fotoole  
Pro #Trump supporters gathered outside the American Embassy in London today.#Brexit #trump #TrumpUKVisit #TrumpVisitUK #BrexitBetrayal #BrexitmeansBrexit #Brexiteers #BrexitWhitePaper #BrexitShambles #BNP #UK #BELENG #DonaldTrump #MAGA #MBGA #British #MAGA2018 
Now We all know who is really in charge of #BRITAIN and it is not @theresa_may but #AngelaMerkel and #Germany! #TheresaMay does everything her #PayMaster commands! #BREXIT #MayMustGo #BBC #SKY #LBC @ConHome @CCHQPress #ConservativeParty @Conservatives @DCBMEP @andreajenkyns #TORY 
Amazing. 1. He knows nothing. Doesn’t know what Hard Brexit is - of course. But he doesn’t know Ireland is not part of UK. 2. Can’t stop talking himself like a bizarrely immature maniac. The question was about policy not your golf courses, you dolt. #25thAmendment 
Why we have been betrayed by Theresa May:1. Her white paper was produced in secret without the Brexit secretary's knowledge.2. May took her white paper to Merkel for approval before Ministers and MPs knew of its existence.3.The press got it before MPs in parliament.#BRINO 
Brexit White Paper chapter on security puts to bed the myth that UK security will be adversely affected by Brexit. Status quo on data sharing maintained because the UK contributes so much more and the EU needs access to British intelligence. 
Barwell has confirmed May has lied in at least 4 key respects(1) When she said #BrexitmeansBrexit (2) When she threatened no deal(3) When she said her lines were red(4) When she claimed her fake #Brexit was needed to avoid a Irish border 
This ancient tweet is, obviously, yet another major public humiliation for Daniel Hannan. But it also provides proof that some people on the Remain side understood the implications of Brexit for Ireland months before the actual vote. Won't get mentioned next time he's on the BBC.  
AND JUST LIKE THAT "THIS IS NOT THE #BREXIT THAT #PEOPLE #VOTED FOR."#NotSureIf #Fascism #EuropeanUnion #FascistGovernment #BrexitmeansBrexit 
.@MarkDrakeford is right.A hard #Brexit, that makes Wales poorer, that creates barriers to trade and collaboration, has no mandate.Join us to oppose this shambolic mess.#TakeControl and demand a #PeoplesVote on the final #BrexitDeal. 
Unless @Jacob_Rees_Mogg advocates conquests on the Continent (who knows?), the Treaty of Le Goulet is irrelevant to his argument about Brexit. #KnowYourHistory 
Watch this.  Trump does not know what the term “hard Brexit” means. He doesn’t understand the basics of the issue in any way, so he changes the subject to his election. This is stupidity raised to high art.  
Apparently @ScotGovEurope are so keen to talk to young people in Scotland about Brexit (spoiler: they really just want to push their Indy agenda) that they disregard the fact that children under 13 shouldn't be on Twitter, and shouldn't be approached in this manner.  
We're still here... joining @BBCsarahsmith for the PENULTIMATE Sunday Politics tomorrow, ERG chairman @Jacob_Rees_Mogg, Brexit minister @WalkerWorcester, shadow chief sec to the Treasury @Peter_Dowd and on the panel @JuliaHB1, @jessicaelgot & @steverichards14 
The reasons that led people to believe we had to reduce the number of EU citizens coming here –shortage of school places, pressure on public services, inability to get a decent job, not being paid enough– will get worse as a result of Brexit, not better 
According to the Times, Boris Johnson ‘wants to repair his standing with remainers.’ A tricky task, but I suggest backing @peoplesvote_uk, apologising for referendum lies, & declaring Brexit is dead as a credible political & economic project 
Trump is asked about Brexit and ends up talking about his electoral victory in Wisconsin and his property in Ireland. Those who question his mental health, and/or suspect dementia, have every right to. Just watch this clip and tell me otherwise.  
“For the first time since the 2016 vote for Brexit, I think a #PeoplesVote could be possible.”Leading political commentator Andrew Grice on how the chance #StopBrexit is growing: 
We are in constant awe of Prime Minister’s super human work ethic.It’s been a busy last few days what with meeting @POTUS & reaching Cabinet Brexit decision but @theresa_may will always find time to meet her constituents in Maidenhead #TheresaMay #ToryCanvass #PrimeMinister 
If I was a right-wing nationalist I'd be furious with @BorisJohnson for promising an impossible Brexit he always knew was impossible. He was only ever interested in his power and status - he's a globalist in every way. The only options are a fudge Brexit or no Brexit 
There will be cross-party cooperation on Brexit, whether leaders admit it or not. My Sunday article @IndyVoices 
NEVER WAS SO MUCH HARM TO SO MANY BY SO FEW #Brexit  
I dunno, England & Belgium playing for third place in the world is a little too on the nose. #brexit #eu 
The right callMichael D has been a gracious Pres but 14 yrs is very long time to remain in office uncontested & being paid substantially by the public purseWill keep Irish unity high on agenda at crunch time of #Brexit talks in Oct/Nov via @RTENewsNow 
We've nearly reached 70,000 signatures for our petition calling @Theresa_May to hold a Question Time event with young people on Brexit. If you agree with us, please SIGN and RT!! #TalkToUsTheresa  
I promised myself I wouldn’t make any Brexit metaphors about the World Cup, but we are now behind in a futile battle with Belgium to see who loses least!I mean, come on!!! 
We need a governor who’s going to send a wake up call to arrogant & overreaching government.America had its referendum on the swamp, and now Minnesota needs its own.There’s one campaign left in this race serious about generational reform.It’s ours.#JoinTheFight2018#MNGov 
"I came to #indywales as a pragmatist. Way to believe and think differently.Wales won't be indy until we start thinking differently ourselves.UK isn't delivering - in 40% poverty in Wales. Big business, far right r ready for Brexit and econ hit. Is Wales ready? @markjhooper 
May bewildered Team Trump with her Brexit approach. Now they're angry, says @Nigel_Farage 
“Theresa May is killing Brexit. She has crossed all of her own red lines. She is defying British voters by keeping us beholden to EU rules, and British democracy will suffer as a consequence.”Brendan O’Neill on Sky  
So let's not mince words. Trump is a fascist President who is only held back from acting as a fascist tyrant by the US Constitution. #TrumpProtest #Brexit #StopBrexit 
Anti-Trump protest in London: “You’re so vain. You probably think that Brexit’s about you”  
"If I had been a member of the cabinet, I would have been one of the ones that would have quit over the weekend" #MichaelPortillo on #Brexit!  #BBC #SKY #LBC @ConHome @CCHQPress #ConservativeParty @Conservatives @DCBMEP @andreajenkyns @BrexitStewart #TORY 
"Self-government, limited government, our laws, our Parliament, our freedom.These things were not easily won.And if we Conservatives explain that they are now in peril, they will not be lightly surrendered."Can you imagine the #Brexit negotiations under Margaret Thatcher?  
Be proud, Brexit freaks. You can add fucking up Northern Ireland to your list of horrors. 
"Politicians leading the Brexit Leave campaign never actually explained to the British public what a vote for Leave entailed, they promised Brexit was all things to all people, which is how it managed to eke out a 52- 48 victory over Remain" 
Is Trump good or bad for Brexit?#TrumpUKVisit 
.@seanhannity takes on London Libtards & exposes their extreme ignorance! They’re not protesting @POTUS, they’re trying to force their insane ideology onto you! Anti-capitalism, pro-Palestine, anti-Brexit, pro-climate change, you get the point! SICKOS!  
"So, you see, the puppy was like Brexit. In that, they were both lost in the woods. And nobody, especially the little boy - "Britain" - knew where to find 'em. Except that the puppy was a dog. But Brexit, my friends, that was a revolution."  
It is a tragedy British nationalists in the UK government have ignored Northern Ireland & belittled real & grave concerns #brexit  
#Brexit chaos puts Conservatives on the edge of a breakdown   
@FraserNelson .  Always held you high in respect, but this is rubbish.  There is no way that you can claim thet the White Paper reflects the choices and information given prior to the referendum.  This is EU membership with renamed four pillars. 
So, Corbyn is at #DurhamMinersGala, remembering the miners who lost their jobs because of Thatcher.What a fucking hypocrite. Thousands will lose their jobs because of the Brexit he refuses to fight. No doubt he’ll soon be at the Sunderland Car Manufacturers Gala blaming Tories.  
Theresa May would seek #Brexit in name only (#BRINO) regardless of NI border issue her Chief of Staff @GavinBarwell has claimedThis is an utter betrayal of the British public & the Conservative manifestoWrite to your MP to let them know your thoughts:  
Mayday for #Brexit  
The EU is petrified that Britain is going to make a success of #Brexit, that’s the truth of the matter  
It's pathetic @theresa_may and @LiamFox creep, crawl and beg narcissist Trump for a trade deal.A US deal goes nowhere near recovering the impact Brexit has already had, and the further costs of Brexit are massive.We're safer, stronger, better off inside the #EU#StopBrexit 
Massive crowd at the #Edinburgh #TrumpProtest!The fight against #Brexit is the same as the fight against #Trump. Just look at the picture of Nigel Farage posing together with Donald Trump in a golden lift.Stop Trump, #StopBrexit. Make life normal again! #FBPE 
The British right wants a hard Brexit so they can sell us out to a Trumpian disaster capitalist trade deal. 
Anti-Brexit MPs tabled 100s of amendments to the repeal bill.Why are pro-Brexit MPs tabling only 4 to amend May's non-Brexit plan?#BrexitWhitePaper 
David Davis set to SCUPPER May’s Brexit plan as he votes WITH Eurosceptic rebels  
#Trump using #Scotland visit to promote his golf course -- which is LOSING MILLIONSThe commander-in-chief also cited his investment in claiming that #Brexit would be good for his struggling business... IT'S ALWAYS ABOUT HIS POCKET FIRST#MOG#MAGA 
Why has the elite not adapted to Brexit?  
Even Remainers can see that Theresa May's Chequers deal doesn't deliver on the referendum result. Many of them will be quietly pleased with an outcome that sees us remain in all but name - good for @piersmorgan to tell it like it is! Support us at  
Brexit has been fertilising this..then petrol on the flames the incendiary deal with the DUP.  Wrote to my MP about it in 2016 & 2017. Time to remind him that this was foreseeable and his voting has fertilised it.  
Trying to persuade the New Class (our political-bureaucratic elite & Statist intelligentsia) to embrace BREXIT is like trying get your cat into the bath. 
We’re going on a Brexit hunt; we’re going to have a hard one; I’m not scared; what a beautiful day. Uh oh, customs; no customs arrangements; can’t go round them, can’t go over them; can’t go through them. Oh shit! Oh shit! Oh shit! 
The degree of anger about May’s Brexit plan amongst grassroots Tories is extraordinary - all the more so since she intends to deliver most of what they want. My @telegraph column: 
The anti-Trump protest was promoted by the political parties to divert the attention away from the Brexit fiasco. They knew the fallout of their Brexit white paper and they released it on the same day he lands? 
ICYMI Trump loves Brexit.  Why doesn’t Mrs. May’s government?  
Just watch. He literally knows nothing. Not one thing. Just one ex: after claiming to have read a lot about Brexit, he doesn't know what Hard Brexit is. Clearly never heard the term. Either he was briefed and forgot/ignored that word or his advisors didn't bother to tell him.  
R.I.P #Brexit "died of its own contradictions"  
"If your head is spinning, that means you’re paying attention," writes @togawamercer of the recent Brexit chaos:  
Not for the first time in recent days, David Davis prepares to put country and #Brexit above career.Shame other Eurosceptics in Cabinet have not done likewise.I would love to hear DD give a resignation speech in the Commons#maymustgo#KeepMayGetCorbyn 
May has betrayed brexit & if we remain attached to the EU as she wants us to we will regret for evermore having heard her name. Even idiots know what she is doing yet still not a finger is raised to save our country. Our role in life is to kiss the EU arse and help with migration 
6. @Nigel_Farage .....It is time for you to go back to the House of Commons and lead @UKIP again.  Don't let the BREXIT dream die because it is Great Britain's last hope. Save your race and your people from the evil of mass immigration, forced integration and the dangers....6/7 
You are the natural born fake news guy. You gave interviews, on tape, about UK, Brexit and Theresa May. And one day later you say your own interview is fake news. You‘re so poor. 
Scotland does not want you and your bunch  who lied to the scots and done tories dirty work at the Scots referendum ya wee tosser and don't fuking tell me what I want Labour can fuk right off  
It's high time for Scotland to leave this uncomfortable association to Brexit Country and his dark companion from Overseas. Scotland's future is the EU, with friends who do not use you as a doormat. @45albannach 
Hate Brexit? Engineer? Designer? UX? Data scientist? Join us! The Great British Hack-Off summer festival hackathon will aim at Brexit - July 21-22, London  via @techcrunch #GBhackoff with @TechForUK & @BestForBritain 
Xenophobia associated with Brexit "has bled, quite easily, quite effortlessly, into attacks on black and brown people" in Britain, says @garyyounge: 
APC is desperate in #EkitiDecides2018. Seems to them, this is a referendum on Buhari’s presidency. Maybe it is. They lost a poll on APC handle and it looks very likely they would lose today. Sai baba brand isn’t selling any longer. No one wants to associate with failures. 
1. @Nigel_Farage, @theresa_may has clearly betrayed the confidence that was bestowed upon her by the British people. They voted for BREXIT yet she clearly seeks to undermine it and subvert their will.I sense a deep conspiracy here by the globalists, the integrationists and...1/2 
Totally absurd! Global markets have gained $1.15tn in mkt cap in a week in which Trump continues to try to destroy the global multilateral world order w/ another tariff bazooka, NATO upheaval, and #Brexit furor!  
Mogg, along with many other politicians, recognise that the White Paper does not reflect the Brexit that the British people voted for. We must remain loyal to our people and get the Brexit we voted for! #Revive 
He could repair his standing with Remainers by telling the country he got it wrong, that Brexit is wrong and demanding a meaningful #PeoplesVote Likely? Not a chance unless he sees it as self-serving opportunity 
I really recommend the FT that’s been doing some terrific reporting on Brexit alongside @carolecadwalla @guardian.This story follows the money through Trump TorontoTower of secrets: the Russian money behind a Donald Trump skyscraper  via @financialtimes 
Lloyds has been in Britain since 1686.Because of Brexit, it is now moving jobs to Brussels.And that means less tax money to fund the NHS, too.#StopBrexit #Remain 
For PM May to repeat ‘We are delivering #Brexit, we are taking back control’, like a Dalek, will not do, not in the slightest. She is Orwellian in assuming that constant repetition to the public will triumph, even when they know the message is not true.  
A huge thank you to every one of the 250,000 people who marched yesterday against Trump. We are proud of our role in organising the protest. Trump is the American franchise of a global project. Here, the franchise is Brexit. Join the fight back here  
I’m not sure how anybody could have expected Brexit to have been anything else.No preparation.No plan.No idea what it is.No concept of how to implement it.Incompetence at every stage.Not one single positive outcome and no benefits.  
May's desire for a Soft Brexit would have been pushed, regardless of the situation at the Irish border! 
I’m game - ⁦@Jacob_Rees_Mogg⁩ ?? Ps ⁦@JeremyClarkson⁩ obvs can’t be ref cos he is a massive anti-Brexit man. Pps cartoon underplays my toned muscles   
What about Ruth Davidson? Given this is BBC *Scotland* news ... has anyone at BBC *Scotland* sought the views of the leader of the *Scottish* Tories after Trump trashed May's 'Brexit Plan'? Would Ruth have welcomed Trump to *Scotland* in the manner *Scottish* Sec Mundell did?  
Liam Fox is an embarrassment. As is Davis and Johnson. They were promoted in government not because of any aptitude or talent but because of their Brexit credentials. Two have rightly gone, Fox next.  
Nigel Farage - "Theresa May says the right thing and does the opposite, it’s quite extraordinary. "I think they wind her up at the back in the morning and she robotically says ‘we’re taking back control of our laws, borders and money.'" #Brexit  
This isn't the UK I want. Most Leavers voted to improve public services. Brexit is going to whittle them down to nothing. US style.  
EU membership has been good for Ireland and we will face any challenges that Brexit brings with the full support of our EU partners - Tánaiste and Minister for Foreign Affairs @simoncoveney on Ireland's preparations for #Brexit.  
My cartoon Saturday @TheTimes on pots, kettles etc. #TrumpUKVisit #TrumpBabyBlimp #Brexit  
'For the first time since the 2016 vote for #Brexit, I think a second #referendum could be possible'  
To deny leave won the referendum is is wrong.To deny that the consequences of the decision will be harmful is wrong. To deny half the country a say on this matter is wrong.To deny a second vote now those consequences are better understood is wrong.#FBPE #StopBrexit 
Tory Eurosceptics helped engineer Donald Trump’s explosive #Brexit intervention, it has been claimed 
A message for @theresa_may & the @Conservatives @CCHQPress .... The 17,410,742  who voted for #BREXIT knew exactly what we were #voting For & it was NOT your #FakeBrexit #ChequersPlan, a #TURD with no meaning! #BBC #SKY #LBC @ConHome @Conservatives @DCBMEP @andreajenkyns 
Im back !I don’t know, between Trump trying to dictate U.K. domestic policy, Theresa May holding hands with Trump at every conceivable opportunity and Corbyn clinging to Theresa May’s coattails like a leech over #Brexit, it’s a very sad state of affairs at present... 
Can I start a separate list, those MPs (normally but not exclusively Tory) who are happy to say in private that they know brexit will be a disaster, but are not willing to put out so much as a tweet about it. 
BBC News - Lloyd's of London chief executive Inga Beale criticises Brexit White Paper  Its not the Governments White Paper as it is Angela Merkle's. 
Donald Trump on 24th June 2016: “The opening of Trump Turnberry in Scotland was a big success...Very exciting news conference today!”This contradicts the claim that he predicted “Brexit will happen” when he “was opening Turnberry the day before Brexit”  
How Brexit Is Becoming a Political Disaster for Britain  
The differences between Boaty McBoatface & Brexit are:1) People with a sense of fun voted for Boaty2) Boaty McBoatface will always be called that by the public whereas many won't accept Brexit is Brexit, even if EU citizens get thrown out, businesses die & fascists take over 
Eva Bolander Swedish born Provost of Glasgow opens Eurofest in Dundee. Praises ⁦@NicolaSturgeon⁩ speech after Brexit telling EU nationals Scotland wd always be their home.  
I nominate Adam Holloway MP - this reponse to a woman battling cancer, concerned about the nonsensical Tory withdrawal from Euratom, merely because its name begins with "Eur..." and #NHS statement hard #Brexit puts supplies of 100+ vital medicines, supplies & equipment at risk.  
#AndreaJenkyns:  The odds of us leaving the #EU with #nodeal are steadily increasing and we now need to start planning seriously for a no-deal #Brexit!  #BREXIT #MayMustGo #BBC #SKY #LBC @ConHome @CCHQPress #ConservativeParty @Conservatives @DCBMEP 
Last week the #Brexit white paper gave us a little gift - the UK is committed to the European Convention on Human Rights!For over 60 years the ECHR has helped to safeguard the fundamental #HumanRights and freedoms of everyone on these shores. This is great news for all of us 
BBC, Guardian, ITN, Sky News all Trump obsessed. New Statesman, Spectator and all the other niche politics outlets gaming out endless Brexit scenarios that will prove irrelevant after the EU says no.Meanwhile a part of the UK is drifting to the edge. 
Many Remainers worry Brexit will erode workers' rights. But these rights were won domestically, and are actually being eroded by EU courts. The newest analysis on @tfbrexit by labour historian Prof Mary Davis:  @ExittheEU @PaulEmbery @labourleave 
#Brexit is the poison tree of the eternal #ToryProxyWar over Europe. #BrexiteerUltras  pressured the PM to evoke #Article50,-starting the clock- before she had a Plan. They were scared that it would never happen"You Can't Make It Up" was made for this.#BrexitShambles#skypapers 
Now on the backbenches, David Davis will be able to fight for Brexit! (£) 
1/ A short thread on Liam Fox and his transatlantic connections: Atlantic Bridge: . This links with climate denying billionaire & Tory donor Michael Hintze. Koch bros funded ALEC and Heritage Foundation in the USA, & Gove & Johnson#TrumpProtest #Brexit 
Survation If there was a referendum tomorrow with the question “Should Scotland be an Independent country?”, how would you vote?Yes – 54%No – 46%  
I'm a 30 year Tory voter, switched to UKIP to get the Referendum, then joined Tories, now preparing to vote for a Brexiteer to replace Treason May. I shall rejoin UKIP if that's what it takes to restore our democracy & sovereignty. 
We'll be 'either a colony or a member!'  Portillo sums up where we'll end up with May's Chequers Brexit deal  
Brexiteer MP says Britons are INCENSED at EU's 'arrogant' behaviour in Brexit talks   
Brexit, this way, the May way, is driving ancient iconic British businesses — and our WEALTH— out of the county. Lloyd’s have been here 100s of years. And they are off.   
Its interesting watching all these right leaning journos all of a sudden waking up to the reality of hard Brexit Britain and how it will utterly destroy the UK. Too bad it took them so long. 
We had Jo Cox murdered, violence in our streets due to British nationalist & Orange order parades. Now we are seeing bombs being throwing at Sinn Féin Gerry Adams. This what this @Conservatives & @ScotTories Government's have created over the past 2 years due to Brexit. 
This is the most important aspect of #brexit. They broke the law. Repeatedly, and with calculation.The referendum result is therefore void. We do not HAVE to do this. #PeoplesVote is now our best option. Get behind it.#brexit #Resist #FBPE 
David Davis set to SCUPPER May’s Brexit plan as he votes WITH Eurosceptic rebels  
A no-deal #Brexit would most likely result in a state of emergency. Measures could be taken in the name of preventing disorder such as banning protests & criminalising incitement to protest, which if given a broad definition could shut down the #Remain movement.#StopBrexit #FBPE 
Helen Goodman - The Govt own assessments show the NE would be worst hit by a hard #Brexit.. output would fall by 16% & unemployment would skyrocket by 250,000.. that's more people than in the 80s recession after the steel/coal industries were decimated. #FBPE @HelenGoodmanMP 
#NigelFarage "This is not the #Brexit that people voted for" is the one phrase that the #British #Government did not want @realDonaldTrump to say. His intervention has come as a bombshell to the establishment!  #BREXIT #MayMustGo #BBC #SKY #LBC @ConHome 
Brexit is a battle between ‘sovereignty’ and ‘government’.‘What happens if media, political classes and public insist that only sovereignty matters and that the complexities of governing are a lie invented by the liberal elites?’  
Brighty on Donald Trump’s criticism of Theresa May over her handling of Brexit in an interview with the Sun - Political Cartoon Gallery in Putney  
In defence policy, just like other topics, the May-Robbins Brexit plan would put the United Kingdom in a perpetual state of commercial coercion, forcing us to mirror the wider defence rules and policies of the EU institutions and even stay in a range of political structures.  
Reminder:-THE REFERENDUM WAS A SCAM.The completely dishonest result was ADVISORY,  and does not force us to leave the EU.  
It's time to be honest, Mrs May. You have no intention of delivering Brexit! 
#RemainerNow It’s not too late to stop this madness. In fact, even Johnson admits that Brexit is dying. Welcome to the right side of history.  
The radical right want a no deal Brexit so they can push us towards a disaster capitalist trade deal with Trump, making Britain a tax haven for the rich and service economy workhouse for the rest. 
The EU is terrified that Britain will make a success of Brexit:  
DExEU plan is a recognition that each other's rules and regs can be trusted. UK and EU are in charge of their own rules, in their own nations. A partnership of equals. No10 plan puts EU in charge and we have to take their rules. That's not Brexit. 
If you support Brexit, do you realise it will push us towards a trade deal with the USA & the price of that deal will be the sacrifice of the NHS to commercial American interests? Is that what you really want?#StopBrexitSaveBritain #SaveTheNHS 
Jeremy, you’re like a sad 1970s tribute act. Stop trying to re-fight the battles of your youth and look at what’s happening to our country in the here and now. Brexit is about to ruin countless millions of lives. You and your party must focus, all day, every day, on stopping it. 
9. If we don't get this government out of power, cliff-edge Brexit will happen. The whole Sun headlines thing yesterday was staged to make us all feel a bit sorry for May and support her. But to support her will mean a No-Deal Cliff-Edge Brexit. Actions speak louder than words. 
8. Focus on Brexit alone distracts us from any meanful opposition to the government.  For 2 years they've been asset-stripping what's left of our national wealth - the family silver has long gone, as has the lead off the roof. Now they're selling the fitted kitchen on eBay. 
Michel Barnier is adamant that Brexit will not hinder the European Commission’s plan to push ahead with military union. A little more than a “dangerous fantasy” now @nick_clegg, wouldn’t you agree? Support us at  
We’re sitting here and all we can talk about is fucking Trump, fucking Brexit, fucking May and fucking Corbyn. pic.twitter.com/TTqKXZedER 
It's now becoming quite apparent that those opposing the visit of Trump or indeed the Brexit we voted for have been played by the media and a globalist elite. Ask them why they're there or why they're actively opposing democracy and their faces drop with a expression vacant. 
@Nigel_Farage needs to be on TV more.. he knows all about the EU ..he runs rings around constantly moaning MPs like you on #bbcqt ... etc .. he's witty and fun and Nigel loves this country.. unlike you.Viva #brexit 
Trump gave the UK a glimpse of life after Brexit: one of humiliation by a ruthless exploiter.Brexit means trying to do a deal with Trump. He can’t be trusted.#StopBrexit. 
“This year we’ll have a General Election” shouts Jeremy Corbyn to a fab at the Durham Miners’ Gala. When he’s confident of winning the Tories will be desperate to avoid one unless Brexit destroys them #Gala18 
The Sun, Mail and Brexit MPs all attacked Obama for removing a Churchill bust from the Oval Office (it was a lie). Those same people now have nothing to say about this photo  
The #Brexit deal will affect the future of young people everywhere. Join us on October 20 to march for a #PeoplesVote:  #PeoplesVoteMarch 
Outrageous that he doesn’t have the strength, conviction or principle to do this about #Brexit, which will harm the 99% beyond measure.  
Poll result, may not be a sample of tens of thousands but it’s still concerning to keep a “leader” who so many dedicated Tories across the broad church have no confidence in anymore due to the shambolic Chequers Brexit agreement. #MayMustGo #NotOurBrexit 
If this is true, I am now very concerned indeed. According to @TheSun, the Northern Irish border is not a decisive factor for Theresa May's soft Brexit decision. @BrexitCentral @SteveBakerHW 
How can any #Brexit make us *less* Sovereign, if we were leaving the EU because we *weren't* sovereign?It's almost like those who voted leave for Sovereignty had a simplistic & childish view of what Sovereignty actually means in the real world...  
Absolutely. A flip-flopper. She knows this plays to the majority in Scotland. A march being led by the First Minister, no less. In right wing England, she’d trim that sail, just as she moved from Remain to hard Brexit after the referendum. A chimaera. A chameleon. Untrustworthy 
Ah, I see you’re busily undermining your Prime Minister, Mr Rees-Mogg.Presume you have self-serving Macbethian ambitions afoot.But ultimately, your party can’t unite around any plan after two years of mess. So it’s time to ditch Brexit.Bring a plan next time. 
Remainers - Join the fightback against Brexit and Trump. We are stronger together.It’s follow back pro-EU day so:1. Add #FBPE to your profile2. Search #FBPE to find and follow pro-Europeans 3. And #FollowBackProEU.Please RT - keep building the movement to #StopBrexit. 
Since 2007, UK services exports to the EU have increased at about twice the growth rate of goods exports. So it seems perverse that the UK #Brexit White Paper proposes reduced access to EU markets for services industries, while seeking much better terms for goods trade  
Dear friends it seems that we never appreciated what we had until we were on the verge of losing it. The turnouts as the recent marches against #Trump and #Brexit should give us hope. The tide is turning..do not stop, keep strong, we will overcome. 
Matthew Parris and I view Brexit from polarised positions, says Rod Liddle. But we both agree that Theresa May's Brexit plan really does give us the worst of all worlds.  
Event since the brexit result two years ago there’s hasn’t been ONE SINGLE THING to cheer in favour of it - this means there can be no happy outcome . Best to stop it and let us all get along as we were .. 
James, l regularly watch your show and respect your views on the political situation in the U.K especially concerning Brexit, but you really need to dig deeper into the whole Ruth Davidson fantasy created by BBC Scotland. There is a great story in there waiting to get out. 
This is your Saturday 14th of July reminder that both Leave campaigns deliberately broke the law to win the Brexit referendum including possibly treasonThis means@BorisJohnson@michaelgove@Arron_banksBroke the law, should be in jail#VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw#VoteLeaveCheated 
If true, this is absolutely hopeless. Brexit never meant Brexit.  
Exit from Brexit party does well. Again. There’s a bit of a trend here but oddly I don’t hear about it from the BBC.  
and annul the referendum?? anybody??  otherwise you're basically saying; if we got a #PeoplesVote and we lied and overspent in our campaign to remain in the EU and won, that result would stand, we could literally buy the referendum result. seriously??  
BREAKING: following Trump’s visit and in light of Brexit, a new poll shows an overwhelming majority of the public believe the UK should prioritise a trade deal with the EU over the US  
PODCAST: In what has been a tumultuous week in #British politics, I speak to @jongaunt on the #Brexit betrayal', @realDonaldTrump’s visit, and the future of UKIP. 
UK population 65,000,000Voted for Trump 66,000,000Voted for Brexit 17,400,000Watch "The Chase" daily 3,500,000Live in Tower Hamlets 300,000Taxi drivers in London 50,000Bigoted Trump Protesters in Trafalgar Square. est. 25,000  
Tories want EU to bend its rules,Ireland to break its rules. Scotland now to hand over its rules.welcome to Brexit Island.A fortress of English exceptionalismBrexit was a vote to take back what we never lost, in order to lose everything we currently have. 
The pound tumbled after the Brexit vote in 2016. The Big Mac index reveals how cheap it now looks  
What really happened yesterday:We don't want Brexit.We don't want to comply with US regulatory standards.(Care of ZDF German TV)  
Follow @williamnhutton for acute, trenchant commentary. And read our anti-Brexit ‘big change’ manifesto for Britain:  
Preparations and contingency planning for #Brexit have been underway for months now across Govt. Of course we continue to negotiate for the best possible outcome, but need to prepare for all eventualities.  
The Brexit Jeremy Corbyn proposes, will according to both the British Medical Association & the Royal College of Nurses, wiukd hammer the NHS, cut spending to the NHS & cause shortages of medical staff.So either you don’t understand the dangers the NHS face or you don’t care?  
Majority of Brits back Trump meeting Queen and making views known on Brexit  
This is one all female panel I’m more than happy to take part in  Well played @JFK_SS #Brexit  
DExEU said we'd have similar regulations & recognise the need to meet equally good standards, but have the freedom within that plan to change our methods if we want to. No10 says we follow the EUs rulebook and change will have "consequences". Only one of those = Brexit!  
The results of the 1986 NATO membership referendum in Spain by province  #map #maps 
Just a shot in the dark John, but maybe they looked at the stalled economy, the state of their schools, hospitals, roads, railways, public services and the size of the national debt and they thought, 'this lot couldn't run a piss-up in brewery, maybe we need an EU safeguard?' 
Is there any part of the #EU we are leaving under @theresa_may’s #BRexit plan? Someone must have heard of at least ONE thing?Please advise ... ‘cos otherwise I will have to assume that 17.4 million people are being cheated of their democratic decision. Anyone? Just ONE thing? 
How can anyone trust @theresa_may If this is the only way she can answer an immigration question by ignoring obvious facts, I have now lost all confidence in her "Brexit means Brexit" !@Jeremy_Hunt@BorisJohnson@RichardAshMEP@Jacob_Rees_Mogg Anyone care to disagree 
Off to Dundee with @joao_kay to support our EU citizens who've become pawns in the Brexit game. As early as the 12th century Scottish proclamations addressed the French, Flemish, Scots and English inhabiting our towns - we have always been a proudly mongrel, European nation.  
Extraordinary FT story on Russian dips trying to bribe Greek officers to stir up opposition to North Macdeonia name deal.  by Kerin Hope. When will BBC report Kremlin meddling in Brexit? @carolecadwalla @lionelbarber @NickCohen4 @mk1969 @alexebarker 
Today sees the launch of the Sir David Attenborough boat, however the 'will of the people' voted for it to be called Boaty McBoatface but the government overturned that decision. The reason why is that it would've made us look like a global laughing stock. Ring any bells Brexit? 
Quite, it’s disgusting that @BBC support a proponent of far right policies, but seek to silence David Attenborough for being anti-Brexit. I actually can’t believe it. 
I've followed @JamesCleverly as a fellow blogger for many years, even before he became a politician. I found myself agreeing with him on almost every subject and I've admired his performance as an MP.However, his backing of May's Brexit deal has left me deeply disappointed. 
No Deal preparations being stepped up on both sides of the Channel this week. Brexit latest from me and @steve_hawkes 
These are Trump’s words: I can’t make up my mind as to whether he is extremely clever or his brain is not functioning v well. He’s certainly got a particular message on Brexit, despite saying that he doesn’t...a number of times. #trumpprotest #TrumpVisitUK 
When are you planning to hold a re-run of the abortion referendum? What's that? You aren't? Why? Because you won and because referendums stir up a lot of anger and hatred and the decision has been made and nobody wants to go through that again because a minority won't accept it  
For Brexit numties who say ‘no deal’ is fine because there’s the WTO:1. WTO collapsing because Trump refuses to appoint new trade judges. 2. No country IN THE WORLD trades on WTO rules alone. Time to get real! 
"Sir David Attenborough" so the government can over-ride 'The Will of the People, who voted to call the ship 'Boaty McBoatface', but they can't do so in the case of the #EU Referendum? 
A transcript of Trump on Brexit: Make of it what you will, but it greatly concerns me. The real question is - why isn’t anyone around him stopping him? #TrumpVisitUK #TrumpProtest 
We need just one #BrexitCoalition candidate in each seat.The 17.4m can then unite behind & elect a #Brexit Government.It is the only way to get the #Brexit we voted for.This is too important for party differences to get in the way.We MUST break free from the  EU dictatorship.  
"New IRA" has organised the last 6 nights of violence in Derry. Just last night 74 petrol bombs and two improvised explosive devices on the streets.Can't help but think that #brexit is contributing to this instability.  
#Bristol West MP @ThangamMP, whose constituency voted by 80% to remain in the EU, came in for criticism for ruling out a ‘people’s vote’ on the final #Brexit deal@vincecable accused her of “let[ting] down” her constituents to support @jeremycorbyn 
WHAT #BREXIT MEANS 4 DISABLED PPL.“#Accessibility on planes is only covered in EU law, not UK” ~ Prof Anna Lawson @CDSLeeds@Tanni_GT @FrankRGardner @transportforall 
All civil servants who have been working against the Referendum result should be prosecuted for Malfeasance be sacked with loss of all pension rights. 
The North East cannot cope with another industrial extinction - that #Brexit would cause, argues @MPphilwilson 
How embarassing is Corbyn? Speaks out on Trump bc it is easy Silent on Brexit bc it’s hard He’s a champagne socialist who’s failing Britain over Brexit. #FBPE#StopBrexitSaveBritain 
Farage predicts ‘DRAMATIC’ week for Theresa May as ‘middle England’ react to soft Brexit  
Fintan O'Toole: There is nothing undemocratic about voting again on Brexit  via @IrishTimesOpEd 
Chief EU Brexit Negotiator: No 'Punishment or Revenge' on Our Side  #NewsandPolitics 
Brexit REVEALED: Four reasons why Brussels is queuing up to REJECT May’s plan  
The only brexit that is acceptable to me is a NO BREXIT  - none of the others hold a candle to what we have now  - - why put UK through 10-15 yrs of severe austerity willingly and knowingly   
What does it mean?#corbyn says nothing on .@carolecadwalla  Investigations Corbyn says nothing on Electoral Comission findings on Vote Leave Corbyn says nothing on US indictments of 12 RussiansCorbyn continues to support Brexit. #Putin's little  helper. 
Sky gleefully publicising fake claims. Trafalgar squares GLA licence is for 19,999 and they didn’t even fill it! Sky news propaganda wing of the EU Anti Brexit, Trump and UK! 
May’s idiotic #Brexit deal means The City is fleeing abroad:“We are moving to Brussells, full steam ahead  and many other banks and financial services will be moving at that pace now”.A reminder - the City pays for the NHS.   
But not employ UK staff? Great insight. And sums up exactly the ideological madness of Brexit in one tweet. 
French hail Brexit paper as chance to grab jobs  
Dr Fox prime apologist for Trump on @BBCr4today. Trump would eat him alive in any negotiation. But I’m sure he would fix him a job with a free market Washington think tank after Brexit collapses 
Scotland...Simple fact timeLabour pro BREXITTory pro BREXITBoth are staunch UNIONIST  
Liam Fox on @BBCr4today says he wants a ‘People’s Brexit’. Well how about allowing the People a final say on the Brexit deal then? @peoplesvote_uk 
We need a people’s Brexit not a bureaucrats Brexit,’ says Dr Fox airily on @BBCr4today. A people’s Brexit to make the people poorer. Don’t think the people like that idea 
The EU is terrified that Britain will make a success of Brexit  
How media works: as usual, they fit the facts to their own agenda. Telegraph is unusually disgraceful except by this week’s standards. It is accusing May of Brexit “treason”, yet backs a Foreign demagogue against her  
Which is more than can be said for fucking Brexit.  
Ministers intervened over the name Boaty McBoatface because the people had voted for something "stupid".  Why are they not intervening on #Brexit which is a far more stupid thing the people supposedly voted for. 
Lloyd's of London moving to Brussels. What could possibly sum up the criminal madness of Brexit more succinctly than that? 
What a week in Brexitland. What will it all mean for the negotiations, the Irish backstop and Theresa May’s future? Check out Brexit Republic episode 3  with me and @colmomongain  
#Brexit#TrumpIt’s all about weakening the power that we have as members of the EU.Brexit will make us weaker.Only those that can profit from weakening the UK push Brexit.Sadly, that also includes very wealthy UK citizens who stand to profit personally on market turmoil.  
It was always a possibility, and always the most democratic way to rubber stamp Brexit, or reject it!  
‘I’m not discussing some of the president’s comments,’ Dr Fox tells @BBCr4today. Blind eye to world around. Sums up Brexit 
Three things are happening that should be a cause for concern;1) Murdoch now has Sky2) The Hard-Brexit ‘Moggites’ are being pushed in the right wing media3. The likes of Milos, Tommy Robinson and Paul Joseph Watson have coalesced around UKIP The fascists have a plan #resist 
After the last 36 hours even the most ardent Brexiter must do some honest heart-searching. The proposition that Britain should look to Trump to compensate for what we lose by leaving the EU is palpable nonsense. His visit was an object lesson in why Brexit is a national disaster. 
Breaking up our union with the EU, will break up our union with Scotland too. Don’t forget about the long term hazards of Brexit. #StopBrexitSaveBritain 
Revealed: Donald Trump's #Brexit advice to Theresa May In essence, "Overshoot your target, be tough and get on with it."May has completely ignored this advice all along, whether by design or default.  
You know that thing where the Corbynites say Corbyn can do nothing to stop Brexit, but he forces his MPs to vote with the Tories?Here's Corbyn protesting something he absolutely has no power to stop.I look forward to him addressing the next Brexit protest.  
Street cleaners are picking up lots of these around Westminster this morning #Brexit #Trump #SpitTheDummy 
So Brexit won't affect the peace process in Northern Ireland ?@KateHoeyMP @BorisJohnson @michaelgove @campbellclaret@OwenPaterson @Anna_Soubry @NadineDorries @heidiallen75 @theresa_may @GavinBarwell #FBPE 
With the Tory party collapsing and the Brexit fantasy in ruins today's Mail reads like the final issue of the Völkischer Beobachter... Dacre in full brand destruction mode  
Things Corbyn can find the tome to do: protest Trump.Things Corbyn can’t find the time to do:Attend marches opposing Brexit.Oppose BrexitUnderstand the basics of the EU  
It's a beautiful day to march with our new @NE4EU banner at the Durham  Miner's Gala to show Corbyn what we think of Brexit.  Yes to Europe, No  to Trump!! Meeting 10am outside Gala Theatre (Claypath) :)  
Trump haters are inevitably Labour voters. But if Labour ever got into power they would immediately lose the support of america, potentially our main trading partner after Brexit. Corbyn, Lammy, Thornberry and Abbott have all burned their bridges with Trump. Mugs.  
Words are important. But for Donald Trump, words are very confusing.Here he is discussing what he thinks about Brexit. He’s like one of those battery operated toy dolls that can talk to you with a set of pre programmed random messages.  
Just to point something out, Owen... AT LEAST as many people marched to stop Brexit a few weeks ago. In fact I would say that march was even bigger. What do you and JC say to that?  
Mr Benn, time is running out. 1. There is a real risk of a no-deal Brexit happening in March. We need a way to prevent that. 2. There is no mandate for any Brexit. The ref result was a fraud & part of a plan to destabilise the West. We need a #PeoplesVote on the deal. #FBPE 
Americans, Britain stands with you. Together we have both suffered.Electoral crime & cheating delivered Brexit and Trump. Don’t let Putin run America. Let’s work together to dump Trump, stifle Putin and reverse Brexit and make the world a better place through democracy. 
EXCLUSIVE SHOCK #BREXIT REPORT: "UK Benefits LEAST From Single Market, Says EU Commission".  The lies that underpin Mrs May's White Paper.  Read the truth here:  
Remember this LIE?#Brexit #StopBrexit #StopBrexitSaveBritain #VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw #VoteLeaveCheated #VoteLeaveLied #PeoplesVote #PeoplesVoteMarch #FBPE #brexitshambles 
Treason May and her @Conservatives remainer lackies think they can deceive the people & lie to parliament. They fatally underestimate the anger across the nation. They are finished as a political party unless they bin May and deliver the #brexit we were promised. @theresa_may 
The #Brexit choice......The UK will align all standards to it's trading market.EU or USSatellite of US & take their food standards with no say.Satellite of EU & take their food standards with no say.Part of the EU & make the standards on food with full say.#PeoplesVote 
will you stop playing political games with people's lives and jobs @Conservatives @uklabour. You know Brexit in any form hurts the economy, jobs, social fabric of this country. There is ZERO evidence a majority understand it let alone support it. #stopbrexit before you wreck UK 
A brutal view of #BrexitWhitePaper the UKGovs brexit proposal. It will please virtually no-one. Many decent people voted leave believing those backing brexit had workable plan-2 yrs on still no plan Its why many are #remainernow -the numbers grow daily 
Trump denies criticising Theresa May, despite tape of him criticising her.Bizarrely, he also claimed he'd visited Britain the day before the 2016 referendum and correctly predicted the Leave vote – even though he arrived a day later. He's losing it.  
'It's CAPITULATION!' ECONOMIST Gerard Lyons condemns Prime Minister May’s #Brexit white paper. “It lacked vision. It was complex. It was potentially unworkable. The EU will demand for further concessions.” 
3 reasons why a No Deal Brexit is more likely: May's new plan still cherry picks. Time's running out. We have no legislative mechanism in place to stop a No Deal Brexit, because MPs either rejected or abstained on those amendments.The only way out is a#PeoplesVote 
ReMayner May made unelected Robbins the #Brexit negotiator in chief  She has consistently sidelined #Brexiteers in CabinetNow she has given Merkel a veto over the government's #Brexit plansMay's intent has clearly been from the outset #BRINO 
For the first time since the 2016 vote for Brexit, I think a second referendum could be possible - The Independent  
May did the only think she knew how. She went into hostage video mode, repeating a few bland remarks about Brexit meaning leaving the EU while looking like someone who was praying for her ordeal to come to an end. Make it stop.#StopBrexit 
'It is NOT what people voted for!' Tory MPs revolt against Theresa May's Brexit plan  
Elmar Brok, who is dubbed ‘Merkel’s man in Brussels’, has been very hostile towards the UK over #Brexit - UNTIL Theresa May's #Brexit blueprint was published.Yet more evidence, if you needed it, that what May is offering is #BrexitBetrayal 
Why Brexit doesn't make Trump happy anymore  via @bopinion 
Academic experts at Birmingham City Uni's  Brexit Centre confirm the Chequers plan is “Brexit in name only""Maintaining many of the same rules that we currently subscribe to" "Participating in EU agencies and contributing to their costs"More betrayal 
About to go on @bbcworldservice Weekend programme to talk about Trump, Brexit, my book on #MarieColvin - everything apart from football! 
So apparently Trump's White House staff aren't aware that Scotland is in the UK. ... Well, you know what? It won't be after Brexit!#StopBrexitSaveBritain  
Trump Gives 'Fake' Interview Where He Blames Lady For Ruining Brexit And The Muslim For Breaking London       by @SER1897 
If there was a hard #brexit, why would a company move 2EU where they would have 2pay a WTO levy 2export their products back 2 UK. So 2 all companies threatening 2leave UK, please get management that understand economics & tell them #ProjectFear didn't work last time either. . 
The British may have their last chance, for many centuries to come, to reclaim independence. They should listen to @Nigel_Farage & @realDonaldTrump — seems like @BBCNews #propaganda has already done significant damage...#MEGA #Brexit #TrumpUKVisit #MAGA 
Instead of honestly confronting Britain’s place in the world, the Vote Leave campaign offered brazen lies: Brexit would deliver £350 million a week to our health service; Turkey was about to flood Britain with millions of Muslim migrants. via @nybooks 
Brexit voters & Remain voters voted to protect the UK's influence.Brexit voters & Remain Voters voted to protect our NHS.Brexit voters & Remain voters voted for a good standard of living.We all want similar things. The Brexit deal will tell us whether we get them.#PeoplesVote 
1. Brexit paper2. Kennedy resigns3. And novichok-gate becomes murder4. Half the UK government resigns5. Trade war with the EU6. Kavenaugh gets nominated despite pasta-gate7. NATO summit8. A whole (good)latte of strzok9. Lol lets round out the week with some indictments 
Farage predicts ‘DRAMATIC’ week for Theresa May as ‘middle England’ react to soft Brexit  
.@POTUS to @theresa_may on Brexit: "Whatever you do is okay with me. That's your decision... just make sure we can trade together. That's all that matters."  
This is the kind of hypocrisy that makes so many Remainers furious.London Young Labour are happy to brag about their participation in the #TrumpProtest. But when the anti-Brexit march took place on their doorstep, they didn't mention it in a single tweet on their timeline!#FBPE 
 Brexit Boy @andywigmore explains the psyop here 
FACT: The first Brexit was completed in 1776 
"How Brexit Is becoming a political disaster for Britain"  
Nigel Farage, the right-wing British politician and Brexit mastermind, is scheduled to visit Washington, D.C., next week, and is working to set up a meeting with Trump while in town  
The only thing that's gonna save Europe will be President Trump! They either follow his lead or fade into a freedomless abyss! #MAGA #POTUS45 #Brexit #EuropeHasFallen 
Former Prime Minister of Australia, @TonyAbbottMHR, has advocated for #Australia and the #UK to negotiate freer movement of citizens between the two countries as part of upcoming #Brexit negotiations.#CANZUK #cdnpoli #auspol #nzpol #UKpolitics 
On April 16 the gov passed a referendum to social security, reducing benefits and increasing what we had to pay. On the 18 protests began, the police killed 2. Since then they have increased their violence towards the citizens 359 have been killed and many more tortured 
Given HM's views on Europe, suspect conversation was something like this:"Now, Donald, of course I cannot say anthing publicly, but I agreed wholeheartedly with what you said about #Brexit and can only hope my Prime Minister listened closely."  
London march for KhalistanThe rally will call for a referendum in 2020 to give the nearly 30 million Sikhs across the world – including those in India – a chance to vote for the creation of an independent sovereign Khalistan.  
In an about-face from earlier comment about Theresa May's post-Brexit strategy, President Trump said his relations with the UK are the 'highest level of special'  via @ReutersTV 
'Rudeness Upon Rudeness:' Even Theresa May's Opponents Are Taken Aback By Trump's Brexit Attack || Via; Fortune  
What's going on with Brexit?  
The Guardian says this Trump brag about Brexit is just one of his "towering, easily debunked" U.K. lies.  
The entire Brexit debate has been dominated by men. Aren't you tired of that?Personally, my dream team would be: @eloisetodd, @GottgensJess, @JMPSimor, @daisycooper, @libdemdaisy, @lara_spirit, @NinaParker and @TessMillsy. 
#Brexit #MAGA WE ARE FAMILY  #LondonLovesTrump 
Facebook and Cambridge Analytica broke the law when they helped Brexit win its election.Trump and Brexit are DEEPLY interconnected:     
Dear Sister Britain: Please show us the way to #RESIST the Russian-led attack on our shared values. YOU can undo the absurdity that is Brexit & ensure that we NEVER again allow xenophobia & white supremacy to prevail. We can crush the Russian evil TOGETHER!  
Thousands of London's citizens swarmed the streets after President Trump's reported negative comments to The Sun about the British PM's handling of Brexit.    
'For the first time since the 2016 vote for Brexit, I think a second referendum could be possible' || By Andrew Grice  
And take another second to think about the fact that the European Parliament has proportional representation which means that EU laws represent the full spectrum of opinions across Europe.And we voted Brexit for BETTER democracy.  
Stopping Brexit is only the first step to fixing the real problems in this country. Good luck fixing this if the government's busy flailing around with Brexit.  
Now this is what a Presidential Couple looks like #MAGA #MAGA2020 #Brexit #British #KAG #POTUS #Americafirst 
Trump told a British tabloid that he had threatened Theresa May over her “soft” Brexit plan, telling her that if she followed through on it the US would not make a bilateral trade deal with Britain.  
Unionists will resist Scottish independence falsely claiming Scotland can’t be independent because of #GERS while completely ignoring the damage that #Brexit will do to Scotland. Don’t let them avoid the fact that Westminster will sacrifice Scotland #DissolveTheUnion 
Donald Trump: I didn't criticise PM over Brexit. That is fake news  
New customs checks coming in to Ireland after Brexit lads, start stockpiling all your favourite British snacks like walkers, tetley, mr. kipling oh wait no they're all terrible 
President Trump claims he "didn't criticize" PM May, hours after a British tabloid, The Sun, published an interview with him in which he torched May over Brexit."It’s called fake news," the president said.  
“The British connection in the investigations into Donald Trump and the Kremlin will be in focus at a grand jury session this week with the appearance of a witness with ties to Nigel Farage and others in the Brexit campaign.”  
Can there be any doubt that Russia also interfered with Brexit? That on top of Leave lies, election fraud, harm to economy & geopolitics. It is May who is deciding to carry on w Brexit despite the flawed, corrupted advisory referendum. No reasonable PM would go ahead regardless. 
"Trump expressed hope that Russia would "find the 30,000 emails that are missing" from Hillary Clinton -- which, as the indictment states, is what Russian hackers actually tried to do on that day." 
It is a Remainer’s Brexit, an exercise in paying lip service to the referendum result rather than implementing it with any conviction, and the country knows it. The public reaction has been overwhelmingly negative. Electoral disaster looms for May and the Tories. 
The spirit of the north is alive and well but is being threatened by the NDP’s rigged #PropRep referendum. Conversations like today’s are important as communities like the #CityofPG deserve to keep strong local representation. #NoBCProRep 
Tory brexiteers claim to have full number of signatures to trigger vote of no confidence in may. Have given her 1 week (as from 10th July) to ditch #chequers plan or they are going ahead. 3 days will tell the story if they really have the numbers! | #SCOTREF #BREXIT #INDYREF2 
After the American President humiliates our Prime Minister by destroying her Brexit plan and praising Boris Johnson, do you dare call yourself a Trump fan AND a British patriot? Join me from 1 on @LBC and call 0345 6060 973 
No longer "We might", "We could", "We are considering".Lloyds read the white paper, and now they are ACTUALLY MOVING OUT!!!!!In 2014 Lloyds had net assets of £23.5bnBBC News - Lloyd's of London chief executive Inga Beale criticises Brexit White Paper  
Farage predicts ‘DRAMATIC’ week for Theresa May as ‘middle England’ react to soft Brexit  
“Whatever you do is OK with me,” President Trump said in a joint news conference with British Prime Minister Theresa May, after falsely denying he criticized her “soft Brexit” approach  
The #Chequers plan is a #baddeal – we need to start planning seriously for no deal, says #AndreaJenkyns!  #BREXIT #MayMustGo #BBC #SKY #LBC @ConHome @CCHQPress #ConservativeParty @Conservatives @DCBMEP @andreajenkyns @BorisJohnson @DavidDavisMP #Tory #UK 
BBC News - Lloyd's of London chief executive Inga Beale criticises Brexit White Paper  
In the year of our Lord Donald Trump: They need less “God Save the Queen” & more “God Save the Country.” #Brexit to #MEGA (Making England Great Again).  
We are being sold a narrative by the Globalist Deep State who want Brexit stopped. Mark my words now. This anti-Russian hysteria and risible false-flag Novichok poisoning (would Putin be so inefficient?) is setting the mood to suddenly produce 'evidence' Moscow rigged Brexit  
Trump: Brexit Happened Because of ‘Very Bad’ Immigration  
The dispute between @StephGrisham45 (who is press secretary for Melania Trump, @FLOTUS) and @BBCJonSopel is over one very simple fact. Was Mr Trump at Turnberry before or after the Brexit vote? If after, he couldn't have “predicted Brexit.” These exchanges are mesmerising pic.twitter.com/wO1sK785sg 
Trump weighed in heavily on Brexit today. Only to be expected. Does anyone out there really still think the referendum was a fair & honest vote? #TrumpVisitUK #TrumpUKVisit #CambridgeAnalytica 
Portillo’s verdict? The Tory party has to hurry to get rid of the Prime Minister after she delivers a timid, “steady as you go Brexit,” or face electoral oblivion.  
May's Polling Figures Plummet in Wake of Brexit White Paper:  
Giving Brexit a whole new dimension, the White House removes Scotland from the U.K.  
The Spiked Guy on @SkyNews is saying Leavers were always willing to take an Economic Hit for the price of winning Brexit. I don’t remember that in the manifesto. 
THIS. THIS. THIS. Then listen to Trump speak again today about Brexit, on British soil. The world is being duped by a well organised network of high-end crooks. #TrumpUKVisit #CambridgeAnalytica #TrumpVisitUK 
There's nothing quite so repulsive as a sycophantic TV presenter toadying up to a lying sex pest President whose incumbency is losing credibility faster than a UKIP manifesto. 
After Brexit the Tories say we can cut out a lot of the Red tape that we have as members of the EUImagine a UK liberated from:Maternity rightsEnvironmental protectionsWorking time limitsClean water standardsEqual payFood hygiene standardsClean airRED TAPE  
This isn’t a mistake, it’s Trump accurately predicting passage of the next Scottish independence referendum.  
Despite what Trump said in a briefing w/Britain's Theresa May, @RNicholasBurns says Trump's comments in The Sun were "a direct attack on the prime minister...this was the real Donald Trump" Trump visited the U.K. amid protests + critiqued May's handling of #Brexit in the press  
Everyone in the world outside the UK (except the infantile idiot Trump)thinks that Brexit is mad: @nytimes on May’s Brexit plan: “Ah, yes — the magical great deal on Brexit. The truth is, there is no great deal to be had.” 
#Lavrov: The current status of #Crimea was determined by the people, who live there, in a referendum, which was free and fair. This was certainly done in a much more transparent and legitimate way than the unilateral recognition of Kosovo’s independents without any referendum  
Um. You ARE on the batshit crazy side. Your Dad just said he's more popular than Lincoln after saying Germany is owned by Russia and he connected "Hard Brexit" to his electoral vote total. Bat. Shit. Crazy.  
Spot on. As Will Hutton and I argue in  our new book ‘Saving Britain,’ Brexit is about ‘Thatcherism in one country’.’  
Theresa May’s personal popularity has been plummeting, especially among Leavers – where it has fallen from a net +10% supporting the PM to net -23%. #Brexit 
I was wondering .. has anyone met a remainer  yet who supports trump ? I can’t help but think the trump supporters are from the same ilk as the ones that voted for brexit 
It is quite clear that May’s plan will kill off Brexit and keep us tied permanently to the EU as a vassal state. My fear is that the EU will accept it since it offers them all they want. Plus £40 billion as a down payment. So who will stop it? Tory Brexiteers? Sure. When pigs fly 
Thousands of angry leftists protested & threw a tantrum. Millions stayed home & love president Trump. #Brexit 
'Trump took a huge dump on May's Brexit plans – then blamed The Sun for not cleaning it up'  
The bossy tax-munching metropolitan New Class hate Donald Trump so bitterly because they know that his presidency, like BREXIT, is a profound challenge to their rule. This is the very reason the rest of us find him such a thrilling breath of fresh air. pic.twitter.com/SB8jrsbYd4 
Commentary: The case for UK’s Brexit chaos  
Portillo slams May's #Brexit proposals for leaving the UK with only two possible outcomes."One is a non-Brexit Brexit and the other is Remain... Either to be a colony of the European Union or to be a member of the European Union." Shame on you May! 
why on earth should there be a voter referendum to upzone the west side of the city when the less wealthy eastern neighborhoods had a ton of condos dumped on them without a referendum? poor neighborhoods need more self-determination. wealthy neighborhoods need less. duh 
Revealed: Donald Trump's Brexit advice to Theresa May  
This is what I don't get..giving the Ppl a #Peoples vote to allow a #FinalSay doesn't overturn #Brexit unless the majority of the Ppl now wish to #Remain in which case it is the Ppl who overturn it.It's a false reason used as an excuse to avoid them forcing their will on the ppl 
Trump called his criticism of Theresa May over Brexit "fake news." However, The Sun published a recording of the remarks Trump claimed he didn’t say.-HuffPost 
As a long eventful day comes to a close let’s not forget that our democracy is at stake. @theresa_may needs to go and the @Conservatives need to act quick to save the party.#MayOut #MayResign #MayMustGo #BrexitBetrayal #Brexit #CCHQ 
Trump’s gone now, so can the media report the unfolding violence in NI? This is happening today and won’t get better with a #Nodealbrexit. We only have weeks to find a solution, or cancel Brexit #exitbrexit @guyverhofstadt @BBCNews 
#isitokay to ask when you are all going to realise that the Scottish Government are the only people with any clue about brexit 
.@DavidDavisMP the former #Brexit Secretary, is prepared to join Eurosceptic MPs and vote against the Government next week in a move that could force ministers into a climbdown on the #Chequers #WhitePaper#MAYMUSTGO #BRINO 
Exclusive: David Davis prepared to back one of the key Tory Eurosceptic amendments to the trade bill on Monday in one of first acts since resigning as Brexit Secretary   
Errr. No. He’s departing Windsor for Scotland. So not leaving the U.K.  I refer you to Union of Crowns, Act of Union and 2014 referendum. Is the White House that ignorant it’s heard of none of above?  
President Trump made exaggerated or false claims about American troops abroad, NATO spending and his prediction of the Brexit vote, among others  
I’d like to thank President Trump for doing a superb job of stopping #Brexit.  
‘The Labour Party should give the British people the opportunity to have the final say, by..supporting a referendum on the final terms of the exit deal, with an option to remain full members of the EU’All power to your elbow, @Remain_Labour & @Labour4EU!!! 
Trump claims he was in Scotland the day before Brexit vote. The evidence says otherwise.  
British Poll: 51% Of Brits Appreciate President Trump’s Views On Brexit  
Time is running out @uklabour. Stop @jeremycorbyn blocking opposition to Brexit, or get rid of him and put someone in charge who will. The ref was illegal. The promises broken. Nothing to respect other than the future of us all. #peoplesvote #stopbrexit 
Trump: "Once the Brexit process has concluded and perhaps the UK has left the EU"  
A northern manufacturing trade unionist friend texts to ask a good question : “ Jezza in town to denounce Trump. Where was he for the Brexit demo?  Well...... that only might involve working class people at JLR, BMW, Airbus UK, Siemens, Philips and Pfizer losing their jobs. “ 
Why has the elite not adapted to Brexit?  
Did anyone cancel their meeting with President Obama after he interfered with the Israeli election or the Brexit vote?  Curious. 
So, bit of a busy week tbh @SkyNews - #Trump #TrumpProtest #ThaiCaveRescue #CaveRescue #Brexit #CabinetReshuffle #WorldCup2018 #England #skynews 
Part of me wants to vote for someone new and different, but that’s the mentality that got us Brexit so I’m sticking to my guns #LoveIsland 
She also supplied the Charaties Regulator with laboriously compiles details of dozens of No-Vote promoting Facebook pages presenting as charities (but not registered), in a spreadsheet.The regulator took no action against any of the pages during or after the referendum vote. 
The EU’s negotiating strategy is to make British success as difficult as possible. They are scared stiff that we will flourish and show the world how misguided the EU project is. #Brexit  
'Rudeness Upon Rudeness:' Even Theresa May's Opponents Are Taken Aback By Trump's Brexit Attack || Via Fortune  
Nigel Evans MP is one of the Brexit good guys.  
And how much wasted on useless /unwanted meters..?   The suppressing of the Siteserve Judge Cregan inquiry...?  Most importantly where is our referendum ?  
Some time in the not too distant future there will have to be a thorough public inquiry into how the BBC has become a mouthpiece for the Russia-linked far-right. @bbcthisweek#StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE 
I'm all for #Brexit, but if we are going to do it then it should be done with care and with full acknowledgement of all the facts be they comfortable or not. It should not be used as a sandbox for Tory delusions. To hell with those who claim the referendum is a mandate for such. 
I think there should be a national referendum on whether Madeline McCann’s parents should be prosecuted for her death tbh 
I have always been a Tory.I decided last year that I would go to my first party conference this year.  Now, I don’t want to go.I feel so disengaged and angry with the PM after this last week. I trusted the PM with #Brexit and she has really let me down, badly#MAYMUSTGO 
.@Nigel_Farage on President Trump's 'bombshell' Brexit intervention  
Huge love and respect to all you fabulous people who brought such a #CarnivalofResistance to central London today  Women Against Brexit say #FuckOffTrump#Resisters @Women_4_Europe @susiecourtault @spaceangel1964 @NinaParker pic.twitter.com/K6NSgqynxv 
Can we all agree that the referendum was interfered with, funded with dark money and that electoral law was broken? 
Farage predicts ‘DRAMATIC’ week for Theresa May as ‘middle England’ react to soft Brexit  
Launch of the people’s Brexit revolution – 'Deliver the EU exit Britain voted for'(The People’s Revolution)even Express UK are taking notice of what's happening.TRDJ 
The first hour of my show will be a dual broadcast with @BBCWorld Channel 5.  You'll hear them here.. they'll hear us there.  Should be fun.  #Brexit #TrumpUK 
Punter take-out from Trump visit; he really likes Boris, he’d do us a trade deal if Boris was PM, he’d help Boris get a better Brexit. 
Foreign Brexit loving money has bought people at the heart of Government, in the opposition, media & the BBC. Only a few brave journalists are getting the word out. It remains to be seen whether we still have an independent Police force.Our democracy is at stake.Stop Brexit.#FBPE 
Byline has been covering #Brexit #Trump #Russia for 18 months, and ⁦@BylineFest⁩ will be returning to the combination of Dark Money, Deep Data and Putin with all these great speakers in August  
Trump Says His Brexit Negotiation Advice ‘Too Brutal’ for PM May, Warning Over Trade Deal   
Donald Trump ‘waded into the maelstrom’ of controversy surrounding UK Prime Minister Theresa May’s Brexit plan, criticizing it in an interview, then ‘deriding his own interview as fake news.’ Could the ensuing chaos be good for democracy? Via John Lloyd.  
Since the pound slumped after Brexit we're probably cheaper :-) 
If Mrs May wins a vote of no confidence, UK gets BRINO. If Mrs May loses, what is the likelihood that a Brexiteer leader is installed, without dissension in the Party, for a complete Brexit?  
So you are available for some marches and not others? Brexit=Trump, it epitomizes populism, division and causes racism and hatred,  hurts everyone in this country, and you support it. We all wish you didn't support Brexit.  But you do. #StopBrexitSaveBritain 
I can't believe this - David Cameron clearly feels no shame for the Brexit mess he created. Look at the state of him.  
Brexit has created a terrible mess in the UK. It must be fought & stopped. It is failing, we are winning: and then there must be reform of the rotten system that caused it to happen. #PeoplesVote 
Actually, caption needed. 12 Russians were indicted today. Confirmed Russian interference in US elections and interference in Brexit. Yet they hold hands and smile. I’m tired of these politicians enabling the perversion of democracy & taking us for granted. TIRED. #TrumpProtest 
The big 5.  Nick Robinson /Rob Burley /Andrew Marr /John Humphreys / AF Neill - all need to go  & go quickly if we are to save the @bbc - some of them also are involved in the #brexit thing in a deep personal way.They shouldn't be running @bbcnews - conflict of interest#FBPE 
Because you have stripped away our right to live, study, work, marry or retire in Europe, many exciting possibilities have gone forever.  Hence many would be adventurers feel saddened rather than energised by the prospect of brexit.   
Why is this Irish Water even still in existence, we were promised by the majority in the Dail especially ff that it would be scrapped, and a Referendum would be put before the People on the future of OUR water.? They may have forgotten the Irish People haven't. #GE18 #IrishWater 
Tonight: Transatlantic relationships. President Trump meets with British Prime Minster May, striking a theme of unity, despite disagreements over ‘Brexit.’ Also: Constitutional concerns & the phony immigration deadline. Also: the effort to unseat Wacky Maxine Waters #MAGA #TCOT 
Dear #bbc.  You do such a brilliant job with  #bbcproms & #bbcdrama Why on earth have you lost it with #bbcnews & current affairs? Your journalists aren’t challenging politicians any more, you’ve become so biased for brexit you’ve lost objectivity. We want the old bbc back. #FBPE 
This corruption is being taken far,  far more seriously in the US than it is in the "U"K. (It's how Trump was corruptly "elected" and how the 2016 referendum was knobbled and "won" by leave you know!) @JolyonMaugham @BrexitBin @abcpoppins @carolecadwalla @acgrayling @MollyMEP 
#BREXIT cuisine for those earning over £50000 per annum. The elite cookbook of the future  
The anti-Brexit force is strong  in ⁦@JolyonMaugham⁩ and ⁦@cliodiaspora⁩ 
Farage predicts ‘DRAMATIC’ week for Theresa May as ‘middle England’ react to soft Brexit 
Also made me think that anyone attached to the toxic Brexit project and the similarly toxic Trump is doomed. The mood has changed. 73% of Britons have an unfavourable view of Trump and Brexit by association. 
After a tumultuous second day in the UK, marked by widespread protests and a shock interview in which he slammed Theresa May's Brexit plans, @realDonaldTrump has landed in Scotland.More on the day's events:  
“Chequers is dead in the water. Theresa May doesn’t have the majority to pass the Chequers brand of Brexit, neither should she. Where does she go now? I’ll tell you. She goes across the floor to the Blairite Traitors who are waiting in their scores to prop up a Tory Government”  
'For the first time since the 2016 vote for Brexit, I think a second referendum could be possible'  
All the Leavers has to do was put forward tangible and measurable reasons why Brexit was better than what we have now. No single example ever made. So how do you expect people to be persuaded? All I heard was rhetoric and following that is the path to bad history 
I HAVE JUST HAD ENOUGH OF THE LEFT WING BIAS OF CHANNEL4 NEWS. They always push the leftist cause. They've been consistently anti-Trump, anti-Brexit, anti many of the things I'm for. They pretend to balance occasionally but their bias is clear and frequent.  
#TrumpBaby bc #London seems to have gone down the  with their Mayor. Glad America  was the original #Brexit   
Just done a great meeting with @unitetheunion in Doncaster. Agreement on the need to stop the damaging, costly, job-destroying, rights-threatening #Tory #Brexit  
Really productive and encouraging meeting this afternoon with @michaelgove and Hastings fishermen who were pleased to hear they will get a fair share of our waters after Brexit. Great news for our local community.  
Pretty much like you did at the Brexit protest.  
"How Brexit Is becoming a political disaster for Britain"  
Anti-capitalist, anti-Brexit, Pro-Palestine, pro-climate change liberal lunatic‘s in London turn violent against pro Trump rally’s! These 100,000 maniacs on the streets of London and elsewhere have nothing to do with ⁦@POTUS,⁩ they’re anarchist 
Donald Trump says he predicted Brexit the day before the referendum while in Turnberry, Scotland.But he actually visited the day after the Brexit vote.  
The #Brexit deal will affect the future of young people everywhere. Join us on October 20 to march for a #PeoplesVote:  #PeoplesVoteMarch 
They call #BrexitShambles a "soft #Brexit"You have to soft in the head to believe thatThe only "exiting" would be UK MEPs in Brusselsresulting in REGULATION without REPRESENTATION#TrumpVisitUK exposes May's subterfuge#BrexitmeansBrexit 
51% say Trump is too untrustworthy to negotiate a deal with. That's a big number! 65% want a vote on the #Brexit deal. That's an even bigger number.  
Matt - you need to put 20th Oct in your diary. Trump was put in place by the same people that manipulated the Brexit vote - come to London to protest that too.#StopBrexitSaveBritain 
The other 60 odd million didn't protest. However, we will have it fed to us by the BBC, Sky et al who will push the globalist agenda and give the protesters the impression that we all feel the same. We have this over Brexit too. It's becoming tiresome. 
Brexiteer MP DEMANDS answers amid claims Merkel saw Brexit blueprint BEFORE Parliament  
So Trump wants a hard Brexit. Putin wants a hard Brexit. Johnson wants to be PM. May wants a lie down. 
.@POTUS to @theresa_may on Brexit: "Whatever you do is okay with me. That's your decision... just make sure we can trade together. That's all that matters."  
In case you have forgotten; Trump and Brexit are the same thing.#TrumpProtest #TrumpBabyBlimp #TrumpUKVisit 
British Poll: 51% of Brits Appreciate President Trump's Views on Brexit  
The City of London still doesn't know what Brexit means  (via @bopinion) 
#honestpoll Is the #NHS safe from US businesses and privatisation after #brexit? Please #vote and #retweet. Comments welcome.#TrumpUKVisit #NHS70 
Trump’s claims that he predicted Brexit revealed as ‘fake news’ | Via The Scotsman  
We are appeasing a fascist. May should hang her head in shame, playing poodle to this toxic tyrant. Are we to be vassals to this hideous monster? It’s terrifying. Wake up! Brexit means the end of Britain. #StopBrexitSaveDemocracy #TrumpNotWelcome #TrumpFascist 
There's a special edition of Chopper's Brexit Podcast tonight with @realDonaldTrump's former chief strategist Steve Bannon. We reveal the secret advice the President gave Theresa May on Brexit, and why @BorisJohnson should lead the Tories. From 10pm on @Telegraph @brexitbroadcast 
Mark my words.The #Trump administration is not a friend to save us after brexit. It is a business waiting to pounce on a failing economy. You think the #NHS is under threat now? Just wait until US lobbyists have a say in its future.But don't worry, MPs will be fine... 
When I look at all those who hate this man 
City lawyers also doing well out of Brexit, like Farage. it’s what voters in Sunderland and Mansfield hoped would be the outcome ‘  
Theresa May’s Brexit plan won’t work  
This is what  you voted Brexit for, so Farage could top up his taxpayer salary (and acquire German residency status just in case) . Hope you’re doing as well !   
The absurdity of Brexit in just one tweet. Absurd idea that Redwood & Brexiters aren't the Establishment. Absurd slogans about 'adventure'. Absurd understanding of how international trade & relations work. Absurd historical reference. Absurd lack of any practical ideas.  
Thanks. The MAGA Movement understands why BREXIT happened and how much @realDonaldTrump is truly respected by the British. 
See @sarahkendzior to fully understand the history of this debacle and @carolecadwalla to understand the underpinnings that connect Brexit and Trump's election. 
I wonder if @DominicRaab has looked in the draw of his desk at @DExEUgov yet. It wouldn't surprise me if there was a handwritten note from @DavidDavisMP which said "I'm afraid there is no #Brexit - Good luck!"#BRINO #ChequersBetrayal #NotOurBrexit #SackOllyRobbins #MayMustGo 
Brexiteers plan to block @theresa_may White Paper proposals by rebelling against her next #Brexit bill.  #borisjohnson @borisjohnson #boris johnson  #Brexit  
How about a mulligan on Brexit?  via @MotherJones 
media focus today is all what he said about May and Brexit but for me the most shocking comments were attacks from a US President on immigrants and the effect of immigration on European “culture”. We all know what that really means. 
'For the first time since the 2016 vote for Brexit, I think a second referendum could be possible'  
Trump was accused of criticising Theresa May's Brexit strategy, so obviously he just lied.#TrumpUKVisit #TrumpMay 
•The prime minister shall be limited to 2 terms in office•All MP’s shall be limited to 3 terms in office•There should be a public referendum before going to war except for invasion by a foreign military or immediate threat.•Party manifestos should be legally binding7/7 
As a Brit, this is the first time I've been proud of us as a nation for two years since #Murdoch's referendum triumph.#PressReform 
#Brexit, #BritainFirst, #farright, #FreeTommyRobinson #altright, #neoNazis #racists, #Muslimhaters  have been on the rise recently but, this day, following #DonaldTrumpVisit the people of #Britain have squarely told your leader “you are not welcome”. 
The fact the complaining about leaking was leaked shows the Tories are in utter turmoil. Whatever you think about Brexit, the party was united towards a common goal until May threw away all aspirations for a Global Britain... #MayMustGo 
Before the referendum we had the highest growth of the G7.Now we don’t.Had we not shot ourselves in the foot we could have funded an NHS increase through the revenues generated from higher growth.Now the NHS increase will be funded by borrowing and tax rises.  
No one person can be Brexit. JRM needs to form a United Brexit Party and welcome all the prominent and talented Brexiteers into it.  
Didn’t you say Brexit and Trump were the same yesterday? 
Behind my jovial, laissez faire Twitter persona, I am actually jolly cross about #Brexit.I think a #PeoplesVote is in order. Does one agree? 
Brexit white paper won't win over MPs or the EU -  If you think that Brexit should involve a #PeoplesVote then sign the petition here: 
James Whale has his say on the Brexit white paper: 'We're being led by a bunch of morons!' Read more ▼ @THEJamesWhale 
BBC News - Lloyd's of London chief executive Inga Beale criticises Brexit White Paper.  “We’re moving to Brussels ... Full steam ahead”  
Being that Trump is in UK, blimp and Brexit madness... we’ll be having a special episode w/ @thisislaurat and @SteelBonnetDuke next Wed July 18 discussing English & British *ethnic* identity (aka not a passport). The After Party on @NoWhiteGuiltNWG’s YT. 
Well get your bloody act together over Brexit! Yadda, yadda about anything but the most important issue to face this country since WW2. Millions of people will be affected by this Brexit calamity you seem so keen on.  Sort yourself out! - FFS! @jeremycorbyn @SeumasMilne 
Circa post election 2017: #Brexiteer Louise Mensch expressing her warm gratitude to #Brexit heroes Donald Trump & Mike Pence for their support on the EU referendum.  Farage/Banks/Trump/Mensch/Wigmore/Bannon etc all share same vile racist homophobic ideology. #TrumpUK #Trumpism 
Trump arrives in Scotland (the day after Brexit) telling the world that the Scots were “going wild” for Brexit. Actually they’d just voted heavily against Brexit. He just can’t stop lying. @StephGrisham45 #TrumpScotland 
Sorry, Ricky, but I think a lot of Brexiteers (you know, the majority that won the Referendum) are rather pleased to see Trump in Britain talking sense on Brexit.  
"Nope. I have photos." Melania Trump's spokesperson tells a journalist she knows Trump was in Scotland the day before Brexit, because she was there...even though, again, he didn't go until the day after Brexit. The false tweets have remained up for four hours.  
“When you want to buy a house, you get a survey done and the sale is dependant on the survey. “Well, I want to see the survey before we leave the European Union. Give us a say - a second referendum - on how Brexit will affect our country, based on what the deal is.”  
Melania chose to marry and chooses to stay married to him. No sympathy. May stupidly invited him here. No sympathy for her either. Queen is doing her duty. Loads of sympathy for her. 
The UK is like the United States. It has highly liberal areas and highly nationalistic areas. Don’t forget our #Brexit brothers and sisters who are fighting to Make England Great Again! 
The year is 2020- Trump wins another term, Brexit has happened, and Djokovic and Nadal are still waiting to get on court because Isner and Anderson are still playing... #Wimbledon 
I’m no fan of the PM, but the way Trump keeps grabbing her makes me squirm. It’s so disrespectful, not just of her office but of her personal space. I can’t imagine Merkel letting him get away with it. That May can’t admonish him is the price we pay for Brexit  
If  Trump doesn’t want us in Europe you can bet that’s the place we should be.Brexit is bust@Bonn1eGreer 
UK headline: "Theresa May Has a Civilizing Effect on Donald Trump."lolPolitically, I'd like to see Trump have a civilizing effect on May & her govt.Trump leads a democracy.May leads a tyranny.If I am wrong & the UK abides by the will of the ppl, why hasn't Brexit happened? 
So that means around 65%... Yea freedom is popular. British Poll: 51% of Brits Appreciate President Trump's Views on Brexit  via @gatewaypundit 
Trump Says His Brexit Negotiation Advice ‘Too Brutal’ for PM May, Warning Over Trade Deal   
The last few days have proved even more that #brexit is a coup. Johnson, Leadsom, Mogg, Wigmore, Mercer, Banks, Hands, Davis, Farage, IDS, Fox, Redwood, Gove, Dacre, Murdoch, IEA, the ERG, Snowden, Trump, Putin, Koch, Bannon, Hintze, Odey, Ashcroft, Hoey, Patel, Raab, Baker... 
'I voted to Leave NOT half-leave!' IDS ridicules Theresa May's Brexit White Paper   
After criticising Theresa May's Brexit plan in an interview in The Sun, Donald Trump has dismissed the report in the UK newspaper as 'fake news'  
80% of Kent businesses see EU as main export market. No wonder they're worried as #Brexit will damage their future @Labour4EU @EK_EuropeanMove 
To many in Brussels, it still looks like UK wants many of the benefits of EU membership without its obligations—free movement, budget contributionsMay’s paper looks more like a membership application than an exit, only the start of the Brexit climbdown  
Whistleblower for the benefit of us all, written off, trudged to hell and back, went down the data rabbit hole on Brexit, made out to be a conspiracy theorist, now proven right. Buy his book people - we’ve all been and still are being played.  
EXACTLYNigel Farage played a leading role in #Brexit, which involved some of the same shady characters (Mercer, Bannon, #CambridgeAnalytica) as #TrumpRussia.What was on the thumb drive that Farage passed to WikiLeaks’ Julian Assange  
Except when it comes to Brexit. Isn't that right Jeremy...? 
Re #TrumpUKVisit protests at Trafalgar Square - there is NOT 100k people here.Closer to 20-30k.Absolutely nothing organic."Protestors" have been bussed in w/many professionally manufactured signs by Labour and Remain (anti-Brexit) organizations.Dying breath of globalism.  
Support for #PeoplesVote growing daily as polls show govt seen as incompetent & business moving to #EU due to #Brexit. Corbyn needs to get on board. It is our only way out of this Tory created mess #FBPE 
My article for @TheNewEuropean on the North East and Brexit  
After Trump made the false claim that he had “predicted Brexit” during a trip to Scotland the day before the 2016 referendum, several reporters pointed out that he had, in fact, arrived in Scotland the day after the vote.  
We asked Labour's @stephenctimms #HowWillBrexitBenefitM?He is incredibly worried about where #Brexit is heading and agrees that there should be a #PeoplesVote on the final deal#StopBrexitSaveBritain #SODEMaction 
BBC News - EU's Jean-Claude Juncker stumbled 'in sciatica attack' . BBC told to run this anti EU story. What about Russian interference in the Referendum. State controlled media. Stop Brexit. #FBPE 
All these people turning out on to the streets of London to protest against a man they call a fascist when some of the most active present day fascists are in office in this so-called European Union of theirs. Go figure.#Brexit 
At the pub with @oidptg and Corbyn walked past trailed by a few hard remainers shouting PLEASE STOP BREXIT, so I, the intellectual, screamed DO HARD BREXIT. Probably now presumed to be an awful Tory but got to live in the moment, I guess 
'For the first time since the 2016 vote for Brexit, I think a second referendum could be possible' #StopBrexit #FBPE #PeoplesVote 
‘They gave us Brexit and The Apprentice’ #dumptrump *full video over on our Facebook* 
“Let me be absolutely clear, Brexit means Remain” - Theresa May. #MayMustGo 
BBC News - Russians indicted over US election hack . BBC makes no linkage to interference in the Referendum. Has no one at the BBC got any intelligence or investigative instincts. No just a BBC cover up and active manipulation of the news. Stop Brexit #FBPE 
Here is my latest on @DCU_Brexit_Inst blog: The Seven Circles of Brexit. Brexit is complex because Theresa May must obtain consent or acquiescence of 7 political groups: 1) War cabinet 2) Cabinet 3) Caucus 4) Governing majority 5) Parliament 6) UK 7) EU 
Trump knows that the US can exercise more power in a UK weakened by Brexit - The Independent  
Conservatives left reeling after a dose of reality on Brexit  
Just watching Trump blackmailing #theresamay on @BBCNews Seems we have 2 choices: 1. Become a #vassalstate to a lying misogynistic Nazi loving immigrant hating adulterer with the loyalty and attention span of a gnat2. STOP BREXIT oooh ~ hard choice .........not #TrumpUKVisit 
Now @realDonaldTrump has completed his visit to and is heading to Scotland for the weekend can we turn our attention back to the betrayal of #Brexit by @theresa_may and the @Conservatives#MayOut #MayResign #MayMustGo #BrexitBetrayal #Brexit #CCHQ 
May’s Brexit UNDER FIRE: Hammond desperately tries to defend plans after City attack  NO ONE likes it, ffs sake May get a grip. It’s shit for everyone. If youre trying to build apathy & eventually Remain then your in for a world of trouble & revolt 
Corbyn, confirmed to be at Durham Miner's Gala tomorrow. Join @NE4EU to show him what you think of Brexit! We are meeting 10am at the Gala theatre to launch our new banner and march! #WATON @isitworthitbus @mikegalsworthy @OFOCBrexit  
The American president's comments spell out why a hard Brexit is such a bad idea  
What Julian Assange was doing the night before Brexit..."Organization 1" is Wikileaks. Here it is emailing Guccifer 2.0 on June 22, 2016..  
Remaining in the EU involves no vassalage & no loss of sovereignty.  We are a leader in the EU. The EU is hugely important in world affairs. We & our fellow members set the standard. There is a myth that Brexit brings us sovereignty. It does not. #StopBrexit #PeoplesVote #FBPE 
Help Get Britain Out save Brexit! Read our letter to Theresa May and use the included information to contact us if you wish to add your name. 
Who ever the leader may come and go but the people have already decided to END THE GLOBALIZATION.#Trump#Brexit#Frexit#Nexit#Gerexit#Grexit#Itexit 
Why do I feel uneasy at the blurring of lines between a political party, our devolved government & the third sector in Scotland? Not to mention any subtle campaign of influence on the culture of our young generation. Am I alone in feeling uneasy? (PS I think Brexit is bad)  
Brexiteers must stand together against May's betrayal. We have been led down the garden path by Theresa May and her Europhile Cabinet. Time to replace her and get Brexit back on track! Support us at  
At the #TrumpProtest in Manchester.... which is buzzing... with placards, flags and ‘Bollox to Brexit’ stickers.‘This is a city that says no to RW populists and the politics of division.’  
One thing that we've learned over the past 2 years ... Don't send a Remainer to do a Brexiteer's job. @Conservatives #EmbraceYourInnerBoris on #Brexit  
During a joint press conference with UK Prime Minister Theresa May, President Trump backtracks on comments he made to the Sun newspaper about May's Brexit strategy. But he doubles down on his ethno-nationalist comments about immigration.  
Dear Mr Mogg @Jacob_Rees_Mogg please be so kind as to enlighten this cave dweller as to the cost of #Brexit to the British Taxpayer so far and the projected cost post 29 Mar 2019. Your intrusion into my rights and freedoms is unwarranted and most disagreeable.#PeoplesVote 
Trump has frequently begun conversations w/Theresa May by urging her to speed up "Brexit." He has attacked Nicola Spurgeon, crowed about his golf courses & disagreed with her sharply on immigration. Her advisers say it's quite difficult to deal w/him.  
Trump has complicated relationships with Europe's two most powerful women. @GregJaffe, @marycjordan and I explain here, and go inside his interactions with Theresa May, who he has frequently hectored to expedite "Brexit."  
Obama came over and told us how to vote in the referendum - I'm guessing you were equally outraged then?  
Three bigly points:1) Trump won't be in power for much (if any) time after Brexit is finalised2) If anything but a suicidal hard Brexit fails to get us good deals elsewhere then Brexit is worthless3) More people are at Trump protests than attended his inauguration 
WATCH | Remain-voting @piersmorgan slams May's Chequers deal: "Barnier, Juncker and Merkel are all making approving noises - of course they are! This is us basically not really leaving! I voted to stay but this is not Brexit!" Support us at  
Oops ...EU Parliament threatens to veto Theresa May’s new Brexit plan over Irish border#PeoplesVote 
Under Theresa May's Brexit we will have to apply to Brussels to spend our own money  
Are you aged 8 - 18? Children and young people in Scotland are going to be affected by #Brexit, so we want your views! Apply to join the @cisweb Children & Young People's Panel on Europe to work with @scotgov. Find out more & apply by 22nd August   
Incredible strong women @Women_4_Europe joining the march to #StopTrump & #StopBrexit today because when a racist fascist sexist homophobic anti-abortion climate-change denier wants the UK to Brexit you know you should oppose it! #CarnivalOfResistance 
Every time May finds herself in more trouble with #Brexit cops in Wiltshire make another breakthrough in their search for Novichok. This time round they found a small bottle with #Novichok in Charlie Rowley's flat in Amesbury. Taking the piss come naturally to them, it seems. 
I hear VAT is going up in Ghana. Why? So we raise money for referendum to create new regions? 
"Once the Brexit process is concluded and perhaps the UK has left the EU - I don't know what they're going to do, but whatever you do is OK with me." After making these remarks, Trump is told by Theresa May that the UK will definitely be leaving the EU on 29 March 2019.  
Remember that Nigel Farage visited Assange, Stone & Trump Jr communicated with him, & Assange was key to Snowden’s “sanctuary” in Russia. #DOJ #Brexit  
#OhLo.OKs LiKe i'M #FaKe_NeWs TOOFTLOY#auspol #brexit #ausmedia#wwg1wga #walkaway@OddemocracyA#qanon #cbts#maga#lol 
#Trump praises British Prime Minister May one day after report criticizing her approach to #Brexit  
What with all this bollox with #Trump #Brexit shit government, shit opposition, lack of funding for Wales,     right wing, left wing, JRM, Jezza, fuckin shit Welsh Labour, Prince of Wales Bridge, twat Welsh Secretary & fuckin Love Island, I’ve decided to go full on @YesCymru 
Fascism doesn’t come all at once - it comes disguised in kitten healed baby steps walking towards a Brexit nightmare, guided by the hand of a madman @NicolaSturgeon please call #Indyref2 soon#HandmaidsTale #Brexit  
Leftists in #London  hate @Potus. So what? Facts:1) these r the ppl  who banned guns & murders skyrocketed. 2) same people who voted to “dull knives” when gun ban didn’t work 3) #BREXIT won 4) ever see a #TrumpRally? 
Spanish Finance Minister Montoro: “Not one euro of public money was spent by the Catalan Government on the referendum”Why, then, is #CatalanPresident @krls Puigdemont being charged with doing precisely that? 
How dares Russia interfere in American elections?? US Ambassador to #Macedonia is right now literally calling the voters to support the referendum that will change our name and national identity  
Portillo on May's #Brexit failure"This is the most dreadful betrayal.We have conducted ourselves in this miserably timid way for the last couple of two years."  
Just a true Brit fighting for Brexit pal 
If Mrs May’s intentions were to make both sides of a divided electorate unhappy over Brexit, then it appears she’s passed with flying colours.Theresa May has lost the first week of her Chequers war  
President Trump denied criticizing British Prime Minister Theresa May on her home soil Friday, despite being quoted in an interview with a British tabloid saying she ignored his advice on Brexit.  
Centrist contortions. Because Corbyn has failed to single-handedly stop Brexit, we must support Theresa May's deal ...  
Time for Labour to oppose Brexit. This, of all times, is the wrong time to be separating the UK from the EU. Think again @jeremycorbyn Oppose Brexit. Save the UK. 
Whats frustrating about this is: I don't give a toss whether Trump predicted the Brexit vote correctly or not. I only give a toss about him and his staff lying about it.  
Trump: Brexit Happened Because of ‘Very Bad’ Immigration   
What could be more perfect than a split-screen of Trump standing next to the Queen of England (victims of Russian hacking in Brexit) while Rosenstein is set to announce additional indictments against 12 Russian intelligence officers for hacking the DNC (to help Trump win). 
Brilliant. Thank you, @OwenJones84. Now there’s only one question: what good is to take a stand against populism of Trump while simultaneously supporting Brexit—which has its roots in the exact same populism? It’s a genuine question, Owen: I am desperately trying to understand.  
Amid Protests, Trump Meeting with Theresa May After Criticizing Her over Brexit  
Some commentators see symmetry in the interventions anti and pro Brexit by successive Presidents. There is one crucial difference. President Trump is not intervening in an election or referendum, whereas President Obama deliberately tried to influence voting. 
Most people think @RealDonaldTrump was right to make his views on #Brexit public, according to a Sky Data poll #TrumpUKVisitFor more Sky Data results on President Trump’s visit read this:  
Trump’s criticism of May’s Brexit plan zeroes in on trade reality  
A small number of leftie wasters who have nothing better to do. Most are probably on welfare, kept by the state. Trump is well supported in UK and a poll on Sky News is indicative of the support for Trump. #maga #Brexit 
(1) Health is not "completely devolved" to Scotland.(2) The UK Gov has transferred powers from Scotland to  Westminster through the EU Withdrawal Act.(3) The UK Parliament can legislate on devolved areas.(4) Theresa May has not excluded the #NHS from a #Brexit trade deal.  
Week in Review: Trump’s survival-of-the-fittest worldview shows perils of Brexit  
Yet Theresa May our PM stands there  while the POTUS says a disgraced lying ex cabinet member should be PM. That’s how powerless the PM is post ref , that’s how powerless UK citizens are now . Brexit is trump. #StopBrexit#TrumpUKVisit 
British Poll: 51% of Brits Appreciate President Trump's Views on Brexit  via @gatewaypundit 
Nigel Farage Discusses President Trump U.K. Visit and Accompanying Truth Bombs Over Brexit…  
Let me see if I have this right:1) The Sun records Trump criticising May over Brexit.2) Trump says this is "fake news"3) The Sun says Trump calling them "fake news" is.... fake news.What next? Our existence on earth is fake news? 
It may be just me, but I do find the posts from SNP MPs/MSPs and supporters condemning May’s Chequers proposal interesting. By attacking her softest Brexit plan, they are showing quite clearly that they are simply anti-Tory, and not at all interested in what’s best for Scotland. 
Mass protests in central London as Trump walks back Brexit interview  
TRUMP SLAMS UK’S MAY OVER BREXIT, THEN DENIES IT:  Pres. Trump denies his interview with 'The Sun' was critical of Prime Minister Theresa May in a press conference this morning, calling it "fake news" — although his interview was recorded. The co-hosts discuss.  
Boris Johnson, Donald Trump and the Rise of Radical Incompetence  #Brexit #TrumpRussia #TrumpBaby 
“The UK adopting wholesale EU rules on goods makes it very difficult to progress meaningful trade agreements,” @missvhewson of our trade unit gives her verdict on the #Brexit White Paper There is much to gain and little to fear from a US-UK trade deal:  
Trump vows 'great' trade deal with UK, abruptly changing tack on May's Brexit plan  
You only need to glance at the BBC news to realise every single story they can find that is anti-Brexit is moved up the reporting ladder, whilst every story that puts Remoaners in a bad light is completely ignored. This is not an impartial organisation & has never been. 17/18 
Tory MP @JamesDuddridge: Chequers plan isn't Brexit I campaigned for or my constituents supported. “There is an alternative.  We should tell the French and German governments we will move to established World Trade Organisation rules.   
.@SteveHiltonx: Trump is 100% right about Brexit. Theresa May caved to the elitist establishment who want to stay in the EU.  
My Annual Lecture for @JCMS_EU, on "Brexit: Where is the UK-EU Relationship Heading?", is now out on FirstView:  
To recap: Sun interviews Trump; releases audio of Trump attacking May over Brexit. When asked about it, Trump says it’s fake news. Then the Sun is asked about being called fake news. They say it’s fake news to say that he called them fake news. All of this is on tape. ¯\_(ツ)_/¯  
EVEN Trump doesn't think Theresa May should walk away with a no deal Brexit.  So Trump is officially saner than @Jacob_Rees_Mogg#FlounceOutBrexit 
#MAGA #NATO #EU.. TRUMP UK - MAJORITY of BRITS SHARE TRUMP's VIEWS on BREXIT:British Poll: 51% of Brits Appreciate President Trump’s Views on Brexit. 
In a interview, President Trump castigated Theresa May for her approach to Brexit and said it might jeopardize a trade deal.At a news conference on Friday, he expressed the opposite view.  
And it will take us decades to repair the damage we are doing to ourselves over Brexit.  
Yes: this Brexit folly has done all sorts of damage to our society as well as economy. But as one astute Tweeter said: Remaining in the EU hurts no-one. Brexit hurts millions. “Divide in the UK may last long after Brexit is over - Evening Standard  
To all journalists who keep insisting Trump never predicted the Brexit result, here is what he told me in March, 2016: 
Your own tweet from June 24, 2016 says that Trump arrived on June 24 (the day after Brexit):  
51% think Trump was right to speak out on Brexit. That’s a big number!  
“The radical right want a no-deal Brexit so they can force Britain into a disaster capitalist trade deal with the USA.” — good piece by @AdamRamsay 
President Trump said UK PM Theresa May is "doing a fantastic job" with Brexit talks ... hours after The Sun published an interview with him where he called her negotiating tactics "very unfortunate"   
We love you KW and London and all our British friends! Wish all us @lady_all_stars could be there in London with you supporting our @POTUS . Thanks for being such a great friend to the USA! #BREXIT #MEGA #MAGA  #TrumpUKVisit 
Note the datestamp on his “just arrived in Scotland” tweet: 10.21am on Friday 24 June 2016 - the day after the referendum.  
President Donald Trump again falsely claimed on Friday that he predicted the Brexit vote results ahead of the referendum during a visit to his Turnberry golf course in Scotland in 2016  
This is it, in a nut shell, this is the essence of Brexit & nationalism. Immigration, other religions, other sexuality, other cultures = change & change is inevitable because everything is impermanent.  There are those of us who accept this & embrace it and then there is this.  
Nigel Farage - "If they don’t get rid of Theresa May and get back on track then I will, next spring, come back into the front line of British politics."I’ll tell you what. If I have to do this again, next time no more Mr Nice Guy." #Brexit  
I think this is the one for the march today - courtesy of  @DemarcationDSGN Join me and raise two fingers to the man who lied his way to Brexit and the heart of @realDonaldTrump 
How others see us - Mrs 61 has just translated from Dutch:  “Good news for fans of British TV comedy show ‘Brexit’ as it enters a 3rd season...” (they even compare it to Monty Python)  
Even Melania’s Comms Director engages in Orwellian gaslighting. Trump lied about arriving in the UK before Brexit. The Brexit referendum was June 23, 2016. Trump traveled overnight to Scotland, arriving on June 24th. He even tweeted about arriving—on the 24th. Why lie about this?  
Something is happening out there in #Brexit Britain [thread] 1/ 
The Trump tweets that show he left the US for Turnberry after polls has closed in the Brexit referendum, and opened his golf course after the result was known. He was not there the day before the vote and it's weird that he and the White House persist in their fake version  
*impeaches Trump and cancels Brexit*  
Donald Trump: "I was opening Turnberry the day before Brexit...I said Brexit will happen and it did happen"Fact check: The UK voted to leave the EU on 23rd June 2016Donald Trump opened Trump Turnberry on 24th June 2016 
Not just East England, but form all over.  I am in the North West, and was never a member of UKIP although I did vote UKIP in 2015.  On Monday I joined UKIP.  I am ready to fight for my democracy, my country and my Brexit. 
Trump is suddenly calling reports that he said Theresa May's plans for a “soft” Brexit could kill a planned trade deal between the U.S. and the U.K. "fake news."  
What’s amazing is the people of the UK have great concerns about crime, out-of-control immigration, suppression of free speech, undoing of Brexit, yet They protest the ONE world leader that shares & supports their concerns?! They should be protesting their own government!  
Melania Trump’s spin chief propagating the lie that Donald Trump was in Scotland the day before the EU referendum. Depressing and sinister.  
.@Nigel_Farage talks about @realDonaldTrump and the feeling of betrayal over the current state of #Brexit negotiations on @BreitbartNews Daily on @SiriusXMPatriot 
LONDON PROTEST This is a product of open borders, Progressive Socialism. Fake News Media there, controlled & carefully scripted.  They only report negatively on @realDonaldTrump Media does what they always do.  Alternative fact based media is blocked or censored @TruNews #Brexit  
Trump took a huge dump on May's Brexit plans – then blamed The Sun for not cleaning it up | @tompeck 
Had one of those lightbulb moments where you realise that you’ve missed something important about Brexit and politics, so I wrote about it:  
Donald Trump today: "If you remember I was opening Turnberry the day before Brexit... They asked for my opinion and I think you will agree I said Brexit will happen."Trump on 24 June, the day after the referendum: "Just arrived in Scotland."  
Theresa May is floating like a cork in a sea of Brexit and Trumpian shite. Blown this way and that, from day to day, minute to minute. Today Trump puffed out his orange cheeks and blew her back to the shore of hard brexit, where the US will utterly rip off a weak and cowering UK. 
Getting messages from across East of England of former Kippers signing up for duty again. Thought they had secured Brexit, now realise May has conned them. I bet it's the same elsewhere too. 
Melania Trump's press secretary is insisting Donald Trump *did* predict Brexit day before the vote, when it's not in dispute that he did it the day after, and that he lies about it.There's dozens of videos showing him arriving on 24 June.These are curious times we live in.  
"Given the stakes... not surprised to see the recent flurry of ill-founded fear-mongering by astroturf groups created by powerful businesspeople, backroom strategists and grumpy ex-politicians to spread confusion about the upcoming referendum on B.C.'s electoral system." #pr4bc 
Supporters marching for a #PeoplesVote. @realDonaldTrump ruled out a deal with current #Brexit deal. We need to take control of final deal  
It breaks my heart that a referendum was held and Vote Leave cheated and broke the law. It breaks my heart that Mrs May @theresa_may and Mr Corbyn @jeremycorbyn lead parties that are more concerned for their own unity than the future prosperity of our country. Heartbreaking..... 
 Here's the proof that @realDonaldTrump was at Turnberry the day AFTER the referendum - not as he repeatedly claims the day of the vote 
On #AJNewsGrid: US President Donald Trump directly criticised UK Prime Minister Theresa May’s "soft Brexit" strategy, saying it could "kill" chances of a US-UK trade deal. Send us your questions  
The EU costs less than overseas aid, ‘we’ are the EU, not ‘they’, migration has enriched the UK in almost every way, the EU is a civilising force. By contrast Brexit has coarsened our behaviour, weakened our economy and wrecked our future. We need a #PeoplesVote. #StopBrexit 
Why a geo-political partnership with #Canada, #Australia and #NewZealand is the most logical step for the #UK as it seeks new political relationships ahead of #Brexit.#CANZUK #cdnpoli #auspol #nzpol #ukpoli 
Trump twice repeats falsehood that he was in the UK the day before Brexit and predicted it would happen  
If Trump says his comments about Brexit and May are fake news and lies then that means the Sun intentionally manipulated and edited a video and audio recording of a US President. His base should be outraged no? 
Trump talking about Brexit reminds me of myself trying to spoof my way through the oral Irish at school. Ta beirt, er, dra-harr agam agus, er, beirt dra-fooer. 
You think you're free. You're unarmed gagged slaves. Meanwhile, your invaders are all around you. Unarmed you represent no credible challenge to the Crown that rules over you.@realDonaldTrump speaks truth but you refuse to listen. #Wakeup #Trump #May #Brexit #UK #MAGA 
Every news report and broadcast, as well as Trump's own tweets from 24 June 2016, show his Turnberry Brexit story to be untrue, as @BBCJonSopel rightly says. Why Grisham – Melania Trump's director of communications – is colluding in this obvious falsehood is odd and worrying 
.@realDonaldTrump almost ruled out trading with #brexit deal. We need a #PeoplesVote on final deal 
The Mayor of London Khan takes a page from the US liberal playbook organizing a leftist protest. Heck, doubt they know what they are protesting. Real Londoners know the truth and are against this drama. #SadiqKhan #LondonProtest #TheresaMay #Brexit  
.@thomasbrake .@FabianLeedsNE .@alexsobel .@EmilyThornberry .@CarolineLucas .@CatherineWest1 I beg you to please continue to pressure @Jeremy_Hunt  to #FreeNazanin#Brexit is important but it keeps Nazanin on the backburner. Please  bring our dear Naz home .@AlistairBurtUK 
Thank you London. With love, from NYC  #CNN #JimAcosta #GuardianNews #Piccadilly #TrafalgarSquare#LondonProtest #LondonPride #Brexit #Immigration #TrumpUKVisit #FridayThe13th 
Where to begin! If only someone would end it....you have to feel for Melania, at least the Queen and May only have to pretend for a couple of hours. 
"You can't walk away, because if she walks away she's stuck." President Trump comments on British PM Theresa May's handling of Brexit negotiations during joint news conference  
Trump is suddenly calling reports that he said Theresa May's plans for a “soft” Brexit could kill a planned trade deal between the U.S. and the U.K. "fake news."  
Sky Data poll: Britons back Trump on airing Brexit views  
If people are really writing off the Brexit vote and pro-Brexit sentiment as nothing but a Russian op, we're in trouble.  
SOUND ON. Modern day #Tartuffe? A certain  visitor managed to squeeze in a visit to watch his favourite play @TRH_London. He finds links between it and #Brexit. Thanks for this endorsement of presidential proportions  #MakingTartuffeGreatAgain #Trump #TrumpUKVisit #London 
23 June was the referendum day, and the polls closed at 10pm so nobody at all would have known, least of all that burbling aneurysm Trump. You're thinking of 24 June, when literally everyone knew. You're welcome. 
Dear @StephGrisham45 - this is the tweet. This is the day after the Brexit referendum. Not the day before as @realDonaldTrump said. Are we agreed? 
He wasn't. Neither were you. You're lying in support of a liar. Here he is cutting the ribbon the day AFTER the referendum.  
Isolated? US wants a deal with UK, is worried Chequers Brexit plan will scupper it. The old Commonwealth countries are keen to welcome UK back into free trade. Remember EU is only 10% of world's population with a shrinking share of world trade.  
Donald Trump backtracks over Brexit criticism and calls Sun interview 'fake news' – live  
Nope. I have photos. I also have a newspaper from the morning after Brexit. I remember sitting in a pub the night before, watching the results come in. 
I love how Trump thinks Brexit is a 'great opportunity' for Britain, yet our own weak PM can't even admit that. May must go. 
President Trump described the US-UK relationship as the "highest level of special," before saying British Prime Minister Theresa May may have seen suggestions he gave her about Brexit as "too brutal"  
Trump thinks that by behaving in this capricious & inconsistent way he’s acting as a smart deal-maker. In fact he presents as a vacuous bully. If the Brexit plan means we have to swallow this stuff & become a puppet of this President, we have a problem.  
So in case you thought @theresa_may’s tricky day is over, I’ve just seen two rebel Brexiter MPs in Chequers car park, John Penrose and Edward Leigh, and ‘22 bigwig Cheryl Gillan, waiting to hear from @theresa_may why her Brexit white paper isn’t the turkey they think it is 
A poll by @SkyData suggests 51% of people think Donald Trump was right to make his views on Brexit public while 45% think he should have kept them private 
Stephanie - I hate to argue as we were there together. He was NOT at Turnberry on the day before the referendum, as he said at the news conference. He was not there on polling day itself. He was there the day after, on Friday 24th. These are indisputable facts 
Vote Leave 'won' by cheating & breaking the lawVote Leave 'won' based on an empty promiseVote Leave didn't have a planThe government doesn't have a plan, except cake@UKLabour doesn't have a plan, except cakeCakeFucking cakeWhat a fucking fuck upFuck #Brexit#PeoplesVote 
President Trump comments on Brexit during news conference with British PM Theresa May: "I don't know what they're going to do, but whatever you do is okay with me...just make sure we can trade together"  
'Fake news': Trump backtracks over criticism of May Brexit plan  
POLL: 60% of Brits support @realDonaldTrump meeting the Queen. And a majority say he was right to speak out on Brexit!   
Whether one is for or against @realDonaldTrump he deserves a warm and friendly welcome as the democratically elected President of our most important ally and partner. I'm enjoying drinking a toast to him, to the USA and to Britain's bright Brexit future. #TrumpUKVisit 
President Trump Touts Bilateral Ties with the U.K., Supports May Amid Brexit Talks -  #OANN #TrumpVisitUK 
President @RealDonaldTrump had said @theresa_may’s #Brexit plan would “kill trade” between the US and UK, but at a joint press conference he said whatever the PM does is “okay with me” #TrumpUKVisitFollow live updates from President Trump's visit here:  
British hacks who are mostly not very bright can't see the difference between Obama's interference before the EU Referendum in UK, when he tried to rig its result in favour of Remain, and Trump simply stating the way things are after the vote has taken place. #TrumpVisitUK 
Trump refusing to pull an Obama and give his opinion on Brexit, telling may she "can do whatever she wants as long as we can trade with UK". Well, we can't trade with UK independently unless it severs all ties with the cabal EU. Boom. #ArtOfTheDeal 
When it comes to Brexit, many Conservatives have put party over country   
Violence flaring in Northern Ireland, plans afoot to stock food for a Brexit no-deal, May humiliated by Trump, Britain isolated & British values dragged through the mud <-- Imagine living through this as a "liberal Brexiteer" without having the humility to admit you were wrong 
Britain and the United States agree to pursue "an ambitious UK-US free trade agreement" after #Brexit, Prime Minister Theresa May says following talks with US President Donald Trump  
"I believe after speaking with the prime minister's people that it will absolutely be possible" for US & UK to have free trade deal post-Brexit. Yesterday he said May's Brexit plan would "kill" that possibility  
Tell us something we don't already know.I didn't vote for a #TreasonMayExit I voted for #Brexit A storm is coming.#TreasonMay @theresa_may #BrexitBetrayal #May2Go #MayMustGo #MayUnfit4Office#TreasonMayExit 
Trump wasn't wrong: without escaping the constraints of the EU’s Customs Union and being free to diverge from EU regulations a meaningful US-UK trade deal isn't possible.If these two conditions are not met, many will rightly question whether ‘Brexit’ has any meaning at all. 
UK PM May doing 'fantastic' job on Brexit, says Trump, promising trade deal  
Donald Trump has backed away from his criticism of Theresa May's Brexit plans: 'Whatever you do is OK with me, whatever you do is OK with us, just make sure you can trade with us, that’s all that matters.'  
Yup it's #brexit without the exit as @Conservatives lie and deceive the house as to their plans. Press given the White Paper at 0900 and @UKLabour not given it at all. But that makes sense as Labour have ceased to matter now we have a criminal Tory cabal running UK ... 
Absolutely loving all these right-wing fuck-wits waiting on Trump's every word on Brexit like he's the oracle when in fact everything that comes out of his mouth is utter moronic bullshit. 
#MAGA #NATO #EU.. TRUMP UK - TRUMP to UK MEDIA / NO BREXIT ... NO TRADE DEALS:President Trump Drops the Heavy Hammer on May's Failure to GET Brexit Done -  Trump: May’s Brexit Plan ‘Will Probably Kill’ U.S. Trade Deal. 
Also says he was in Scotland the day before the Brexit vote and predicted it, which is a complete lie with video to prove it.  Why won't the press question him on that? 
Consistently brilliant analysis of unfolding Brexit tragedy. Chris Grey is my fix of sanity in a mad mad mad world.  
Chequers presser was an exercise in diplomacy. This is Trump's style. Throws grenade, then backs off and lets the consequences unfold. Chequers will be forgotten, but Trump's now fixed the spotlight on the betrayal of Brexit.#TrumpUKvisit 
"In reality his position is the same" - Former UKIP leader Nigel Farage says that although @realDonaldTrump struck a more conciliatory tone at today's press conference, he still wants the same outcome from Brexit Follow live updates on Trump visit:  
“Lots of people give me advice about how to negotiate with the European Union.”That was Theresa May’s answer to a question about Trump saying he gave her advice about Brexit. “My job is actually getting out there and doing it. And that’s exactly what I’ve done.”  
Hey #Britain, "You're WELCOME!" @realDonaldTrump likely saved Brexit, as feckless #May doesn't have much wiggle room. Thoughts @Nigel_Farage #TeamKJ 
The referendum was flawed. Similar to:Government: "Should we get a pet?"52%: "Yes"Government: "OK, we'll get a cat"1/2 of 52%: "Oh no, I hate cats. I wanted a dog."Except May has decided to get us a vampire bat!Time for MPs to act. #RevokeArticle50. 
Question that could have been asked to Trump:"Mr President, you have again stated you predicted Brexit while in Scotland, when you did not arrive there until the day after the vote. Give your apparent inability to be truthful, how can Mrs May allies trust anything you promise?" 
Trump rips British Prime Minister Theresa May over Brexit, then tries to ease tensions  
EU document has warned all member states to prepare for a No Deal Brexit. “Negotiations, on the other hand, can fail.”The British government must prepare the country to walk away!  
This is cool . Racist fool Trump #TrumpVisitUK #StopBrexit #Brexit  
.@Nigel_Farage: If Theresa May remains Prime Minister, the UK will not get the Brexit we voted for  
Just a few untrue items from Trump just now:--said he predicted Brexit in a 2016 presser that was a day after the vote--denied things he said in an intvw for which audio is public--blamed Obama for Russia's annexation of Crimea 
This needs to be the new normal. When they lie, bust them wide open. Play tapes, read quotes, show pictures. Make them look ridiculous. Might be tricky on programmes presented by people complicit in Trump/Brexit lies, of course.  
So Guy is calling Brexiteers Nazis now? #ThankEUGoodbye #Brexit #BRINO 
In a wide-ranging interview with the British tabloid The Sun, President Trump criticized Prime Minister Theresa May for her handling of Brexit and accused London Mayor Sadiq Khan of doing "a terrible job."  
US President Donald Trump on Brexit: "Whatever you do is okay with us, just make sure we can trade together, that's all that matters"  
#TheresaMay says UK, US agree to: - engage Russia with “strength and unity”- pursue ambitious free trade agreement after #Brexit#TrumpVisitUK 
With criticism of May's Brexit, Trump detonates a diplomatic grenade  
Some takeaways:1) Damage control: POTUS tried to walk back his explosive intv by differentiating between slamming May vs. slamming her policy on Brexit. (Again: the audio's out there.)Hand-holding seemed intentional to say: world, we're still pals! 
Last time #Brexit; this time #TrumpThese are twin evils of the far right. Identify fascism, name it, and resist#TrumpUKvisit 
Currently got a lot of Brexiteers on my timeline furious that Trump has just agreed to do a trade deal with the UK. This is the lunacy that now infects the Brexit camp. 
Trump Calls His Theresa May Brexit Criticism 'Fake News' - we all know what is Fake News- it’s trump. trump is Fake News because he lies so much and changes his positions so often there is no reality anymore. Only destruction...  
Fearful, craven, immoral, supplicatory. What a bright fucking future we’ve got. Fuck every bit of fuck out of Brexit. 
Friday Morning Briefing:- Trump attacks Theresa May's #Brexit plan - Jeff Bezos' plan to charge at least $200,000 for space ride- Mexico opposes U.S. plan to make it take asylum seekers 
Prime Minister May laughs at a question about President Trump's "advice" for negotiating Brexit: "Lots of people give me advice"  
'Fake news': Trump backtracks over criticism of May Brexit plan  
Interesting remark from journalist Tom Newton-Dunn.that Trump has never liked the EU since the 1980’sWhen he was trying to do business in Europe but thwarted by the EUSo when he says Brexit means Brexit and that the USWould have given the U.K. a great trade deal he meant it. 
Trump praises British Prime Minister May a day after his criticism of her approach to Brexit was published  
Michel Barnier gets out what he calls "his favourite slide" aka Brexit steps of doom."All these models are available for the UK, it is their choice... they close the door themselves"@Carnegie_Europe 
"Donald Trump has just taken a bulldozer and driven straight through that plan and potentially straight through the Prime Minster's leadership." – @KattyKayBBC on Brexit plan and Trump's interview in The Sun.  
"The first I said when I saw her was I want to apologize.... I said wonderful things..." 1) I don't think I've ever heard @realDonaldTrump apologize and 2) will the rest of the media report that?  re: Theresa May headline on Brexit 
Bizarre. @realDonaldTrump says he came to Turnberry the day before Brexit and he told everyone that he thought Brexit would happen. And that he predicted correctly what would happen the next day. Umm. Not true. He came the day after Brexit. I was there. June 24  
Trump wants a hard Brexit so he can force through a trade deal that will asset strip Britain, and the hard Brexiteers are helping him:  
Can't wait to see what all the Brexiteer Ultra Tory MPs who've spent the past day earnestly telling May she should listen to Trump on Brexit will say now!  
Trump was in Scotland the day AFTER the Brexit vote. He's just making up something that didn't happen.  
Trump works in a promo for Turnberry, the private club he still owns and profits from. #griftHe then takes credit for predicting Brexit, while bashing Obama for purportedly not foreseeing it. Trump urges May to follow his advice and leave the EU immediately.  
Bull in China shop.  Trump charges Germany is captive of Russia; NATO obsolete; May’s Brexit plan failing; Europe wrong to accept immigrants.  Has any American President ever before so willfully tried to weaken our best allies? 
Donald Trump: "I was opening Turnberry the day before Brexit ... I said Brexit will happen and it did happen." One small snag - he went to Turnberry the day after the Brexit vote. 
Trump again says he was at Turnberry 'the day before Brexit' and he predicted 'it would happen.'In fact he arrived at Turnberry the day AFTER the Brexit vote. #TrumpVisitUK 
I was very impressed and I'm now convinced Theresa May will follow through on the will of the British people with a real Brexit  
Trump adds new imaginary details - "at the 9th hole, overlooking the ocean" - to his total lie about being in Scotland the day before Brexit and predicting it. (He wasn't in Scotland until the day after, didn't predict it the day before.) Says we all probably remember this. 
EU approach to Brexit summed up by Michel Barnier. "There is no justification for us to unravel what we are because the UK is leaving." 
You didn’t predict Brexit the day before, you raving loon, you did that press conference the day after. He’s actually fucking insane. 
Trump is now telling this Turnberry story AGAIN at the Chequers press conference, saying he was there "the day before" Brexit. This is NOT TRUE  
Just yesterday, Trump ripped Prime Minister Theresa May and her Brexit plan in a interview with the Rupert Murdoch-owned newspaper The Sun. Now, he says that report is "fake news."  
Trump repeats false claim that he was in Scotland the day BEFORE Brexit and predicted the result. he arrived the day AFTER the vote 
TRUMP WAS NOT OPENING TURNBERRY THE DAY BEFORE BREXIT 
Maine Gov. Paul LePage (R) says he will go to jail before he allows the expansion of Medicaid in his state. He's willing to be held in contempt by the courts to resist a court order to implement a voter referendum that passed with 59%. https://  (1/4) 
In the Brexit White Paper outlining May's Chequers plan the Govt capitulates to the EU on almost every issue. It might as well have been written by Michel Barnier. Perhaps it indeed was?#Brexit  
Trump says it's "fake news" to report that he criticised May's Brexit plans,despite repeatedly doing so on the record and in publicly available recordings.  
• 'No limits' to the UK doing trade deals after Brexit • Trump on May: I didn't criticise the prime minister • Trump on Sun interview - "It's called fake news"Follow our live page:  #TrumpVisitUK 
Trump on his Brexit advice to May: "I think she found it maybe too brutal." 
"Let me be very clear about this, we will be leaving the European Union, and we are leaving on the 29th of March, 2019... we will be delivering on what people voted for," PM Theresa May comments on Brexit.  
#FlashbackFriday #BenGarrison #Cartoon needs an update with Theresa May turning the ship around and punching holes in the bottom.. #Brexit #TrumpVisitUK #Brexit cartoon from June 2016  @LeaveEUOfficial #MayMustGo    support at  
"Terrific woman....that Brexit is a very tough situation. She's going to do the best." 
Irish Govt has spent many months planning for Brexit contingency. I will bring a detailed paper to Cabinet on Wednesday outlining our level of preparedness. But this week was a positive step forward for #Brexit negotiations despite political tensions in UK  
President Trump claims he did not criticize Prime Minister May over her Brexit strategy and suggests his interview with The Sun is "fake news"  
The US-UK relationship is far bigger than Trump - hitting home the key benefits of Brexit: we are the largest investors in each other’s economies 1m American nationals work for  companies 1m British nationals work for  companies  
Here’s how they’re reading it in Brussels.As campaigners have long been saying, ‘soft Brexit’ is actually ‘soft Remain’.In defence, the picture is worse than we ever saw during membership.  
BREAKING: After criticism of May over Brexit, President Trump says however UK leaves EU 'is ok with me.' 
"I didn't criticize the prime minister": President Trump, in the U.K., affirmed his support for Theresa May, after questioning her Brexit plan  
Trump accuses The Sun of 'fake news' and insists whatever Theresa May does with Brexit 'is ok with me'  
WATCH: President Trump claims he "didn't criticize" PM May when he told a British newspaper that she "didn't listen" to him on Brexit.More on his interview with The Sun:  
EXCLUSIVE. British academics expose May's deal as "Brexit in name only”! Please RT.  
President Trump tells British PM Theresa May that whatever she decides to do on Brexit "is OK with us" — as long as the US and UK can continue to trade together  
Donald Trump now calling part of the Sun interview in which he criticized Theresa May’s Brexit strategy and said a trade deal was in question under her plan as “fake news.” The Sun released an audio version of the interview in which he did just that. 
Donald Trump backtracks over Brexit criticism, calling Sun interview 'fake news' – live updates  
This is Brexit.  
"Whatever you do is ok with us, just make sure we can trade together that's all that matters" - President Trump on #Brexit Follow: #TrumpVisitUK developments:  
President @realDonaldTrump says whatever the UK does in #Brexit negotiations is "okay with me" after criticising @theresa_may's plan in an interview Follow live updates from President Trump's visit here:  
Trump on Brexit: "I don't know what they're going to do, but whatever you do is ok with me. That's your decision. Whatever you're going to do is ok with us. Just make sure you can trade with us. That's all that matters."  
First question from @bbclaurak about how he treated May in interview, blasting her Brexit policy:  “I didn’t criticize the prime minister.” Then, @realDonaldTrump takes next step of calling The Sun “fake news.” The Murdoch-owned Sun that is.... 
BREAKING: US and UK agree that Iran cannot be allowed to have nuclear weapons and that a trade deal should be pursued between the two countries after Brexit 
Donald Trump dismisses Sun interview in which he attacked PM over Brexit  as “fake news” 
Asked about his explosive Sun interview trashing PM Theresa May, Trump claims “Fake news.”“I didn’t criticize the prime minister,” Trump says of interview in which he did criticize her Brexit strategy. 
Pleasure to be at today’s Anti-Trump Demo. A horrific human being, and one that last night but paid to the idea that there’s any kind of US Trade Deal on the table. One of the ways to stand up to him is supporting a #PeoplesVote on Brexit Deal. #FFS 
.@POTUS says he didn’t criticize the prime minister - says the Sun story was “generally fine” but didn’t include the “tremendous things” he said about May personally.But the president DID blast May’s Brexit plan. It’s on tape. Today: damage control. 
"I didn't criticize the prime minister," Trump says. He criticized her for not listening to his Brexit advice and remarked that her biggest political rival would be great at her job. 
On Brexit, @realDonaldTrump says ‘Whatever you do is ok with us. Just make sure we can trade together.’ That’s not what he said to @TheSun 
"Whatever you do, that's ok with us.  Just as long as we can trade together" - Trump to May on her Brexit plan  
What a hard Brexit looks like  
today in damage control: "Whatever you're gonna do is OK with us," Trump says re: Brexit. 
Trump brought it home. He told Theresa May that a trade deal with the US would not happen if her plan for a soft Brexit goes ahead.She needs to get with the program. The US backs democracies. The folks voted to leave. They’ve had it with globalists. The people have spoken. 
Trump walks back the Sun interview on Brexit: "Whatever you do is ok with us" 
Trump on Brexit: "Whatever you're gonna do is okay with us, just make sure you can trade with us..." 
'Rudeness Upon Rudeness:' Even Theresa May's Opponents Are Taken Aback By Trump's Brexit Attack.  via @FortuneMagazine 
Until you understand the close links between the Tory Brexiters and UK think-tanks centred on #55TuftonSt with right-wing US business interests and think-tanks you will not understand #Brexit.#TrumpUKVisit #StopBrexit 
"So in some respects, the Labour position on Brexit is now slightly ‘harder’ than the government’s. But it hardly matters, as neither is remotely realistic."  
@POTUS #Trump Exposed @theresa_may the #MerkelTwin to the World!  #EU #NWO InvaderLoving OpenBorders#Globalist #Fascist MAY AGAINST #Brexit #TommyRobinson #UK#FreeSpeech  MAY DEFENDS #Terrorist #GroomingGangs #Pediophiles#EU #Illegals #Censorship MAYDay 
Watch live: Trump, May to speak to media after dramatic NATO summit and U.K. tabloid report of him criticizing her Brexit strategy  
Trump and his hard-Brexit pals want a cliff-edge Brexit so they can force you to swallow their disaster capitalism:  - latest from me. 
To be clear… #TheresaMay wanted the President to lie about how he felt about her approach Brexit. And he wasn’t willing to lie. I guess #TheResistance & #NeverTrumpers thinks lying & diplomacy and the same thing. cc: @marthamaccallum on #UKtrumpvisit 
And crying over Brexit trying to get it stopped we voted Brexit deal with it people 
He’s intimidated by strong, intelligent women. Let’s face it, he doesn’t know Germany’s history and can’t talk coherently about Brexit. So he decided to torch them both. 
BRITAIN THANKS YOU @realDonaldTrump You told Khan what he isYou told Merkel what she isYou told NATO what they areYou told May what she isYou to us what Brexit now isYou told us what the EU isYou told Boris what he is to youDespite MSM spin,WE HEAR YOU POTUSTHANK-YOU 
.@garyyounge: "Theresa May didn't support Brexit, [Boris Johnson] did… Once the vote had been taken, the question is how you leave, and it's taken a year and a half of the government negotiating with itself to come up with a plan. And the plan is not very good." #DNlive 
Trump is the face of Brexit: a chlorinated chicken President come to enjoy the royal soap opera and play golf while simpering ministers compete with each other to offer him discounts on the only thing they have to sell: us. 
#Brexit •2016 referendum:→ Leave the EU won by 51.9% to 48.1%→ Turnout was 71.8%→ 30+ million people voted→ England & Wales voted to leave, Scotland & Northern Ireland voted to stay→ Biggest democratic exercise in UK history•Exit date: March 29, 2019  
President Trump said PM May went for a soft BREXIT against his advice. He warned her that would make a lucrative US trade deal very unlikely.Trump also said Sadiq Khan has not stood up to terrorists & blamed him for spiraling crime in London.  
Here's what President Trump said about British Prime Minister Theresa May, Brexit and 'England'  
Trump praises strong relationship with UK's May after damning her Brexit plan  
seeing faux cyrillic or words translated into russian on trump or brexit protest images gets my hackles up in a very specific way 
One of biggest 2018 elections is Missouri's "Right to Work" veto referendum , which unions organized to put on ballot. I'd seen skepticism that this might work, but rare poll of this vote has RTW going down by 18%, 56/38.  
Theresa May's eyes rolled as Donald Trump was quizzed about his comments to The Sun criticising the PM's Brexit plans  
May's Brexit plan would not give the UK the freedom to diverge from EU rules, would not end the jurisdiction of the ECJ and does not provide a workable customs plan that would enable the UK to sign meaningful trade deals. My analysis of the White Paper:  
"Of course, in the new political correctness of Brexit we are not allowed to suggest that the people did not know what they were voting for, for fear of being labelled elitist by some billionaire, ex-public schoolboy or tax exile." 
Theresa May's Last Minute Invitation to MPs for Tea at Chequers Today  via @GuidoFawkesThis Prime Minister not only needs to go because she is a liar about #Brexit but because she is totally incompetent .Tory activists no longer support her.Go Appeaser 
Donald Trump. "This is not the Brexit people voted for"The most powerful man in the World agrees with Brexiteers. 
Just for clarity: this is the day Brexit tries to sell the NHS to Trump. 
Another great morning to be a Trump supporter.  POTUS is letting Brits know what a “special relationship” looks like when they disrespect the country that saved their asses from being a German colony.  May has got to go and Johnson is the best hope for Brexit. #KAG #DJTrumplicans 
German MEP Hans-Olaf Henkel - "Monsieur Barnier and Mr Verhofstadt have been treating the British with a high degree of arrogance."So I think they are now well advised to make sure that the British get the best deal possible." #Brexit  
Please listen whether you voted #leave or #remain. This gave me goosebumps. Of total fear. Who is going to answer that question? What happens the day after? #Brexit  
F*ck Brexit, F*ck Trump, LOVE BRITAIN!  
Trump "is a racist, a serial liar, & either a sex abuser or someone who falsely brags about being one... So, as British politicians hide their distaste in an attempt to get a post-Brexit trade deal, we should all remember what kind of man Trump really is."  
In UK, Trump throws fuel onto Britain's fiery political debate over Brexit. @BlakeBurman has the story.  
The @Conservatives need to get rid of @theresa_may and her treacherous #ChequersPlan for #Brexit as the mass exodus has already begun. pic.twitter.com/INdlUQd4vj 
'Trump mansplaining Brexit to Theresa May is no surprise, but he's too dangerous to dismiss as just another sexist fool'  
#ICYMI: #Brexit Balls Up! It’s fun to watch, but does anyone actually know what’s going on?   
This man could have been prime minister right now.Instead we had Cameron again, a Brexit referendum, ongoing economic chaos, May, the DUP and a love-in with Trump. Well done, British electorate, well done...  
The Chequers proposal falls a long way short of a clean, free-trading Brexit with which the UK takes back control of our money, laws and borders. I cannot vote for it when WTO terms offer a better Brexit, says @OwenPaterson 
May’s PMship has been a dismal failure.  She botched the election, apes Labours disastrous tax & spend policies, has squandered a golden opportunity to exploit an anti-EU US President & has totally screwed up Brexit.  We need a new PM & new game plan  
Today the establishment and their cohorts in the main stream media are in meltdown today.Donald Trump has come down in support of the Brexit cause. Brexit has some very powerful allies, Trump, Farage, Rees-Mogg, Johnson, Davis, Hoey, Chairman of Dyson and 17.4 million Brits 
Thanks for your support. You have lots of American support for Brexit as well. Keep fighting the deranged left in GB. We are fighting ours here. No shortage of them unfortunately. 
Become a bailiff post brexit - you’ll make a fortune from all the repossessions that willl come out of it . 
By bashing Theresa May’s Brexit plan and praising her rival Boris Johnson, President Trump ensured headlines would be about him, not protests  
Good overview: ”Brexit white paper’s 98 pages and even more questions” via @FT. The institutional nerd in me says that this looks more like #VelvetBrexit rather than hard or soft #Brexit. Interesting to see reactions. Important to get results. ⁦  
*NEW:I voted Remain but Trump's right to attack May's Brexit plan - it's NOT Brexit & won't allow proper free trade with America. My column: 
Trump has warned Theresa May’s Brexit plan will “kill” any future US trade deal.  
The Chequers debacle is what happens when Government is taken over by bureaucrats. The Prime Minister preferred to listen to advice from Olly Robbins, a former private secretary to Tony Blair, than she did to David Davis, the Brexit Secretary she appointed! 
Brexit Britain? More like Broken Britain. And the blame is entirely with the @CONservatives. A coalition of chaos who have wreaked havoc on our country. Enough is enough. We need a General Election.We need a @JeremyCorbyn-led @UKLabour Government! #TrumpUKVisit 
.@Nigel_Farage: "Trump believes in Brexit. He believes in a world of democratic nation-states cooperating with each other, not globalist structures like the European Union."  
When reality kicked in...Could not stop laughing!!! It was tiny Hardly anybody showed up Cost £18,000 Flew a few feet off the groud Tiny tree's were much taller Stayed up only an hour You absolute twonks! #TPRPARTY#Qanon#WWG1WGA#Brexit  
Paging @OllyRobbins and @theresa_may....You've united the country against you, you are screwing up the exchange rates as people go on holiday. Tory activists are against you.Some going that. It really is.#MAYMUSTGO#Brexit #BRINO #Trump 
UK press to Trump: "What do you think of Brexit?"Trump: "I own Turnberry in Scotland. It's a magical place. I won Wisconsin and Reagan didn't even win Wisconsin when he ran the table."Have SNL writers hijacked all of Trump's material? 
*NEW: President Trump's not rude to tell Theresa May her Brexit plan stinks - it stinks. And real friends are not afraid to tell their friends when their ideas stink. My new column: 
Trump protests in London - LIVE: President ignores questions over Brexit remarks in awkward appearance with May, as thousands take to streets  
"This is not the Brexit that people voted for" is the one phrase that the British Government did not want Trump to say. His intervention has come as a bombshell to the establishment.  
If Brexit goes ahead and a new world of low taxation, No NHS, no social security, less rights and reduced pensions becomes real.Free markets and money reigns supreme and the poor don’t matter, there’s always charity and the workhouse.It’s what we voted for.#FBPE 
Bracing thoughts from @riptari to bring us into the weekend: "Brexit could mean blockchains at the border, immutably ledgering every little thing that passes into and out of the UK, forever and ever, until crypto amen." Read:  
Exclusive: (full version) EU warns states to step up plans for no-deal Brexit via @RTENewsNow  
*NEW COLUMN*Trump's right about Brexit & right about NATO. Why do so many people hate him for telling truths they don’t want to hear? Isn’t that what ALL politicians are supposed to do? 
U.K. Prime Minister Theresa May appears to roll her eyes over the President's awkward Brexit comments  
Scoop here from @tconnellyRTE on #EU preps for a #nodeal #Brexit....A 15 page stark internal EU document issues strongly worded guidelines to the 27 member states to deepen contingency planning for the UK crashing out of the EU in March next year without a deal.  
Can you believe how the British Mainstream media today are defending  Theresa May from the remarks made from Donald Trump, when they have spent all of the time trashing her at every opportunity on Brexit?  It just shows that Donald Trump is right in what he is saying. 
Still nothing from @LiamFox ??? He must be at home with his pants on his head, two pencils up his nose gibbering 'I do believe in Brexit!' 
May bids for Trump Brexit backing with vow to rip up red tape!Imagine UK liberated from:Maternity rightsEnvironmental protectionsWorking time limitsClean water standardsFood hygiene standardsClean air#TrumpVisitUK  
Fair point, although the frequency seems to be increasing and the claims are getting weirder. ("I told Theresa May how do to Brexit." What?)  
Ripped apart by the Brexit chaos they createdRiddled with racism and dictated to by far right MPsInept and weak leadership and cabinet falling apart. Falling membership and no connection with the youth. The Tory party is on it’s knees. Let’s put it out of it’s misery. 
Very worrying #brexit /DUP mal influence.  
#Brexit: Things are getting clear: - Theresa May has finally confronted her hard brexiters- In yet another attack on the EU, Trump is telling the UK to leave for good or stay put Time to get real: Will the EU behave strategically or legalistically? 
As we watch the Tories stumble through negotiations, the public are having to scramble to ensure that they retain their rights as EU nationals. A hard Brexit will make UK passports far less powerful. The people must have a final #VoteontheDeal & an opportunity to #ExitfromBrexit 
#Tory #MP @nigelmp says he asked @LiamFox under #TheresaMay plan what happens if #UK wants to import goods from #America. Response: ‘We’ll have to ask the #EU.’ #VassalState  #BREXIT! #MayMustGo #BBC #SKY #LBC @ConHome @CCHQPress #ConservativeParty #Tory 
As much as we may disagree with Prime Minister Theresa May on issues, such as Migration & Brexit, if she was to visit the United States, she would never be treated in the shameful way that Pres. Trump is being treated in London. Those protestors are being encouraged by Mayor Khan  
A #British #DonaldTrump would have put Britain first in #Brexit negotiations, unlike the #TRAITOR #TheresaMay who holds #Leave voters in #contempt and has appeased #Brussels at every turn with her treacherous actions! #BREXIT! #BBC #SKY #LBC @ConHome @CCHQPress #ConservativeParty 
Welcome Trump - Free Tommy - Brexit Rally tomorrow Sat 14th July London Whitehall  3pmInternational speakers - Stage & Large screens - PA lots of Brexiteers, Veterans, Patriots, Tommy & Trump Supporters  Welcome Mr President   
Brexit choice...1. Trump tells you what your standards are2. EU tells you what your standards areThat’s global trade...pick one. 
BANNON: Corporate establishment have wanted to 'slow walk' Brexit from day one.“They have fought Donald Trump tooth and nail and you’ve seen the same with Brexit.” 
'Donald Trump mansplaining Brexit to Theresa May is no surprise, but he's too dangerous to dismiss as just another sexist fool'  
1/11 @realDonaldTrump interview makes it clear #Brexit deal would "probably kill" any chance of a deal. More #BrokenBrexitPromises. We found 10 times brexiters claimed US deal would be easy 
Responding to the @TheBMA declaring support for the people to have the final say on the #Brexit deal“#EU nurses & doctors leaving the UK, and an alarming 87% drop in the number of nurses and midwives joining the register from the EU” says @thomasbrake 
"I would no more take advice from Donald Trump on negotiating Brexit than I would on staying married or choosing a good hair dye."  via @alexGspence 
Former White House Chief Strategist, Steve Bannon told @GMB that the President feels “misled” by Brexit plan. Watch the full interview:  
Wonder why so many MPs are missing Ben...including Front benches...PS I don't really....we know the real reason don't we...Illegal goings in Ref = INVALID #BREXIT...Let's ignore it till it's all over & they can't do a damn thing about it. 
How would Donald Trump do a Brexit deal?  
I was deeply disappointed at the Chequers plan and subsequent White Paper.  This is not the Brexit I campaigned for and my constituents supported. #WhitePaper #ChequersPlan  Read my full response here 
The worst thing about Trump’s outbursts on Brexit and Nato? That he’s right. Leader in the new issue of The Spectator:   
There  seems to be something wrong with my twitter - where are all the Brexit fans  posting about a foreigner interfering with our Sovereign Government this morning?   #fbpe 
#Trump accuses May of wrecking #Brexit, killing any chance of vital US trade deal  
As the son of refugees @Kishan_Devani speaks from the heart with @bbcasiannetwork - where he says the @Conservatives are pathetic in their handling of #Brexit & Immigration has been a force for good in Britain - highlighting how the #NHS has been a beneficiary of #EU immigration. 
He simply flags up why the US trade deal has been scuppered by fake Brexit. As has all the other potential trade deals.I am at your service Mr. Martin to go through the white paper with you.  
Soft or hard, no brand of Brexit can command a Commons majority  - that's why we need Brexit to be decided by a #PeoplesVote Sign and share the petition here: 
Aquí ya hilamos con "Turn around, every now and then I get a little bit terrified. And then I see the look in your eyes. Turn around, bright eyes, but every now and then I fall apart"BREXIT, EL MUSICAL. 
“It’s becoming clear now to Britons that the promised benefits of Brexit aren’t likely to materialize, and that the best they can hope for is a divorce settlement with Europe that minimizes the disadvantages of leaving.” - ⁦@ThereseRaphael1⁩ 
.@piersmorgan: “Although I voted to stay, this is not Brexit!”  
So Trump supports the majority of British people who voted for Brexit and worries they aren't getting what they voted for. The BBC response - "Trump is turning the whole country against him"Right... #FakeNews #Brexit #TrumpUKVisit 
Trump actually praised May at the dinner and told guests that their relationship was better than ever. Needless to say, that's not driving the wall-to-wall coverage in Britain today, where May is politically vulnerable amid "Brexit" woes.  
No, Brexit is driven by the same love of freedom that led us to resist Hitler & the Kaiser. & will mean we’ll never consent to be ruled by the #EU 
NEWS! US Presidents should stay out of Brexit debate only when they disagree with me, clarifies Nigel Farage  
Tory MP John Lamont accused #KeepScotlandtheBrand of being "anti UK" at Scottish Affairs CMTE meeting - Scotland and Brexit: Trade and Foreign Invt The good news, today's survation poll suggests @John2Win and the majority of @ScotTories will lose their seats in GE. #John2Lose 
Trump was feted by Theresa May in an elaborate dinner at Churchill's home. As the dinner wrapped up, his interview with The Sun published where he took on May's handling of Brexit and praised her deposed foe --threatening to upend the choreographed trip.  
A British Donald Trump would have put Britain first in Brexit negotiations, unlike Theresa May who holds Leave voters in contempt and has appeased Brussels at every turn.  
Trade with America is meant to be a big Brexit prize, but Theresa May spurned it long ago, @asabenn says 
Trump on Brexit: "I would have done it much differently. I actually told Theresa May how to do it but she didn’t agree, she didn’t listen to me. She wanted to go a different route."Can we clone him please? 
"Theresa May's government, her leadership hangs in the balance this week in the UK over the Brexit plan. Donald Trump has just taken a bulldozer and driven straight through that plan and potentially straight through the Prime Minister's leadership." – @KattyKayBBC 
I've just been scrolling through your Tweets to find your criticism of Barack Obama poking his nose into the EU referendum and making threats to the British public.Can't find anything.#Hypocrite 
Jacob Rees Mogg has gone oddly quiet today about Trump’s intervention on U.K. politics. Funny how he wasn’t so quiet last time. The only way to not let these people win is to support a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal.  
Not just Trump's Brexit comments that have caused upset in the UK. His lines on immigration have been described by @hopenothate as the "coded words of white supremacy" 
The 10 craziest things Trump said in his U.K. interview about Theresa May and Brexit  
And rightly so! It's a complete sell-out of Brexit! (£) 
My new @DailyMail column is about President Trump's Brexit tirade against Theresa May. Posting soon.  
Dalrymple: "It was essential for the European Union to make Brexit a disaster for Britain because, were it not, then that would be a disaster for the European Union.""A prosperous Britain outside the European Union would have destroyed the EU’s raison d’être." 
Can May pull off a Brexit deal from here? @jameskirkup argues it would be unwise to write her off just yet, but her strategy now depends on the behaviour of pro-EU Labour MPs and the EU27  
“This is the equivalent of President Trump coming in and kicking Prime Minister May while she’s down.” @halliejackson reports on Trump’s latest comments about May/Brexit ahead of their news conference  
Those hostile to Britain, whose asset's in the White House, want Brexit—as hard and chaotic as possible, but Brexit by any means. They want only to harm us. Our foolish ministers and opposition, trying to appease them, are leading us to disaster. This country needs to wake up. 
The complacency of thinking Trump and Brexit can be attributed to dodgy companies or the sly hand of the Kremlin, rather than material conditions is remarkable. And dangerous  
Dear Baby Blimp Londoners, Congratulations on BrexitYou inspired us to elect TrumpWe're thrilled w/ booming economyUSA no longer 's piggy bankHow's "part & parcel" working? #TrumpBabyBlimp 
@theresa_may & @Conservatives have stupidly energised the militant wing of the DUP with their self-interested deal which is distressing for all especially the gracious people of Northern Ireland & the Irish Republic. We should kill #Brexit now before Brexit starts killing people. 
When Obama said #Brexit would put us “at the back of the queue” for a trade deal, Brexiters screamed “Project Fear”. It’s Project Fact. 
"She didn’t listen to me": Trump blasts Theresa May’s Brexit plan  
It was great to visit @arkwp this morning and hear about their plans for the future. I enjoyed meeting some very engaged pupils who asked me about Parliament, Brexit, and my priorities here in #Hastings. 
This tweet hasn’t aged well #brexit  
Piers Morgan BLASTS Remoaner MP's fear-mongering over 'no deal' #Brexit “The reason we don’t trust politicians when they say these apocalyptic things is because every apocalyptic warning has not manifested itself." 
Brexit has to be stopped because it was driven by illegal funding, it is linked to Russia & America with an aspiration to destroy the EU AND the UK - it is no longer about whether it is a good idea or not.. we are being attacked as a nation at our core.. 
Britain’s biggest export earner - the #Financial sector (insurance, banking, etc) - tears into #TheresaMay’s #Brexit #ChequersPlan for keeping them outside #SingleMarket 
#Khalistan supporters r planning to do A global rally in London & many parts of the world for referendum to vote for creation of KhalistanBut they don't protest for recent Sikh massacre in Afghanistan?They don't protest for Pakistani Sikh policeman who was humiliated? 
The Tories, and a government now surely in its death throes, richly deserve the mess they are in. Britain does not. Until we ditch Brexit, we shall be at the mercy of our own hardcore Europhobes and men like Trump 
#StopTheTrucks:  UK Government's dropped its promise to ban live exports post-Brexit  
A report by the IEA says a No Deal #Brexit scenario wouldn’t be a disaster at all.In fact, it should make it easier to strike up trade deals, cut tariffs and save money because the UK won’t be shelling out shed loads of cash to the EU.  
The decision to leave the EU was made by Mrs May when she wrote her A50 letter founded on the illegitimate advice of a fraudulent referendum result. #StopBrexit #FBPE #PeoplesVote 
Prior to meeting with British Prime Minister Theresa May, President Trump said in a wide-ranging interview with The Sun that May ignored his advice on Brexit, a move he said threatens to scuttle a trade deal with the U.S.  
Trump's Brexit intervention is perfectly reasonable, says Jacob Rees-Mogg. Read more ▼ 
#Trump was doing no more than stating the obvious. As May’s #Brexit White Paper stands, #Britain would indeed remain so shackled by Euro regulations it would be quite impossible to negotiate a meaningful free trade deal with the U.S.  #BestPresidentEver 
Trump backing Boris Johnson in his plan to execute a right wing coup to dislodge Mrs May and install himself as PM and to then walk away from the EU with no deal. It’s been the plan all along. Dangerous times. Stop Brexit. #FBPE 
TRUMP'S BREXIT BLAST I told Theresa May how to do Brexit but she wrecked it — the US trade deal is off, says Donald Trump. The anti brexit , anti Trump liberal media make me sick in the biased political broadcasting. Theresa May should be done for treason for her brexit plan. pic.twitter.com/Gtde3iiPZc 
Petition: Rescind Art.50 if Vote Leave has broken Electoral Laws regarding 2016 referendum  
Important thread showing extent Government is failing to explain why Chequers is pragmatic compromise which makes sense in of itself for UK pattern of trade/economyAll started going wrong with OTT briefing on Brexit minsters walking back from Chequers  
UK media and politicians tell lies about @realDonaldTrump#PresidentTrump tells the truth about #Brexit. 
His comments were not just undiplomatic they could have real world implications for Mrs May’s new Brexit plan. Mr Trump’s threat to take a US/UK trade deal off the table if this is the final Brexit plan could damage it irreparably.  
NEW REMAINIACS: 100% news analysis - no guests, no special topic, not even any other stories. Just endless bitter laughter and occasionally words on Brexit's Day of Chaos  
London welcomes Donald Trump with a baby blimp and street protests  #TrumpBaby #TrumpVisitUK 
A British Donald Trump would have put Britain first in Brexit negotiations, unlike Theresa May who holds Leave voters in contempt and has appeased Brussels at every turn. Support us at  
"We approach these negotiations with a spirit of pragmatism, compromise and, indeed, friendship" #Brexit  
Problem with @carolecadwalla is she's a conspiracy theorist who gets everything wrong, just look at:Cambridge AnalyticaFacebookVote Leave co-ordination LeaveEU illegality and criminality Russian interference Oh hang on...Well it's not like she's an award winning journalist! 
Right I can call it, this election will not be free and fair nor credible. This was supposed to be a referendum on Mnangagwa's legitimacy, but they have squandered the chance with the obstinate ZEC and the unhelpful public media. The absence of violence alone isn't enough! 
It must be tough for @Nigel_Farage to keep to a schedule.It took him about 5mins and 3 selfies just to get into our building @itn. #brexit #trump 
The Brexit white paper: 104 pages of delusion, muddle and wishful thinking  
Hilarious... Remainer WhatsApp group discussing Conservatives social media posts yesterdayQ: Why aren’t we quoting companies not biased towards remain (to support #WhitePaper)?A: We looked long and hard for those and none were forthcoming #Brexit #BRINO 
'It is NOT what people voted for!' Tory MPs revolt against Theresa May's Brexit plan  
Nadine Dorries on the government's Brexit white paper: “a betrayal of everyone who voted leave” which “will be the end of Conservatives in government”  
Interesting letter regarding #ConscientiousObjection and Students Concerns post repeal in today's @CTribune. @SimonHarrisTD @campaignforleo #NotWhatIvotedFor #Referendum #8thRef #Legislation @merrionstreet @dail 
Trump (correctly) accuses Theresa May of wrecking #Brexit, says this will kill any chance of vital US trade deal 
That trip Theresa May made to Germany, to get Angela Merkel to approve her Brexit plan before revealing it to the cabinet, that sums her up perfectly. And yet there are still people in Britain who believe she will deliver #Brexit 
Excellent article by Quentin Letts that says it all!If MPs chicken out and vote through Threason May's proposed deal, that makes the UK an EU satellite, (despite Brexit) what's left of fishing will be decimated by inept quota discard rules. 
I love this Downing Street explanation for why ⁦@realDonaldTrump⁩ really didn’t mean it when saying ⁦@theresa_may⁩’s Brexit plans make a trade deal with US impossible  
Dominic Raab makes it clear: our Brexit plan is the best deal for Britain. Get the full details at  
I was worried that the Brexit White Paper & World Cup banter would cause us to argue for a wee while, but like a big baby blimp in the sky that you cant ignore, Trump flies in to unite us all in a worthy common cause.  #FuckOffTrump#IndyRef2 #TrumpUKVisit pic.twitter.com/lKnVC1FSwX 
US President Donald Trump said a free trade deal with Britain might be impossible if it went ahead with Prime Minister Theresa May's proposals for post-Brexit ties with the European Union, in damaging remarks that could widen domestic criticism of her plans. #Brexit 
So clear pattern emerging from Trump's foreign visits is 1.kick off by being unbelievably rude/threatening (your Brexit sucks, I might quit NATO, N Korea it's war, etc) 2. day later declare that everyone now agrees with him, threat duly withdrawn 
Can anyone supporting Brexit on patriotic grounds honestly tell me that they feel proud looking at this image of a fawning and subservient PM? As a true patriot, let me tell you, it sickens me to my stomach! Time to take back control #FinalSayForAll #PeoplesVote 
Putin is masterful. Russia’s economy is smaller than Texas. No real military might. He set up the UK and US, via Brexit and Trump, to trigger their own destruction from within.Follow the money. 
May welcomes Trump at Chequers. Both leaders praised the special relationship ahead of bilat meeting, with Trump ignoring multiple questions about if he regrets his Sun interview criticizing May Brexit approach and saying rival Boris Johnson would make good PM  
"It's never been more united," said Pres Trump of the US-UK relationship. Neither leader commented on @POTUS criticism of PM's handling of Brexit, but at the start of their talks today, he cited last night's dinner, "We talked for an hour & a half and it was really something.”  
PM falling making a valiant effort to ignore the bulldozer than just drove through her Brexit plan.  
This is EU Supergirl and Faux BoJo."Our message is very clear - Brexit and Trump have a lot of parallels. Neither is good for their respective countries, they're only good for Putin."  
Worth noting that a US-UK FTA is not some great prize: a l/t (15 year) benefit of 0.2% GDP according to HMG Brexit impact assessment (p.14 of link) compared to a 2%-8% GDP cost of Brexit:  
'Either a colony or a member!' Michael Portillo CONDEMNS May's Chequers Brexit deal 
We are all viewing Trump trade statement as a Brexit intervention. But the bigger picture here is Trump's desire to weaken the EU as a trading block. That's why he told Macron to leave and why he wants UK to do so. This is not an idle aside, it is US trade strategy. 
Trump continues to work towards  destabilising the E.U and NATO and will then attempt to strong arm the UK into a hard Brexit so that he can manipulate trade deals that will  benefit the USA.Special relationship indeed. 
I've just listened to what Donald Trump had to say on the Brexit white paper and on Sadiq Khan. He is absolutely CORRECT on both counts.That's not me being a Trump 'fan' - that's me being a fan of commonsense no-nonsense tell it like it is. 
Jacob Rees-Mogg says Theresa May's Brexit white paper will leave UK 'a vassal state of EU' as he accuses her of breaking promises  
Trump and May meet amid tensions over the U.S. president's public rebuke of the U.K. prime minister's Brexit strategy  
#MAGA #DJTrumplican #KAG                                            As May’s Government Teeters Over Brexit, Trump Gives It a Shove - The New York Times  
Donald Trump deals a brutal blow to Theresa May's plan - plus Friday's other Brexit headlines  
Last night -- @realDonaldTrump insults May's Brexit strategy, and says a lotta other things in The Sun interview.This morning -- Trump says of the US-UK relationship: "It's never been more united." 
A no-deal Brexit survival guide: what food to stockpile 
You know things are shit when you're seeing Brexit 'prepper' guides. Stay angry.  
Theresa May's "soft Brexit" strategy could kill hope of US trade deal, says Donald Trump  #TrumpVisitUK 
Discussing the unholy trinity of Trump, May and Brexit on @@daily_politics in a mo. What a glorious mess 
Remember the dateFriday 13th July 2018The date Far Right America invaded the UK to take control of brexit whilst our politicians cowered and curtsied. The only sane thing to do in response  is#StopBrexit 
SURVATION July 2018Base: Likely to Vote with undecided / refused removedIf there was a referendum tomorrow with the question “Should Scotland be an Independent country?”, how would you vote?Yes – 54%No – 46% 
Dear @jeremycorbyn Trump wants #Brexit because like Putin and Murdoch he knows it will undermine Western democracy. Support for Brexit is support for the kleptonationalist axis that is trying to destroy our democracy. Whose side are you on?#TrumpUKVisit #PeoplesVote 
3. For some reason MPs have forgotten their primary duty, putting country 1st. This #BrexitShambles is based on pure party politics & a deeply suspect Ref. There are so many reasons #Brexit can no longer be validated w/o giving the Ppl a #PeoplesVote & a #FinalSay to Confirm it. 
Donald Trump is set to meet with the U.K. Prime Minister Theresa May after giving an explosive interview to The Sun newspaper. He slammed her plans for Brexit, and said former foreign secretary, Boris Johnson, would make an "excellent" prime minister.  
That Trump Brexit advice in full: "Tell 'em you'll walk away if they don't give you what you want"Later ..."Did I say it right, Mr Putin Sir, did I, did I?" #TrumpVisitUK 
On the #TrumpVisitUK you do all realise that with the UK the EU is the biggest market in the world and its population outstrips that of the United States but without the UK those tables are turned? So no, it isn't UK's interests he is thinking of when he supports a hard #Brexit. 
WATCH | Bannon on Brexit: "Once again, you see the corporate influence in London that have wanted to slow-walk this thing from day one. They've fought Donald Trump tooth and nail, the elites. You've seen the same thing with Brexit!" Support us at  
IEA: No Deal Brexit would allow UK to ‘crack on’. “UK would be able to crack on with its own trade deals with the rest of the world, cut tariffs on imports unilaterally, review EU regulations, and save straightaway on contributions to the EU budget.” 
“Everyone should listen to Obama on Brexit, he’s the President of the USA!”“Stop interfering in our politics Trump, you’re the President of the USA!”As always life as a lefty is difficult. 
1. Anna I have respect for you & share your view of Trump but I'm afraid the PM has brought much of this upon herself by forcing through an unworkable #Brexit after invoking A50 w/o any due diligence, based on a v. flawed process.PM's credibility is shot. 
Brexit means making the UK Trump's toy. Despite what some here will tell you.No thanks. Better sticking with our closest allies. That includes an America freed from him.#StopBrexit#FuckOffTrump pic.twitter.com/iRD1MZ6YTK 
In June, Survation polled Scots aged 16+ about how they would vote in a second referendum.In July, the same company only polled Scots aged 18+With 16/17 year oldsYES - 54%NO - 46%Without 16/17 year oldsYES - 47%NO - 53%Which was given air time? 
May invited president Trump to cement the special relationship. Instead, he gave a Murdoch-owned tabloid an interview in which he criticized her for botching Brexit, praised a departing rival and questioned a possible trade deal with the US.   
In the Sun, Trump claims he predicted Brexit when he opened Turnberry the day before the vote. He was actually there the day after the vote.  
The TM has had 2 years to negotiate Brexit and made an utter hash of it. Ocean going disgrace  
Trump, Putin, Mercer, Murdoch, the Koch bros, Dacre, Farage, the ERG and the far-right are all united in a Kleptonationalist network that sees democracy as an enemy to be destroyed. Currently they are winning and #Brexit is helping them.#TrumpUKVisitSave democracy #StopBrexit 
Don’t forget what this man stands for. How you can support #Brexit and oppose #Trump is beyond me. Let’s stop this fascism. The kitten heels are off, the jack boots are being pulled on. #StopBrexitSaveBritain 
No @realDonaldTrump, Brits do not like you. Do not mistake the millions of duped Brexit voters for your supporters. You and your hate are not welcome here. #TrumpVisitUK 
"Trump Gives It a Shove"#DontheCon is in England mansplaining to Theresa May how she is screwing up Brexit which undermines her leadership. He's an American  stink bomb. 
It's not just Trump unleashed today...  Minister on White Paper: "The people of the North voted for Brexit and have had it stolen from them. Once again the South have used the North as a sacrificial lamb to protect their rich mates in the City.”  
I oppose Brexit & I’m a member. Just join, agitate & scream you hate Brexit. That’s what i do.  
Yeah the majority who voted Brexit are going to SO hate being given fire support by the US president  
Trump says May's Brexit plan kills hope of a U.S. trade deal  
#TrumpBaby is flying, and he wants his Brexit  
My article in @TheNewEuropean⁩ on mental health impact of #Brexit. ⁦@NewEuropeans⁩ ⁦⁦@voiceseurope⁩ ⁦@InLimboBrexit⁩ ⁦@The3Million⁩ ⁦@BritishInEurope⁩ ⁦@16MillionRising⁩ ⁦@euromove⁩ ⁦@Open_Britain⁩ ⁦@britainforeurop⁩ 
If Trump had his way all those who oppose him would be silenced, jailed or dead. The UK should have as little to do with him as possible, and his British political admirers must be regarded with the greatest suspicion in terms of their loyalty to democracy.#TrumpUKVisit #Brexit 
LISTEN | @Jacob_Rees_Mogg on Theresa May sabotaging Britain's post-Brexit trade policy and making us a vassal of the EU - "the European Union rule book will be interpreted by the European Court of Justice"Support us at  
Trump wants hard Brexit so our country is on its knees in UK-US negotiations. He wants us to scrap EU rules, because they protect workers and environment standards. We will not find our strength in Trump's America, but as a leader of a social and democratic EU. #TrumpVisitUK 
We have music. Think this one’s called ‘Bollocks to Brexit’ #TrumpBabyBlimp 
My take on the White Paper - if it was an injured horse then it would be put out of its misery. Latest Brexit Blog post, just up:  
I have never been so embarrassed for our country until @theresa_may, you do not reflect a strong, independent UK. You're a weak, incapable, and easily swayed prime minister with no drive or want to better the country. #Brexit #MayMustGo #TrumpUKVisit #UK #NoConfidence 
Here's a way of looking at #Brexit that we haven't thought about before.  
They can’t because they are focused only on salvaging a Brexit that will make things worse  
British Members of Parliament (MPs) suggest 45’s criticism of PM May’s Brexit plans & suggestion Boris Johnson would make a great PM, has been met w/ outrage by MPs, who accuse 45 of being “repulsive” in “disrespecting” UK & asked May to show him the door.  
My highlight of the week?  A frontbench spokesperson  for Labour party admitting that Labour doesn't want to "exit from brexit" & is intending to"honour" a referendum won by lies & law breaking.  A true #trump moment from Labour Jenny Chapman#FridayFeeling#FBPE#stopbrexit 
Merkel's government hasn't displayed much respect for democracy in its dealings with Greece, and May's attitude towards the EU referendum result and her own 2017 manifesto commitments currently looking pretty questionable. 
EXCLUSIVE: Theresa May is inviting 'softer' Eurosceptics to Chequers THIS AFTERNOON - moments after Donald Trump leaves - for a meeting. Looks like she's trying to divide the Brexiteers ahead of crunch Brexit votes on Monday 
You don't get it. There is a right-wing coup going on right now, right this minute. And all you can do is bleat about Brexit. Wake up, ffs. This is far, far worse than you can imagine. If we don't get the Tories out now, say goodbye to every civil liberty and right you have. 
MOGG: May’s EU plan is not what the British people voted for. “It recreates many of the worst aspects of the EU the British people voted to leave. This does not respect the referendum result.” 
No they didn't. Most the country are still unaware (thanks to the BBC) that #CambridgeAnalytica was created by Farage's friend and Trump's campaign manager. The whole @ICOnews investigation is about datacrimes around #BrexitBut the BBC omitted this crucial bit.  
Trump accuses May of 'wrecking' Brexit | Angry reaction to Brexit White Paper as May unveils plan for softer Brexit | Brexiteers plan rebellion on Trade Bill | Video sparks claims Juncker was 'drunk on the job'  
74 MPs & peers believe #Brexit 'could damage UK environment'. Take 1 minute to tell the UK Government to keep their promise to deliver a greener future after we leave the EU. #WhyNatureMatters 
would like to thank @joe_co_uk for compiling this handy clip for the next independence referendum  
I cannot vote for the Chequers deal when WTO terms offer a better Brexit, writes @OwenPaterson 
HOW MANY politicians have booked a day off to stomp their feet and throw tantrums today and how many are doing it on our taxes? How are these people building bridges to do the best for the UK in post Brexit Britain? A shower of children that need clearing out. #TrumpUKVisit 
This is fundamentally what Brexit is about: Undermining British standards in a sell-out to the US.  
Let's be clear.Obama tried to interfere in the people's vote by bullying the British people to vote remain. Donald Trump is defending the British peoples decision against a Theresa May that is trying to usurp that referendum vote. Massive difference. 
Don't always agree with @campbellclaret on Brexit. But he is making  @ianpaisleymp look ridiculous on Sky. If Brexiteers want to side with Donald Trump against Theresa May they are making a fatal misjudgment. 
Former head of FCO says @theresa_may #Brexit deal not acceptable. We need a #PeoplesVote to give people control of the final deal 
Confirmed in the #Brexit white paper - The UK is committed to the European Convention on Human Rights!For over 60 years the ECHR has helped to safeguard the fundamental #HumanRights and freedoms of everyone on these shores. This is great news for all of us 
Following the publication of the Brexit white paper, it is now clear the Chequers agreement cannot deliver the manifesto pledge to leave the single market, the customs union and the jurisdiction of the European Court in anything but name:  
It is now clear that if & when parliament gets its “meaningful vote” on May’s Brexit Deal, MPs will in effect be invited to vote to give up both parliamentary & national sovereignty. For any who do so, the term “traitor” will not be too strong. 
Donald Trump Brexit intervention is a disgraceful insult to Britain. (My latest for Reaction @reactionlife) 
Donald Trump says that the British people want Brexit because more people voted for Brexit. More people voted Hillary than you, you fuckturnip. 
No version of Brexit works without huge damage.May’s version softens economic disruption but puts us in quarantine.Your version is a sell-out to Trump that undermines UK farmers, the NHS & Irish peace.It’s all bad. You’ve had your chance. Time to ditch Brexit. 
WATCH | “If I have to do this again, next time, no more Mr Nice Guy.”@Nigel_Farage says he will return to the front line of British politics again next Spring if Brexit doesn't mean Brexit! Support us at  
Westmonster’s @PatrickChristys is on @lovesportradio 10.30am-12. He’ll be: - Sticking it to Trump protesters.- Asking why Britain’s military has been decimated- Picking apart Theresa May’s shambolic Brexit plans. Tune in!  0208 70 20 558  
There is nothing more politically damaging to Theresa May than saying she is wrecking Brexit.  
More precisely Theresa May’s Brexit deal could kill US trade deal. Great job Theresa.   
Interesting contrast - Scotland & France has shared citizenship in 16th century.  Clearly we see relations with others in more positive, equal terms. #Brexit  
WATCH | @Nigel_Farage: "The whole of Western politics is being completely reshaped by electorates that have had enough of leaky, open borders. If Theresa May doesn't take back control of our borders, there'll be a wave of populism that'll make the referendum look like nothing!"  
If you read one thing today make it this. A quietly devastating dissection of May's white paper by Hugh Bennett of Brexit Central.  
It recreates many of the worst aspects of the EU the British people voted to leave. This does not respect the referendum result. Ultimately it is the greatest vassalage since King John paid homage to Phillip II at Le Goulet in 1200. #BrexitmeansBrexit 
Keep sticking up for us Moggy, looks like it'll be down to you to save brexit 
And as I told you in Brussels, you’re not welcome to live in UK if you brief against Trump and Brexit. Bugger off back to the States.  
Don't you just hate it when Trump says something nasty that, nonetheless, is true? E.g. That the May Brexit plan (a customs union + EEA in all but name) is inconsistent with a bespoke US-UK trade deal? That May is lying to everyone by means of a fudge that out-Brussels Brussels? 
Do you know, I’ve always wondered whether Brexit was coordinated by Bannon. Thing about Donald is, he can’t help himself blurting out anything he’s been told. 
BREXIT REALITY-“With astonishing hypocrisy wealthy Brexiters such as Rees-Mogg Redwood Lawson & Ashcroft have all been discovered either preparing to move their own assets into European Union jurisdictions or advising clients on how to do so.” & ALL YOU LEAVERS FELL FOR IT 
Strategically, Leavers should put an ocean of clear blue water between Brexit & Trump (reflect where 2/3 of British Leavers are).But the Culture Warriors have a different project. The social climate is less fertile in UK than US but they will try 
What patriotism is to me: Looking after each other Defending our society Promoting our values An emotional connection to my homeWhat patriotism is not: Hating others Rejecting others Dishonesty Arrogance Exceptionalism Brexit 
My suggestion for the NZ cannabis referendum:Q1. Should cannabis use be legal for adults in NZ?Y/NQ2. Should adults be allowed to grow cannabis for personal use only?Y/NQ3. Should regulated companies be allowed to produce and sell cannabis?Y/N  
Really bizarre that of all the European leaders, Trump chooses to publicly insult Theresa May and Angela Merkel. Wonder why that is. Hmmmmmmm"As May’s Government Teeters Over Brexit, Trump Gives It a Shove"  
Should #brexit have a clean break form the EU? RETWEET & VOTE  #yourvoicematters 
.@andreajenkyns: The odds of us leaving the EU with no deal are steadily increasing and we now need to start planning seriously for a no-deal Brexit  
Then fight brexit. Get a leader who fights brexit and offers a people's vote. You would have my vote and many others. The truth is if we leave the EU we will need a USA deal and instead of being strong partners within the EUwe will be a USA sattelite 
Trump is speaking for Brexiteers & those who value freedom & independence. Theresa May & her Cabinet full of remainers, are trying to wreck Brexit & in turn, a free trade agreement with the US. 
Do you believe Theresa May Chequers plan is credible enough for #Brexit negotiations?  @theresa_may RETWEET & VOTE  #yourvoicematters 
@DamianCollins @guyverhofstadt Damian, this is a large conspiracy, and only some of the criminal activities have been uncovered by the Electoral Commission and the ICO. They have stolen UK and US Democracy - these thefts must now be dealt with, and punished. And "brexit" must end 
On June 25th, Survation polled 1,002 Scottish residents aged 16+ on behalf of the Daily Record/Daily Mirror.With undecideds/refused removed, the poll result was when asked how they would vote if a referendum was held tomorrow:YES - 54%NO - 46% 
Two cabinet ministers and two Conservative Party vice-chairmen have quit. Is the Brexit dream dying?  
I had marmite on toast and a cup of tea for breakfast, I work for my fellow citizens as a civil servant, I don't like fascists, and I don't want to see my country wrecked by Brexit, no-one's going to give me any lessons in patriotism. 
Sterling on the slide after Trump says Theresa May's Brexit strategy has probably killed off chances of a U.S.-UK trade deal. Pound down at $1.31.  
#UPDATE US President Trump launches scathing attack on UK PM May's #Brexit strategy, testing the already strained 'special relationship' as they prepared to meet on second day of his tumultuous trip to Britain  #TrumpUKVisit 
This would be in the event of a no-deal #Brexit. One wonders why the Tory Brextremists are so keen on a no-deal. Or perhaps one doesn't wonder. The transformation of the UK into something like Putin's Russia or Erdogan's Turkey could be accomplished within weeks. #StopBrexit 
Sturgeon has said she will decide in the autumn whether to push ahead with plans to hold a second plebiscite on Scottish independence once the terms of Brexit are clear. 
Londoners are protesting against Donald Trump himself and not America or its people, @SadiqKhan - the @MayorofLondon - says  
Look! Someone's made a banner of our graphic. This was from nearly 18 months ago. We know this. It's a transatlantic web of money, data & influence. Brexit & Trump intimately linked. What's happened today should shock no-one  
Brexit 'could damage UK environment' and it’s not just air quality - we’ll need new legislation for conservation too and it’s not yet a Word document let alone legal !   
The Right, 2016: How DARE Obama say anything about Brexit? He's not from round here & hates us because Kenya.The Right, 2018: Here's Trump to undermine the PM, do a racist rant about the London mayor & tell us what to do re Brexit & also let's ask Steve Bannon what he reckons. 
We'll just leave this here..... 
President Trump slams UK’s May over ‘very unfortunate’ Brexit plan, says ‘it will probably kill’ U.S. trade deal  
Yes. I have no time for May's Brexit policy. I am a firm believer that we should remain in the EU. But Trump's intemperate outbursts, his criticism of our PM, his blatant threats over a US-UK FTA and his unwarranted interference in this country's politics is unacceptable. 
This is the usual way that current @GovUK deals with devolved administrations - then (just like this) when challenged apologises and says it won’t happen again.  It always does...Commons chaos as Tories botch unveiling of Brexit White Paper | The National  
In just a couple of days Trump has:> Got NATO members begging to pay their contributions> Spoken up for the BRITISH people against Mrs May's tragic Brexit plan> Exposed Germany as being Russia-dependent> Torched Sadiq Khan's track record and made him look stupidWelcome Sir!  
The speech that Theresa May should give today...That, or she should call for a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal.#FFS 
Donald Trump: I told May how to do Brexit but she wrecked it.You must watch the whole of this piece. Well said Mr Trump!  
It's worth reading every word of this interview - well beyond the bombshell Brexit headline. Trump's brain really is a British tabloid.  
This is why folk a turning away from BBC news. The constant push from them trying to set an anti-EU agenda. Scraping political programs and replacing with Farage documentaries. Majority of guests from RW pro Brexit. Not how any broadcaster should behave  
I’m not a great fan of Trump but on this issue he is right, surely. We cannot strike trade deals independently of the EU if our trade arrangements are closely aligned to it. In this and many other respects, the #Brexit White Paper plan is unrealistic.  
@afneil you’ve been playing to #Bannon #trump #brexit fiddle and only now you realise it’s based on lies?! Welcome to reality. #brexit is pro Russia assault on our country and continent. #BBC has been working against UK interests pandering to #brexit. 
Jacob Rees-Mogg, Trump apologist, has insisted that Barrack Obama was trying to "bully Britain" over Brexit but Donald Trump is merely "setting out his view" with honesty & integrity...Can we get loathsome JRM off the airwaves? His views aren't balance they're dangerous #r4today 
The European parliament shoots down Theresa May's Brexit plan within minutes of its releaseBy @wrightismight #Brexit #BrexitWhitePaper #BrexitChaos #BrexitShambles 
"This is the worst Prime Minister I’ve seen in my lifetime."@Nigel_Farage isn't holding back talking to us about Theresa May, Trump and Brexit. Let us know your thoughts. #wrightstuff 
"Brexit is Brexit", he said at the presser today. So I guess that clears everything up. 
Why is a referendum on putting the right to housing in the constitution not also being planned for? Surely it is one of the most pressing issues? Govt to ask cttee to meet next week on referendum  via @rte 
Britain moves to limit the damage caused by Donald Trump’s extraordinary attack on Theresa May’s Brexit policy  
"Who Will Rid Us Of This Perfidious Prime Minister?"My new article just up at @TheConWom, on the process by which Theresa May can & must be ousted to assuage the growing rage in the country over her cynical Brexit deception. 
Translation: "I want a hard brexit so that your country is totally fucked and my American companies can buy it up and I can totally control you and put my bitch Boris in your Downing Street". #trumpbitchBoris 
Also aided in the Cristiano to Juve deal, negotiated Brexit options with the EU, drafted pitches for three Japanese game shows and hunted whales in the North Sea.  
Trump cares little for Brexit or Russia. Context:Trump admin. wanted/wants UK to split from EU27 on tariffs/trade + wants a lopsided trade deal with UK. Same with NS2: he wants to drive a wedge through EU28 + wants Europeans to purchase energy from US - via @POLITICOEurope: 
But what if Trump has a fair better grasp of what Brexit means than certain painfully squishy, sell-out Tory MPs do?  
John Redwood: White Paper even worse than Chequers Statement!White Paper proposes UK staying in much of current #EUWhite is the colour of the flag of surrender!White Paper sacrifices what we voted for -To be a free & independent country again.#Brexit 
Millions of Brexiteers will agree with Donald Trump that Theresa May's white paper on Brexit threatens a free trade agreement with the US. Continued Single market / Customs Union regulatory alignment along with Associate membership is not what Brexiteers voted for. 
A racist US president deliberately tries to stir up trouble on Brexit, immigration and Tory divisions and this is the response of a British cabinet minister. Tragic  
May’s ‘Brexit Deal’ is not Brexit and is not even a deal.A deal is ‘an agreement for mutual benefit’.May’s plan is a one-way street and a permanent surrender of sovereignty on:TradeIndustryDefenceEmploymentFishing watersSocial policyForeign aidEU paymentsEtc  
Boris Johnson's former boss Max Hastings says he has 'no scruples, conscience or principles' - so of course Trump thinks he's got what it takes to make a great prime minister. #TrumpUKVisit #StopBrexit #Brexit 
"The Trump visit is going very well," says Tory Lord Duncan as Trump, on whom countless millions have been wasted, publicly humiliates Theresa May and runs down the UK. The Tories, in their #Brexit madness, have turned us into poodles. Our international standing has been trashed. 
Trump on May’s Brexit Plans: ‘I Don’t Know If That’s What They Voted For’   
YET it's up to him to decide on 'beach body ready' posters. His personal emotions have taken over and are damaging to post Brexit Britain. London clearly isn't open. Stop the Khanage. He has to go. All because Trump was proven correct over London. Small man ego syndrome.  
Dominic Grieve - There is no possibility of a no deal #brexit... it would be so damaging for the UK for that to happen & no rational parliamentarian would allow that to happen.. if no deal was to happen then Parliament would have to intervene & the Govt wouldn't survive#FBPE 
An Australian-born US citizen has used his British newspaper to help a despotic US president undermine the prime minister but brexit was all about taking back control from foreign influences.  
So we alienate all of our friends in Europe and have to crawl to a man who cages children and grabs women by their genitals. #Brexit has brought us to a point of national humiliation. How must we look to the rest of the world? Theresa, WTF are you playing at. Stand up to him! 
Happy to stand with our MP @LaylaMoran at Blenheim last night. The struggles against Trump and against Brexit are indivisible because their malignant purposes are intimately linked. Keep those tiny Brexitter hands off our NHS.We want No Trump and No Brexit.@HealthierIn 
Polite reminder. Trump & Brexit are not 2 different things. They are the same thing. Same companies. Same data. Same Facebook. Same Russians. Same Cambridge Analytica. Same Robert Mercer. Same Steve Bannon. Same Breitbart. Same Alexander Nix. Same Donald Trump. Same Nigel Farage.  
BREAKING: #Brexit CRISIS - Theresa May has DAYS to save Brexit and HERSELF as no confidence vote looms.Tory Brexiteers now have 48 fellow MPs who are willing to submit letters to 1922 Committee, triggering a confidence vote.OUT OUT OUT OUT OUT OUT 
Oh dear! Mr Murdoch is cross with Theresa, & the fool Trump is an easy tool (as Putin finds) to pass the message: “Why May wrecked Brexit – and Boris would make a great PM” - The Sun  
Even Trump is talking down May's Brexit plans, but the reality is that this whole Brexit process has been a mess. #TrumpUKvisitIf you agree that the people should have the final say on the Brexit deal and option to stay in the EU, add your name  
% drop in GDP as a result of a no Brexit deal: Wales — 12%, Northern Ireland — 12%, North West —12%, West Midlands —13%, North East  —16%[UK government analysis]  
"The “special relationship” has only ever really been “special” for  Britain. But now America has become unhinged and Brexit has in effect  made us a bridge to nowhere, it’s difficult to see what’s in it for  anybody."  
#Trump: May's #Brexit "business-friendly" plan could "kill" US trade deal  
My job is to work for Britain’s exit from the EU. That’s why people voted for UKIP & me 2004, 2009 & 2014. We achieved the Referendum & it’s result. And that’s what wounds the soul of treasonous, collaborating, Quisling Remainers. 
Khalistani elements planning to do global rally in London & many parts of the world for referendum to vote for creation of KhalistanDid you see any protest by them for recent Sikh massacre in Afghanistan?Did you see any protest for Pakistani Sikh policeman who was humiliated? 
I was surprised & saddened to see Liam Fox supporting May’s Brexit deal, and even saying it would allow us trade deals with 3rd countries.  Defending the indefensible. 
The pound drops as Trump threatens to 'kill' any post-Brexit trade deal with the UK  
Pictures tell a thousand words about what’s going on at the moment in British politics. We live in dangerous times. Putin is rubbing his hands in glee. Time to stand up against this madness. #Trump #Brexit  
Everyone who isn’t an idiot now knows that Brexit is a catastrophe, and was won not just by lies but by actual criminality. The PM is a spineless fool who is trailing around the land holding the hand of an abusive racist hate preacher who locks kids in cages. Can we do something? 
The overlap between ‘British people who support hard Brexit no matter what the cost’ and ‘British people who think Trump is just fine’ is curiously large. Like they’ve swallowed one bad idea & thought ‘well this is what I do now.’ 
In 2014 I saw victorious unionists snatch the saltire from a young woman's hand and destroy it. I knew at that point i'd made a massive mistake in my "soft no thanks" vote. Then came Brexit. To Scots like myself with close connexion to England: Please support #IndyRef2 
#ThankYou Sarah, yet you seem happy for the PM to insult 17,410,742 of the British electorate, which, as you know only too well was the majority. #brexit  
Trump detonates Brexit bomb in Britain visit | Analysis by @StCollinson  
EU SURRENDER! The PM sparked uproar yesterday when it emerged her post-#Brexit plans promised visa-free travel for ‘talented’ EU workersMay has crossed so many red lines that her discredited utterances are now as believable as Tony Blair's 
So after all of Macron’s diplomacy TrumpPulls out of Iran deal Pulls out of Paris AgreementTells the world he has dandruff And after May’s diplomacy TrumpCriticises her Brexit plansQuestions US trade dealPraises a minister who has just resigned  
I'd disagree. One of the fascinating aspects of Brexit is how much of England is still pottering on as normal as if nothing will change  
For big U.S. banks, Britain's negotiating position on Brexit isn’t great news  
SITREPThis is where we're at. Our desperate Prime Minister can't wait to accommodate a mentally ill misogynist dinosaur who, whilst a guest of this country, feels the need to offer advice as he's a business genius....look way now if you've fallen for this fraud... #TrumpUKVisit 
Jacob Rees-Mogg says that Donal Trump’s intervention is justified because Brexit plan is a matter of foreign policy for the US. Obama’s intervention was unjustified because it happened on the eve of an election #Today 
Donald Trump isn't getting the Brexit he wanted  via @bopinion 
Obama, at the behest of Cameron, meddle in the Brexit Referendum, saying UK will go to the "back of the queue" unless we vote Remain. UK media rejoice.Trump backs the 17.4m who voted Leave. Media incensed. See how this works? #BIASEDFAKENEWSMEDIA 
BoJo says Trump should lead Brexit.Trump says BoJo should be our PM.BoJo- the man who even lied in his resignation letter, after a life of lies.“He’s got what it takes” said Trump.We did warn you.Brexit means Trump.  
Sarah Wollaston - In the government's contingency planning for a no deal #brexit they should publish very clearly what they're planning for because if the public could see the extent of the disruption a no deal would cause they would be a lot more concerned#FBPE @sarahwollaston 
My @BrexitCentral colleague @HughRBennett spent yesterday reading, analysing and dissecting the Brexit White Paper. Here’s his comprehensive report.   
I have read the Brexit white paper, and contrary to Government statements today and yesterday there are in fat huge legal and practical impediments to global trade for the UK if its policy is implemented. It must be altered. 
Agree with the many people I’ve seen pointing out that we are focusing today on what Trump says about May and Brexit, but history will look back on what he’s saying about Sadiq Khan - dangerous (and illogical) to blame a single politician for terror attacks #TrumpUKVisit 
Disruption Show continues. Trump explicitly attacks UK PM on her Brexit plan and de facto endorses Brexit Taliban options.  
Here’s a guide on today’s protests in case you can afford, in this post-Brexit economy, to take your Friday afternoon off of work (hint: the @womensmarchlon is lunch hour-adjacent) 
1. Give over about the bus, it's embarrassing.2. Member States are desperate for a deal.  EU Commission don't care.3. May's deal stops a US trade deal.  Nothing else.4. Many supported a 'no deal' Brexit, from day one. Why would they care what the EU says? Sorry Dan, you lie.  
What's incredible is the way the Kamikaze-Brexiteers don't realise the damage their demand for a suicidal, no compromise Brexit, is going to do to their grand project. 
The President of the United States must always be welcome in Britain. But I would no more take advice from Donald Trump on negotiating Brexit than I would on staying married or choosing a good hair dye.  
Succinctly put.I've been asking myself the same questions for some time.What drives Remainers?The best answer I have is laziness.Laziness even to try to understand Brexit.That is not a good characteristic in a leader.#MrsMayMustGo 
Yet another cost of #Brexit they never told us about:#BrexitChaos#BrexitShambles 
If #Brexit is about sovereignty & taking back control why is Alan Duncan so happy about handing it straight over to Trump?In a globalised world the sharing of sovereignty is necessary; sharing it with Trump is not - & nor is is desirable.  #r4today 
I was a fascinating Brexit briefing recently w/a US economist. He talked up a trade deal w/US ‘but of course your indigenous agriculture would basically end’. At end of event he was asked what he thought of Brexit - said it was ‘crazy’ and UK would be much better off in EU  
For anyone who has not yet understood: Trump and international far right oligarchs are trying to destroy the EU and the values it stands for. #Brexit is part of that plan. And they are quite willing to sacrifice the UK to achieve that goal. #StopBrexit now 
Corbyn might as well be rolling out the red carpet too, he is a hand holding Brexiteer of the highest order. A hypocrite who has deserted the people he represents. Enabling Trump and enabling Brexit. One and the same.  
By praising him, Trump has destroyed what was left of Boris Johnson’s career. The British don’t like to be told what to do. We didn’t listen to Obama”s measured warnings about Brexit, so why would we listen to the empty, flatulent burblings of Trump.. #TrumpUK, #Trump 
So far Donald Trump has; Rubbished Theresa’s Brexit plan Backed Boris Johnson for Prime Minister criticised the London Mayor and now he’s going for tea with the Queen on Friday the 13th- God help us all!  #TrumpVisitUK 
Indeed. But @jeremycorbyn: in the end, Trump’s policies, his vile populism, have same roots as #Brexit. So please tell me: how can you condemn Trump while simultaneously enabling Brexit? It makes no sense: Brexit too puts lives and well-being of millions at risk. #TrumpUKVisit 
Donnie Trump is a billionaire businessman.He's walked into the UK and spotted:1) Our people voted for Brexit and we clearly ain't gettin' it.2) Theresa May is an ineffectual gimp, better suited to the checkout counter at Debenhams.#IStandWithDonald 
Sorry Dennis, but if you support an alt-right Brexit and vote in the EU Withdrawal Bil to give Tories unlimited power, then you can't expect us to take you seriously when you slag off Trump.By being a Labour Leaver, you're giving Trump exactly what he wants!#StopBrexit#FBPE 
Earlier this week Bannon attended a private meeting in a London hotel with people like Nigel Farage and partner of Marine Le Pen, Louis Aliot, the meeting was organised by the far-right Bow Group, TODAY he's on ITV spreading his poison; why has he been given a platform? 
So, @realDonaldTrump thinks a hard brexit is the best plan and thinks @BorisJohnson would make a good PM.If you voted leave, this orange bag of vomit is now your friend.You're welcome to him. 
Brexit latest: (Black) American Presidents with a record of transparency, support and honesty have no right to comment on UK politics. (Orange) American Presidents with a history of depravity, division and deceit should be listened to intently. 
The White Paper is little more than an incredibly convoluted way of repackaging the status quo. It is an exercise in paying lip service to the referendum result rather than implementing it with any conviction, and the country knows it, says @HughRBennett 
Donald Trump arrives in London amid protests and Brexit chaos  
All playing out exactly as planned. As soon as the referendum results were in, Cameron walked & the No-Deal Hard Brexiteers took over. Oligarchs are using Brexit as a wedge to destabilise the EU in a trade war. We are the stupidest bloody country in the world to help Trump do it  
Recent events have given rise to another nightmare scenario that is only just beginning to take shape: that every conceivable Brexit outcome may now not command a parliamentary majority.@Bremaininspain 
In a public rebuke hours after landing in the U.K., Trump said May's Brexit plan would affect trade with the U.S. 'in a negative way'  
Trump says Europe is losing its culture because of immigration. It' s almost always uncultured yobs who wail about the loss of culture to migrants - blaming others for the personal cultural wasteland which they  inhabit. #StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE 
Brexit explained...  
Poor foreign office minister Alan Duncan has to appear on #r4today saying Trump wouldn’t have excoriated May if he’d read her Brexit White Paper and say Trump’s not rude he’s a ‘controversialist’. Ignore Trump’s real, stated aim - destroying the EU 
I predict two medium term consequences of the Brexit battle raging in SW1:1) House of Lords will go 2) How senior civil service managed becomes live political topic. Both have been in Remain rearguard. Big votes to be found now in taking down both 
It’s not, no. Just a big week with World Cup, Brexit & Trump. I’m as exhausted as you are...  
I have to battle the existential threat of Brexit, like the hero of an ancient epic, fighting demons, rogue armies and the forces of evil threatening to take over the world.Hadrian’s Wall is open *despite* roadworks  
I told May how to do Brexit but she wrecked it — the US trade deal is off, says Donald Trump  
MSM are assembling their artillery to support the Fake Brexit plan.They will interview such big business CEOs who were remain to start with, academics & the usual smattering of luvvies.Prepare for project fear on a new monster scale. 
Looks like the purpose of Brexit is to sell off the UK to Trump.Whose country is this anyway?!Pardon me but... *fuck right off*. pic.twitter.com/ZM2iqZFg7b 
Brilliant from @piersmorgan“Already Barnier, Juncker & Merkel are making approving noises... of course they are! This is basically us not really leaving and I’m sorry, although I voted to stay, this is not #Brexit” #whitepaper #BRINO #MayMustGo 
Do your part and support BREXIT. 
You help #trump and #putin by not resisting #brexit. The left is complicit in this wrecking ball. 
The co-ordinated media attack by Trump, Farage and Murdoch is merely the latest in a far-right war against democracy that has been going for several years now.The extensive criminality that tainted the #Brexit referendum was very much a part of that.Wake up, Britain!#r4today 
I was on balance (but unenthusiastically) in favour of  #Trump visit. But his patronising put-down of @theresa_may is wholly outrageous, whatever your view of her, her government or her handling of #Brexit. 
2/ It suits Trump to keep people guessing on whether he is out of control. He is not. He is working towards a very consistent set of goals in this Europe trip which couldn't be clearer:- Weaken EU (so weaken possibility of May's soft Brexit)- Weaken NATO- Strengthen Russia 
Wake up @UKLabour . It’s Brexit with Trump and the oligarchies or we climb down off this idiotic sideshow and stand with liberal democracies in the EU. Magical unicorn island of isolated socialism is not an option. 
Treason? Betrayal of whom? A frothing minority that will never be appeased.What a mess the angry fantasists have gotten our country into. May’s deal is bad. The ultras want it worse.Time to ditch Brexit altogether.  
I told May how to do Brexit but she wrecked it — the US trade deal is off, says Donald Trump  
When obama told Britain a Brexit vote would put it “back of the queue” for trade deal with US, Boris Johnson said Obama was channeling Kenyan anti-colonial bias. Now Trump says essentially same thing. Guessing Boris may handle differently   
It’s Friday.And there you have it. Trump says May has ignored his advice on Brexit and trade deal with the US now unlikely. Says Boris Johnson would make a great PM.Do we really want to go down this route? I don’t.#StopBrexitSaveBritain#PeoplesVote 
And no, Trump’s rudeness, arrogance, ignorance and belligerence doesn’t make me feel sorry for Theresa May. This is her mess. She built this, just as much as anyone. She drove the xenophobia that underpinned Brexit - and chimes with Trump. 
Sadiq Khan getting a harder time on #r4today than the whole sorry Brexit mob. Trump makes a series of insulting and baseless allegations and it's all the London mayor's fault, apparently. 
Trump is in the UK and a wide-ranging interview with The Sun revealed what he thinks about a plan for a "soft brexit." "If they do a deal like that, we would most likely be dealing with the EU instead of with the UK, so it will probably kill the deal."  
Blah blah. We didn’t hear anything from these hypocrites when #Obama made a direct intervention in our politics by attempting to bully us into staying in the #EU. #Trump is telling the truth. #TheresaMay has wrecked #Brexit.  
Having lost her grip on her party, the country and Brexit, Theresa does her best to keep her grip on a trade deal with the US.  
#TrumpVisitUK on behalf of all the decent people of the united kingdom,i would like to apologise to the President of the united states for the disgraceful behaviour of the left wing morons protesting your visit,and thank u sir for telling our gutless prime minister about brexit 
Who could have foreseen that Trump-Farage-Johnson-Gove-Murdoch would have something cooked up to disrupt a broken UK politics? Hi, Britain? Sorry, but you’ve been played. There’s no good brexit, wake up and stop it. 
This is your Friday 13th of July reminder that both Leave campaigns  deliberately broke the law to win the Brexit referendum including possibly treasonThis means@BorisJohnson@michaelgove@Arron_banksBroke the law & should be in jail#VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw#VoteLeaveCheated 
TM achievements this week:1) New Remain cabinet2) Not delivered Brexit3) Angered the 52%4) Angered the 48%5) Soured the special relationship6) Won’t get US trade dealWhen will the 1922 committee do something? Votes will slip to UKIP and we risk Corbyn GOV! #MayMustGo 
'My fear about your white paper is that the guys in Brussel last night already said that there's no chance that we accept this.'Steve Bannon discusses his concerns on the Brexit plan.  
And Brexit is out of the same stable, the corruption of the vote, dark money. Fbpe is on it and have realised this for a long time. Defeat brexit, install pro-eu PM, best defence. Then work to get wealth shared more equally to combat the right. The right has grown thx 2 austerity 
Trump is in the UK and a wide-ranging interview with The Sun revealed what he thinks about a plan for a "soft brexit." "If they do a deal like that, we would most likely be dealing with the EU instead of with the UK, so it will probably kill the deal."  
'Usually, I don't feel sorry for @theresa_may, but I do this morning' - @EmilyThornberry accuses @realDonaldTrump of "insulting the host" after criticising the PM's #Brexit plan during his visit to the UK #TrumpUKVisitRead more on this story here:  
|￣￣￣￣￣￣￣￣￣￣￣￣|  THE CAP IS IMPERFECT  BUT ON THE WHOLE  BREXIT WILL BE BAD            FOR FARMING|＿＿＿＿＿＿＿＿＿＿＿＿|              (\__/)    ||             (•ㅅ•)   ||            /  　  づ 
Listening to @realDonaldTrump on Brexit and the Mayor of London I think in spirit he is more British than many of our political leaders. I can understand why he's so popular amongst the grassroots people of America. He'll probably win a 2nd term. 
There is no way, under any circumstances, that a No Deal Brexit can be described as the Will of the People.#PeoplesVote 
Your morning briefing: Trump says Brexit plan could ‘kill’ UK-US trade deal; Police ask for more help with Novichok workload; Prison ‘didn’t use scanners’ 
#TrumpUKVisit All these protests against Donald Trump.  Two great fiends over many years. With Theresa May messing up Brexit. And all these stupid protests, and that bloody balloon. Donald Trump doing brilliant job for . Different class to our PATHETIC politicians.  
The President's simply calling out May's deceitful policy for what it is - not Brexit.  
RUBBISH @Kristene4Angus!Brexit white paper is an association agreement with common agri policy.Same words as Treaty of Rome that gave foundation of CFPLeaving CFP is legal fact of terminating memebership. What govt policy proposes is signing up to re-obey CFP in new deal.  
Tory MPs were in open revolt last night after full details of Theresa May's #Brexit plans were revealed. The #WhitePaper sets out proposals for an “associated agreement" that will leave a swathe of Brussels regulations in place#MayMustGo #BRINO 
The Telegraph is wrong here. A Brexit 'No deal' is not fine for UK economy which will probably be hit badly with longterm effects & it may well generate a fresh General Election and a possible Corbyn government. Do they think through the logical consequences of their assertions?  
“This is not Brexit”Whether you love him or hate hiim, this is a brilliant summary of the “Chequers deal” by Remain voter Piers Morgan on #bbcqt 
Translation: Unless the UK goes for a hard Brexit no trade deal with US. If you do, we’ll squeeze the trade deal till your NHS and agriculture pips squeak. #ScyllaAndTrumpdis 
Trump: May Has Wrecked Brexit and Killed US Trade Deal | Read His Full Quotes Here >>  
In 24 hours #Trump has insulted the Mayor of London, humiliated the government and praised Boris Johnson over #BrexitWe must stand up to him. The single best way to do it is to #Remain in the EU. Help us make it happen. Help us fight back  
First it was the divorce bill, then it was so-called vassal status, now their deal with Trump's America is on the ropes.Slowly but surely Brexit leaders are realising their fantasy is failing. It's time the people took back control via a #peoplesvote. Agree? Please share 
Brexit means a bonfire of worker’s rights. YOUR rights to things like equal pay for equal work, holiday pay, reasonable working hours. Many Americans only get 2-3 weeks holiday per year. Anyone vote for that? Time for a #PeoplesVote to #StopBrexit 
Soft or hard, no brand of Brexit can command a Commons majority | Mujtaba Rahman  
Trump says May's Brexit plan kills hope of a U.S. trade deal  
President Trump has savaged Theresa May’s Brexit plan, saying that it would almost certainly kill a trade deal between Britain and the United States  
The European parliament shoots down Theresa May's Brexit plan within minutes of its releaseBy @wrightismight #Brexit #BrexitWhitePaper #BrexitChaos 
The priorities of Britain’s media today is being reflected on @GMB right now. You’ve got the WH former strategic advisor on during #Brexit turmoil and they spend the first 6 minutes of the interview doing pro-Islam advocacy  
The reins of Brexit have been handed to those who never wanted to leave  
Trump says: *May wrecked Britain*Trump means: *I am wrecking Western democracy*Perplexed journalists say *fascinating*There is nothing *fascinating* about an existential threat.  It needs to be called out by media & politicians. Brexit is poison, Soft Brexit too low a dose. 
Britain's May looking forward to explaining Brexit stance to Trump: May spokesman  
This is an absolutely scorching and ultimately heartbreaking essay by @NickCohen4 on the BBC’s unconscionable abdication of basic journalistic duty over Brexit.  
Brexit is a shambles.The NHS is in ruins.Homelessness has sky rocketed.Our kids are in debt. The economy is a disaster.Extremism & racism is on the rise.Crime through the roof.The Tories are destroying OUR country.It's time for change.We need #GE2018Now We need Corbyn! 
‘Welcome to the UK, Mr President!’‘Your #Brexit deal sucks. Where’s Boris? I love elbows. Are you the Queen too? You know I’m stable, right? And a genius? Immigrants are bad. You got burgers here, right? I’d kill for a burger. And Fox, right? I own Scotland. Is that near here?’ pic.twitter.com/Q7T6vXGdhl 
paying his respects..#TrumpUKVisit @FinancialReview #Brexit  
Theresa May can1. Fight and maybe lose. Losing a brexit bill could be very serious indeed for her premiership2. Pull the vote. But that’s it - she will still be accused with some justification of being unable to command majority in Commons for her brexit It’s a standoff 
I seem to recall Mr Farage, Rees-Mogg and Johnson all criticising Barak Obama for expressing an opinion on Brexit. The silence is deafening from these men over Donald’s Trump’s incendiary comments comments on Brexit last night. 
So, Trump yesterday morning re Brexit "It's not really for me to interfere" - Comes to UK - "I think Boris Johnson would make a great PM" - I wonder who slipped him the brief?  #TrumpVisitUK 
Here is a fairly brutal assessment of the #BrexitWhitePaper from the ever excellent @iandunt Many decent people voted leave beleiving those backing brexit had a workable brexit plan, 2 years on there is still not one. It's why so many are #remainernow 
Funny how liberals absolutely adored Obama’s “back of the queue” comments - when a US President brazenly tried (and failed) to influence #Brexit vote - yet toys leave pram when Trump correctly states US trade deal with UK more difficult without clean break from EU   
@realDonaldTrump on #Brexit “I would have done it much differently. I actually told Theresa May how to do it but she didn’t agree, she didn’t listen to me”“She wanted to go a different route. I would actually say that she probably went the opposite way." 
On my way to @5WrightStuff for what promises to be a feisty morning with @Nigel_Farage No doubt on menu will be #TrumpBaby #TrumpUKVisit with a side order of #Brexit &  #bigben & a good portion of mischief. Tune in from 9.15am 
As I said, a major US trade deal post Brexit is impossible without a hard border, either in Ireland or in the Irish sea.  
This whole meltdown over trade is bizarre. Referendum's meaning was *never* about trade so far as vast majority of voters concerned. 
Donald Trump warns Theresa May a soft Brexit will 'kill' any trade deal with the US 
PM says White Paper delivers 'the Brexit people voted for'  liar liar pants on fire ⁦@theresa_may⁩ 
Owen Paterson : I cannot vote for the Chequers deal when WTO terms offer a better Brexit 
Spot on! BBC QT audience point out @theresa_may  is FAILING Leave voters with Brexit plan  
I remember right after the #Brexit vote, then Candidate Trump said: "We're gonna have one hell of a Brexit in November!" As usual, he was more right than anyone could have imagined 
President Trump will force duplicitous Theresa May to FINISH BREXIT! 
Trump tells Theresa May her soft Brexit plan will 'kill' US trade dealTrump tells it like it is, honest, blunt & true!  
MAY MUST GOTheresa May is decent & hard-working but she is also lacklustre & uninspiring. We need an optimistic & dynamic leader to reject Brexit negativity & defeatism. We need a leader who truly believes that Brexit is a golden opportunity to make the country richer & fairer.  
Donald Trump's warned that Theresa May's Chequers Brexit plan would "probably kill" the chances of a trade deal with the US.  
Lot in here about why we shouldn’t hand control to Trump, Putin, Johnson & Farage - which is what Brexit does  
The Government are consulting on two crucial parts of environmental protections after Brexit in England and we need your help to make these as strong as possible. Respond here:  
Trump’s crass and disgraceful interview illustrates why Brexit must be stopped. It is sheer folly to estrange ourselves from EU allies when this appalling man is bent on undermining Britain 
+Brexit?-Its not 4 me 2 say-Property in SCO-Its not 4 me 2 say-Great Scottish friends-Mom born in SCO-Ambassador doing great job-Its not 4 me 2 say+Hard Brexit?-Heartbreaking?-Brexit=Brexit-Protests-We won Wisconsin-Property in IRE-Property all over-Immigration 
Donald Trump says Theresa May is wrecking Brexit... Is he right? @JuliaHB1 |  
There never was a trade deal with the States.Trumps advisors publicly stated that Brexit was an opportunity to scavenge anything valuable from the UK.Having said that, the best thing May could do right now is cancel the rest of Trumps visit and join the protest march. 
Coming up: London Mayor @SadiqKhan on Trump's visit (0750) and Foreign Office Minister @AlanDuncanMP (0810). @Jacob_Rees_Mogg on the Brexit White Paper (0830). And can classical music be funny? (0820) #r4today 
The Brexit White Paper just lacks one thing.Any thing to do with actually Leaving the EU.#WhitePaper 
Presumably Leavers, who whined about Obama interfering in our affairs before the referendum, are absolutely furious with Trump now.  Unless they’re a bunch of massive hypocrites of course. #TrumpUKVisit 
Actually Gina there is a big difference between Trump sounding off (as he does) two years after the vote and Obama threatening British voters with a spoonfed line from Downing Street in the middle of the referendum. #TrumpUKVisit #brexit #Trump 
We should vote EU President Juncker out.He regularly appears drunk  whilst on EU duties.Oh wait.We can't . He is unelected.Like the other EU dictators.The sooner we get the #Brexit we voted for the better. 
News Daily: Trump's Brexit attack, and police plead for help  
Pound falls as Donald Trump says Theresa May's Brexit plan could kill a future U.S. trade deal  
Now clear that Brexit is a policy of colonisation by Trump & Putin, enforced through their friends Johnson & Farage. I think we need our equivalent of the Boston Tea Party. 
Friday briefing: Trump takes swing at May's Brexit  
3/ Then Trump arrives in U.K. and a) backs islamophobic attack on @SadiqKhan b) backs Boris for PM c) attacks May Brexit plan 
Simple answer to this one: a leader who has trashed her relationship with major allies and weakened her country by pushing for a destructive BrexitA sign of things to come if we pursue *that* trade deal with the US and the humiliation it entails#StopBrexit  
Trump's trade promises are not worth the paper they are written on. It was never a viable prospect even without Trump. The bottom line is that EU trade is worth more to us than any USA deal and the completion of Brexit talks is more important than this particular side show.  
This US president has brought his damaging agenda, shocking diplomacy and jock-like sexism to the UK.Johnson, Farage and Trump’sTransatlantic boys’ club is toxic.The truth will out about the real link between Trump+Brexit and it can’t come soon enough.  
News of extreme plans to stockpile processed food in case of a break in supply of food. Will there be rationing following a No-Deal Brexit? Will we all be forced to use food banks?Project Fear suddenly looking like Project Slightly-Worrying compared to reality of Brexit! #r4today 
There's some difference when US politicians are briefed by Barnier rather than by Boris on #Brexit  
The idea that ‘global Britain’ is there to be bullied by the obscene Trump, & told what we can & can’t do with our democracy, shows the utter bankruptcy of Brexit. It is a policy of unilateral democratic disarmament. Which is why there must be a people’s vote to stop it 
Lord Heseltine - Theresa May now has an impossible problem.. the #Brexiters want a hard #Brexit but May can't get a hard brexit or the Chequers fudge through the Commons.. so brexit is now unravelling & I hope this will lead to the collapse of brexit. #fingerscrossed#FBPE 
You were silent on Obama - but now you decry Trump? You were vocal about Russia but silent on your foreign funding. You were vocal on leave cheating but silent about Remain's foul play. Brexit has a historically large mandate but you tried to obstruct it. How can you be serious? 
Will you be telling Trump to keep his nose out of Brexit, @Nigel_Farage? 
#GME | Barely 24 hours after Donald Trump said Britain was in turmoil, he's created turmoil of his own for Prime Minister Theresa May with explosive comments about her Brexit deal. Live from the US embassy in London with the latest is our @VinnyMcAv 
Thank God for Trump. Now he has rejected a trade deal with Brexit Britain, backed Boris for prime minister, & threatened NATO & European security, THERE IS NOTHING WHATEVER LEFT OF BREXIT AS A VIABLE POLICY. Brexit - RIP 
Trump tells Theresa  May her Brexit plan will kill off U.S. trade deal  
My parents' generation are mostly dead,would be appalled by Brexit and stunned that you don't understand about reciprocal arrangements. 
.@realDonaldTrump warns @theresa_may her #Brexit blueprint will "kill" hopes of future trade deals with the #US 
BFE: If you voted LEAVE in order to secure lucrative Trade Deals around the world then Donald Trump couldn't have made it clearer. We will NOT be getting one. If that's not the Brexit you VOTED for, then join our demands for a #PeoplesVote   
Theresa May's white paper on Brexit has sparked anger from Eurosceptics and leaves her facing defeat in the Commons as early as Monday  
Trump is not much different in public as he is in private. As the row explodes over his attack on May over Brexit read this: 
So when President Obama had an opinion on #brexit, it was "disgraceful", but when Trump sticks his oar in it’s front page news, with many pages beyond. The hypocrisy of the Brexit headbangers is vomit inducing, just like their #chlorinatedchicken.#FBPE #peoplesvote #TrumpVisitUK 
''SUPPORT for Scotland becoming an independent country has grown to 47%, according to a poll published today.It puts backing among voters for the Yes cause two percentage points higher than since the Sept 2014 referendum- despite there being no campaign currently on the matter'' 
How many days in a row can I say  " well this is awkward"? . But wow. This really really is! -  With criticism of May's Brexit, Trump detonates a diplomatic grenade #Brexit #TheresaMay #Trump 
Honesty is @POTUS' policy, even if PM May doesn't want to hear it.President Trump Tells UK Media a Failed Economic Brexit Likely Means No US Trade Deal Possible.As long as UK is attached to EU they aren't allowed to conduct their own trade negotiations. 
Trump warned in an interview that Theresa May’s new Brexit strategy will “kill” any future trade deal with the U.S. once the U.K. leaves the EU.The remarks came on the same day Trump arrived in the U.K. for a visit  
IMO Trump has the whole US military intelligence apparatus behind him since before announcing he was running. He doesn’t run against the whole swamp without their approval and full support. Brexit confirmed this was the right time to go for it. The swamp will go down.  
May’s deception is blown wide apart. Why is May insisting on sending detailed, complex proposals to Brussels? The referendum decision instructed her to trigger Article 50 & prepare to leave. May is a procrastinator & shameless EU hardliner who took her job on false pretences 
As I say in my Telegraph column today, a major UK-US deal had been seen as the great prize of Brexit. It now seems that this has been rather dramatically taken off the table.  
May's Brexit plan could "kill" US trade deal: Trump 
Theresa May gave President Trump a red carpet welcome. Then, the Sun tabloid published an interview in which Trump blasted May’s Brexit planning, attacked London’s mayor, and praised Boris Johnson as a future PM.  
UK premier Theresa May is reported to have told her Cabinet that a change to her Brexit plan was not possible, after consulting with German Chancellor Angela Merkel. The two leaders have met twice in the past week. 
If there was any doubt about Trump's racism and hateful nature, there isn't now. #Brexit #BrexitShambles 
Trump and May yesterday. Her fawning over him clearly hasn’t worked. He is openly contemptuous of May and constantly undermines her. #Brexit demeans us all.  
Sort of amazing that Trump just said he is predicating US trade deals with UK not on US interests, but on the views of Brexit hardliners.  pic.twitter.com/BJygDyMBRP 
With special thanks to Mark Zuckerberg and Nigel Farage. #Brexit #Trump 
Dear PM May,Why didn't you listen to President Trump when he explained how to do a hard Brexit so the UK could be free from EU tyranny?Mutual trade deals with the USA can't happen until Brits are sovereign again.Listen to your voters who said BREXIT.Signed,Your USA ALLIES  
#MAGA #NATO #EU.. TRUMP UK - TRUMP to UK MEDIA / NO BREXIT ... NO TRADE DEALS:President Trump Drops the Heavy Hammer on May's Failure to GET Brexit Done -  Tells U.K. Media a Failed Economic Brexit Likely Means No U.S. Trade Deal Possible. 
England got Brexit for the same reason we got Trump: Russia cheated their way in. 
Day 1  #TrumpVisitUK: Queen has pretended to be dead so she no have to meet us. Donnie complain Big macs aren’t the same and that people speak funny. He get revenge by sabotaging Prime Minster on trade agreement over Brexit. I sleep badly - no airco. 
Trump: Brexit plan 'will probably kill' US trade deal - The cold, friendless, post #Brexit world starkly revealed.  
Trump tells Theresa May her soft Brexit plan will 'kill' any US trade deal after Britain leaves the EU, adds Boris will make a great PM and blames Sadiq Khan for terrorism in explosive start to UK visit   
‘Ideologically opposed’ Piers Morgan accuses Theresa May of NOT BELIEVING in Brexit 
Dual Member Proportional (DMP) is one of the three proportional representation voting systems that will be included in this autumn's BC referendum. Learn more about it by listening to this podcast, featuring DMP's creator, @sean_gra. #bcpoli #pr4bc 
WATCH | "I don't know if that's what they voted for... the British agree  with me on immigration, and that's why you have Brexit in the first  place" @realDonaldTrump speaking sense on @theresa_may 's fake Brexit!  
Because the real danger to May right now is an internal party leadership challenge over her handling of Brexit. She’s hanging by a thread. Trump’s attacks on her might be the final snip. And her opponents already don’t like her; this won’t change that. Good question though!  
"No deal means No Brexit!"This line of logic from Remainers  is dangerously close to Brexiters insisting the EU will give us a bespoke deal.No deal means Brexit. It means it in the worst way possible. Like jumping out of a plane with no parachute. Say hi to the ground. 
Dear God trump is s complete fool. He gives an interview saying he told Teresa May  how to fix the Brexit situation (this idiot couldn’t fix a tire). He said she chose to ignore him. After trashing her and promoting her competitor, went to dinner with her. What a fool 
Said before, will say again:Trump is a buffoon and a neo-fascist. Much as it is a joy to watch May blanche as he vomits all over her #Brexit plans, this kind of public intervention in domestic affairs is a warning to us all. Urgent need to rethink Aus-US relationship #auspol 
President Trump Tells U.K. Media a Failed Economic Brexit Likely Means No U.S. Trade Deal Possible...  via @thelastrefuge2 
Remember that time Obama talked about Brexit and the brexiteers were all like "keep your nose out of our business!" 
Trump makes complete fool of self in interview w/Murdochs' London Sun.Bashes PM May for not doing BREXIT as he told her, endorses Boris Johnson for PM, claims US GDP has "doubled, tripled" since he's been pres & that he outpolls Lincoln in GOP. Then plugs "England" over "UK". 
There will never, ever be a time when I can hear the phrase “hard Brexit” and not internally chuckle like dumbass because it sounds vaguely like something sexual. 
Thank you to @realDonaldTrump #MAGA #MBGA #BREXIT #LEAVE voters support you.#WWG1WGA 
TRUMP IS A SERIOUS BADASS - I told May how to do Brexit but she wrecked it — US trade deal is off!  
Voters may get to directly repeal &#8216;sanctuary state&#8217; laws via referendum:  
Come on Theresa May.  Don’t let Britain be bullied. Stand up for yourself and your country. Hard Brexit is a hard right denial of the best of Britain. 
When my cat meows at the door like it wants to go outside, so I open it and then it just stands there and isn’t sure what it wants. Is that what Brexit is? 
#Ukip’s on the verge of a spectacular comeback – and it’s all thanks to #TheresaMay!  #BREXIT #MayMustGo #MayMustGoNow #MayGo #BBC #SKY #LBC @ConHome @CCHQPress #ConservativeParty @Conservatives @DCBMEP @andreajenkyn 
Trump Torches Hosts on First Day of Visit to U.K.When will people learn? The Brits sucked up to him to get a post-Brexit trade deal and he STILL shanks them. #ETTD 
Trump slams May over 'very unfortunate' Brexit plan, says 'it will probably kill' US trade dealTrump criticized May's handling of Brexit saying that her plan was "very unfortunate" and would "probably" kill any possible trade deal between the U.S. & U.K.  
Rick: Trump told us Brexit is Brexit and his mother's from Scotland. What?Scott Dworkin: He's nuts. It's Putin's talking points and Trump is only going to Scotland to promote his golf course. #DworkinReport 
Why would this surprise anyone?  Trump gave her a great deal to support BREXIT and the people of the UK, she betrayed both.  Easy decision. Theresa May presses Trump for a post-Brexit trade deal  via @MailOnline 
Trump weigh’s in on  May’s Brexit problem’s. @realDonaldTrump #TrumpWorldGroups #TruthMatters #ThursdayThoughts  
Wow. This is juvenile!@Trump Undermines May’s Brexit Talks: ‘She Didn’t Listen to Me’  
Actually, Scotland really does want another referendum. Working class people aren’t fighting each other. We’re trying to get rid of the Tories for good. Next time just ask us.  
Trump says British PM Theresa May's Brexit plans would effectively kill any possibility of a U.S.-U.K. free trade deal  
Trump accuses Theresa May of ignoring his advice by opting for a soft Brexit strategy, and warned her any attempts to maintain close ties with the EU would make a US trade deal very unlikely.A gangster’s racket he wouldn’t deliver anyway 
@theresa_may TOTAL DISGRACE  #BrexitBetrayal#TheresaMay is Destroying the #UnitedKingdom@UKParliament @10DowningStreet #Brexit I told May how to do Brexit but she wrecked it — US trade deal is off!  
We need just one #BrexitCoalition candidate in each seat.The 17.4m can then unite behind & elect a #Brexit Government.It is the only way to get the #Brexit we voted for.This is too important for party differences to get in the way.We MUST break free from the  EU dictatorship.  
US President Donald Trump Slams UK PM Theresa May for "Soft Brexit"Additional comments made by @realDonaldTrump in exclusive interview with British media outlet:Read full article at  
Hard Brexit fan >@PiersMorgan asserted that 17.4m voted to leave the Single Market on #BBCQT This Evening Standard poll makes nonsense of that!60% backed remaining in the Single Market16% opposed staying in the SM24% undecided  
Thank god for @realDonaldTrump who has finally said what everyone in #BRITAIN thinks of the utter failure #TheresaMay who is SCAMMING the 17,410,742  who voted for #BREXIT! #MayMustGo #BBC #SKY #LBC @ConHome @CCHQPress #ConservativeParty @Conservatives @DCBMEP @andreajenkyn 
I’m not sure tying your vision of Brexit to Trump is the best move, lads. Tactically unsound, I feel. 
Seriously,  Ben. Why don't you find out why at least 6 Govt ministers have resigned over May's new Brexit proposal which she intends to steamroller through Parliament? Her unpopularity is not down to Pres Trump. 
The impact assessments were leaked but not reported on the BBC, ITV or even @Channel4News . They show a 7.7% crash with a no deal Brexit or a 4.8% crash with a Norway style deal. That is about double the last banking crisis and worse than the 1930's. Stockpile now. 
@PlnCom_Richards was there a referendum on whether you were allowed to move to San Francisco?What you're saying is, neighborhoods should be allowed to dictate who gets to live where. SF is a gated community economically already so I'm glad this has been confirmed. 
As Brexit Secretary, former  Brexiteer Dominic Raab is acting as a figleaf for Theresa May. Neither a pretty thought nor a dignified position. What a career choice for a once ambitious politician. 
You don't need to support Trump to know he is right about Theresa May.Her brexit plan, negotiation skills and leadership are all sadly lacking.She doesn't have agreement in her own party, and it will be rejected by the EU and USA.May is a joke.Not a fan, but he's right on May 
Must have been an interesting dinner conversation -- POTUS told May there would be no trade deal unless she made Brexit really happen!  
Absolutely right. The rich man’s Brexit of Johnson, Gove, Redwood, Rees Mogg is all about exploitation and lower standards. The only ones ‘taking back control ‘ will be the greedy rich.  
President Trump accused British Prime Minister Theresa May of ruining what her country stands to gain from Brexit and says her ‘‘soft’’ blueprint for the UK’s future dealings with the EU would probably ‘‘kill’’ any future trade deals with the US.  
We have all  got to put differences behind us.We  need just one #BrexitCoalition candidate in each seat.It is now the ONLY way we can save the Brexit we voted for.It would also put the fear of God into the #REMOANERS in the established parties17.4 million voters are powerful. 
Trump wants Britain to be sicker, weaker, poorer and nastier.  So why are the Tories and Labour going along with him on Brexit? @theresa_may @jeremycorbyn Explain yourselves, Theresa and Jeremy. And don't waste our time with the usual meaningless nonsense. 
Trump Inserts Himself Into Brexit Debate, Criticizing Theresa May  
Parliament should postpone the summer recess and break for 3 weeks maximum this year. The brexit work Davis should but didn't do must be caught up and everything should be checked with absolutely no flaws, so we hit the ground running in October. 
Trump warned U.K. Prime Minister Theresa May that implementing her government's Brexit plan could 'kill' chances of a bilateral trade deal with the U.S.  
In a bombshell interview, President Donald Trump says Prime Minister Theresa May's “soft” Brexit plan would “kill” any potential trade deal between the U.S. and the U.K 
Brexit: porcine aviation - Mrs May's Brexit White Paper is a litany of delusion. With the porcine aviation out in force, there is not the slightest chance of this being accepted by the EU...  #Brexinfo. pic.twitter.com/2GHmh7b2Wh 
BREAKINGTory Michael Fabricant retweets Islamophobic tweet of London Mayor Sadiq Khan#Tory Fabricant should be suspended in what I call; a blatant display of IslamophobiaHe claims he didn't see but the context remains the same.#TrumpUKVisit #Brexit 
I think Frankie Cocozza could have delivered a more sound analysis of Brexit  
The @Conservatives need to take note of what is happening in this country and wake up. @theresa_may has to go and go soon. #MayOut #MayResign #MayMustGo #BrexitBetrayal #Brexit #CCHQ 
With criticism of May's Brexit, Trump detonates a diplomatic grenade  
I told May how to do Brexit but she wrecked it — US trade deal is off!  
Did anyone tell him Putin helped with Brexit? Or show him this?  
Trump hates the EU so much, he's bullying the UK into a hard Brexit. Whoa. Yet another example, along with blocking WTO judges & threatening to w/draw f/ NATO, of Trump's gleeful wrecking ball instincts.Still waiting for a convincing explanation of how this is good for the US tho  
POTUS loves Brexit. He’s not going to let her off easily.  Interesting short read below. She’s already on thin ice with him.  I love seeing a POTUS finally doing what’s best for us first. No more apologies or selfies like Obama’s tenure. #AmericaFirst #Brexit #MAGA  
Brexit, 2018: “Britain facing ‘state of emergency’ if no deal reached, warns Tory MP.”Brexit, 2016: “No downsides, only considerable upsides.”Brexit was mis-sold on a false prospectus. #StopBrexit. 
#TrumpUKVisit 'Boris would make a good PM' - the house is on fire and he's praising one of the arsonists!? Trump says tonight UK won't get a deal if it's a soft #brexit  Leavers criticised Obama for wading into Brexit – they’re all silent now. Talk about double standards! 
Trump warns May—in interview published 25 mins after he left gala she hosted for him—that her Brexit plan could “kill” chance of trade deal with the U.S., publicly rebuking the prime minister on his first evening in London as president. W/⁦@jggross⁩ 
And now we know Trump's real reason for visiting the UK. To kill off any Brexit deal that doesn't cause maximum damage to the EU and ourselves. #Kompromat 
Please sign and share, and also sign the #PeoplesVotePetitionThe Conservatives are making a mess of Brexit, and the Labour Leadership continue to support them.Give the people the final say on the Brexit deal. 
In the interview Trump says the US will abandon trade talks w/ the UK if it pursues a soft Brexit. This isn't an offhand remark. It is the result of a v deliberate administration policy designed to exploit Brexit to get the UK to sign a trade deal that gives the US everything 2/7 
Donald Trump has slammed Theresa May's Brexit plan in an extraordinary newspaper interview, saying a UK/US would be dead if it becomes reality. What good reason is there to trust the US President now? #DarrenOnLBC 
While we are concentrating on the ridiculous Peter Strzok hearing, Donald Trump has started his UK visit in a horrific manner. Blasting Theresa May for not following his advice on Brexit & saying the US trade deal is off. FFS. 
"We have enough difficulty with the European Union": President Trump said a "soft" Brexit could put an end to the trade relationship between the U.S. and U.K.  
No getting away from it @theresa_may your brextremists have made a fool out of you using an all too willing @realDonaldTrump time to expose them all by showing some mettle, suspending Brexit with EU agreement and calling for a major inquiry into the manipulation of the referendum  
Churchill would have been anti-Brexit.  His courage made modern Europe possible.  
#UPDATE Donald Trump issued scathing criticism of Prime Minister Theresa May's Brexit strategy during his visit to Britain, as campaigners planned a mass protest against the US president   
Macron & Merkel have each other. Thanks to Brexit, this is Britain’s closest ally.A lying egomaniac with an attention deficiency disorder who will put his own wealth even ahead of his own country’s security.It isn’t too late to change your mind, Britain. Seriously: come home.  
Trump criticizes Theresa May over Brexit deal 
May day, May day, May day!PM May can you hear @POTUS now?Get your 'Brexit together'!@realDonaldTrump@VP@Flotus@PressSec@GovMikeHuckabee@POTUS slams UK PM May over 'very unfortunate' Brexit plan, says 'it will probably kill' US trade deal.  
Trumps article in the Sun Newspaper today is absolutely brilliant. Again the strong man has seen through all her bullshit and hit the nail on the head. He has said outright that Mays brexit will essentially mean the US having to deal with Europe which will probably stop a deal. 
Curious silence tonight from those people who went absolutely shitting mental at the previous US president stating his views on Brexit. 
Not content with wrecking Brexit. Tory Cabinet Minister and the Labour Shadow Cabinet Minister laughing and clapping like a couple of sea-lions begging for fish when an audience member mocks the elected US President, our closest and most important international partner. #bbcqt 
"I told her how to do it. That will be up to her to say. But I told her how to do it. She wanted to go a different route."Trump touched down in the UK and spoke with a British tabloid on where he differed with PM Theresa May on her approach to Brexit.  
"Oh, God knows" says Alan Johnson"I have not Him on tonight, I have only got you" @afneil about the road to Brexit and votes on future deals#bbctw 
Well, Trump has fired May as PM, appointed Johnson in her place, and told the UK exactly what kind of Brexit it must do (a no-deal, cliff-edge Brexit) if it wants a trade deal with the US. This is really beyond quite extraordinary. 
"I told her how to do it. She wanted to go a different route." US President Trump criticizes British PM Theresa May over the Brexit deal  
"If I had been a member of the cabinet, I would have been one of the ones thatw ould have quit over the weekend" Michael #choochoo Portillo on Brexit #bbctw 
#bbctwThere is a 3rd wayMay is forced to resignTories apologise to the nation JRM is appointed caretaker PMExit deal is negotiated with the EUWTO terms until new realistic post-Brexit relationship is developed. Anything else destroys the Tories - permanently 
"The instinct for blood would be too strong. But I am worried about the Remainers" says Alan Johnson on Brexit vote #bbctw 
.@RealDonaldTrump has told the Sun if Theresa May's plans for Brexit go through, it'll scupper any chance of a separate trade deal with the US. @ScottLucas_EA provides some context to the interview: 
This is the most dreadful betrayal. If I was one of the members of the cabinet I would have been of the ones that quit says #choochoo, Michael Portillo to @afneil #bbctw #brexit 
Wrong. This is Theresa May's just deserts for producing a Brexit plan that ignores the express instruction of the electorate, doesn't deliver on her own promises, and places the interests of Brussels & Merkel above those of Britain.Serve her right.#MayMustGo 
George Orwell wrote: "“Unpopular ideas can be silenced. & inconvenient facts kept dark, without the need for any official ban.” The BBC's failure to cover the serious criminality that tainted the #Brexit referendum shows just how this is done. 
I like that England’s protesting Trump, but let’s not forget Brexit here. You ain’t better than us! We’re both dumb! 
So, I’m in my 60’s and Brexit has awoken me.I have been at every anti Brexit march.Save our Windrush families.Anti Yaxley Lennon.Anti Trump Tomorrow and anti fascist on Saturday.Be silent or complicit. 
Did I miss it or did no one mention in all the Brexit debate on #bbcqt tonight, that BOTH Leave campaigns BROKE THE LAW & the ICO is on the case? So the referendum should be declared null & void or at the very least we should have a #PeoplesVote. Not mentioned at all?#StopBrexit 
Brexit be the fruit #TrumpUKVisit 
HALF of Scotland are FOR Scottish Independence and that is BEFORE campaigning begins. Keep your Brexit Britain I see a much better path. #ScotlandCan 
Simple. Because they are babies throwing a Veruca Salt tantrum. They’re demanding unicorns now, Daddy... regardless of any economic practicalities. They will never be appeased. So time to take their Brexit away from them & ditch it... for the sake of all of us.Analysis: Done.  
All through the Ref campaign: What's your plan? "Let's not focus on specifics"Day after Ref: The plan? "We thought Cameron would have one"1st year: The plan? "It's a secret"2nd year: The plan? "It'll be a [insert adjectives here] Brexit"Today: "We've got a plan!" It's a dud 
May has sold her soul to the devil by embracing Brexit and Trump so fervently when both their tiny electoral victories were clearly manipulated by Cambridge Analytica/Mercer with PUTIN’s active assistance. Now she has to reap the contempt of a deeply corrupt man. 
Nigel Farage tells me on This Week that he’s been winding up Trump and his team on Brexit and was a guiding spirit behind tomorrow’s Trump article in the Sun. 
"#Brexit will scare foreign students away."Err....  
This is pretty much de Gaulle level effrontery, no? She should tell him to leave.Trump Inserts Himself Into Brexit Debate, Criticizing Theresa May   
Dear MPs #Brexit has hamstrung our Country ..you're flogging a dead horse...give it up...move on...get over it...#StopBrexit.Put Country 1st... #PeoplesVote #FinalSayForAll#Reject #Revoke #Remain #Reform 
In other words, I think he was musing about what is evidently new info for him on the Brexit situation, and complaining about the EU, not making a dramatic threat, which is how The Sun, being The Sun, framed it. /End 
President Trump tells Theresa May her soft Brexit plan will KILL any US trade deal after Britain leaves the EU, adds Boris will make a great PM and blames London Mayor Sadiq Khan for TERRORISM in London in Explosive start to U.K. visit  
My read is that he's saying that May's plan would result in continued close links between the UK and EU, so he'd have to deal with the EU in these negotiations, and he doesn't get along with the EU on trade, so this kind of Brexit would probably kill the chances of a deal. 
"AAAAAAHHHH TRUMP" is pointless and repetitive. Better to take a closer look at who in his entourage is feeding information about Brexit into his information bubble.John Bolton is fundamentally hostile to any rules-based system that puts restraints on American power. 
Trump blasts UK PM May's Brexit plan, says it puts trade deal in doubt  
It's worth parsing what Trump said about the UK-US trade deal and Brexit. Contrary to the Sun front-page headline, I don't think he declared "the deal is off" or made an ultimatum over it. Here's what he said:  
Trump is “America First” so he sees Britain Second, Third, 17rh or 18th which means he views Brexit as good for the US and worse for Britain. We should tell him to eff off 
'Theresa May has KILLED US-UK trade deal with soft Brexit' - Trump's major blow to PM  
What Trump actually said, on Fox, not in Scotland, the day before Brexit: "I don't think anybody should listen to me because I haven't really focused on it very much, but my inclination would be to get out."  
1) British Prime Minister May threw President Trump a glitzy and graceful dinner tonight 2) Trump meantime, trashed her in a newspaper interview, complaining that she "didn't listen to me" on Brexit and that Boris Johnson (who just left the government) should be Prime Minister 
"On the 30th of March next year we will do what? I want to know what the plan for no deal is."@thatginamiller says that she's only interested in the practicalities and wants to know what will actually happen if the UK walks away from the EU without a Brexit deal #bbcqt 
I actually feel sorry for Theresa May. The bad boys of Brexit , Murdoch and Trump and BBC are coming for her. 
Wow the leader of a foreign power is threatening Britain unless the Prime Minister does what he tells tells her to on Brexit, this will surely infuriate our proudly patriotic right-wing press ... oh, no apparently it's fine, a welcome intervention in fact. #TomorrowsPaperToday 
This is Theresa May’s reward for being first to visit the Trump White House - he attacks her Brexit plan for not delivering on referendum promises & making a US trade deal harder & says Boris would make a great PM  
It is beyond extraordinary. Trump holds Britain in complete contempt. Mrs. May should reciprocate, cancel tomorrow’s meetings and ask him to leave. Lets get off our knees as a country, walk tall and stop conniving in the new lows and humiliations wrought on us by Brexit 
.@POTUS slams UK PM May over 'very unfortunate' Brexit plan, says 'it will probably kill' US trade deal.  
BBC News - Trump: Brexit plan 'will probably kill' US trade deal Surely Theresa the Appeaser’s White Paper is dead in the water.When Trump states that any US/ UK trade deal is conditional on the U.K. leaving the EUMay is a dead woman walking. 
I get it now. Trump really is trying to influence the Brits to drop May and install Boris Johnson. The Sun reports that he not only threatened and insulted  May on the soft Brexit, he "Insisted former Foreign Secretary Boris Johnson would make “a great Prime Minister” 
Why would he do a new trade deal with us if we don’t really Brexit? That’s his point.  
Meetings with Theresa May tomorrow are likely to be tense after @realDonaldTrump tells @TheSun that May’s plan for a “soft Brexit” would likely scuttle a trade deal with the US. POTUS also says Boris Johnson would make a great PM... 
Trump warns British PM May's Brexit plans will hit trade with U.S.: Sun  
After the news tonight from @realDonaldTrump, this cartoon pretty much sums up @theresa_may’s #ChequersPlan for #Brexit#MAYMUSTGO 
When Labour comes out as anti-Brexit it will have massive support.Until then it will continue losing support.And as for Corbyn...  
This is a warning about what Brexit could bring back in Ireland:  
Brexit Whitepaper: "This could include exploring how machine learning and artificial intelligence could allow traders to automate the collection and submission of data required for customs declarations." Me:  
Brexit means we have to suck up to Trump! Yeah, you've really sold it to us now... #bbcqt 
#bbcqt Piers Morgan says a giant inflatable orange baby is an act of national self-harm. Yeah, that's right, a 20-ft blimp is more damaging than #Brexit. 
Trump drops a few bombs after arriving in UK. 1. Says PM Theresa May screwed up Brexit.2. Rips Mayor Sadiq Khan for not standing up to terrorists.3. Says migrants destroyed UK culture.  
."After two years the government has finally published a Brexit white paper.It runs to 104 pages but is full of so much muddled thinking, desperation & fantasy that they could have done it in five & saved us all a lot of time." By @IanDunt. 
A group in Oregon has submitted a petition with 25% more signatures than required to qualify for the ballot a referendum on repealing that state's "sanctuary state" law.  
if anyone from the labour front bench would like to stick a hand up and point out brexit is the obsession of the worst people on earth, now would be an excellent time.  
Brilliant! If you consider processes in other #EU states, the refusal to have a referendum following a negotiation is completely abnormal. It is UNDEMOCRATIC to undertake this constitutional process without returning to ask the "People" whether their "will" has changed. #FinalSay 
There have been three huge stories the BBC has covered with only the most perfunctory reports: the Facebook/Cambridge Analytica data leak, the Brexit campaign funding scandal, and the exposure of Russian interference in British politics.  
I think those letters might be going in you know & @BorisJohnson will challenge @theresa_may. Look at how conversations are shifting. And Rupert’s The Scum have run a splash saying Trump thinks “May has wrecked #Brexit” and Boris “would be a great PM”. #bbcqt 
Theresa May bows to EU pressure to keep UK in human rights convention after Brexit, enraging Tory right  
Charles Moore in 90 seconds explains why May's #Brexit negotiation strategy was flawed from the very beginning and why she has emboldened Barnier with every unreciprocated concession.  
Brilliant. Brexit implodes on itself for not being enough of a sell-out. 
This recreates the worst parts of the EU': Tories revolt over May's Brexit blueprint as 98-page plan reveals European workers WILL be allowed into Britain, EU judges WILL get a say and the UK WILL follow Brussels rules  
The most extraordinary foreign interference in our sovereign national affairs you will ever see (I hope)...#Trump #Brexit #BorisJohnson 
Newspaper headlines: Trump accuses May of 'wrecking Brexit'  
Vote for any Brexit party or independent Brexiteer but not any of the established parties.  
Trump, in the UK, deals a double blow to Theresa May, saying her plans for a soft Brexit would end any hopes of a trade deal with US, and suggesting Boris Johnson, who quit her cabinet earlier this week, would be a better leader than her.@Jess_Shankleman 
#BREAKING: Trump attacks British prime minister: Her Brexit plan would kill US-UK trade deal  
Yesterday when defending May's Brexit plan, @JamesCleverly listed the USA as a country that wants to do a trade deal with the UK. We know after that explosive Trump interview that the shambles James now supports will destroy any chance of such a deal. 
Brexit leaders prove that the campaign to leave the EU was entirely driven by self-interests #BBCQT  via @LondonEconomic 
I wonder if a single person has been remotely enlightened or informed by a single Brexit related discussion on #BBCQT in two and a half years. The same tired, tedious monotonous arguments week after week after week. So much drivel which actively misleads viewers. 
Well this is, er, awkward#Brexit#TrumpUKVisit 
NEW: Ahead of meeting, Trump criticizes Theresa May's handling of Brexit in a new interview with The Sun  
JUST IN: Trump says that Theresa May's plans for Brexit would end prospects for a trade deal with the United States 
Please remember, Donald wants hard Brexit because it means catastrophe and that means cheap asset stripping of UK businesses and a plundering of the NHS.  
And then she said, “Brexit means Brexit, but I want to keep the benefits of being in the EU, but as long as I can still say it’s Brexit.”#bbcqt 
For the fifth time, Trump lied that he "predicted Brexit" the day before the vote while in Scotland. He was not in Scotland the day before, he was there the day after. Day before, he didn't make a prediction at all; said he was pro-Brexit but hadn't been paying much attention.  
Sad but true #brexit means leaving  
Breaking News Trump Tells May Soft Brexit is Surrender and Could call off US Trade Deal@NileGardiner@hgurdon BOOM!!!! 
Theresa May has fucked up an election, fucked up Brexit. Made us poodles to the EU and now no trade deal with the USA. She's a cretin, a traitor and a fraud. If she's not removed very soon she will totally destroy the UK. You have been warned! 
Every week the #bbcqt audience demonstrates why the referendum should never have been called. The total lack of understanding of the issues - alongside the uneducated/ignorant comments - is utterly depressing. 
It's worth noting that Trump said *this morning* that it was not for him to weigh in on Brexit. He's gone from "it's not for me to say" to "I would have done it much differently" in less than 12 hours. 
The Tory Party can't even ensure the UK has a fully functioning train service, why on earth do you think they can organise a Brexit deal let alone manage a no deal situation? I don't see anyone apart from millionaires and idiots who think a no deal is viable.#bbcqt 
Man upset that Labour is "Constantly sniping from the sidelines" on Brexit. Yeah, it's called "The Opposition", mate...#BBCQT 
Brexit is like a Möbius strip. Whatever direction Brexit takes us towards, we’ll always end up back at the realisation we cannot get a better deal than the current deal of staying in the EU. #bbcqt 
In his Sun interview, Trump repeats a fake story he’s told before about “predicting” Brexit when opening his golf course at Turnberry. That visit was on 24 June 2016, *after* the leave victory was confirmed  
"This is basically us not really leaving. Although I voted to stay, this is not Brexit!" @PiersMorgan feels that the terms of the Brexit White Paper do not go far enough #bbcqt 
“Mr Trump also said Mrs May’s nemesis Boris Johnson — who resigned over the soft Brexit blueprint on ­Monday — would ‘make a great Prime Minister.’”  
Donald Trump gives May's Brexit plan both barrels  
Where to even begin? But at least it brings one thing out more clearly than ever before: this is your Brexit future, UK.  
Trump: “I predicted Brexit. I was cutting a ribbon for the opening of Turnberry … the day before the Brexit vote. I said ‘Brexit will happen’.”Trump opened the Turnberry the day AFTER the Brexit vote. The Sun leave the false claim totally unchallenged.  
I feel for @thatginamiller. She is the only person on the panel who has any real understanding of what is going on with Brexit. Everyone else is talking  point-scoring gibberish.  #bbcqt 
Obama was used to influence a UK referendum. Trump wants a trade deal, obviously he's surprised that, having voted to leave the EU, Gov't are putting us in a situation where we going to be hamstrung in that regard.  
This is a key moment. The Brexiteers told us Brexit was about sovereignty. About us, as a nation, taking back control. Let's see how many of them are prepared to take a principled stand against Trump's attempt to bully us into submission. 
Donald Trump: 'I told May how to do Brexit but she wrecked it - US trade deal is off!'  
Trump: Brexit plan 'will probably kill' US trade deal  
WHOA:“Donald Trump world exclusive @TheSun interview: May has wrecked Brexit...US deal is off!”IF this headline accurately conveys the contents and IF the contents are real, Trump has stabbed the (very politically vulnerable) Prime Minister of the UK in the back.  
I hate Brexit. I really hate Brexit. I hate the incompetent way we lumbered into it and the speed with which it turned into a Fascist joy-fest. We need to unpick it now, roll it back, put a stake through its heart and finish it forever. 
Leaving everything else aside, the idea that anyone could ‘wreck Brexit’ is hilarious. ‘Thanks a lot! My gonorrhea is RUINED now.’  
Trump: May Has Wrecked Brexit and Killed US Trade Deal | Read His Full Quotes Here >>  
Given Trump’s current regressive trade policies, I don’t think there was much of a deal to be had.... also worth noting of course that the breakdown of UK exports is 15% to the US and 44% to the EU #TrumpVisitUK #brexit  
The Trump Interview - @POTUS says May’s soft Brexit will “kill” a future US trade deal: "She didn’t listen to me"; 
Friday's Times: "Trump hits out at May's soft #Brexit blueprint" (via @hendopolis) #tomorrowspaperstoday 
They claim Obama interfered in the referendum campaign. They claim #Brexit is patriotic. Well here is Trump!Will the Trump toadies complain! Of course not! #Brexit is not patriotic, it is about selling Britain to Trump and his super-rich cronies.#StopBrexit #PeoplesVote 
Friday's Guardian: "PM to push Trump on trade deal as Tory anger over #Brexit goes on" (via @hendopolis) #tomorrowspaperstoday 
‘This is not Brexit!’The Conservatives have let down the 17.4 million who voted to leave the EU and ignored the 16.1 million who voted to remain in the EU.This is a shambolic Tory Brexit that will achieve nothing.When it’s time to vote, punish them at the ballot box. #bbcqt 
This is NOT Brexit - This is NOT what 17.4 million people voted for - you have undermined democracy @10DowningStreet you must go and go now 
Well well well.As predicted, here is confirmation that Abject Dishrag @theresa_may has thrown away the crown jewel of Brexit. Are there any Tory MPs with an ounce of integrity, not to say basic common sense, to rid us of this utterly worthless betrayer of Britain? Seems not...  
The British Prime Minister has outlined her policy on Brexit. The US president has outlined his policy on Brexit. Tonight, the Brexiteers are telling the British people they must side with the US president. In the name of sovereignty. 
Jean-Claude Juncker showing the world that Britain was right to vote for Brexit  
“This blows apart one of Theresa May’s central claims about Brexit” – our political editor Nicholas Watt on President Trump’s comments in an interview with the Sun@nicholaswatt | @TheSun | #newsnight 
Who is my neighbour? My neighbour is all mankind.And that’s why I hate Brexit. It’s the diametrical opposite of that.#bbcqt 
To be clear, this is no surprise. US has been absolutely clear for a year that hormone beef and chlorine chicken in our food chain will be price of any deal. They don’t have to compromise. They, like EU, hold all the cards. Brexit has no dividend, no benefits, no future. The end. 
when obama came to england and talked about how brexit would send britain to the “back of the queue”, the leave campaign were delighted because they thought their voters would hate being told what to do by someone like obama. wonder how the same voters feel about this  
WATCH: @ianbremmer reacts to breaking news that Trump is not happy with May's "soft Brexit" plan, says 'so many reasons why' trade deal between Britain and Trump administration won't happen #MTPDaily 
Dear @realDonaldTrump , we do not like you, you are not welcome here, keep your orange nose and tiny hands out of our affairs. We're in enough trouble with Brexit as it is, without a racist misogynist butting in.  
#PresidentTrump shaking up the #BIGClub - Your #ThrowbackThursday 2016 #BenGarrison #cartoon #NATO #DeepState Peter Strzok  @Nigel_Farage #Brexit#StayTooned #ToonTroops  support cartoons - prints books and more at the store!  
Explosive fr @realDonaldTrump:- humiliates his host after she pulls out all stops- suggests Boris, who has done more to undermine her than anyone else, should be PM- patronises her by “telling” her how to do Brexit - throws hand grenade under her new Brexit plans  
Tonight’s @bbcquestiontime was dominated by Brexit & Trump. Recorded just before the explosive Sun splash dropped but still very pertinent. Well worth a watch. #bbcqt 
MTP: Trump apparently told Theresa May that if she goes with a soft Brexit the US will no longer trade with the UK.  He apparently believes that May refused to take his advice on how she should have done Brexit and he's mad.So this is continuing to go well. 
Donald Trump: Theresa May's Brexit plan will 'kill' US trade deal  
I mean, Theresa May *has* made a complete hash of Brexit, it's true. But for Trump to go for his first state visit to the US's closest ally and give an interview to a tabloid saying all this out loud is...a salutary reminder of just what a f**k-up he is. 
Brexit means prosperity & we’ll eat grass if we have to.Brexit means being a vassal state... for freedom.Brexit means control our borders and no Irish border controls.Brexit means global respect - and sod what the world thinks.Brexit means...Brexit means...Brexit.  
Trump on Brexit: “I would have done it much differently.  I actually told Theresa May how to do it, but she didn’t listen to me.”#AmericaIgnored 
"This recreates many of the worst aspects of the EU the British people voted to leave" Jacob Rees-Mogg slams the government's just-released white paper on their plan for a Fake Brexit. Time to put country before party and oust May!  
Trump says PM May's soft Brexit deal could 'kill' U.S.-UK trade deal: Sun  
 The golden opportunity of Brexit is the ability to sign new trade deals. However, if we are aligned into EU standards on traded goods then it will be impossible to strike these new deals with countries such as the US. The #ChequersPlan hands that prize away to the EU. 
Theresa May’s Brexit plan won’t work  
Donald Trump has apparently told Theresa May that her Brexit plan will mean she can't get a trade deal with the US. So that special relationship you speak of.... 
Trump did an interview with The Sun in which he criticizes Theresa May’s Brexit compromise blueprint, warns it will “kill” a future trade deal w/ the US & knocks May— who is already politically vulnerable. Oh, and this is breaking while he’s at a gala May is hosting in his honor  
Who says we’re not prepared for Brexit  
Hardest Brexiteers - inspired by Trump - kill Brexit white paper. Then what? Really, considering the numbers in the Commons, then what? What's the plan? 
The incredible insanity of brexit: City of London sees brexit white paper as real blow to financial & related professional services; but Hammond says less market access  for fin. services  "works for the UK, works for the EU & works for business”.  via @FT 
Today again has demonstrated a dying govt in turmoil & one that completely ignores democracy. Releasing the Brexit white paper to the media before the House of Commons just another example of their rank incompetence. We need a new govt. We need a Corbyn LAB govt.#GE2018Now 
Donald Trump says anything other than a hard Brexit means a UK-US trade deal is off. According to our polling, *Leave* voters don't want the sort trade deal Trump would offer.  
Friday's Express: "Tory MPs revolt over May's #Brexit plan" (via @hendopolis) #tomorrowspaperstoday 
OK, again, I’m confused. If Brexit is about reclaiming sovereignty, why is Trump’s opinion relevant. 
Trump dictating what kind of Brexit Britain should have and threatening that if it's not the one he likes, America will prioritise trade with the EU over any deal with the UK. Well done Brexiteers you've turned us into America's gimp.  
Young brits. The new Brexit minister @DominicRaab clear today : no more free movement. That means for you too. This means practically impossible to get a job  in EU if you send in a CV from a non EU country. You should be very angry. They are slamming doors in your face. 
Today I sat down w/ EU Chief #Brexit Negotiator Michael Barnier to hear the latest on the negotiations. It's absolutely vital that in this process we defend the Good Friday Agreement and don't return to the "bad old days" of a hard border b/w Ireland and Northern Ireland.  
Trump “TOLD” Theresa May how to negotiate with Brussels? Think what you like about Brexit but this says so much about the man’s lack of respect for women and his massive ego...  
OK, since this pulls the rug from under the only remaining ‘Brexit benefit’ claim of a trade deal with the US, #Brexit has been killed - by Trump!!! - showing we need to #ExitfromBrexit 
Confirmation of Trump's predatory policy toward Brexit that I have written about. Constitutes massive interference in UK politics, well beyond anything Obama did  
Jon Sopel on BBC News focusing on Brexiteers having wanted Obama to keep his nose out of an actual live referendum, wondering if we will treat Trump comments the same way. Could have said Remainers hailed Obama comments and therefore can hardly tell Trump to butt out now. #bias 
The Sun is reporting that President Trump has warned Theresa May that her soft Brexit will "kill any future trade deal with the US"Maybe Trump has to step in to help save democracy in the UKIt wouldn't have been the first time the US has saved Britain. 
How DARE @realDonaldTrump support the 17.4m Brits who voted for Brexit? I see @BBCJonSopel trying to stir it! 
Something I'm *really* struggling with - we hear that the Government is looking into plans to stockpile tinned food and generators for post Brexit meltdown. They could eliminate that need in a second, by ditching Brexit entirely.Can't they even *read*?!  
Friday's Telegraph: "May’s #Brexit might not be what voters want, says Trump" (via @hendopolis) #tomorrowspaperstoday 
May vows to “tear down” bureaucratic barriers Brussels has put in path of business, in bid for US support of her plans> Clear admission a Tory brexit means less rights at work and less food & environmental protections  
BBC News - Brexit services plan will speed up relocation, says Lloyd's boss . Goodbye London we’re going. Financial Services, 80% of our economy at risk. Just so Mrs May can hold on to power. Corbyn not a word. Disgraceful. Stop Brexit. #FBPE 
Trump on Brexit. Must see.  
Friday's FT: "Hammond defends #Brexit plan as City decries 'real blow' to business" (via @hendopolis) #tomorrowspaperstoday 
Yet the first line of tonights's BBC News at 10 was even worse. "Mrs May might not be going about brexit in the right way, Donald Trump warns". "Warns". WARNS?  
Today's Brexit White Paper is a bilingual document, written in English and Gobbledegook. 
TRUMP SAYS MAY DIDN'T LISTEN TO HIS ADVICE ON BREXIT: SUN 
Trump also reveals to me PM ignored his advice on Brexit negotiations: “I would have done it much differently.  I actually told Theresa May how to do it, but she didn’t listen to me". 
TRUMP WARNS MAY SOFT BREXIT WILL KILL ANY FUTURE TRADE DEAL:SUN 
WORLD EXCL: Donald Trump warns Theresa May her soft Brexit blueprint will "kill" any future trade deal with the US. Full @POTUS interview with @TheSun from 11pm. 
A Brexit marriage made in hell. Britain’s future, no thanks. Stop Brexit. #FBPE 
Both documentaries - one on the day of the Referendum, October 1st and one recently released  on the events of September 20 (that shows clearly the innocence of the Jordis) now available with subtitles in multiple languages here:  
ANALYSIS: Theresa May has finally managed to unite the country - against her Brexit vision 
The Prime Minister sparked new fears for workers' rights as she told the President Brexit will be an "unprecedented" chance to "tear down" barriers for corporations  
"The rule of law and Parliamentary democracy must always be defended. We call ourselves a democracy because our laws ban the buying of votes and power." 
May’s comments to Trump on an FTA are incredible, says her Brexit proposal has created an “unprecedented opportunity” for an FTA and “an opportunity to tear down the bureaucratic barriers”. No meaningful trade deal can be done with UK as the EU’s puppet.  
Oh bless you, sweetheart, but no it isn’t. It’s grown since Brexit but, thanks to the uncertainty and dithering, it’s grown by a tiny *2% less* than it might otherwise have grown. I know these percentage thingummijigs are complicated but do try to keep up. X 
Petition: Rescind Art.50 if Vote Leave has broken Electoral Laws regarding 2016 referendum  
And finally the ladybird book of food rioting hope you like them  #Brexit  
The ladybird #brexit series book of colluding with foreign powers  
Trump gets Brexit. May doesn’t. What a time to be alive.   
I believe that the Airbus chief, Tom Enders, is right. We must fight to Stop Brexit.  
UK's latest #Brexit plans likely to cross EU red lines, Barnier hints Yet our spineless Prime Minister is still trying to appease the EU and will no doubt give in to their further demands. #MayMustGo 
Brexit and the SNP's reaction to it has completely changed my view on independence. I'm English and voted no in 2014, but I am now very active with @YesBerwickshire & very glad I live in Scotland. 
1. Freedom from EU Tirrany2. A market where trade is limited to those inside that agreement area.3. A market where levies are the same. 4. WTO rules mean a free market to trade with world on same playing field.Brexit means freedom, I hope your schooled now. 
Ross wants a hard Brexit. Ross is defying the will of his constituents and his country.  Don't be like Ross. Learn to read & count for a start.  
UK PM May praises 'dearest friend' U.S. as Trump questions her Brexit plans  
"The @BBC’s reporting of the scandals around the #Brexit referendum is not biased or unbalanced: it barely exists." 
May's Brexit white paper is the worst deal in UK history. We are kept in a customs union, single market & continue free movement all by other names, EU courts continue to rule the UK, we must follow EU rules & regs with no say, immigrants get UK benefits & May traps us in ECHR..  
The notion that May is committing to allowing the EU to determine UK labour laws and environmental & social policy post-Brexit is quite extraordinary. How can anyone think that's OK? I mean, seriously: Look yourself in the mirror & say you think that's OK. See how it feels. 
Well that didn’t age well #WhitePaper says...We won’t have control of our moneyWe won’t have control of our bordersWe won’t have control of our laws#Brexit #BRINO #MayMustGo 
Barnier: EU offer = ambitious FTA + effective cooperation on wide range of issues, including a strong security partnership.So why are we offering them Britain as an EU colony, a voiceless EU rule taker, whilst needlessly throwing away the greatest prizes of Brexit?  
Brexiteer MP DEMANDS answers amid claims Merkel saw Brexit blueprint BEFORE Parliament  
Theresa May bows to EU pressure to keep UK in human rights convention after Brexit, enraging Tory right  
Brexit White Paper 'falls far short of what Scotland needs' - BBC News  
".. Trump administration has pursued a predatory policy toward Britain designed to capitalize on the UK’s need for new trading arrangements.." @politico.The prime asset?#NHSSaid a million times : NHS or #Brexit. You can't have both.pic-@doctor_oxford 
Today, former FBI agent Peter Strzok described America's response to the threat to their democratic process due to foreign interference...... 
Be in no doubt #Trump may use immigration to explain #Brexit but he backs it because it will leave the UK weaker & more isolated so that the business vultures circling can carve out the best deals & cherry pick our industries & best minds.#StopBrexit or #51stState? 
Tomorrow's front page ... Prepare to protest against Trump's Scotland visit and Brexit plans unveiled amid chaos in Commons  
.@POTUS starts UK leg amid scattered protests, Brexit divisions. (via @AdamShawNY) 
I've written a song for #TrumpUKVisit tomorrow!  It's called "BOLLOCKS TO BREXIT AND TRUMP" it's time to bin the political garbage because they both belong in the dump! #BollockstoBrexit #BOLLOCKSTOTRUMP  #EUsupergirl #StopBrexit #DumpTrump 
Painting my placard. Have already messed up the back with a spelling mistake. Now I've done a spelling mistake on the front. I've missed the effing x out of Brexit!!!! Why is big writing so hard??? 
This is what loss of sovereignty really is, not EU membership where we decide what we agree with our nearest neighbours, this, pandering to fascists and demagogues the world over in order not to damage the prospects of trade deals.  Brexit is loss of sovereignty & national shame.  
It pains me to retweet this, as I believe that attacking journalists working for our national broadcaster undermines a key pillar of our society. But what Cohen writes as absolutely correct, and BBC cowardice over Brexit is unmistakable  via @nybooks 
Voters may get to directly repeal ‘sanctuary state’ laws via referendum  
Britain facing 'state of emergency' if no deal reached, Dominic Grieve warns  The crisis that Brexit is causing means it is time to demand a #PeoplesVote - sign the petition here if you haven't already: 
Dutch property prices hit a record high as Amsterdam lures Brexit exiles  
PM says the #BrexitWhitePaper delivers 'the Brexit people voted for'...As in, one that:- is built on lies- broke the law - is undeliverable- will put jobs at risk- and that people now don’t want.She should stop the soundbites - and #StopBrexit.   
Remember those heady days of February; back when we had hope; back when the Government were at least pretending we weren’t going to have a Mad Max Brexit. Ah, those were the days.   
 I have now read the #ChequersPlan White Paper. It has confirmed my fears. Clearly Brexit does not mean Brexit. Rather it charts a course for Britain to become a vassal state in an EU orbit, a voiceless EU rule taker and throwing away the great prizes of Brexit #fudge 
The UK's Brexit future explained in one photograph.  
The man replacing Boris Johnson as Britain’s foreign secretary lobbied against Brexit  
"For the time being, May’s saving grace may well be that the U.K. premiership is a poisoned chalice that no serious politician should want until Brexit is over and done with."My latest for @TIME ↓ ↓ 
To “do Brexit talks properly” you need a Parliament that is a) relaxed about changing the constitutional status of Northern Ireland one way or another b) keen on large unfunded infrastructure policies. Essentially, only a Corbyn landslide can deliver the “right” Brexit. 
The ladybird #brexit collection @solange_lebourg 
May bids for Trump Brexit backing with vow to rip up red tape  
This is NOT what 17.4 million British #Brexit voters voted for ... @Conservatives might as well start cashing in their pensions, because they'll never have our trust again. Just a bunch of selfish, greedy bankers ... scared to death of looking the common man in the eyes. 
I can’t put it any plainer than this  @UKLabour. If you oppose brexit and support a vote on the brexit outcome with an option to remain, and also support the rights of the 5 million, I will lend you my support once again. I’m not alone#PeoplesVote #FinalSayForAll #stopbrexit. 
At this time of disgust with @theresa_may and her sell out government @UKIP needs to be harvesting new members and rising in the polls . We need to be the true party of #brexit and not get sidetracked from the great issue of the day 
.@theresa_may has been having us along all of the time, she is deputy PM.#Brexit  
Your Guardian, still cryin' and screaming for a re-vote two years after the EU Referendum, have the brass balls to lecture the England team on learning from defeat without bitterness. pic.twitter.com/ZKOSTT1txR 
I find the prospect of brexit far more worrying and wonder how people are carrying on as normal...  
Theresa May urges Donald Trump to cut a post-Brexit trade deal with Britain in speech at Blenheim Palace dinner  
German judges demolish the legal, political and media strategy against the Catalan referendum  
WATCH: CHAOS as Tories “forget” to allow MPs to read crucial Brexit White Paper before debate [VIDEO]  
1. First impressions of the Brexit White Paper.  Welcome that the Government has at last set out its proposals on the future UK-EU relationship in the face of economic reality. 
Brexit betrayal: The “common rulebook” for goods and agri-foods is patently the “EU rulebook”... and the European Court will still reign supreme.  
Not a single coherent message from a major civil society organisation re May's Brexit offer, not least the CBI.When did the British establishment get so utterly useless at...running things? 
Chief Brexit negotiator @MichelBarnier meeting with Friends of Ireland caucus now @uscapitol including with Chair @RepRichardNeal , @RepBrendanBoyle, @RepDanKildee & @RepBillKeating for an update on #Brexit negotiations #FutureofEurope @EUintheUS 
Watch the president of the EU swaying, floundering & needing to be propped up. What a state.Bit like the EU really.#Brexit Jean-Claude Juncker stumbles and loses his balance at NATO summit 
'Theresa May bows to EU pressure to keep UK in human rights convention after Brexit, enraging Tory right.' - Another concession! 
To be clear the Scotland Act 1998 Section 35, 1 (a) gives the Westminster government the power to strike down any Holyrood legislation on any issue  (reserved or not) if,it breaches any post-Brexit deal with Trump. This means NHS, food standards, Water, fracking all up for grabs 
How on earth do you Brexit backers get away with all your propaganda? #Brexit#WhitePaper 
Even though we had doubts about her delivering BrexitWe gave her the benefit of the doubt when she declared Brexit means BrexitWe have given her time to show where she standsShe stands with Merkel & the EU#MAYMUSTGO 
Theresa May bows to EU pressure to keep UK in human rights convention after Brexit, enraging Tory right  
The EU’s chief #Brexit negotiator @MichelBarnier is meeting with members of the US Congress on Capitol Hill. He’s briefing the ‘Friends of Ireland’ caucus on the negotiations. @rtenews 
I do like Krum. Please circulate far and wide to get the word out to European students considering studying in the uk but not sure what Brexit means for them.  
The real cause of Trump-Brexit disaffection is not too much change, but too little. We need to radically reduce the restrictive effect of precautionary regulation and promote a new regulatory culture based on permissionless innovation.  
 Did Merkel approve May's Brexit plan in advance?Incompetent May. When the EU don't approve it, Merkel will say, sorry Theresa but I couldn't persuade them to go with your plan, you'll have to make even more of your red lines even more pale pink. 
Oh dearMachine learning in the gov brexit white paper (S20): "This could include exploring how machine learning and artificial intelligence could allow traders to automate the collection and submission of data required for customs declarations". 
AMIDST ALL THE TURNCOATS, one man has been absolutely stalwart for #Brexit.  @borisjohnson is a shining example of integrity.  Thank you Boris.  If anyone ever deserved to be PM, it is you!  #borisjohnson #boris johnson 
This needs to be answered — “How the BBC Lost the Plot on Brexit”  via @nybooks 
Very good. Key problem: Britain wants to keep control over EU trade policy. That simply won't fly. Only question is when the British political and media class face this fact. Before or after a cliff-edge Brexit.  
It puts backing among voters for the Yes cause two percentage points higher than since the September 2014 referendum  
Then answer this - why did you happily sign away 24 of our Welsh powers to try and curry favour with her over Brexit? I await your response.  
If this is all the government has for its Brexit white paper, we're in trouble  
Why is the BBC downplaying the Facebook Brexit scandal? | Jonathan Freedland | Opinion | The Guardian  
This isn’t needed, the members are already overwhelmingly Brexit supporting, democracy supporters. To “take back control” CCHQ needs to listen to the members and stop living in the Westminster bubble. If it continues to ignore, we get Corbyn. #MAYMUSTGO 
The Brexit white paper is a perfect example of the fallacy that if something’s criticised from both left and right it must be somehow ‘OK’. It really isn’t. 
The embarrassing old soak in this video, stumbling around blind #drunk at a major #internationalsummit, is #unelected President of the #EuropeanCommission #JeanClaudeJuncker. How can the rotten #EU command any respect?  #BBC #SKY @LBC #LBC @ConHome #BREXIT 
More disastrous polling numbers for #TheresaMay. People back @DavidDavisMP & @BorisJohnson for resigning, think her deal is bad for #Britain, and say she's handling #Brexit terribly. She does not represent the people of #Britain!  #MayMustGo #BBC #SKY @LBC 
There are many reasons why people voted #Brexit.  Here is one  
The Brexit white paper (white flag)I am struggling to remember a time when a government's own backbenchers have so heavily criticised such an ill-judged government set of policies. #MayMustGo 
If May wants to know what will happen to the Tory Party if she breaks her promises on Brexit, she just has to look at the Lib Dems and what happened to them after they broke their promise not to raise student fees. That proved electorally suicidal.The Tories will fare even worse. 
I plan on attending the Dump Trump event on Saturday here in Edinburgh. But I do wonder why we think Trump's America is any worse than Brexit UK. They're both about xenophobia and racism. 
At the time of the 2016 referendum, we were still decided if we should go ahead with Prüm. I'm not sure if we made a final decision, but this Whitepaper is definitely proposing our involvement in parts of the EU we weren't involved in at the time we voted to leave.  
The Gov tries to get it through without it being read. They lied about Brexit impact assessments & much more. They have packed parliamentary committees even though they have no majority. They have bribed the DUP. They ignore/cover up the illegality of the referendum. Sovereignty?  
In the Good Old Days...MPs would have looked at the lack of options, peered into the Abyss that will be post #Brexit & gone 'sod this for a game of soldiers how do we get out of this utter sh*tstorm?'Simple..give us a #FinalSay with a #StopBrexit option. 
European Parliament threatens to veto Theresa May’s new Brexit plan over Irish border - The Independent  
Only a Remainer could dream up a Brexit that is worse than staying in the EU. 
I'm going to be blunt.Anyone telling @J_amesp he's wrong and we'll stop Brexit with People's Vote?Look how long it took that petition to hit its minimum target.Like James, I want my cynicism to be wrong. But our voices were silenced on this long ago. 
An absolute embarrassment to the UK. Pathetic crybabies who put virtue signals above national interest - securing trade deals in a post-Brexit world #TrumpUkVisit 
The latest UKGov paper on #Brexit is released. As @scotgov Finance Secretary I say again, Scotland did not vote for EU exit and therefore Scotland’s public finances should not be detrimented as a consequence. 
During the 2016 EU referendum campaign the Brexiteers hit the roof about Obama's input. They said the US President had no right to interfere in British politics. But now Trump is speaking out for Brexit... the Brexiteers are silent. #C4News #BBCnewsten #Newsnight 
i was here in verona just after the EU referendum when the pound had plummeted to 1.22, so none of us got any euros out because it was such a poor exchange rate and we assumed it would recover in time. if only we'd fucking known eh?  now we DREAM of an exchange rate of 1.22!! 
Trump: May’s Brexit Deal is Not What People Voted For  
Brexit is a media word, LEAVE is the action we are expecting!  
There are holes in the #brexit white paper for sure, but it (at last) poses a fundamental Q to EU side: do you want a deal? My latest.   
I think you will find that Brexit didn't happen in a vaccum and that Owen has been for years fighting the economic inequalties that caused brexit whilst lib dems enabled brexit by forming a coalition with the Tory govt in 2010.  
What a fcking joke, you've actually convinced yourself that what you're doing to 17.4 Million Brexit voters is the right thing? When what you've actually done is sold this country to the Eu lock stock and the barrel. Well get used to being on your arse  madam. #Toast  
Vote PR BC has been selected as the official proponent for the 2018 referendum on electoral reform by Elections BC.British Columbia, it's time to get what you voted for!#bcpoli#cdnpoli#pr4bc#ProRep 
Looks like old Jean-Claude Juncker's had a skinfull...at the#NATOsummit liquid lunchAnd this rubber-legged Tipsy McStagger supposedly has Ireland's back in the #Brexit poker game@campaignforleo looking more like a mug every day#IREXIT 
Angela Merkle far more important than MP's in the House of Commons. That's why she was first. I still think PM May nipped over to Brussels to pick up Frau Merkle's Brexit White Paper. Instead of taking one to show her. The delay was getting it translated from German to English.  
Short of going on hunger strike, I am at a loss to know what more I can do to alert the UK to the devastation we face with any version of #Brexit. 
And when politicians and press use such language, they are deliberately and knowingly whipping up hate. And they know very well that such hate will result in threats to our MPs, and quite possibly in violence. Our #Brexit press and Tory politicians are inciting terrorism!  
Brexit:  
How can I look my voters in the eye if I accept Theresa May's Brexit deal?, asks @mariacaulfield 
Apart from the fact, that nothing in the #Brexit #whitepaper says what she claims in this dog whistling tweet, EU citizens can't claim benefits right now without making UK contributions. We are all contributing, £2bn pa net of cost to UK to be precise. So, @andreajenkyns F. O. 
So my petition has become live today...sign and share Petition: Rescind Art.50 if Vote Leave has broken Electoral Laws regarding 2016 referendum  
.@theresa_may has achieved the remarkable feat of writing a Brexit plan that alienates both Brexiters and Brussels. Genius or madness?  
'NO to EU laws!' Tory MPs HIT OUT at Dominic Raab over May's white paper Brexit proposals  
Brexit has shown how poorly educated over half of the British are about how their economy works  
Theresa May is repeating the mantra of the "Will of the People". It is a fascist slogan, providing a democratic sounding excuse to demonise opposition as anti-democratic. The right to oppose is central to democracy. Where it is denied, democracy dies.#StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE 
#JeanClaudeJuncker @JunckerEU drunk again care of the #EU expense drinking account, utter disgrace this is what @theresa_may is signing #Brexit deals with....? UNBELIEVABLE! He is #DRUNK care of #European #Taxpayers! NICE....  #BBC #SKY #LBC #UK @ConHome 
We did meet one @POTUS supporter outside of #BlenheimPalace before the protesters arrived. He's an American from Missouri and thinks that #Trump's policies on immigration resonate with those who voted for #Brexit.  
Theresa May's Brexit document really is a White Paper all right: there's certainly no sign of any red lines on it. 
Honestly I have no idea what will happen next in UK politics with regard to Brexit. There seems to be no majority for anything in particular, and huge amounts of frustration. Getting out of this a challenge neither party leader seems equipped for 8/ 
Theresa May's new Brexit plan is the most realistic one yet   
'It is not acceptable for this to be height of the thinking now, with just weeks of negotiating time left.' Brilliant piece by @IanDunt eviscerating Brexit white paper and the govt's criminal time-wasting stupidity over the past two years  Read it and weep 
Yes, followers, it’s true I think @GaryLineker is overpaid at the BBC, part of culture of excess at the top which is doing BBC such harm. And I also think everyone has a right to a view on football, just as everyone has right to a view on politics, esp Gary’s anti-Brexit views! 
May is a disaster, the Tory party has no concern for national interests and their Brexit strategy is a mess. Time for a General Election to get them out. #GE2018Now #ToriesOut #JC4PM 
More disastrous polling numbers 4 @theresa_may. People back Davis and Johnson for resigning, think her deal is bad for Britain, & say she's handling Brexit terribly. She does not represent the people of Britain!#MayMustGo  
FolksPlease find below my draft letter to the Prime Minister concerning Brexit.Comments/suggestions/criticisms/improvements very welcome. I plan to send it tomorrow so it arrives in Downing Street on Saturday morning.Viva Brexit!  
The LADYBIRD BOOK of FOOD RIOTING part of the learning to live with #brexit series  
2 years, 2 YEARS after the referendum this divided and incompetent excuse for a government mucks up the release of its half baked White Paper which will fall apart when it faces reality. #Brexit is destroying the reputation of our country.  
In chaotic scenes, MPs heckled Brexit Secretary Dominic Raab in the House of Commons, demanding to know why the Brexit White Paper had not been distributed earlier  
sound on! The government has published its blueprint for UK relations with the EU.  @BBCLauraK heard from @edvaizey @ABridgen - two side of the debate* in the @Conservatives #Brexit #BBCNewsSix (*they shook hands ) 
“Badly written cyberpunk.” One of @IanDunt’s more polite comments on the Brexit white paper.  
Best assessment I've seen so far of today's Brexit White Paper - and a damning one ("it is criminally vague and deluded"). It would be wise to have a wet towel ready to put over your head after reading.  
#German court rules that #CarlesPuigdemont can be deported back to #Spain to face punishment for upholding democracy & staging a referendum. They found a loophole: he's being charged with "misuse of public funds".Thank goodness the #EU is so democratic and free! 
I voted conservatives for the first time in 2017 because I thought they could deliver brexit. I now feel betrayed and politically homeless 
Yes Angela Merkle's Brexit White Paper proves that PM May has only been allowed to offer our UK a BRINO ( Brexit In Name Only ).  
“Dominic Raab's inauspicious start as Brexit Secretary”: MPs are allowed just 5 mins to read the #BrexitShambles White Paper before questioning the new Brexit Secretary  via @YouTube 
Fellow Patriots: Royal Wootton Bassett, Wilts: patriotic and proud #Brexit#MayMustGo 
Lol. The president of the EU, who likes to lecture the awful Brits, so utterly smashed from a 7 bottle NATO lunch he cannot actually walk. And people say Brexit is misguided.  
So basically the Tories released the #brexit whitepaper to the press before the MP's of the house of commons. MP's got a total of 5 minutes to read it before the sec. of state stood up to speak. Totally in breach of parliamentary rules! #Scotref #Indyref2 #Brexit 
'Shambolic' Brexit white paper has 'zero clarity' on impact of Brexit  
I have now read the white paper.My fears were well grounded.I outline exactly what needs to be done to get real Brexit.FAKE BREXIT IS WHAT'S ON OFFER.IT MIGHT FOOL MSM BUT NOBODY ELSE  
Brexit means blockchains, lots and lots of blockchains  by @riptari 
2016: UK govt said voters would have final say on Brexit. turned out civil service did - this is not Brexit. Now: exit Theresa May, 10% corporate tax, invest in skills + infrastructure, welcome entrepreneurs + ACTUALLY LEAVE THE EU!!!#PositivePopulism 
I feel ashamed to say I believed Mrs May, although the only party ive ever voted for is the Conservative Party.I thought it was odd that the process was glacial, but thought she would deliverNow we know she will stop at nothing to betray Brexit  
Junker, pissed as a fart at an historic NATO meeting, say what you want about Trump but if Junker is a roaring alcoholic how can he be anywhere near power let alone shaping the future of the EU, Brexit negotiations and defence? The man is a liability. 
So the @bbc thinks that a 20year old social media make up star’s earnings are ‘news’ but Russian collusion in Brexit is not. Very very odd world we are in right now. 
Brexit white paper’s 98 pages seeks to recreate many of the existing economic relationship between Britain and the EU, short of free movement.Will the gambit work, @alexebarker and I ask?  via @financialtimes 
An Instagrammable "Trump baby" balloon, confusion over Brexit, a prime minister holding her government together, a Royal Family hoping to avoid embarrassment, a World Cup exit hangover. Here's my take on Trump's UK visit. With @StigAbell, @londonvinjamuri 
This appears to be a video of Jean-Claude Juncker, President of the European Commission, at the NATO summit, so drunk that he literally has people on either side of him to hold him up.(Note to Brexiteers - this looks bad, yes. It doesn’t magically make Brexit a good idea.)  
Poll: The British Conservative Government is a divided shambles. Brexit is now about the Tories, not about you and your loved ones futures, which it should be. #BBCQTShould @theresa_may call a General Election?Please vote and retweet. 
Here is what Andrea Jenkyns, the @Conservatives MP who accused @The3Million campaigners of fear-mongering and blocked me after I asked questions about her position, has to say about the #Brexit #WhitePaper. I am lost for words: there is nothing about this in the White Paper! 1/ 
@oflynnmep Patrick today I sent my letter in to @theresa_mayShe has sold her party and her country out. I know others have done the same. She must quit!#brexit #MayMustGo 
"To jumble up the Brexit jargon, it is cakeism-minus. They have a cake, they have eaten it, some of it is still magically on the plate, and the rest is being vomited up on the floor." OOF. Vicious and vivid, from @iandunt 
When Scotland had IndyRef in 2014, the Scottish Government had a White Paper ready BEFORE Scots voted Yes or No. But the Yes side were still apparently “unprepared.”Today, after 2 years of Brexit, we finally have a White Paper & we are told to believe everything’s “fine.” Wow. 
Reality Check: Donald Trump’s views on Brexit - the complexities of which he clearly doesn’t understand - is bad news for the Brexiteers. Never in my lifetime has an American President been so despised by British people who love America.  
The Brexit White Paper outlines a close future UK-EU financial services relationship. It's a good deal for the City: keeping the mutual benefits of integrated markets protecting financial stability preserving the City’s global reach  
"The United Kingdom’s ‘Brexit dream’ has become a waking nightmare"  
"We should thank England for taking our minds off bloody Brexit for a few glorious weeks." @piersmorgan has hailed Gareth Southgate and his players for unifying the nation with their run to the #WorldCup semi-finals   
And of course the same applies to the other Ultras. For that matter, recall how vitriolically opposed they were to Parliament having any role at all in shaping how the government approached Brexit. Enemies of the people was, I think, the phrase applied to those who sought it.  
This is much bigger than just @ForBritainParty & @UKIPWe need the 17.4m who voted for #Brexit to come together in one #BrexitCoalition.We need just one #Brexit candidate in each seat.We can then elect a #BrexitGovernment to deliver the Brexit we voted for.  
  #Trump's Early Russian Connections: 30 years of the #KGB surveillance. Facts, links, interviews. #Helsinki2018 @WendySiegelman @dcpoll @peterjukes @lukeharding1968 @ushadrons @AlexandraChalup @Vladdich @grantstern @patrickLSimpson @brexit_sham  
Sorry about being Debbie Downer today. I think between those Scottish indy polls, and the reality that we're headed for hard Brexit, I just feel a wee bit down. If ever there was a time for courageous politics in Scotland, it's now. 
Can I urge all principled Conservatives to support the courageous action of @andreajenkyns and help her ensure we get the Brexit we voted for, not the one that May and Merkel seek to impose.  
Potential anti-trump protests being given extensive coverage on @BBCNews I wonder why the larger anti-brexit protests across the country a few months ago faced a BBC boycott - with them saying coverage wasn’t in the interests of the viewers. Don’t want Trump. Want Brexit less 
That's it, no more grotesque Brexit nonsense for me. I'm going to read superhero comics. 
Delighted to meet An Taoiseach @campaignforleo at government buildings in Dublin today with Irish @eppgroup Members. #Ireland has our full support on #Brexit negotiations. @EPPGroup 
If this is all the government has for its Brexit white paper, we're in trouble  
Lots of Brits are wishing Trump was negotiating Brexit - that’s why the collectivists hate him so much. He puts his country first. Differentiated countries have to compete for citizens, which reduces government power. 
It would be better if @guyverhofstadt stayed out of UK-US business. Brexit is already messy enough. Thanks but no thanks to EU-UK #BRINO. Get lost Guy. 
More disastrous polling numbers for Theresa May. People back Davis and Johnson for resigning, think her deal is bad for Britain, and say she's handling Brexit terribly. She does not represent the people of Britain!Support us at  
“It is a sign of true creative genius to be able to come up with something that would please no one, but somehow Theresa May has managed it.”OFOC’s @Femi_Sorry tears apart the Brexit white paper:  
Change Britain: government's White Paper is a substantial and significant compromise on the expectations of Leave voters, and is not the Brexit many voted for.  
When Verhofstadt welcomes May’s appeasement over Brexit you KNOW we need a new strong Prime Minister.  
"Theresa May bows to EU by keeping UK in human rights convention after #Brexit"#MAYMUSTGO #BRINO 
Catch up with our Opposition Day debating Brexit earlier this week.This week has shown how badly the Tories are making a mess out of Brexit. If you think the people should have the final say on the Brexit deal, and option to remain, add your name:  
Dear EU please stick to your principles & help us rid Britain of this venal self-serving rabble of charlatans & liars that calls itself a government, and the #Brexit of lies, hate & criminal cheating they are trying to foist on us.@MichelBarnier @guyverhofstadt#StopBrexit #FBPE 
Just heard @BBCPM calling for people affected by Brexit, happy with it, dismayed by it, living here or elsewhere in EU to tell them their stories and what they think of what is happening.  pm@bbc.co.uk You know what to do! #FBPE @InLimboBrexit pass it on... 
⁦@IanBlackfordMP⁩ and I had very useful meetings with Irish parliamentarians in Dublin today about #Brexit and it’s impact on our nations. Thanks to ⁦@simoncoveney⁩ and others for taking time to meet 
BREAKING: Judge Llarena withdraws extradition charge against Puigdemont. Extradition for misuse of public funds alone not strong enough especially when Spanish State on record as saying  no public money was used in referendum. #Catalonia 
[Project Fear reunion meeting]Chief Fearmonger: You guys are a disgrace! Why did no-one come up with this during the referendum? Head of Economic Scaring: They’d never have believed us!  
Theresa May bows to EU pressure to keep UK in human rights convention after Brexit, enraging Tory right  Just proves that PM Mays Brexit is in name only ( BRINO ). 
Theresa May proudly announces that she will end our Right to Freedom of Movement, like a robber proudly announcing what she intends to steal!Let's us stop this robbery, and let us ensure that the would-be thieves do not go unpunished!Stop Thief! #StopBrexit#Brexit #PeoplesVote 
A damning new YouGov poll for The Times shows that 75% think that TM is making a mess of #Brexit, the highest it has ever been. Time for her to go & a new #peoplesvote 
Anyone else really depressed about Brexit? I just don't have faith that Scotland is going to escape in time. It's really messing with my head. 
After the shambles of the govt’s release of its Brexit White Paper in Parliament today, all is orderly here in our busy constituency advice surgery in Camden this evening thanks to my great casework team!  
Brexit: What does the government White Paper reveal?  
In the gov's 100+ page report, there are only TWO paragraphs on young people! They know their Brexit deal screws our future, they have given up defending it! #PeoplesVote 
Why the Conservative Party will reject Theresa May’s Chequers Brexit Plan  
Verdict of Vote Leave / @Change_Britain from Gisela Stuart: ‘this is not the Brexit many voted for’ 
Tories will be finished after this. It is way beyond Nick Clegg's porkies to the students and remember what happened to the LibDems.  This is now bigger than Brexit it is about Democracy itself, you've permanently lost my vote. 
Our plan for Brexit means that we will deliver on the referendum result, regaining control of our borders, laws and money - whilst also protecting jobs and our prosperity   
Thoughts on the song I've just written? It's called "BOLLOCKS TO BREXIT AND TRUMP"  #bollockstobrexit #BOLLOCKSTOTRUMP  
Don’t need to see the future - we’ve devalued the pound by 15%, receipts are down, our share of FDI has fallen, manufacturing output has weakened, trade balance in goods has worsened and the OBR says public finances are reduced by £15Bn pa. But apart from that, Brexit is Brill! 
Two years on since the referendum and 16 months since May triggered Article 50, the govt is still peddling fantasy as policy, and losses as if they are gains.  
1. At best, it reflects the will of 26% of the British people.2. But it doesn't even do that. You're just another Brexiter who insists that your version of Brexit is what people voted for.  
Just to confirm my letter was submitted on Tuesday. We must ensure we do not let people down and deliver a proper #Brexit. Please keep the faith Brexiteers, there are quite a number of us standing up for what people voted for. 
President Trump States What Every Brexit Voter is Thinking  
|￣￣￣￣￣ | |  RETWEET  | |    IF YOU    | |     HATE     | |    BREXIT    | | ＿＿＿＿_  | (__/)   ||(•ㅅ•) || / 　 づ 
It would be better if Trump stayed out of EU-UK business. Brexit is already messy enough. Thanks but no thanks.  
Today's offer on workers’ rights in the Brexit white paper isn’t good enough. It provides no absolute guarantee for existing rights. And it would allow the rights of UK workers to fall behind those in other European countries. 
In case anyone was still labouring under the delusion that Boris Johnson is not a sociopath, here he makes clear that literally any price (and any number of jobs) is worth paying for Brexit. If his Brexiter colleagues remain silent, we may simply have to conclude that they agree  
Can we put Southgate in charge of Brexit, least he’ll unite the nation and give us belief that it will actually happen instead of these clowns #Southgate #brexit 
#EU #LeftistSedition #IslamicTerrorism #GlobalismIsCommunism...  UNITED KINGDOM - TRUMP HITS MAY over HER BREXIT FAILURES: Trump on May’s Brexit Plans: ‘I Don’t Know If That’s What They (the Citizens) Voted For’. 
Instead of embracing national independence, the establishment has done all it can to thwart #Brexit. At its heart is the refusal of the political class to respect the wishes of the electorate.The policy has been not implementation but deceit and retreat.  
The Brexit White Paper turns cherry-picking into a form of international relations art. I cannot see how the EU could accept it as a basis for proper negotiations. 1/ 
DUP MP Sammy Wilson - "I think Theresa May should take a line out of Donald Trump’s book in dealing with the EU. Straightforward, no-nonsense. "He said that to the European companies and they’re all starting to pay to NATO now. He is saying the same on trade deals." #Brexit  
Andrew Neil reduced in stature and Sarah Smith out on her backside as BBC announces that Sunday Politics show is to be axed! | #Scotref #Indyref2 #Brexit |  
The Lloyd's of London chief chief says the government's plan for relations with the EU after #Brexit will speed up the departure of firms from the UK.  
Jacob Rees-Mogg - "Trade with the rest of the world has grown from about 40% to nearly 60% of our total trade whilst the trade has shrunk in recent decades."WTO terms have been hugely successful for us whilst we have been shackled to the failing European state." #Brexit  
The Tories have already lost younger generations. Forget Rees-Mogg's drivel, these are the cold hard FACTS. If Tories push through a Brexit that risks jobs and opportunities they will be out of power for a LONG TIMEIf they allow a no deal #FlounceOutBrexit the party will die 
Here is a list of Trump’s lobbying activities relating to Putin. You can add trump shoving his Putin request of telling May to do a hard Brexit so she can speed up leaving the EU. Apparently GOP elected officials on American payroll have no problem w this 
'Remainers beware: a soft Brexit would mean the return of Ukip, and it's already started,' writes @MrTCHarris  
Finance industry tears into Britain's Brexit trading plans  
Alice in Wonderland. When a court is not a court, for the purpose of Brexit fantasies  
Theresa May reveals her ‘comprehensive vision’ for Brexit:  
3. This is why the Government - two years later - still struggles to define what Brexit actually means. It’s why there will never be consensus for any possible outcome. And it’s why voters will be so disappointed with what they eventually get. 
1. Trump’s comments about “the Brexit people voted for” miss the point. Leave voters didn’t vote *for* something specific, because the Leave campaign didn’t offer any coherent alternative vision - and attempting to retrofit one now to create a mandate is blatantly dishonest. 
May's Lancaster House Jan 2017An independent, self-governing, Global Britain “Not partial membership of EU, associate membership of EU, or anything that leaves us half-in, half-out"Now: 'These arrangements take form of an association agreement.'#Brexit 
Brexit white paper: Here's what you need to know  
Theresa May's White Paper is obviously worse than remaining in the EU.  Get out properly or admit that you are canceling Brexit. Only these course are actually honest 
The Facilitated Customs arrangement, proposed by Theresa May is bad enough. However, it is to be phased in. Doesn't mention a time. We already know there is to be a transition period of at least 2 years. Don't bet against it bring unlimited.This is not Brexit. 
Theresa May’s government will ask the EU for a post-Brexit "association agreement," including a free-trade area for goods  
Refrain from blaming #IrishWater says @MurphyEoghan Over €2 billion on a quango stuffed with cronies and still no referendum - you have no credibility, Minister. Enjoy your holidays. #right2water #not1pipe 
...I suspect that your understanding of #brexit is as incomplete as your knowledge of King John and that your patriotism and desire for "sovereignty" is as valid as King John's first Marriage to Isabella of Gloucester. 
Leaving the #EU and then turning to Trump is like leaving a well-paid dream job and then turning up at the job centre ready to accept anything that can earn a crust. #TrumpUKVisit #Brexit @Theresa_May 
Did you wonder why so many tax dodgers backed Brexit? Here's your answer. They wanted to turn your country into a tax haven. And the Government is playing along.  
This is the moment MPs scramble to hand out copies of the Brexit white paper.Parliament was briefly suspended today after the Government began a debate on the long-awaited Brexit policy - without having given MPs a copy of it to read.  
The economic impact of #Brexit on the North West is truly devastating. The latest resignations are because the Cabinet is split on whether to take a voluntary 8% hit to GDP or a voluntary 12% hit:  
UK calls for close economic ties with EU in Brexit white paper  
Once continues to ask If all Brexit options are such a sh*t show, then why not call the whole thing off?  The wrongdoings (by both sides) in the campaign should be enough to call the result void. If all else fails a #peoplesvote with "Abort A50" as an option should  be allowed 
US President Donald Trump arrives in London amid protests and Brexit chaos  
The Speaker had a go at Dominic Raab for not handing out copies of the Brexit White Paper to opposition MPs. Total disgrace!The question is whether this was just an innocent mistake by the Govt or whether it was intentional   
Brexit White Paper is "totally unworkable and bad for Britain" says @ChukaUmunna: 
"European Medicines Agency said work to license them after Brexit has not been done."What a fucking shambles this country is rapidly becoming. Pathetic.  
Has she cleared this with Angela Merkel first?#ENG #EnglandvsCroatia #WorldCup #Brexit  
"JACOB Rees-Mogg made a brilliant point to a panel of Remainers by highlighting the fact that Britain voted "three times" for Brexit and that democracy "must be upheld".Two of the most recent vote were the General Election and the 2016 referendum." 
Instead, Theresa May has approached Brexit through the lens of crisis mitigation rather than grabbing the opportunity to transform our country and economy with both hands. 7/7 
‘Dear Jeremy, We are both avid rail enthusiasts, perhaps the strongest bond two men can forge at a distance, outside support for the England football team. My mission now is to form an equally strong bond with you in fighting Brexit’  
I have long been an advocate for investment in heavy and light industry. That should have been part of the positive plan and vision for the UK post-Brexit. 6/7 
Brexit could have provided an opportunity to recast our economy, so it worked for everyone. It was an opportunity to design an economy that healed the divides in this country; the divides between North and South and the divides between the generations. 5/7 
...Your command of French history seems somewhat skewed, I thought you were in favour of sovereignty, instead you seem unhappy about ending English imperialism in France. Sounds like your understanding of #Brexit is as pitiful as your understanding of the Treaty of Le Goulet... 
Jacob Rees-Mogg savages Theresa May's Brexit white paper as he accuses her of breaking her promises  
'I think they like me a lot in the UK': Donald Trump comments on his visit to the UK, immigration and Brexit #TrumpUKvisit 
"Alexa, show me the definition of Brexit Means Brexit in picture form"  
Brexit Chaos encapsulated. Two years after the vote and the most incompetent government since the War flings copies of its White Paper at MPs round the Chamber. The Speaker suspends Parliament. Scotland, really, we can do better than this...  
To be fair, Theresa May doesn't understand the details of Brexit either... 
Now is the time. UK, Survation poll:Scottish Independence Referendum18-24 | YES 71%, NO 29%25-34 | YES 63%, NO 37%35-44 | YES 54%, NO 46%45-54 | YES 46%, NO 54%55-64 | YES 36%, NO 64%65+     | YES 31%, NO 69%Field work: 05/07/18–10/07/18Sample size: 1,002#ScotRef 
Trump backed Brexit. Then he used It as leverage—a predatory policy toward UK designed to capitalize on its need for new trading deals after Brexit to exact painful concessions that US was unable to secure when Britain negotiated as a EU member 
As the chaos in Westminster continues and it becomes increasingly clear the danger Brexit poses to the Scottish economy and to the jobs and lives of those living here in Scotland, support for independence grows.  
Within a couple of hours of the shambolic release of the White Paper we have Tories leaking emails damage the other side, MPs openly telling May she’s done for & rumours of enough signatures to trigger a no confidence motion. Brexit is the Conservative plaything. #GE2018Now 
So the #Brexit White Paper… Govt:     27 Govts and @MichelBarnier:  
Oh how they wish they had a Donald J. TrumpUK - Trump Arrives, Says PM May’s Brexit Plans “Not What They Voted For” (Video)  #news 
Brexit white paper: New blow for Theresa May as Tory MPs - and Donald Trump - trash plans  
IF WE'RE NOT GOING TO BE BETTER OFF AFTER BREXIT, WHAT THE HELL ARE WE DOING IT FOR?  
WATCH: May's Brexit Banger featuring in today's BBC News bulletins.May’s Brexit Banger – the £50 billion "bargain" nobody’s buying. Please RT:  
Tim Martin slams Brexit deal  
HMG's Brexit White Paper is here . Its the final nail in the coffin to claims that the Tory party are pro-Business - they are the anti-business and anti-worker party whose claims to economic competence have been consigned to the bin. 
Initial reaction to the #government’s #WhitePaper  from the EuropeanParliament’s #Brexit Steering Group: Yes to Association Agreement, No to outsourcing #CustomsUnion 
Great example of how North Carolina GOP's bipartisan Elections Board constitutional amendment referendum this fall is just a voter suppression scheme. A deadlock means Dems can't restore polling places the GOP removed from Dem-leaning college campuses & black neighborhoods #NCpol 
Tory MP @SimonClarkeMP says he will not vote for May's Brexit plan and other Tories won't compromise either.'My position is more akin to that of David Davis and Boris Johnson.' 
No one wanted to buy our old #Brexit banger. If the #Brexit you voted for isn't the one you're getting you have a right to change your mind. We want a #PeoplesVote to take back control 
The shambles of Brexit encapsulated:MPs lobbing copies of the Brexit White Paper around Parliament like paper aeroplanes as the Government forgot to distribute them before the debate. #BrexitWhitePaper #Brexit 
The Brexit White Paper is a bad deal for Britain  
Time is running out for a Brexit deal, French government warns Theresa May  And when the Brexit deal does arrive, we want to make sure that there is a #PeoplesVote - sign the petition here: 
Hector knows his haters are in their middle age, fat, bold, and voted brexit. How can you not love this guy?  
Theresa May bows to EU pressure to keep UK in human rights convention after Brexit, in move set to enrage Tory right  
-‘How about Brexit?’-‘I own a lot of property over there.’-‘Is it hard, Brexit?’ -‘A lot of things are heartbreaking.’*geen vraag*-‘We won Wisconsin.’*geen vraag*-‘The people love me. I own a lot of property over there.’   
We are  = 28th out of the 28 EU MS of the EU in economic growth, while we are still in the EU with a competitive £. Yet listen to any radio phone in & you would think the UK economy is doing well. What does that tell you about how the UK media reports the post referendum economy?  
The Brexit White Paper is utterly batshit crazy. pic.twitter.com/coBufxU9Ul 
There is a lot that is very welcome & very good to see in the UK Govt #Brexit White Paper, from the point of view of Northern Ireland, North/South cooperation & @BelfastAgmt Here's a wee thread of positivity1/ 
‘@oflynnmep: UKIP can still put frighteners up political class if they sell-out on immigration.“The only discipline that will make them honour the referendum is fear of them losing their seats.” 
With Gaslit Nation, @AndreaChalupa and @sarahkendzior cut through the noise on Trump, Brexit and Russia like nobody else:  
 a friend had devised this brexit calculator - the sheer amount it’s cost us already . Brexit offers no tangible benefits - not one 
BETRAYAL: #Government seeking potential ‘association agreement’ with the #EuropeanUnion. Is that what you voted for?  #MayMustGo #BBC #SKY @LBC #LBC @ConHome @CCHQPress @theresa_may @DCBMEP @andreajenkyns #Tories #Tory @DavidDavisMP #Brexit @LiamFox 
I think there is a real danger that with all of the bad stuff coming out about the dire consequences of a no-deal Brexit, that too many people will be relieved to accept something that is still shit because it isn’t Armageddon but only a bit of famine, pestilence, war & death. 
Seems it not as easy to shake off the jurisdiction of the #ECJ as the PM would have us believe. I hate to say I told you so but I will. It’s time to consider keeping the Scottish & English judges on the court  #Brexit #WhitePaper 
MAY'S BREXIT PLAN:1. Propose impossible deal, which EU refuses2. Say: "Look at those EU wankers, it's their fault we're crashing out of EU with disastrous no-deal3. Crash out of the EU with disastrous no-deal(Don't mention whole disaster triggered by Tories in 1st place) 
Trump, after questioning May's Brexit plan, arrives in 'hot spot' Britain  
Here's the part in the Brexit White Paper that categorically states that Britain would remain a rule taker from the EU in perpetuity under the Tories' proposals.It is inconceivable that any Tory hard Brexiteer would ever even contemplate  accepting this.  
I'd hate to have heard his views on Brexit were before he'd spent a lot of time reading up on it. 
Former Brexit Minister @DavidJonesMP points out “I see on page 11 (of the White Paper) that the role of the ECJ is preserved” 
A TAX THREADThis is an extraordinary part of state aid bit the Brexit white paperRead it: UK reserves the right to do whatever it likes on tax- like subsidise Apple or Google- or undercut Ireland on VAT in all areas- or apply a special regime to attract financial services  
Except it doesn't. And everyone knows it doesn't. It would actually be better if she came up with some kind of semi-plausible excuse for this about-face because pretending she is honouring either the referendum or her own red lines is just an insult.  
Think of the level of betrayal we’re witnessing, our Government is actually getting us to pay (through taxes) for our own EXTINCTION.We’ve systematically been ripped off in EVERY direction.The best thing about Brexit is it has actually shone a light directly on the criminals. 
Translation: I don’t understand the details of Brexit, but I’m going to blabber about unrelated topics, improvising absolute nonsense, until the question goes away. 
Chuka Umunna: I’m angry Labour didn’t fight harder in EU Referendum  
Don't bother reading the whole thing. It's a pointless document. In the foreword by the PM it says the UK will end FoM. This means the EU will NEVER agree to the rest of it. So looks like no deal (hard) Brexit.  
"Contrary to the rhetoric, the Trump administration has pursued a predatory policy toward Britain designed to capitalize on the UK’s need for new trading arrangements after Brexit"  
The present Constitution of Bharat was never accepted by the people of Bharat via a referendum. Many of its provisions are based on Govt of India Act 1935 passed by the British.A reason why the rich, mighty and minorities gets benefits denied to Hindus and ordinary citizens. 
The Brexit white paper will mean a hard Brexit for 80% of the UKs economy, since services are not included in the PM's proposal. This is simply not good enough.If you want the final say on the Brexit deal with the option to stay in the EU add your name: 
Here's just two paragraphs from the Brexit white paper on how the "facilitated customs arrangement" would work. I'm no customs expert, but it all sounds a bit a tricky to arrange.  
Personally, I welcome free movement. But I’m not so sure Tory MPs, & lots of Leave voters are quite so keen on the shambolic White Paper. Half a Brexit won’t work. Either tip us over the cliff & face the wrath of the voters or better still, suspend negotiations & call an election 
Jacob Rees Mogg evidently doesn’t understand medieval history, which is presumably indicative of his understanding of Brexit  
Hard Brexit= UK an independent country againSoft Brexit = UK a vassal State of the undemocratic EU.  
Hindus should brace themselves for a referendum in year 2024, people of India should be allowed to choose between Present Constitution and the new Constitution for Bharatvarsha.#ReclaimTemples , #Gharwapsi should be an integral part of the new. 
It's a laboratory-grown mutant of the EEA & Customs Union: the civil service have taken all the bad parts of both and spliced them together.Just go for a Canada FTA-type deal and stop this nonsense.#Brexit #MayMustGo 
While the Conservatives tear themselves to pieces over Brexit, this is brewing into a proper row in the Labour party. 
How is it that Brexiters like Jacob Rees-Mogg and Boris Johnson think they know what #business needs, better than business do?! BMW, Jaguar Land Rover and Airbus have all warned - #Brexit is looking bad for business  
This is excellent by @nickcohen4 on how the BBC lost the plot over Brexit. I'm no BBC basher - quite the opposite but the failure to hold many of the key players to account is an utter disgrace. BBC news and current affairs failed   
When Ireland legalised gay marriage in the referendum, people commented on the radical social shift in the course of a generation: conservative, Catholic country opening up. Our Supreme Court's shift on 377 is even more remarkable. Koushal was 2013. Merely five years ago. (1/3) 
Survation poll by age: Scottish Independence ReferendumExcludes 16 & 17 yr olds (estimated YES 80%, NO 20%)18-24 YES 71%, NO 29%25-34 YES 63%, NO 37%35-44 YES 54%, NO 46%45-54 YES 46%, NO 54%55-64 YES 36%, NO 64%65+ YES 31%, NO 69%05/07/18–10/07/18Sample size: 1,002 
A Brexit White Paper that no one likes - see @pollytoynbee; a Brexit referendum that was deeply flawed, criminal even; polls show 5% excess for Remain; young people who have to live with the consequences are overwhelmingly for Remain. And we are damaging the country, why?  
Such sweet irony, that #Brexit is likely to be brought down, not by raging Remainers, but by the irreconcilable divisions among the Tory Brexiters who were always a bitterly divided rabble united only by the meaningless slogan of "Brexit means Brexit".#StopBrexit #PeoplesVote 
Donald Trump on Theresa May’s Brexit plan: ‘I'm not sure that's what people voted for.’Well, I’m sure that Trump is not what we people voted for either - we gave 3 million more votes to another candidate. Yet we got Trump. 
Labour snatch two-point poll lead after Chequers Brexit plan  
FOR SALE: But no one’s buying May’s Brexit Banger. We were promised an amazing Brexit deal, but Theresa May is selling us a rubbish one. That's why we're demanding a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal. Please RT:  
2016: Daily Mail readers explode in ruddy-faced rage about foreign interference after Barack Obama talks about possible consequences of Brexit if Britain leaves the EU. 2018:  
If you want to know what post-Brexit Britain will be like: look at the US. We have been warned - it can and will happen here if we don't #StopBrexit, our democracy is at risk. Not only parallel, Trump and Brexit are the same phenomenon. Theft or our futures by the 1% #StopTrump 
"We urge the Government to look carefully at the existing funding streams for the creative sector and the impressive returns on investment and ensure continuing support." Equity responds to the government's Brexit White Paper:  
Polly Toynbee on the #brexit constitutional deadlock:  Polly 4gets THE easy way to end this crisis: #StopBrexit #FBPE @BrexitBin @acgrayling @spaceangel1964 @Emma_Forage @voiceseurope @jphcoleman 
Tomorrow I'll be in London marching against Trump.Because I don't back Brexit and  it means selling the UK off to him. Because I have friends in America who deserve a real president.And because I will not stand by quietly and let fascism claim the world. 
"I think they agree with me on immigration... I think that’s why Brexit happened.”  
Today’s reaction from well-placed Brussels official to central element of @theresa_may’s Brexit white paper is as forcefully critical as that of @Jacob_Rees_Mogg and the True Brexiters. 
People tried to link #Brexit and football but it was all crappy until Matt  
“It really feels now, from this Chequers proposal, that the EU has boxed the UK in,” says IEA News Editor @KateAndrs on @daily_politicsA paper by the IEA's #Brexit Unit argued that free trade post-Brexit presents a golden opportunity for the UK →  
We drove @theresa_may #Brexit banger to see i anyone's buying it. Turns out no one wants it. We need a #PeoplesVote to take back control of the final deal 
Labour brands publication of Brexit white paper 'utter shambles' as Commons suspended - Politics live  
The words of Justin Sasha, who has just left this meeting in the Commons share this please to Brexit people @Nigel_Farage @Janice4Brexit @lawyers4britain @CllrBSilvester @RedHotSquirrel @DianeJamesMEP @DVATW @GrahamHmoore @RaheemKassam 
I was waiting for the “Brexit is easy, you just put Britain on the blockchain” take, and here it is in the official government white paper  
This bit of the Brexit white paper seems to have been written by someone trying to describe the blockchain without using the word "blockchain". 
There was another approach to Brexit that didn’t involve wasting 2 years w court proceedings, an election, preventing transparency & debate in favour of mantras & triggering #Art50 before this #WhitePaper was written, but now there’s a mad dash to pull back from the cliff edge. 
Welcome to #Britain @realDonaldTrump! Millions of #British People support you! If only we had a Leader like you Sir... #Brexit would have happened by now and we would have left the #EU cesspool! We dare to Dream! #TrumpUKVisit #DonaldTrump @WhiteHouse #USA #UK #TRUMP 
Taking back control.... From Parliament!!!Brexit IS Bonkers  
"Scotland is right in the firing line with this Brexit dither and indecision, damaged yet again by Tory infighting." - @DeidreBrock on the Brexit White Paper.  
British government's new blueprint for Brexit is a 'real blow' to London's all-important finance sector as it will damage jobs, tax revenues and growth, City of London Corporation official says  #brexitwhitepaper 
CATASTROPHE: Conservative MPs slam government's Brexit plan.- I voted to leave, not half leave.- Government have approached the Leave vote as some disaster.- Downing Street will give us Corbyn unless they change and change now. 
Cab Sec @FionaHyslop responds to the @GOVUK #Brexit white paper: “@scotgov has been consistently clear that the best way to protect Scotland’s interests and foster future growth is continued membership of the European Single Market & Customs Union." More:  
Trump arrives in 'hot spot' Britain, questioning May's Brexit plan...  
Just reading through the government's #Brexit white paper  
God Bless #PresidentTrump and WELCOME to the #UK !!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!#TrumpVisit#StormIsHere#BREXIT #MAGA#GreatAwakening#QAnon@realDonaldTrump 
You (as a party) have let your core support down time and time again.  I’m done with you lot now and I always voted Cons.  Also you can ditch ever having a referendum on anything again, as results are not respected or adhered to. 
There can't be any common ground between #PresidentTrump and Theresa May who has lost all authority with her nasty games around Brexit. Trump is basically waiting for this disgusting woman to fall so he can deal with the new PM. #TrumpUKVisit 
The #brexit white paper statement turns into a complete pantomime as the house is suspended for five minutes while MPs get copies of the white paper. #StopBrexit #FBPE 
Britain seems destined for a soft Brexit. But what does that mean? 
Theresa May's plan means hard Brexit for services - 80% of the UK economy. The British people deserve better. If you agree and want to #ExitfromBrexit add your name:  
Keir Starmer slams the Tories for breaching of parliament protocol and ministerial code with delays in showing the Brexit White Paper to the opposition, when journalists received advanced copies in the morning 3 hrs eariler.@Keir_Starmer 
Remember when Nicola Sturgeon used to say "it's not for politicians to decide when we have a referendum, it's for the people of Scotland to decide." Are you listening Nicola?  
The Speaker had a go at Dominic Raab for not handing out copies of the Brexit White Paper to opposition MPs. Total disgrace!The question is whether this was just an innocent mistake by the Govt or whether it was intentional  
@BBCR4Feedback It was a corrupt referendum according to the Electoral Commission.The vote was gerrymandered by l8miting the say. Of U.K. citizens and resident EU citizens.There was foreign interference.Ether a# manipulation by data.Etc. Etc. Etc.We must have a #PeoplesVote 
This can just speak for itself... #Brexit   
Thank you @Nigel_Farage for supporting President Trump. Hoping for the best for #Brexit 
May's Brexit white paper is 'BAD DEAL for Britain' fumes Rees-Mogg. "It is a pale imitation of the paper prepared by David Davis, a bad deal for Britain."It is not something I would vote for not is it what the British people voted for."  
Keir Starmer responds after the Govt did not hand out copies of the Brexit White Papers to opposition MPs in-time before the debate. The question is whether the Govt were just incompetent or whether this was dirty tactics and intentional.  
The UK in which Trump arrives now is roiled by a scandal in which Russians sought to influence a referendum that had profound consequences for the country & the Western Alliance...and in which Russians have had opponents murdered...and Trump has been silent on both. 
Wetherspoon boss Tim Martin attacks Theresa May's Brexit plans claiming there is no need to deal with 'unelected EU representatives'  
The Government's white paper has succeeded in uniting Parliament, with virtually no MP, on either side of the House, supporting the Government's position. Not at all clear where we go from here. #Brexit #FBPE 
Sir Keir Starmer should be in charge of our #Brexit negotiations, he'd hardly had a chance to read the White Paper, but still skewered the pathetic lightweight Dominic Raab, #BrexitShambles #ToriesOut #bbcnews #SkyNews 
Dominic Raab has told us himself he doesn't "believe in economic and social rights".With him in the driving seat, the difference between a Tory Brexit and a Labour Brexit is clear.We will protect rights, jobs and our economy.  
White Paper only has 20 paras on immigration. References to students, tourists & business transfers. But no provisions that wd allow NHS to recruit doctors/ nurses/ carers from EU. Asked Brexit Sec what Govt plans are on this. No answer. Sounds like they haven’t even discussed it 
UK Government's Brexit White Paper: "depth of relationship between peoples of UK and EU must be recognised", and wants "free movement of skilled workers and students." How do they square that with the threat to blockade trade with Scotland and we're foreigners after independence? 
BREAKING: Trump arrives in Great Britain for his first visit as president amid NATO tensions, protests and Brexit turmoil. 
From the resignation of British foreign minister Boris Johnson to Brexit, Britain's ruling class is "falling apart," says @GeorgeMonbiot. "The only thing we are missing at the moment is a crazed orange demagogue," he adds, ahead of Trump's U.K. visit. #DNlive 
Fitting that Trump arrives on day of Brexit white paper. The unspeakable greets the unbearable - & together they will undermine Britain’s security & place in the world 
On the left is an invoice submitted by @vote_leave for 12 rooms at the Ramada in Dover. On the right is a receipt submitted by @darrengrimes_ of @beleaveuk for food for 21 main courses at the same hotel on the same night, the day before the referendum on EU membership.  
Ouch. Fans of Dominic Raab look away now.... Keir Starmer destroys the new Brexit Minister's shambolic first appearance in the Commons.  
“(Vote Leave) breached the official spending limit of £7 million ($9.3 million) during the run-up to the EU referendum. One leading London lawyer said the breach was of a scale and seriousness beyond anything Britain had seen in modern times.” Why is @bbc not reporting? 
MPs having to throw copies of the Brexit White Paper around Parliament as Govt forgot to distribute them before debate. What a joke this Tory Govt is! 
The House of Commons is in meltdown over the Brexit white paper (which MPs weren't even given copies of before questioning Dominic Raab about). Even Lord of the Flies had a more effective political system - at least they had an effin conch shell#VeneerOfCivilisation 
Brexit is entwined with US politics by more than Russian meddling.  The British Brexit “turmoil” President Trump rightly identified had its origins in the world view (and myths) of the alt right.  UK govt needs to wake up to the new world disorder.    
If you have a job or business or family in the UK be worried, very worried. The new Secretary of State Exiting the EU has confirmed the Govt have no idea what the cost of their #Brexit plans will be for you. #FBPE 
Almost 750 days AFTER the EU referendum, the Tories have published their plan.Here are the sensible proposals that are missing.   
I'm English and a Unionist. But I find myself following increasing numbers of @SNP MPs, who seem to say sensible things (against Brexit, pro NHS, education, etc)Would anyone mind if we shut down Westminster for a bit and let the Scots run the UK for a while? 
"This recreates many of the worst aspects of the EU the British people voted to leave" @Jacob_Rees_Mogg slams the government's just-released white paper on their plan for a Fake Brexit. Time to put country before party and oust May!Support us at  
Dominic Raab just said the decision to leave the EU was "free and fair" maybe he needs to look at the evidence suggesting #VoteLeaveCheated in the referendum  @DominicRaab 
Jacob Rees-Mogg savages Theresa May's Brexit white paper: "It is hard to see that any of this meets the promises Mrs May made in her earlier speeches" 
'“The referendum is over,” declared .... Nick Robinson. “The day we broadcasters have to ‘broadly balance’ the views of the two sides is at an end. Why? Because there are no longer two sides.” Real journalists should be able to see that everything is wrong with his statement.' 
Ben Bradshaw throwing out copies of the Brexit White Paper like a supply teacher giving out copies of your GCSE mock exam is iconic.  
Theresa May has unveiled her blueprint for a soft Brexit. Here's what we know so far  
Or, you *could have said:“Majority in Scotland now support second referendum”  
Finance industry not liking the Brexit White Paper.City of London Corporation says it's a "real blow"TheCityUK says regrettable and disappointing UK given up on mutual recognition  
If only I had a £ for every time I overheard someone in Middlesbrough comparing Brexit with the homage paid by King John to Philip II at Le Goulet in 1200.  
What JRM either pretends not to or really fails to understand, is that vassallage is the only possible outcome of Brexit. Whether because we lost our place at the EU table or because EU standards are so important world wide, that many have to follow them anyway. 
NOWHERE HERE DOES IT SAY THAT BRITAIN WILL BE MORE PROSPEROUS OR FAIRER AS A RESULT OF  BREXITBECAUSE IT WON’T BE  
Must read: The moment that @NickCohen4 gave up defending @BBCNews: "What is the point of the BBC if it cannot tackle issues of national importance? What is the point of a news organization that is frightened of journalism?" #Brexit @carolecadwalla 
Brexit minister Robin Walker on #wato not doing a very god job of explaining how having services outside the single market - 80% of UK economy - will be replaced by these undefined 'great trade deals' w/rest of the world. Hold on folks, it's going to be a very bumpy landing 
IDS tells the Brexit Secretary @DominicRaab: “I voted to leave, not to half-leave” 
This is huge. Government's Brexit White Paper (p52) includes a guarantee that the UK "is committed to membership of the European Convention on Human Rights". Will be incendiary to hard core Brexiteers who saw the ECHR as the next in line for UK to leave  pic.twitter.com/qrWBCWVyOc 
Complete and utter shambles in the Commons chamber as Dominic Raab gets to his feet for the first time as Brexit Secretary. Journalists given copies of the White Paper at 9am this morning but MPs not shown it in advance of the statement. Speaker forced to suspend the sitting. 
My @Telegraph article about President Trumps visit and future opportunities between the two countries. @USAmbUK #Brexit  
Let' send a message that Sadiq Khan etc doesn't speak for us... This is OUR COUNTRY! @UKunityorg#Brexit #BrexitBetrayal #FreeTommy #TrumpBaby #Trumpballoon #SadiqKhan #London #Commons #C4News #ENGCRO #Labour #TrumpUKVisit #TrumpVisit #geertwilders #EnglandvsCroatia 
The biggest potential benefit of Brexit is a bonfire of hugely costly EU red tape that rips off consumers and strangles small businesses. But our Remainer-dominated establishment prefers a Brexit-in-name-only sellout:  
Scathing response from @Jacob_Rees_Mogg to the Brexit White Paper: he calls it the "greatest vassalage since King John paid homage to Philip II at Le Goulet in 1200" and says that it "recreates many of the worst aspects of the EU the British people voted to leave"  
If you read nothing else online today READ THIS: "Both the Conservative and Labour parties are being torn apart by a pressure to do the impossible: to square the promises of charlatans with the realities of Britain’s economic and strategic position." 
My favourite line in UK Brexit documents is always "The UK alreadyhas zero tariffs on goods and a common regulatory framework with the EU Single Market" - of course it does: The UK is in the frigging single market. 
|￣￣￣￣￣￣￣￣￣￣￣| Reading the Quran toUnderstand militant movementsIs like trying to understandBrexit by reading Beowulf.|＿＿＿＿＿＿＿＿＿＿＿|              (\__/)    ||             (•ㅅ•)   ||            /  　  づ#HistorianSignBunny#ReligiousStudiesSignBunny 
Dominic Raab having a complete mare on first outing as Brexit secretary. He is being utterly shredded by @Keir_Starmer 
Bob 
UK VAT revenue: £125 billionRevenue lost to intra-EU VAT fraud: £45 billion Number of businesses facing new VAT paperwork post-Brexit: 145,000 Complexity of VAT: extremeNumber of words dedicated in Govt white paper: 80.  
The two British politicians Trump counts as friends are Farage & Johnson. And the British policy he most likes is Brexit. What other argument is needed against it & them? 
Trump’s trying to tell us we all want hard Brexit & what to do on immigration.Let’s tell him where to go. No Brexit, No Trump, No NHS-selling Trade Deal.Get out on the streets tomorrow.If in London, be at All Souls Church, Portland Place, 1:45pm.  
.@Keir_Starmer absolutely tearing this shambles of a Govt apart...and he hasn't even got onto the contents of the #Brexit White Paper yet! What a shower. 
As White Paper crystallises the unicorn-chasing, different wings of Tory party continue to fight like rats in a sack and gov melts into permanent disarray, no Brexit has become much likelier. Deal won’t work for Leavers or Remainers. Let people decide if this is what they want.  
Very quick skim of the Brexit white paper. No chance it will fly in the EU27Stuffed full of cakeismTrade-offs not addressed. If UK doesn't move, we're headed for no deal 
BREAKING Jacob Rees-Mogg lays into Theresa May's Brexit white paper: 'The overall consequence is that we will be a rule taker, de-factosubject to the European Court of Justice and it's hard to believe that there is even a tinge of pink left in Mrs May's red line on this' 
Theresa May’s statement that her White Paper is delivering the Brexit we voted for us quite simply a lie, plain & simple. A direct, deliberate lie. And the voters know it. 
WATCH Chaos as @DominicRaab begins his statement on the Brexit White Paper without any MPs having copies of the document, forcing John Bercow to suspend the debate while MPs scramble to get a copy.  
The Government talks a lot about Parliamentary sovereignty but it is too incompetent to even share its Brexit plan with MPs in time. Shambles. @Keir_Starmer 
Funny how the people who felt it was totally inappropriate for Obama to comment on Brexit are thrilled that Trump is doing it. 
We will now analyse the #Brexit White Paper w/ Member States & EP, in light of #EUCO guidelines. EU offer = ambitious FTA + effective cooperation on wide range of issues, including a strong security partnership. Looking forward to negotiations with the #UK next week. 
WATCH: the Speaker suspends the Commons as long-awaited Brexit White Papers are distributed (thrown in some cases) to MPs... .  
"Brexit is Brexit."Donald Trump says he just wants the British people "to be happy" - and that they "like [him] a lot".  
But, but, splutter, splutter, Brexit...  
The biggest problem we have faced since the referendum is that Government have approached the Leave vote as some disaster that needs to be mitigated against not as an amazing opportunity that should be embraced. That's how we have ended up where we are now. Sad. 
This was flagged up in 2016 in the Economy Committee report on implications of Brexit. Then repeatedly by Fergus Ewing,Emma Harper,Graeme Dey,Mairi Gougeon and myself in chamber and to UK government ministers. 2 years of calls for action to help this vital sector. #BrexitChaos 
In just a few days in the aftermath of Chequers the proportion of Brits who think the government is handling Brexit badly has jumped from 66% to 75%  
proceedings in the House of Commons suspended because the UK Government didn't manage to make copies of the Brexit White Paper available to MPs.  Utter chaos from a chaotic government #BrexitChaos 
Asked what his message on Brexit is, Trump promotes his business: "I have no message. It's not for me to say. I own a lot of property there. I'm going to Scotland while I wait for the meeting I have - Turnberry in Scotland, which is a magical place, one of my favourite places." 
Total shambles in House of Commons as Government fails to release #Brexit #whitepaper before Raab stands up to present it. Speaker forced to abandon sitting. #Brexitshambles #PeoplesVote 
Great start! NOT!@DominicRaab’s statement to the House on the #Brexit White Paper suspended so MPs can actually get a copy - Speaker says "it is most regrettable that this situation has arisen".Disgraceful behaviour from the @CONservatives, sticking two fingers up to MPs. 
Trump openly saying that May's Brexit plan isn't what people voted for. Siding with his 'friend' Boris Johnson. Looks like all that hand holding didn't really help.... 
Devastating column by @arusbridger on the BBC, which he accuses of failing the nation in its coverage of the Brexit debacle...  
What a shambles. John Bercow suspends the Commons because MPs were not given copies of the Brexit white paper Dominic Raab was giving a statement on. Bit odd, given that journalists were shown copies of it at 9am. 
.@DominicRaab didn’t print his homework out for everyone to see.Yet another embarrassing shambles for Theresa May’s Brexit breakers. 
Complete and utter shambles in the chamber. The Speaker has had to adjourn the sitting as the Minister was making a statement about a white paper that no-one has seen. This just sums UK their Brexit. 
So Dominic Raab’s first Commons outing as Brexit Secretary is going well - Dexeu didn’t give MPs copy of the Brexit white paper in advance, they’re unhappy, Speaker has just suspended the sitting  
What a farce. Raab making statement in Commons on Brexit white paper before latter is available to MPs in paper form. ‘Taking back control for Westminster Parliament’, eh?Executive arrogance more like. 
Raab had barely a minute up as Brexit secretary before being given an absolute twatting by the Speaker. 
Something surreal about this = PM expected to respond in next few minutes to Trump saying her Brexit compromise isn't really what people voted for, as Dominic Raab who's been Brexit Secretary for 3 days stands up in the Commons 
Former Brexit Minister @DavidJonesMP: “I’m extremely concerned. The country voted to leave the EU & leaving the EU means no longer being part of the apparatus of the EU” 
Government publishes long-awaited Brexit white paper.  
1. Here's the White Paper - loads in it but 3 things jump out on first glance 1. govt seeking 'association agreement'; 2. no services deal for City + majority of economy; 3. clear possibility of preferential access for EU citizens after Brexit -  
Liam Fox: We've got this amazing trade report with India that says what red tape we should cut after BrexitMe: Can I see it?Fox: NoMe (to India): Can I see it?India: Ok 
'...in the event of no deal  I personally hope that we uphold... '? Sorry @carolinenokes we need more than you hoping? 749 days since the referendum #inLimbo over #citizensrights  for EU citizens in the UK is enough. We need commitments. 
The ministerial statement from @DominicRaab on the Brexit White Paper is only a few minutes away. In a clear breach of the ministerial code  this has not been provided at all, let alone 45 minutes before #WhatDoTheyHaveToHide 
War-gaming the Brexit chaos: Everything you need to know about what's going to happen in the next 9 months  
"The BBC has given up on journalism" Me in @nybooks on why it won't cover the Brexit scandal  
Donald Trump believes in Britain and in Brexit- and so should we via @telegraph 
It’s always hilarious when 16 & 17 year olds are portrayed as ‘incompetent’ and that’s why they can’t vote. Grown humans voted for two Tory govts, Brexit, Trump, et al. I don’t think 16 and 17 year olds are the incompetent ones here. 
It seems that under the influence of an advisory referendum many MPs have succumbed to a kind of political hysteria and are now confusing democracy with plebiscitary dictatorship.#StopBrexit #Brexit #PeoplesVote 
Theresa May has set a course for a soft Brexit. If this week is anything to go by, getting there will be a very rough crossing. Our cover in Britain and Europe this week  
Donald Trump said today "Brexit is Brexit"Mr President. Would love to see you negotiating with Barnier on UK's behalf.Your on the same page as 17.4 million Brits@UKIP #ForTheNation 
The Telegraph cartoon just about sums it up the People don’t want Trump or Mrs May and her Brexit. Time for some new decent policians who put the country first and not their own ambitions. Stop Brexit. #FBPE 
The British agree with me on immigration, and I think that’s why you have #Brexit in the first place, it’s immigration. -POTUS   
CORRECT: @realDonaldTrump slams May's Brexit proposals.'I don't know if that's what they (the people) voted for.' 
Post-Brexit restrictions on the free movement of football mean it can now never come home. 
#BREAKING Trump says not sure May's Brexit proposal is what Britons 'voted for'  
#bbcdp FFS MANBOY crybaby Owen Jones on TV again. On TV everyday talking bollocks attacking Donald Trump & Brexit. Go away you crybaby . No ones listening to you. Owen Jones does for journalism what Giant Haystacks did for Trampolining idiot.      
.@theresa_may's #Brexit paper summed up in a meme.#MAYMUSTGO#Trump #TrumpUK #TrumpVisit 
Donald Trump says he doesn't know what's going on with Brexit negotiations: "who knows?"He also says he believes Brexit happened because of immigration  
#BREAKING @heraldscotland reporting 51% favour a 2nd Scottish independence referendum. @RuthDavidsonMSP this is the result of your u turning on #brexit  
Just to note, this poll excludes 16-17 year olds around 70% of whom back independence, so Yes & No are probably level. There's 8 months of more brexit chaos to come & 10% of voters undecided, it looks like we're probably going to win independence. 
Amazing from @realDonaldTrump - who lost the popular vote in the USA - to lecture the UK on 'what we voted for' with Brexit! 
British government is hoping for quick trade deal with US after #Brexit and hails special relationship but public dislikes Donald Trump, according to YouGov poll:-* 77% have unfavourable view of Trump* 63% found him to be racist* 74% said he was sexist 
For those who follow @J_amesp this will be no surprise, but the mainstream are now beginning to realise there will be food shortages if we’ve a no-deal Brexit. Food for thought, so to speak.  
"Papering the cracks"The #Brexit #WhitePaper day is passing slowly, and no news as yet! So here is my prediction as to how it will go...Follow @SKZAnnounce and turn on mobile notifications to never miss a strip!Buy the book from ! 
We finally know Labour’s plan for a no-deal Brexit: to ‘run around in circles screaming’, writes @LeanneWood 
Trump on Theresa May's Brexit plan"I don't know if that's what they voted for"As always, @realDonaldTrump puts his finger on the key issue.PM promised to take us #OUT of the EU.PM is now keeping us #IN the EUThis is the biggest act of political treachery in the history of UK 
How the BBC Lost the Plot on Brexit: a blistering essay by @nickcohen4 on how the world’s most powerful news media organization lost its nerve and flunked Journalism 101 on the EU referendum’s aftermath:  via @nybooks 
Trump undermines Theresa May's Brexit plan: 'I'm not sure that's what people voted for'  
NATO agrees to up spending in line with Trump demands.Can we clone him and have him negotiate Brexit for us please? 
Dud Brexit white paper has landed, friendless, rejected by Brexiteers, remainers, EU and WTO. Here's my take on deadly parliamentary gridlock ahead. Constitutional crisis: no-one knows what comes next  
Looks like we'll be getting the #Brexit we deserve. The People's Vote petition has 216K signatures - that's less than 1.5% of those who voted to Remain in 2016. Perhaps we are simply a bubble of dedicated activists keeping ourselves deluded? Thoughts? #FedUpWithBrexit 
Brexit Means Brexit.  
WATCH Trump: May's Brexit Deal is Not What People Voted For  
Get ready for the most Brexit central midfield partnership you've ever seen  
Growing the economy through greater freedom whilst keeping taxes low is the path to post-Brexit prosperity as @patel4witham says. #pritifree 
May’s Brexit plan is here, and it’s a dead duck already. Never has there been a white paper of such profound potential importance and simultaneous absolute insignificance  
“Brexit means Brexit,” President Trump tells a NATO summit press conference; “I’ve been reading a lot about Brexit over the last couple of days... it’s not for me to say what they should be doing in the UK”  
President Trump on Brexit and Mass Immigration into Europe: "I'm very strong on immigration. I made a point today, I said 'you gotta stop you're ruining, you're going to have a lot of problems.'"Adds: "I won an election on immigration." #NATO 
Drama as Survation poll shows support for independence INCREASING - and almost half of Scots DEMAND that Nicola Sturgeon should call a referendum:#ScotRef 
The ministerial code is clear that statements and associated documents like the Brexit White Paper  should be provided to opposition parties at least 45 mins before a statement, we have nothing  but @DExEUgov thought it acceptable to brief journalists at 9am this morning 
Since even keen supporters no longer bother to argue Brexit is a good idea, as evidence emerges it wasn't arrived at via a democratic process we have no reason to continue with the destructive madness#StopBrexit 
Trump: "Brexit is Brexit - the people voted to break it up, so I would imagine that is what they would do, but maybe they'll take a different route.. I'm not sure that is what they voted for." BOOM 
“I would say Brexit is Brexit,” says our very stable genius. 
Trump on Brexit: “It seems to be turning a little differently where they seem to be getting partially backed involved with European Union.” 
BREAKING: The latest polling from @britainelects (via @YouGov) - the #Brexit deal agreed at Chequers is...- Good for Britain: 13% (-1)- Bad for Britain: 42% (+9)#Brexit won't be solved in Westminster. That's why we need a #PeoplesVote on the final deal 
Donald Trump: "They like me a lot in the UK. I think they agree with me on immigration...I think that's why Brexit happened." 
Don't be fooled into assuming a 'Chequers Brexit' would be economically painless. Some timely home truths from @jdportes , writing for @Independent : 
BREXIT FURY: Shock claim May said plan 'can't be changed because MERKEL has cleared it' . Fancy that. I tweeted the same a week ago. . . . 
Pres says he's not concerned about planned protests against him in UK. "I think it's fine. I think they like me a lot in the UK." Says Britons like him on immigration. Thinks that's the issue that triggered Brexit. Again says the Putin meeting may be the "easiest" of his stops.  
“I think they like me a lot in the UK,” @realDonaldTrump says, downplaying expected protests in London, adding that he believes Britain is behind him on immigration. He calls the UK “a hot spot,” given governing crisis for Prime Minister May in wake of Brexit. 
We can get too focussed on the here and now, the exact timing of the next referendum etc. Also need to take the time to take a step back and think about how we do this in the least disruptive and least upsetting way for those who aren't reconciled to it. 
Dominic Raab tells Eurosceptics to stop 'carping' unless they can come up with a better Brexit plan  
Guardian editorial not pulling its punches.They had no plan. They have no plan. #stopbrexit #VoteLeaveCheated #brexit #ToriesOut 
While we are on the subject of disgraceful and wrong Mr Corbyn @jeremycorbyn, when are you going to call for an enquiry into the Vote Leave campaign who cheated and broke the law?#Brexit will ruin lives and your support of the Tory Brexit without a #PeoplesVote is shameful. 
Ahem #despitebrexit#Brexit  
EXCLUSIVE. The second @ConHome extract from the DexEU "Canada Plus Plus Plus" Brexit White Paper plan that was blocked from Downing Street  
An excellent piece by @lawyers4britain, exposing the chequers deal for what it really is- a load of Brexit-undermining claptrap.  
HOPE not hate has decided to campaign against a hard Brexit, because we believe it will make Britain poorer and much more unequal, creating conditions that will make a far-right surge more likely. Read why we're against a hard Brexit:  
The Bow Group have certainly been busy; of course Nigel Farage also turned up for this particular soirée yesterday - Bannon, Farage, Aliot, no doubt some of the other dregs of far right society - let's hope @GCHQ were too! … 
So winnable ...only thing to fear is fear itself ..last time we started at 28% and put on 17% ... This time demographics and Brexit-horror-show and a strident campaign and Scotland becomes a normal nation. #indyref2 
Scottish and Catalan leaders @NicolaSturgeon and @QuimTorraiPla call on Spain to agree the terms of an independence referendum in #Catalonia #Catalunya #Cataluña 
EXCLUSIVE. DexEU’s Alternative Brexit White Paper – Canada Plus Plus Plus. 2) Agricultural, food, and fish products. Outcome equivalence.  
Scotland wants the SNP government to be focused on schools and hospitals, not another referendum that creates false divisions between working class people when the real divide is between the richest and the rest of us.Labour offers real change, the SNP only offer referendums.  
Very convenient for the Foreign Office establishment that pro-Brexit and Trump-friendly former UK ambassador to the US @SirSocks was assaulted and hospitalised y’day just before his series of TV interviews talking about how we should be pro-US, pro-NATO and get on with Brexit. 
Lest we forget...Amidst the pathetic shambles of May’s betrayal and handling of Brexit, we shouldn’t lose sight of the fact that Labour are totally at sea on this whole subject. Cretinous and clueless.  Not once has Labour shown even a glimmer of credibility on Brexit.  
Theresa May’s plan for a “common rule book” with the EU effectively prohibits a post-Brexit free trade deal with India, a confidential report suggests  
NEW: @SimonClarkeMP tells me he will not vote for Chequers plan as it stands and PM has left party torn between keeping Corbyn out and fighting for Brexit. “Nobody should be under any illusions. People in Conservative Party feel very strongly about this and will not compromise”.  
The original DExU plan for a proper Brexit has been revealed, and former minister @BrexitStewart asks who put the kibosh on it. Gee, with Europhiles like @OllyRobbins and @GavinBarwell in No. 10, it's a complete mystery!   
New poll makes it clear @theresa_may #Brexit deal is not supported. We need a #PeoplesVote on the final deal to take back control 
If she can go back on a referendum win, can we go back to the last election and choose someone else? 
Additional information on @KRLS Puigdemont:The Spanish Government admited that ZERO euros were used by the Catalan Government for the referendum.Can Germany risk extraditing an innocent man to be 12 years in prison for a non-existent misuse of funds?! 
I think it's clear from the comments that your 'Civil service lead' Deal doesn't respect what people voted for. Please resign and let some one who wants to honour the vote take us into a positive future outside the EU. You clearly are not capable #Brexit #MayMustGo 
Just 13% of the British public believe Theresa May's Brexit proposal will be good for Britain. We think the public should have the right to reject it via a #peoplesvote. Agree? Share this post 
Don't be fooled by the Ultras' opposition to it. Chequers would not be a soft Brexit.  
Journalists had a lock-in and were fully briefed on the Brexit White Paper  in @DExEUgov at 9am this morning. MPs and the public won’t get it until after @DominicRaab has made a statement around 1pm. Is this deliberate to try to avoid detailed difficult questions? 
Your Brexit deal for Britain is•not agreed by your own party, let alone parliament, the EU or ‘the people’•disrespectful of NI, Scotland, the service sector, the people you ignore.... •undeliverable as it stands, so good luck dealing with the hardest hurdle.... reality. 
Important:President @KRLS Puigdemont remains free and rebellion charges have been rejected. Means Catalan politicians have been 9 months in jail for fake charges!!Now appellation on misuse of funds will begin. Could be rejected too as zero euros were used for the referendum.  
Trump administration has pursued a predatory policy toward Britain designed to capitalize on the UK’s need for new trading arrangements after Brexit  
UK, Survation poll:Scottish Independence Referendum18-24 | YES 71%, NO 29%25-34 | YES 63%, NO 37%35-44 | YES 54%, NO 46%45-54 | YES 46%, NO 54%55-64 | YES 36%, NO 64%65+     | YES 31%, NO 69%Field work: 05/07/18–10/07/18Sample size: 1,002#indyref2 #Brexit #ScotRef 
WORRYING: New Brexit Secretary refuses to rule out preferential access for EU migrants.Says it will be subject to negotiation. 
Merkel alone does not have the power to ‘give’ Britain a Brexit deal. Let’s establish that. The UK negotiates with the Commission who gets its orders from a commonly agreed position of the EU-27. 
BREXIT FURY: Shock claim May said plan 'can't be changed because MERKEL has cleared it'  
Really bored of the left circling back once again to "we must support the white enthnonationalist Brexit project but we are really woke, honest" 
Can Humphrys have more days off please @BBCr4today @sarahsands100 - not often you see Brexit Minister and rough ride together  
This Valentine’s Day, take a stand and buy your own chocolate. For you and for teddy bears everywhere. #SetTeddyFree 
Newly-appointed Brexit Secretary on #r4today: “For those that are either criticising or carping or whatever else, they need to come back with credible alternatives.” We carped: What like remaining in the EU & calling off this Brexshit? 
.@VinceCable warns that today’s Brexit white paper likely to show that the UK’s strong services economy has been thrown under a bus as part of the Conservatives’ chaotic compromise #VictoriaLIVE 
The idea that the UK still has a 'special relationship' with the US is a joke. Donald Trump will throw his weight behind a Hard Brexit merely to throw discord at the EU. He isn't concerned for the prosperity of the UK, just America first... #TrumpUKVisit 
This is correct - in economic terms, Chequers is closer to hard than soft Brexit. Myy analysis of the economic impacts here:   
The single most important fact in British politics today: Theresa May does not currently have the votes to pass her Brexit plan even if she could get the European Union to accept it  
There are many parallels between #Trump nationalism and #Brexit. Just look at Theresa May's #HostileEnvironment and Trump's migrant detention centres. We need to draw those parallels and mobilise those outraged about #TrumpUKVisit to join our cause. #StopBrexit will meet them. 
A no-deal Brexit survival guide: what food to stockpile. I expected this from the Sun, but not from the Guardian. Next step, ration books. 
The #Government plans for a No-deal #Brexit show how utterly stupid and chaotic it would be #BrexitChaos 
Over 30% of construction workers in London are EU nationals, who are much younger than their UK counterparts. Apprenticeships have also plummeted since the referendum. Without young & sufficient skilled workers, our aging construction sector is going to be hit hard by #Brexit  
As they ruin Scotland ...the Tories are very worried about another independence referendum they don't want Scots to have opportunities!! We will have #indyref2 
Catholics trying to get into Donegal on the Twelfth after a no deal/hard border Brexit  
The ultra-right currently have the population in a #Brexit cage. They're not voluntarily going to let us out as they know we'd never get back in, as we know we were corruptly tricked into it. It's up to us to break out, and the clock's ticking. A (now) minority like it in here.  
‘@BrexitStewart: Who blocked original Brexit plan and why? @MarcusFysh MP: Plan was consistent with May’s Mansion House speech, new one isn’t. 
Our Brexit deal for Britain respects the will of the British people. And, as Prime Minister, it is the Brexit I am determined to deliver:  
I’ll be on @daily_politics live from 11.30am to 12.30pm talking Brexit and Trump (and maybe the England football team?), so do tune in if you’re in the UK. It’ll be fun to be back on the BBC talking British politics after so long - even if it is about topics that make me despair! 
Half of Scots in favour of second independence referendum.#Fixed that for you .@Daily_Record - you’re welcome. 
Who do you think has determined current UK Government policy on Brexit? 
What does India want from a post-Brexit trade deal? For the UK to lower its food and chemical safety standards. Click the link to read the document Liam Fox didn't want you to see. 
We believe that the Scottish Parliament should have the right to hold another referendum: if there is a significant and material change in the circumstances that prevailed in 2014, such as Scotland being taken out of the EU against our will" #SCOTREF #INDYREF2 #DissolveTheUnion 
Really sad that we're leaving the #EU especially when our politicians lied and acted so deceitfully throughout the referendum campaign. YOU #NigelFarage are a terrible role model for our young people. But your hideous scheme will soon unravel. #Brexit will not come home.   
Nicola Sturgeon [X] call a second referendum on independence...Should, this autumn: 23%Should, not as soon as this autumn: 19%Should not: 49%via Survation, 05 - 10 Jul(Scottish voters) 
One lot of politicians sold a fantasy to win the referendum. Now another lot are selling another fantasy (the deal) to make it happen. Our politics is in the grip of a bizarre form of madness 
Bloomberg reports that the City of London is losing jobs to rival cities as Brexit looms. Financial services are our greatest source of tax-revenue, any loss of dominance will cost our country dearly. Please share. 
#Indyref2 may very well be on the way, but I think before #indref1 happened, another referendum should have been held.Here it is:Do you want Scotland to have full control over its resources? 
DELIBERATELY and KNOWINGLY damaging your country's economy and stability, against expert advice, and based on a referendum result which has been proven to have been gained by CHEATING and breaking the law, is TREASON. #StopBrexit#BrexitScandal#ToryTreason 
May faces a fresh outcry after claims she told Ministers she couldn’t alter her Brexit plan – as she’d “cleared it” with Angela Merkel.Reports claim stunned Cabinet Ministers were given the extraordinary excuse at the crunch Chequers summit last Friday.#BrexitBetrayal 
Well said @Jacob_Rees_Mogg. The British people knew exactly what they voted for. They voted to leave, they didn’t vote to be given a Brexit which meant they were still subject to EU rules. 
Here's an animated version of this week's cover: The Brexit farce. Subscribe here:  
In other words- two years ago, if we'd have been presented with Chequers and told, this is where we're heading-we'd have thought it was a hardish Brexit. Brexiteers won both the referendum and the battle to define what it meant.  
John Redwood: What's wrong with May?#Brexit Statement is based on false premise there is a border problem.It offers:EU “common rulebook”EU tax collection#EU “Mobility” to erode UK border controlThe proposed legal structure is particularly worrying... 
Nobody in Westminster seems to care if, or how, the UK has actually made its decision to leave the EU. Nor do many seem to care if the referendum on which any such decision must have been based  was legal and fair. Oh well, we’ve still got you guys  
So, Brexit voting John Cleese is buggering off to warmer climes, leaving poorer folk who voted Remain, and those like my German wife who were not even allowed to vote, to suffer the consequences. Not so much Lancelot so much as brave, brave, Sir Robin, ay, John? 
@theresa_may for @TheSun: My Brexit plan will let us end freedom of movement, strike our own trade deals and be free of the European court  
Support is up from 2014. Once we know the outcome of the shambles of Brexit we should have every right to decide our future. 47% want Independence according to the poll, the problem you have you know this will only continue to rise. 
‘The great irony of #Brexit is revealing that the United Kingdom already had the best model: EU membership, with a rule-maker’s influence and control’ ⁦@NewStatesman⁩ editorial 
Two resignations: Boris Johnson quits over Prime Minister Theresa May's #Brexit plans  via @ReutersTV 
Well said Gary,Football at least it has put a country together but Boris and Co.with (BREXIT ) I’m not sure before the WORLD CUP England it was LIKE TODAY feeling togetherness .Well done to Southgate and the boys made the country very proud. That’s football   
As @Jon_Danzig writes in his blog, 'If the politicians, and the country, can’t agree on what #Brexit means today, then how could voters have known what Brexit meant in the referendum of over two years ago?' Please RT.  #ExitBrexit #PeoplesVote 
More than half of those who voted for #Brexit don’t think Theresa May’s EU plan respects the referendum result. In the same poll Labour have overtaken the Conservatives, another trend that has been seen since May’s unveiling of her Brexit plan.  
I'm an American and British citizen living in the UK. Let me be clear: Donald Trump is not welcome here. His views are contrary to cherished British values. If post-Brexit Britain is about reasserting our global leadership, this is where we should start. #TrumpVisit 
With London distracted by soccer and Brexit, the president's former strategist has set up shop at a five-star hotel to fuel Europe's surging brand of Trumpism  
Just noticed this from @markpack - nice graph of MORI data showing positive shift in imm attitudes: 1. Ongoing since 2011, so not (just) Brexit effect2. Seen across multiple measures3. Includes substantial decline in share saying "too many immigrants" 
Her betrayal of Brexit has been in slo-mo but people see through it. Unless she is removed and her Merkel endorsed paln scrapped, the Conservatives will lose the next election. Just look at this.  
Donald Trump could voice support for hard Brexit during UK visit, piling pressure on May. Love the Balloon! Lol 
A recent poll by YouGov has shown that 75% of voters think May's Government (and its desire for a soft departure) is making a mess of Brexit. It's time for her to step aside, and let someone with a backbone take the reins. The opportunities are there to be taken!  
Summer disappears, a dejected nation sits nursing hangovers. In the distance a tangerine bigot flies towards the country for no reason. If Brexit could be described with a feeling, it would be today. 
War-gaming the Brexit chaos: What the hell happens now?  
Yes it was a majority of the middle classes, home-owning relatively comfortable pensioners - mainly DTel/Mail readers who liked the xenophobic lies about immigrants. 61% of Brexit campaign was funded by just 5 rich men. Led by OEs and public schoolboys. Elite project from Day One  
May 'flew to Berlin to clear her #Brexit plan with Merkel BEFORE showing cabinet''At Chequers, her responses to suggested changes in her blueprint was to say:'No, that's not possible, because I've already cleared it [existing text] with Mrs Merkel'.'#EU 
Some of Theresa May's "achievements"-Giving Germany control of the UK and pretending that is Brexit-Alienating the United States and stopping a free trade deal-Supporting the rise of Islam across the UK-Making the Conservative Party toxic-Making Corbyn almost electable. 
How quickly we’ve gone from Europe begging us for a deal, Global Britain and #Brexit dividends straight to “so you maaay have to live on horse dripping; it’s patriotic”. 
Made the mistake like 1000s of others in voting tory for the first time ever to get the brexit vote, won't make the same mistake twice @ukip 
When I was a kid we had crap food, tinned vegetables, no money, no foreign holidays and power cuts so I am Brexit ready.. 
"Loyalist" gangs light giant bonfires in East Belfast, burning Irish flags with 'kill catholics' symbols. Police are shot at & cars burned. These are TM's Brexit allies. How low can the Tories stoop? 
Thank you, @BrandonLewis, for your email regarding the Conservative Brexit Plan.  Unfortunately I am unable to support this plan as it has broken the PM's promises on BrexitI feel foolish for having been duped by Mrs May & wait, with great anticipation, to her vacating No. 10. 
CJEU, EU citizenshipNew AG opinion: loss of Dutch nationality (therefore EU citizenship) due to dual nationality and residing abroad ok for adults, but not children (Nb Brexit raises different issues in my view)  
Whether hard or soft, @richardquest was warned: Brexit was inevitable... #ENGCRO #n1info 
Brexit Central: "The government are saying one thing then doing the exact opposite. It's causing MPs to feel they can't trust the Prime Minister, so how that makes the country feel goodness only knows." Watch again ▼@JuliaHB1 | @isaby | @BrexitCentral |  
As Theresa prepares to publish her Brexit white paper it feels like time again for this. And really. I'm so sorry, Scotland. 
Realisation of @theresa_may :- Brexit - Free speech - Making #TommyRobinson known all over the world as the champion of free speech - Making the world know that the UK has become a totalitarian regime which puts dissidents in jail  
May ran on a manifesto to deliver Brexit. She is now ignoring that manifesto and has lied numerous times to Parliament. She has also conspired with foreign Govt’s against her own ministers... that means she has no legitimacy and has acted Treasonously.  
Thailand says Brexit could be positive for trade with Britain  
Labour takes lead in the polls as Theresa May prepares to publish Brexit white paper  
The EU is a paper tiger. It’s pathetic how our politicians - with a few notable exceptions - are so willing to cower rather than face down the EU’s absurd threats.  The EU is in a complete mess and can not afford the consequences of a “punishment” Brexit.   
2018 the UK is planning to make everyone poorer with the need to supply electricity generators on barges, and introduce food rationing.I’d still like to find one single benefit of Brexit for people who are not tax avoiders or looking to strip all employee rights away. Anyone? 
The Brexit White Paper Olly Robbins didn't want you to see has made its way to @ConHome 
Three decades ago, Margaret Thatcher famously retorted: ‘Advisers advise and ministers decide.’ By contrast, for today’s government policy on Brexit, unelected advisers instruct and Theresa May meekly obeys. 
“Rather than folding to the Coalition's lazy predictions of referendum failure, Labor needs to keep ambitions for constitutional reform high... The future of our nations depends on it.” My Op Ed via @smh 
We resist this assault on our rights. Any form of Brexit will leave British women worse off and with fewer rights than our sisters in the rest of Europe. Again, no one sold Brexit this way in the referendum. #StopBrexit #PeoplesVote #FBPE #FBPR #ReSisters 
Listen: @isaby tells @JuliaHB1: If this is a coordinated plot behind closed doors by the establishment to block Brexit then "they are absolutely playing with fire"  
May’s new Brexit plan. There is an alternative – from within the Government. @ConHome publishes extracts from the fullest DexEU White Paper draft today - i.e: from the plan which it worked on but which Downing Street turned down in key respects 
England out. Trump in. Govt's Brexit white paper arrives in Brussels. Home Office tries to bury its Hostile Environment failures in all the bad news. We deserve so much better than this. 
Only one in four Scots want Nicola Sturgeon to call a second independence referendum this autumn. 
A reminder that the Govt has known for some time that maintaining a high quality & reliable food chain post Brexit hasn’t been secured or planned, given our inability to feed the nation ourselves & food imports so dependent on the EU & EU/3rd country deals  
Wildlife & pollution don’t understand borders, so the EU-UK future relationship must protect our environment after #Brexit – new #GreenerUK briefing published here  @GreenerUK_ 
Isn’t it funny that @theresa_may is releasing her #Brexit paper on the day that the divisive Donald Trump arrives.It is like she wants to bury the bad news in the inevitable furore.Don’t fall for it.#MAYMUSTGO 
EXCLUSIVE @ConHome has the fullest draft of DEXEU’s pre-Chequers Brexit White Paper. We’re publishing extracts today:  
My Tory MP going public at last: he fears for the country if we end up with a No Deal #Brexit. He also shared that he's getting 100's of letters from the 'out means out' brigade, so we need to up our game - write (on paper as they have to log them) to your MP TODAY! #StopBrexit 
Perthshire and Angus fields filled with rotting fruit after seasonal worker shortage caused by Tory immigration policies and Brexit  
A  close friend of the US President said: ‘Trump supported Brexit and liked the idea of Britain being independent and not owned by the EU. He has a general distaste for the EU. He thinks Germany secretly controls it.’ 
Jacob Rees-Mogg has said that business leaders should not be trusted with their comments on Brexit because they have a 'vested interest'. Of course JRM has no vested interest at all with his financial dealings and potential profits from a Hard Brexit! #BrexitShambles #r4today 
My thoughts this morning: commiserations to England, it was good while it lasted. Now we can get back to trying to save the country from Brexit. Wouldn’t it be great to see even half of the passion & enthusiasm of the last few days channelled into something that actually matters? 
Can't believe Dominic Raab still trying to use 'can't divulge negotiating strategy' 2 years after referendum.  #r4today 
This is why people should be listening to @M_AndersonSF. Brexit will deny rights to Irish citizens in the 6 counties  
Govt: Brexit will have no downside, only a considerable upside. But you might want to stock up on canned goods and NI may have no electricity.  
Trump is with us for a few days. Brexit is with us forever.  
This @BBCr4today interview with new Brexit Secretary Dominic Raab extraordinary - has so far had nothing to say about a deal for services which makes up 80% of our economy. These sectors are being left out and left behind. The Tory party: anti worker AND now anti business. 
 Support for independence is increasing, according to the latest poll from @Survation in the @Daily_Record:Yes: 47%No: 53%And support among people in having a further opportunity to decide their future in a referendum has risen markedly in the past year. 
Brexit minister Dominic Raab outlining a painfully complicated and arduous post Brexit customs process. Wasn’t leaving EU all about ‘getting rid of red tape’? 
Fewer than one in four Scots wants Nicola Sturgeon to call a second independence referendum in the autumn, according to a poll for the Daily Record.Read more here:  
More hypocrisy and double standards from the Tories who posture about 'Green Brexit' and then side with the industry lobby at the risk of public health  
The Conservative Party squabbles viciously with itself about which half-baked plan based on a criminally fraudulent referendum to implement. 
New Brexit Secretary Dominic Raab on @BBCr4today keeps talking about "avoiding a hard border with Northern Ireland".You'd imagine he means with the Republic. 
POLL: Majority of Leave voters don't think May's plan respects the referendum result. Oh and Labour have overtaken the Conservatives. Tory Brexiteers must put an end to this EU farce.  
‘We read the reports in the English press’ says Modric. As do so many Irish people - and people across Europe - about Brexit  
Journey to the bottom #Brexit #TheresaMay #BorisJohnson #DavidDavis  ⁦@DeGroene⁩ 
Minister in Government on the #Brexit paper:“It feels like it’s been written for Brussels, not for the British people.”Why are we accepting this? #MAYMUSTGO 
Today’s coping strategy is to imagine that the ERG are merely trying to pull off the Reverse-Farage - getting us to a hard Brexit position, devaluing the pound, moving investments, then cancelling Brexit.I have to cling to something. The more natural analysis is: we’re screwed. 
Why is the BBC downplaying the Facebook Brexit scandal? | Jonathan Freedland @BBCr4today @BBCNewsnight 
Donald Trump has a 'distaste for German-run EU' giving BOOST to HARD-Brexit case  
Ministry of Justice gets £17,000,000 to prepare for “no deal” Brexit. Look at how much Brexit has cost us already and it hasn’t even happened; imagine how much it will cost us when (if) it does happen. Make sure you sign the latest petition for the People’s Vote. 
Donald Trump could voice support for hard Brexit during UK visit, piling pressure on May  
If Brexit is not delivered, it will be Theresa May’s Iraq WMD moment  via @Telegraph 
People confuse sovereignty with doing as we please.The WTO have lots of rules and we would need to obey them.If we didn’t have sovereignty we couldn’t have held the referendum in the first place. Ask Scotland about that. 
Not football and not even Brexit - are ‘forces trying to scupper’ the clean up of westminster ? Hear three of those who were brave enough to tell their stories at 0830 on ⁦@BBCr4today⁩ 
Free Movement in all but name is still on the cards.The main reason that we voted for #Brexit has been betrayed by @theresa_may.Why are MPs and ministers tarnishing themselves with this betrayal? It will have disastrous consequences.#MAYMUSTGO 
Dear Mrs May @theresa_may,  your MPs are not behind you, Vote Leave cheated and broke the law on an advisory referendum. 37% of the electorate voted leave for many many reasons, why should I get behind you and support the worst possible outcome for our country?#Peoplesvote 
World In Motion, lyrically, is forward-looking, positive, and inclusive, while Three Lions is aggrieved, nationalistic, nostalgic, entitled. Wouldn't go so far as to say the latter led directly to Brexit, but let's face facts - it sodding did. 
Brexit Shambles World Cup DefeatDroughtPoisoningsThank goodness there isn't some kind of crazed demagogue flying into the the UK today. That would be the final straw. 
This is your Thurs 12th of July reminder that both Leave campaigns  deliberately broke the law to win the Brexit referendum including possibly treasonThis means@BorisJohnson@michaelgove@Arron_banksBroke the law & should be in jail#VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw#VoteLeaveCheated 
David Davis, the former Brexit Secretary, was told by Mrs May that she could not make changes to the White Paper because "I've already cleared it with Mrs Merkel [Angela Merkel, the German Chancellor]".  via @Telegraph 
Let's not forget that Chris Heaton-Harris (new Brexit Minister) wrote to universities asking for the names of those who teach courses on Brexit and the content of their lectures. It was like something out of a dystopian novel. 
."Northern Ireland does not have the resources to fulfil its energy demands in the event of a no-deal Brexit.". 
Just in case you are stupid enough to still believe Brexit is a good idea...  
A businessman who believes in Britain! Hooray! And his pubs are great too. I shall pop into the nearest Weatherspoons ASAP to toast him and Brexit.   
This week’s Ways to Change the World with Ken Clarke : on his own regrets, the mistakes that led to Brexit, why he’d raise tax, why he cringes when ministers refuse to be interviewed and how to tackle public contempt for politicians  
Mogg is pushing all remainers, whether left, right centrist to join the Tory Party so he can overturn May’s Chequers Brexit (cough) policy. How many will fall for this dangerous nonsense. #JC4PMNow 
You're a good chap @Jacob_Rees_Mogg but your party is run by destructive cultural Marxist globalists who want to overturn Brexit, destroy free speech & teach five year olds about transgenderism.Brexiteers and true conservatives should join @UKIP 
Britain facing 'state of emergency' if no Brexit deal reached by February, Dominic Grieve warns  
Thank you @YvetteCooperMP: we agree that the lack of clarity on free movement is ‘uncertain and unfair’ for the 1.3mn British citizens on the continent. #r4today #WhitePaper #brexit #keepfom @BritishInEurope 
Tell us something we didn't know!"The great irony of Brexit is revealing that the United Kingdom already had the best model: EU membership, with a rule-maker’s influence and control." 
*Opens twitter**Faced with a stream of brexit & Trump news, plus lots of crazy anti-science tweets.**Closes twitter and tends to terrariums* 
Even with a soft #Brexit we pay a £50 billion + divorce fee, lose loads of business and jobs, and are subject to EU laws we have no influence over. Who, in their right mind, would swap what we already have for THAT? 
Our Brexit plan:Negotiations grinding to halt due to ineptitude of those negotiating Key Brexit players disappearing off into sunset when it matters New trade deal with Trump [which may well include your NHS]350 million bus lie No “Brexit Dividend” for NHS#PMQs 
Donald Trump has a 'distaste for German-run EU' giving BOOST to HARD-Brexit case  
If Brexit is not delivered, it will be Theresa May’s Iraq WMD moment  via @Telegraph 
Apologies to everyone for my mistake. Apparently, Ireland has never re-run any EU referendum in order to obtain a different result. My thanks to Our Luis for pointing out this "blatant Brexiter lie".  
The English team have really united the country in the midst of Brexit, resignations et al. They fought a good fight. In other news...Trump is headed my way, might just bump into him at Westminster. 
This country is actually planning to get back to rationing, in case the economy crashes after Brexit. What country plunges a country knowingly into disaster and despondency, which is expected to last for decades?#StopBrexitSaveDemocracy 
A... 'difficult' day ahead for the UK, if you were being diplomatic: - England out of the World Cup - Donald Trump arrives for a much-maligned visit - The Brexit white paper is finally published. 
I hate Trump, but I'm not going on any protest lead by the SWP or the likes of Owen Jones - however generically branded it is. I'm not marching with the very pond-life who support a whole chunk of things Trump supports: Assad, Assange, Brexit, Putin, etc. 
We always knew vested interests would lobby hard to reverse Brexit, says @GiselaStuart 
Instead of skirting around the elephant in the room, lets just halt Brexit and call for a public enquiry about criminal activity during the campaigns - Brexit is shaming us collectively as a nation and around the world. #StopBrexitSaveBritain #VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw 
Raab describes the white paper as “a vision that respects the result of the referendum, and delivers a principled and practical #Brexit”Now he has been promoted, I will describe him as May’s joint t*rd polisher in chief, alongside Fox and Gove.  
Not quite right, the hedge funds shorting British business will make billions from the most damaging possible brexit, including Crispin Odey, Rees Mogg's business partner.  Can't understand why this isn't a huge story. . 
Donald Trump has a 'distaste for German-run EU' giving BOOST to HARD-Brexit case  
Come on Theresa, the whole nation is sad, you know what to do. Today would be a very good day to announce we’re pulling out of Brexit. 
But not nearly so big a gamble or danger as Brexit itself  
For months the #FBPE brigade, mostly Blairite New Labour-types, have been slagging off Jeremy Corbyn for supposedly supporting the Tories on #Brexit. Then, when it comes to the crunch, it turns out those supporting Theresa May are the Blairite MPs, not Corbyn. Funny that.  
After the great "Turkeys Vote for Christmas" referendum result the leaders of the turkies claimed that despite the prospect of decapitation and oven roasting the turkies should stand by their democratic decision  
After the cabinet Brexit bloodbath, what do Remainers do now? Me on a second referendum for @thetimes -  (£) 
Utter bollocks. Missing word?Russia.Just to sum up, Russian bots pushed  #Brexit over the line and you, their asset, are trying deflection.  
Things that aren't coming home:- Football- BrexitThings that are coming home:- ISIS fighters 
Three Eurosceptic Cabinet ministers were very concerned by Brexit white paper yesterday on two areas - the influence of the ECJ and concerns about a climbdown over free movement. They went to No 10 & forced it to make last ditch changes 
‘Let me correct you. There are no beneficiaries from Brexit. It is lose lose.’ Business commentator on @BBCr4today 
England fans (and my kids are as gutted as anyone) - think of how you feel this morning.Now imagine that this sense of loss is accompanied by job losses, food shortages, higher prices, travel chaos, and the knowledge that you don't get to try again in four years' time. #Brexit 
Putin’s dream come true.First Brexit.Then an American president who tears apart NATO for the sake of his own ego.We had better impeach Trump — or learn how to speak Russian.Trump's attacks leave NATO allies in disbelief - CNNPolitics  
#Farmers facing tough post-#Brexit future with plans to remove all income support from #agriculture, with no safety nets. 
I have experienced this innumerable times - the unspoken “oh you’re well-spoken and appear to be middle class so naturally you agree with me that Hillary Clinton is great, Brexit is evil stupidity and the Tories are scum”. The arrogant presumptuousness is off the charts.  
Why is the BBC downplaying the Facebook Brexit scandal? | Jonathan Freedland  
Theresa May will publish 'most significant' Brexit document yet – as Tory rebels vow to defeat it  We get to see the infamous document given by Angela Merkle to PM May which she took to Checkers, locked her MP's in like Kids and ordered them to accept it. 
Did May share her Brexit plan with Merkel BEFORE showing her cabinet?Yes, obviously, David Davis was Not allowed any input! Don’t blame him resigning, Shame it wasn’t May!  
The old ‘“BMW” car nonsense again - constantly disproved but the small matter of truth irrelevant to Jacob....Rees-Mogg says we should ignore the CBI on Brexit: 'They have got everything wrong in their history' | The Independent  
Ahead of Trump's UK visit, strategist/propagandist Steve Bannon set up a war room in London to stir the populist pot. He's conspiring w/ far-right pols Marine Le Pen beau and Brexit boy Nigel Farage to “contextualize Trump” for European media who hate him.  
Brexit reaching new depths of idiocyGovernment stockpiles foodBarges with generators on board to provide electricity to NIHow long before they pass an Emergency Powers Act ?Rationing ? Curfews ? Food Riots ?Stop this stupidity now 
The most interesting reflections on Brexit and its fallout come in books that address the subject only indirectly  
In his resignation letter, Boris Johnson said the Brexit “dream is dying, suffocated by needless self-doubt.”  
So now in backing a deeply flawed #Brexit which can only leave us Poorer, Weaker with Less Control & Fewer Rights Corbyn's Labour will be backing decades of austerity...#PeoplesVote to give everyone a #FinalSay with a #StopBrexit option #Remain 
WTF !!!?In the event of a No Deal Brexit, a flotilla of barges would be sent to the coast of Northern Ireland with energy generators to keep the region’s lights on.How the hell are we even considering this?#LeaversAreLoonies#FBPE 
fyi - some additional infonot covered in FT story on new Cambridge Analytica company Auspex Int'l run by Mark Turnbull @carolecadwalla @annmarlowe @profcarroll @chrisinsilico @brexit_sham @peterjukes @J_amesp @EmmaLBriant @ProfessorShaw @shahmiruk 
Nationalism or Populism “is a return to the status quo, not this sort of Globalism on acid we’ve grown accustomed to.” -@RaheemKassam #NATO #AmericaFirst #MAGA #Brexit  
You know Theresa you really got to stop trying to pull the wool over our eyes like old Jim hacker. You pretend to have a hard Brexit if the E.U don't except your proposals. But you know they will because you already giving them EVERYTHING they want. your party's doomed  DOOMED! 
EVERYONE IN #britain go BUY #americanidiot on iTunes!! It's currently at #3 LETS MAKE IT #1!! SHOW TRUMP JUST HOW MUCH WE HATE HIM! It's only 59p!!! Also stream it on Spotify! :) #fucktrump #dumptrump #trumpuk #trumpvisit #trumpukvisit #lgbtq #gay #lovetrumpshate #brexit #london 
John Cleese saying he's leaving Brexit Britain after having pushed and voted for it is sadly not a stand alone case.For every retiree who mirrors him, there are several of us younger people who voted against leaving and are now stuck here.Some of us didn't get a vote at all. 
With London distracted by soccer and Brexit, the president’s former strategist has set up shop at a five-star hotel to fuel Europe’s surging brand of Trumpism. 
What is the point of Brexit then? What is the actual point of Liam Fox’s department for international trade then? I give up even trying to understand the logic behind it all because I’m begging to suspect there isn’t one.  
#TheresaMay working tirelessly behind the scenes for a Good (TURD) #Brexit Deal with the #Germans oops....I mean the EU! But she does have lots of supporters for her #ChequersPlan.. There is Zippy, Bungle and George! #MayMustGo #BBC #SKY @LBC #LBC @ConHome @CCHQPress @theresa_may 
Not just Corbyn, it's against conference-agreed Brexit policy. Blair is telling MPs to ignore Labour policy, defy the membership, betray promises to the electorate, forget the Starmer criteria and run up a straw man for the Tories to shred without seeing May's hand. Blair Idiocy. 
#DavidDavis was told by #TheresaMay that she could not change the plan because ‘I have already cleared it with #AngelaMerkel’. Imagine #Chamberlain telling #Churchill: ‘I am sorry. I cannot change our defense strategy because I have already cleared it with #AdolfHitler! - #BREXIT  
Donald Trump is welcomed by some in U.K. amid Brexit jitters.PM MAY will be gone soon because she is anti-Brexit.We don't like globalist May,  but AMERICANS treated her with respect.UK be ashamed! 
1,000 new members joined #UKIP in June, another 2,000 in July already, post-#Chequers surge. #Brexiteers are clearly furious with #TheresaMay’s handling of #Brexit.  #MayMustGo #BBC #SKY @LBC #LBC @ConHome @CCHQPress @theresa_may #Tory #UK @michaelgove 
Jacob Rees-Mogg has called on Conservative voters who oppose Theresa May's Brexit deal to join the party and challenge it from within. What should Theresa May do about this rebellion? #DarrenOnLBC 
Some Britons welcoming Trump, renewal of 'special relationship' amid Brexit jitters  
Why is the BBC downplaying the Facebook Brexit scandal? | Jonathan Freedland  
Whilst our abject grey dishrag PM Mrs May is betraying Brexit and jinxing our brave football team out of the World Cup the sexy patriotic PM of Croatia is having a bromance with President Trump! pic.twitter.com/QSXbWieO0y 
Brexit: debating the future - we are stuck in a rut, an indictment of the entire system in the UK, from politicians and media, to think tanks, academics, policy wonks and industry groups. None are contributing anything constructive to the debate... . 
About time ! @GeraintDaviesMP Why aren't more MPs not calling for #Brexit referendum to be declared null and void.  
I'm not calling you out for voting Leave, you couldn't have possibly known how things would have turned out.I am calling you out if you support Brexit now. You are either already rich or a moron, check your bank balance.#Peoplesvote 
I see @OwenJones84 is rightly exercised over Trump's visit to the UK, but silent over the gross breaches of electoral law which led to Trump-supported Brexit. 
Almost half of UK workers worry Brexit will ruin their chances of finding a job abroad  
Tories slither in to save McVey from being sanctioned like a #UniversalCredit claimant.Scathing attacks from Labour & SNP MPs were rebuffed by Tory MPs living in a dream world.McVey smirks as she escapes a wage cut#Brexit #PMQs  
#quote"Outrage as Theresa May‘told Ministers Brexit plan can’t be changed as Angela Merkel cleared it’ Reports claim stunned Cabinet Ministers were given the extraordinary excuse at the Chequers summit"One wonders how Churchill might have taken such news. 
.@Nigel_Farage on Brexit ahead of @POTUS' London visit: "People want to control their own borders, make their own laws, be a normal nation, not be run by a bunch of bureaucrats based in Brussels." #TheStory 
The Brexit referendum wasn’t free or fair. Laws were broken. A proper investigation needs to be carried out.Good to see @darrenpjones MP call for a judge-led inquiry - it must be set up urgently. 
100% yes. Labour will never deliver Brexit - we need to take back control of the conservatives and ensure they do what is right.  
Do not listen to the media. A vast portion of the U.K loves our POTUS. #MAGA #BREXIT #FakeNews  The people that voted Brexit are  MAGA.  
2 recent surveys (one conducted by OMA itself &other by COD): >2/3rds of ON MDs want voluntary OMA duesOMA refuses referendum vote b/c they know they’ll lose their $54M/yr cash cow. Instead, corrupt OMA’s implementing draconian Code of Conduct to silence MDs#ExposeOMA #onpoli 
Amazing to hear ⁦@acgrayling⁩ at ⁦@obhampstead⁩ on how we are winning over public opinion to reverse BrexitMPs are looking for an excuse to kill off #BrexitShambles.Spread the message about the #PeoplesVoteMarch on #20Oct to show how you feel about it. 
Tensions deepen as rebels warn Theresa May more ministers are ready to resign over Brexit  
Macedonia will become NATO's 30th member state, though its people must first back the deal with Greece in a referendum.  
.@USAmbUK Woody Johnson on Brexit: "It really boils down to sovereignty. If you can't control your borders, you lose a certain amount of that national sovereignty." #TheStory 
Wow! Incredible figures from Northern Ireland (normally excluded mainstream Brexit polling).71% in NI would now vote for Remain. That is up a huge 15% since the EUref.This added to the 4% increase for Remain in the rest of the UK would likely lead to a clear vote to stay now.  
Britain facing 'state of emergency' if no Brexit deal reached by February, Dominic Grieve warns  
It was probably ill-advised, Dawn. It was just the "right side of history"talk  & the deafening silence about huge overlaps between Trump & Brexit. Same companies.Same data. Same people. Sorry for offence, Owen. Good luck on yr rally. & let me know if you'd like to find out more 
The Tories want the economy to die so their mates can buy everything up on the cheap. #BrexitCorbyn wants the economy to die so he can nationalise what’s left of it. #BrexitThe rest of us just want to live in a decent country and have jobs. Who do we vote for? 
The Brexit good news keeps coming  
If Brexit is not delivered, it will be Theresa May’s Iraq WMD moment 
Maria Caulfield: Brexiteers cannot remain silent as a contemptuous cabal in No 10 betrays the referendum vote 
Patrick voted leave as, although he was not a big brexit backer, he thought remain would win regardless and wanted a close result to give the Tory party a bloody nose.@PatomalO6 so many people voted in protest just like you, thanks for speaking out! Let's get a #PeoplesVote 
Something about Trump-Russia has suddenly spooked the Brexit leaders into resigning  
We're out of the World Cup. And soon we'll be out of the EU too... Why Brexit isn't good news for the UK car industry...     
Did you vote leave in the 2016 #euref? When you did, did you contemplate that this could mean a no deal brexit that would mean the govt stockpiling canned goods & medical supplies? No. Well do you know what, it's ok to change your mind, be #remainernow  … 
Now imagine you discovered that Croatia cheated with the help of the Russians and nobody at FIFA cared or was willing to listen. Welcome to Brexit land logic. 
Britain’s economy has slowed to a standstill, largely because of Brexit  
Trump meets Maywhat to expect as Britain deal with its own political turmoil as the Establishment tries to steal the will of the people - soft Brexit?@RealDrGina@IamJohnBurnett 
So can we get this straight, please: it’s the year 2018 and a government in a European country is seriously contemplating *choosing* a situation — no deal Brexit — where it needs a flotilla of barges to keep the lights on?!  
I've fixed everything. I just led England to victory on FIFA 18... Next up, I'm gonna build a Downing Street replica on the Sims and tackle Brexit. #ENGCRO @iainlee #TLNA 
This tweet encapsulates the difficulty for labour voters. Jeremy Corbyn has said the #Brexit ship has sailed. It will happen. And labour MP Kate Hoey rudely ridicules a politician who is reaching out to the UK. It seems democracy in labour is being  confused with dictatorship  
Scottish people type like Neanderthals, bottled their own independence referendum and spent the last two weeks being so insecure they started supporting whoever played England. We win. 
Brexit and the psychology of the fans thinking England would win the world cup are both; motivated by the absurd and futile fantasy of regaining a lost imperial greatness. 
Outstanding @Telegraph article by @AllisterHeath.If the Brexit clearly voted for is not delivered, it will be Theresa May's Iraq WMD moment, & will lead to the complete breakdown of public trust in democracy & thus to permanent political crisis. 
YER FUCKIN EMPIRE IS OVER, HAHA.YOU'RE OUT THE WORLD CUP.BREXIT IS LIKE AN ENEMY ATTACK, EXCEPT YOU DID IT TO YOURSELVES.A LAUGHING STOCK.HAHA! #ENG 
Lost like 8 followers by bringing up Brexit lol. Look I know you all think I should stick to robots and shit but I don't have any other creative outlet anymore so a couple of mild drunken political rants are gonna slip out and if you can't manage that you can fuck off 
Back home with the dogs,don’t know what I would do without them?? This is the time I miss Melinda most,enjoyed winding everybody up about Trump @ Brexit Radio is saving my sanity and so are you guys thanks . 
Selmayr. Europe's leading idiot. Honestly, hard Brexit now.  
Silver lining: at least now football's not coming home can see what other memes the British public can come up with. Might I humbly suggest- Trump not welcome- The Govt. is in flames- Let's stop Brexit please 
Again what will it take for the @Conservatives to get rid of this abysmal prime minister. @theresa_may HAS to GO. For the sake of our country. #MayOut #MayResign #MayMustGo #BrexitBetrayal #Brexit  
John Cleese is leaving the UK because of Brexit  
Outrage as Theresa May reveals she can NOT change her Brexit plan as Angela Merkel cleared it  
‘referendums should normally take place once the relevant legislation has been passed. If a referendum takes place without detailed plans for change being set out, a further vote should be held once they are.’  
brexit still means brexit if you were wondering 
At a time where Brexit divides us & politicians shame us, these young, multi ethnic lads & unite the nation. Gutted to have fallen short but so many positives & as for @GarethSouthgate, true gent. I’ve been a proud Manc many times but tonight I’m a proud Englishman  
It's the beginning of authoritarianism in both cases. We either have rule of law or we don't. But...I take your point about being uncollegiate. And I certainly didn't mean it like that. What I mean is: this is our country, our laws, our parliament, our Brexit, our fault 
UK, YouGov poll:LAB-S&D: 39%CON-ECR: 37% (-2)LDEM-ALDE: 9%Field work: 10/07/18 – 11/07/18Sample size: 1,732#Brexit 
"The past few days have laid bare a suicidal determination in our political class to ignore the will of the people. They believe they know better, and so they are shamelessly, yet covertly, trying to overturn the EU referendum’s Leave result."Must-read. 
How can I look my voters in the eye if I accept Theresa May's Brexit deal? 
Scotland couldn’t even win a referendum to leave us, that’s how much their country secretly rims the English 
Just a reminder that if we continue along this foolish path, there will be no entry into the EU for at least A DECADE. By that time you could ve living in a destitute country. Remember most of us are just a few missed pay packets away from sleeping rough. Can we afford #Brexit ?! 
COMMENT OF THE DAY: Brexit’s coming home.  
.@Reuters focuses in on @theresa_may, the reserved prime minister shaping #Brexit. A creature of habit, she often has the same chicken salad from sandwich chain Pret a Manger  
Its s familiar Tory tactic. Can't deliver broadband...SNP's faultCan't deliver Brexit...The Irish are to blame 
Downing Street run by 'small cabal' who hold #Brexiteers in contempt, says ex-vice-chairman. A mass revolt is predicted against May's "catastrophically bad" #Brexit plan, which will be a "disaster for the Conservative Party".  via @Telegraph 
Soon the British people will get a change to tell #Trump exactly what we think about himDon't miss this opportunity We can show him what #democracy looks like and hopefully some of our leaders will recognise it as well @jeremycorbyn#ResistUK #BrexitBetrayal #Brexit  
ICYMI: Boris Johnson quits over Prime Minister Theresa May's #Brexit plans  via @ReutersTV 
The sooner Scotland breaks away from this SHAMBOLIC TORY BREXIT SHAMBLES the better.The government is about to start stockpiling processed food in case of ‘no deal’ BrexitRead more at:  
In tomorrow's National ... Lesley Riddoch on Brexit blundering and what it means for indyref2  
UK accused of 'green Brexit hypocrisy' over regulation of suspected carcinogen  
England: Out.Johnson: Twat.Brexit: Big pile of shit.May: Fucking useless.Trump: Stupid orange twat. Rees Mogg: Massive useless twat.Apart from that, everything is fucking peachy. 
JRM: May's Chequers U-turn "fails to deliver on the Prime Minister's explicit promise that #Brexit would mean Brexit and I think when people say things to voters they must deliver on them."  
“This World Cup run comes in the context of Brexit… The country has been very divided, so it is particularly welcome… for us to find some collective object we can get behind,” says author David Goodhart.@David_Goodhart | #newsnight | #WorldCup 
Bloody loved the last few weeks. Bloody loved them.The countries in a fucking mess, Brexit shambles. And Gareth & the boys came along and gave hope, happiness and pride. And it was bloody brilliant.Thank you Gareth Sports Personality of the year!! 
Terrorists. Grenfell. Brexit. Nothing but doom and gloom for the last few years.It was great to forget about all that for a few weeks.It was great to have hope, pride, belief, and happiness.The weather. The beer. The football. It's been incredible.Thank you @England 
"Last week, on the 70th birthday of the NHS, the IEA described the service as an “international laggard”, adding that “it is time to look to the social health insurance systems in Europe”. 
David Davis’ closest aide blasts Theresa May over her ‘Hotel California’ Brexit vision  
@OwenJones84 was still cheer leading & waving his pom-poms for @jeremycorbyn as Jezza turned a blind-eye to the blatant disregard of democracy & derogated proper opposition party responsibility & Britain sunk under the weight of a corrupt Brexit 
OK. I was a strong Remainer. I'm now backing a pragmatic, soft-Brexit. But @MartinSelmayr can do one. 
Tory plan for Brexit is generators on barges in the Irish Sea. This is panic by the UK government. Sheer incompetence. Simply not up to the job. If you can’t cope @theresa_may resign and call a general election. 
I am an uneducated man from the Midlands but I can tell when we are being sold down the river. May's remainers never intended to implement a proper Brexit 
How can I look my voters in the eye if I accept Theresa May's Brexit deal?     Great article from @mariacaulfield 
Bit like her weeping about 'Daddy's farms having no seasonal workers picking the berries" - well that's a fecking consequence of Tories #HostileEnvironment and #Brexit - "daddy needs migrants HomeSecretary to pick the fruit for jam" 
Protesting another country's government is so easy, @owenjones. What did you do when it was uncovered that serious crimes had been committed in the referendum? What did the Labour Party do?  
Now that the England World Cup dream is over, let's all come together as one  country to overturn Brexit and bring unity. 
Brexit has made remainers the most pro-EU people in Europe. EU friends, appreciate what you have, not perfect but better that the alternatives. 
Not gonna lie, I’m a little relieved we’ve been spared the countless thinkpieces on how ‘Brexit Has Successfully Defined What It Is To Be English And Reestablished Bulldog Sovereignty and *THAT* Is Why We Won the World Cup’(You were thinking it too...) 
Local @BBCNews in the North West just did a piece on Brexit and May’s proposal. They went to a place 60% in favour of leaving. Interviewed half a dozen members of the public and a businessman in favour of leave. One person who was in favour of remain. A remain area tomorrow? No. 
Good to see young people in our local area who don't want Brexit :)  
What I’ve learnt in the last 4 wks is this: in the era of @realDonaldTrump @Nigel_Farage @BorisJohnson & Brexit, we’re better as a nation when we embrace the honesty, honour and optimism of @GarethSouthgate etc, instead of the other mob who drag us down. 
The one individual who will be most disappointed about #England dropping out will be @theresa_may No fig leaf can now hide the appalling, disease ridden, shrivelled up crotch which is #Brexit 
And the inevitable outcome of the Chequers deal starts to take effect#Brexit  
Oh well @England There’s always the #Brexit stuff to take your mind off things.By the way, how has that been going? 
Brexit is over for another 4 years #CROvENG #Worldcup2018Russia #UNLOLLE 
Today at @CommonsEUexit I quizzed  @carolinenokes on whether it’s fair for #EUcitizens in the UK to have to pay for settled status after #Brexit @The3Million 
If the referendum has exposed anything it is the fact that London doesn't know that the rest of the country exists. 
What a delightful man #GarethSouthgate is. Love his reflective modest interviews. Someone intelligent and thoughtful to lead an anti #Brexit backlash? 
Second referendum, anyone?  
Is it Because of Brexit that Football can't come Home? 
So stock up on tinned food, camping stove, candles, 759 trade deals, nuclear medicine and an aviation safety agency and Brexit will be a grand success. 
This is MartinMartin is Juncker's senior Eurocrat at the European commissionMartin sums up the EU's insular hidebound pomposityDon't be like Martin...#worldcup #ENGCRO #Brexit  
Brexit complete.  
You are WRONG. T'May, and EU-shill Olly Robbins, colluded, & contrived to mislead the country; shared 'confidential' State plans with a foreign power, 'which cabinet weren't privy to', and completely IGNORED manifesto commitment: "Brexit MEANS Brexit" NOT #BRINO#MayMustGoNow 
So if Tories. Lib Dems and New Labour Whingers all vote for a Tory Brexit. That leaves Labour as the only party voting no. #FunnyHowThingsTurnOut 
Jacob Rees-Mogg promises Leave dream NOT dead but says Theresa May must ABOLISH her Brexit plan  
This is what they think of us. This man is the second most powerful man in the EU Commission. Remind me again how Remain would win that second referendum?  
a disgraceful brextremist  headline which shames @telegraph & Im glad I no longer read it. Its descent into the use of such inflammatory and dangerous language should concern all sensible Brits! Don't entirely agree with @theresa_may Brexit policy but such language is offensive  
Could we do a David Davis & negotiate a bespoke deal just for 'us' with Fifa - that could allow us to get the same benefits of winning the #WorldCup without actually winning it? #Brexit 
Unlike your Brexit car crash  
FREQUENTLY USED ENGLAND JOKES:1) World Cup Brexit2) Hard Brexit3) England is Coming Home4) It’s not Coming Home 5) Harry Kane playing or Lookalike from TV?6) The Harry Kane lookalike would play better than Harry Kane.7) They could sure use those beers at Hyde Park now. 
I've changed my mind. Hard Brexit now.  
Suspect this will really help the "people's referendum" lot ....  
England gets sent home early, you might even call it...a BREXIT...  
.⁦@YouGov⁩: Brexit negotiations going well 13%; badly 75%   
Brilliant #CROENG #BREXIT  
Very pleased to see #bbcnewsten taking seriously the Leave campaign's breach of election rules.At long last!Now please can we have a fair referendum in the form of a #PeoplesVote? 
Every step Tinpot Theresa takes towards a softer 'Brexit Means As Little Brexit As Possible' proposal, is a tacit admission there was little benefit to be gained leaving the EU in the first place.So why continue to do it? 
The first funny Brexit/World Cup joke  
Was depressed as it was after the match tonight (well done England team though proud of you) but this is absolutely staggering....Government plan to secure electricity supplies in NI in event of no brexit deal - put it on a barge....  
Paris predicts it will see an extra 10,000 direct jobs move from London to Paris after Brexit  
England are out. Still, we can enjoy our verdant gardens, Trump's visit, Tory infighting and Brexit. Chin up. 
Dear oh dear you just don’t get it do you. If you betray #Brexit you along with the majority of the @Conservatives party will be out of power for a generation. Not that you care you will leech onto another party. May I suggest @LibDems #MayOut #MayResign #BrexitBetrayal #Brexit  
Absolutely! Problem is some think UK customers will eat more white fish after #Brexit but, sadly, with the hit on the UK economy, they certainly won’t be eating more lobster! @CreelScff 
Ok hard Brexit now  
Brexit removes us from one of the two largest markets in the world. For what?  
The good news is we can look forward to England’s future World Cup success taking our minds off ongoing sodding Brexit in 2022. And 2026. And 2030. And 2034. And 2038. And 2042. And 2046. And 2050. And 2054. And 2058. And 2062. And 2066. And 2070. And 2074. And 2078. And 2082. 
This is what every_single_Labour_MP should be saying as loud & as often as possible Not helping Theresa May to save her useless fucking Gov so it can carry on attacking working class people post Brexit. Any MP who doesn't get that should fucking well resign. Oh, and fuck #FBPE  
Brexit is biggest loss of global power for Britain after the loss of America. Ironically loss of power means loss of sovereignty too. Because we live in integrated world.What baffles me how leaders of both major parties do that?Both are literally destroying the UK for own gain.  
Why is everyone hating on England? What did England ever do to you? Oh right, slavery, colonialism, Brexit, marmite... "carry on". 
Still, at least we've still got Brexit to look forward to...#ControlsComingHome#ENGCRO 
Okay this is the one good Brexit tweet please nobody make another  
10pm updateExclusive YouGov poll- Labour in lead- Public turning sharply again May Chequers deal; leavers says doesn’t respect referendum - Jump in numbers saying May shd quit nowSometimes poll stories don’t matter but if sustained, this serious  
Good riddance. I was sick of the England team's success distracting from the success of Brexit anyway. 
Honest fuck another referendum can we just kick the Scottish out the bitter cunts 
Football is coming home..#Brexit #CroaziaInghilterra 
Now England are out of the World Cup reality has hit.We have no government and Brexit is going south, Its July and I still don’t have a summer body, the bank account has no energy, its forecast rain tomorrow and A-level results day is 36 days away. Dark times are ahead people 
I'm five pints deep and super annoyed so I'd really like to hear why the FUCK ANYONE STILL THINKS BREXIT IS A GOOD IDEA 
No time to dwell though because the normal horror show resumes tomorrow when Mr Trump arrives and the gov deals with the fact that 48 Tory MPs have now written to express no confidence in Mrs May. And of course Brexit, the gift that keeps on taking. Oh well, good while it lasted! 
You don't need a cabinet if you don't have a trophy #Brexit  
AND.... What an example of overcoming adversity. EURO '96 and he's a pariah. 2018, he exemplifies dignity, compassion and determination. (he must have some very cool parents in the background). Now time to put @GarethSouthgate in charge of #brexit. 
Which brings us to some interesting questions:a. As the department responsible for Brexit, how could they NOT know the decision to leave had been taken?6/ 
Britain’s economy has slowed to a standstill, largely because of Brexit  
Thank you @England you bought a divided Brexit nation together, you gave us hope, you showed strength of character... see you at The Euros #threelions 
Two nation states playing one another has nothing to do with the EU and unelected idiots like you. And you wonder why Brexit happened 
Dominic Grieve warns there will be a 'state of emergency' if a Brexit deal isn't reached by February #indybrexitdebate 
Tuesday evening Markle implied support for the outcome of Ireland's historic abortion referendum.  
Just the Brexit White Paper to look forward to now. 
You're going to run out of food. You're going to run out of fuel. Your economy will tank. The rich brexiteers will exercise FoM and go abroad to live. You'll turn on your family, friends and neighbours. You'll still blame the EU instead of yourself. #Brexit 
England’s World Cup semi final exit was rigged to provoke an anti-EU sentiment within the country in order to support a hard brexit in the face of a crumbling Tory government. In this essay I will 
Lost the Semi-Finals, Brexit is happening well atleast we don't have Trum-  
.@PennyMordaunt Time to perk up the nation. Resign & join the fight to deliver #Brexit not #BRINOYou know May’s plan is disastrous. 
Living in the age of Brexit/Trump/Tories, I don’t think our gen has ever felt so powerless about our future. Watching such a young, diverse group of footballers excelling & conducting themselves in the way they did was strangely one of the most hopeful things I’ve seen in years 
Why do politicians do this shit? This from a bloke who wasn't sure whether he supported Aston Villa or West Ham. And will forever be despised for his hapless Brexit performance. Just STFU. 
It's ok, we have a Brexit white paper and the leader of the free world coming tomorrow to cheer us up.... 
Back go politics. #MayOut #MayResign #BrexitBetrayal #Brexit #MayMustGo 
Let' send a message that Sadiq Khan doesn't speak for us... This is OUR COUNTRY! @UnityNewsNet#Brexit #BrexitBetrayal #FreeTommy #TrumpBaby #Trumpballoon #SadiqKhan #London #Commons #C4News #ENGCRO #Labour #TrumpUKVisit #TrumpVisit #geertwilders #EnglandvsCroatia 
Brexit Meets Gravity "So what was the point of Brexit in the first place? Good question. Too bad more people didn’t ask it before the referendum."Indeed.#Brexitshambles 
And now we're faced with spending time with the missus, not being able to use "it's coming home," as an excuse for breaking stuff and bloody Brexit. Sigh. 
twitter mocking england, did i see ur mandem in the semis? no. be quiet. let us despair over the post brexit tragedies we keep facing 
Torn between France,the only African team in the finals,and Croatia, my favourite & underdog I guess Croatia is my team for finals!Meanwhile congrats brits for a good show. Brexit it was! 
The #WorldCup has accomplished three things:1. It's brought us together. I've talked to strangers I wouldn't usually speak to.2. It's shown us the value of dignity and courage in Gareth Southgate's #leadership.3. It's given us something to cheer for in the midst of #Brexit. 
From day 1 @BBCNews  have treated this as a done deal. No questioning nature of advisory referendum even after @David_Cameron resigned & @theresa_may had chance to pause & take stock, BBC let her bulldoze country into crazy position without challenge. #StopBrexitSaveBritain 
Well at least we've got Brexit to look forward to. 
i blame brexit, fuck theresa may  
I’m so inexplicably sad - this actually feels worse than #Brexit  #EnglandvCroatia #WorldCup2018 #EnglandvCroatia #england deserved to get through  well done lads  this is gonna be the whole country #uk tomorrow... #glum unfortunately #Itsnotcomimghome  
Dear @theresa_may, Now would be an ideal time to resign, cancel Brexit and raise the spirit of the nation as a whole. P.s. please give Gareth an OBE 
Fuck. Just Brexit & Love Island now. 
Chin up England there’s always #LoveIsland and #Brexit to cheer us up  
Brexit meddling? Rees-Mogg questions PM meeting with Merkel prior to crunch Chequers talks  
Back To Brexit for the English @hershybru  
England knocked out now lets get that traitor @theresa_may  Knocked out of her brexit betrayal program 
Nah it’s nothing like it!Brexit is like being in the final and voting to leave the match at half time when we’re 3-0 up and then literally shooting each player in the foot  
'It's an embarrassment!' Economist sums up Brexit talks with this BRILLIANT point  
Brexit and Trump come from the same stable. We must oppose them both. Equally x 
You won't win the world cup, but you can at least still stop Brexit#CROENG #Brexit #Johnson #Davis #StayUnited 
Yeah but at least we have Brexit to look forward to........ 
Brexit will hurt more than this, Croatia was just providing the trailer. 
Back to Brexit, then 
Brexit falls through now this. Whole country on the ropes. 
England in the World Cup was just a distraction the last few weeks. Back to brexit we go 
The fundamental practical difficulty that all Brexiteers have faced sinceJune2016 is that dreams of this kind oversimplify a world full of complexity.Brexit was offered as a single liberating proposition, when in fact it involved multi-layered consequences. 
The Tories have voted that animals can't feel pain as part of the EU bill, marking the beginning of our anti-science #Brexit Any pet owning #Leavers out there, you voted for this. 
Anyways that’s what a country that voted for Brexit deserves.... 
What do we have to look forward to in England, now?Donald Trump's visit, tomorrow, then #Brexit... That's it.That's the future for the kids.#ENGCRO 
UK Data Protection Act violations in #ICOReport cast a dark shadow over brexit and Trump. “Bearing in mind SCL Elections is now out of business, the ICO said it might consider taking action against the company's directors.” #CambridgeAnalytica #Emerdata  
England Loss to Croatia Something Something Brexit 
Right, now the rampant patriotism can be put to bed and we can focus on shit that actually matters. Brexit will destroy this country. Winning a world cup would have been wonderful, stopping brexit will be even better. #BrexitShambles 
#Croatia, a small (population 4.2m), an independent country. The #Croatian_Independence_Referendum was held May 1991, with 93% of voters supporting the independence of their country. Now they're in the final of the #World_Cup, facing #France - an independent country for centuries 
Football isn't coming home and suddenly everything is real again. Brexit is happening. Trump is coming on Friday. Life is shit. 
Brexit, 2.0 #ENGCRO 
Sharia May saves a dying UKIP . After Sharia May sold out to the EU on her brexit shambles . Tory voters voted with their feet and and went back to UKIP . Both For Britain and UKIP's membership are soaring .  
Oh, and just a reminder, a crumbling government is about to dump us in the burnt out shell of a brexit plan too. Goodnight 
The Embassy & Amb. @DanMulhall were delighted to host our Head of EU Division & senior Brexit negotiator, Second Secretary General Rory Montgomery. He had a range of political & business meetings with key interlocutors in Washington DC to discuss Brexit & transatlantic relations  
After the match ended I wish the Croatian team had turned to the camera and said “England lost because of brexit” 
Theresa May has abandoned plans for a tight new relationship with the EU in financial services after Brexit  
Don't worry folks, we've always got Brexit. 
BREXIT MEANS BREXIT 
Another 'Brexit boost'.  
Olly Robbins the unelected civil servant who has more power than the PM or MPs over Brexit.  
My friend just said England losing is like Brexit but the racists are also sad  
BREAKING NEWS!!!!BREXIT HAS BEEN FAST FORWARDED DUE TO ENGLANDS DEFEAT, PACK YOUR BAGS PEOPLE WE’RE GOING HOME 
England. Brexit. World cup  
DamnBrits feeling what brexit will feel like earlier than expected 
Good try lads, a good distraction from Brexit and Donald Trump #EnglandvsCroatia #ENGCRO 
BREXIT 
Putin stole the World Cup from #England twice in one yearNot to mention #brexitRough times  
Healthy, white teeth start with strong enamel—and enamel stays strong by brushing 2x daily with Pronamel Strong & Bright toothpaste. @PopSugar 
The only thing coming home this summer is Brexit  #ENG #CRO #WorldCup 
Brexit strikes again!!!  
If that had been on BBC1 England would have won. ITV is Brexit loser TV at its finest. #analysis 
Jacob Rees-Mogg: Tory party will split if Theresa May uses Labour votes to deliver soft Brexit 
That’s what I call a hard Brexit. 
I’m absolutely gutted but I refuse to cry as I’m so so proud of how we’ve played this tournament. The boys brought a divided nation from brexit back together, & Gareth has been our saviour! We overcame our penalties curse; so bring on the Euros  we love you  
Liam Fox warns EU leaders their voters will kick them out if they don't accept May's Brexit deal. This from the government that dare not put the deal to its own voters. #FBPE #StopBrexit 
EVERYONE WHO HATES FOOTBALL YOU GOT YOUR WISH, BACK TO THE MISERY OF SHITTY POLITICS, DEFUNDING THE NHS, INCREASING WEALTH GAPS AND BREXIT ALL DAY EVERY DAY 
.@mariacaulfield: How can I look my voters in the eye if I accept Theresa May's Brexit deal?    
Phrase of the day: World Cup Brexit. Goodnight. 
At least we get another chance in 4 years. It’s not as bad as Brexit 
BREXIT...  
Danish commentary:Fate has been bad on England, first Brexit and now this defeat. 
Gareth and the boys: You did brilliantly. Congrats.Guys shouting Tommy Robinson and Brexit slogans in the pub where my daughter was watching: you didn't deserve it coming home. Go stock up on tinned foods 
It’s fine, England. You’ve got Trump and Brexit to look forward to.  
this is my favourite Brexit #WorldCup 
Brexit debate - LIVE: Jacob Rees-Mogg says Theresa May's Chequers deal will not offer the exit people voted for #indybrexitdebate 
“While we will not be in the final, we look forward to still enjoying the benefits of being in the final”. World Cup in the time of Brexit.*Not a real quote, obviously. 
Of course, the real winner of that game, was Brexit #ENGCRO 
That was the real #Brexit :))Football stayed in exile 
#brexit congrats to   ! Now just  without fascism, nationalism and hate. 
your Brexit joke is awesome. 
Here’s a Brexit that actually makes sense. 
“The darkies cost us the World Cup.” — someone who voted for Brexit. 
Now it’s just Brexit 
First BREXIT now EXIT... 
Brexit means Brexit #vmdk 
Next up in the #WorldCup2018: the Brexit game - England vs. Brussel, and neither can win. 
/ sports fandom: Croatia said to England, “Oh, you want out of the European Union? How about we help you exit this tournament first.” #WorldCup #CROvENG #Brexit 
This means Brexit is cancelled, right? 
On the upside Gareth Southgate can now concentrate on fixing Brexit? 
Back to Brexit 
BREXIT 2.0 
As @MargSchinas prophesized the other day, “football is staying home in the European Union”. For once, SPP’s spin was spot on #Brexit #CROENG #WorldCup 
My cock is hard at the image of the hordes of ruddy-faced gammon walking home with their heads down, their clothes dripping with beer.Brexit's a bust, Tommy Boy's in jail, and it ain't coming home.Fucking great stuff. 
ha, brexit part 2 is funny 
England pulls off a World Cup Brexit. 
Their going home....Brexit!!!#Worldcup2018Russia 
hard to believe this means brexit cannot happen now england but i do not make the rules 
Experts in Exiting. #Brexit 
Thats Brexit! #WorldCup 
How long have all y’all been sitting on these Brexit jokes? 
Dear #Brexit voters:The result of the #Croatia match is *exactly* how it felt when the rest of us found out that you'd f*cked our country in 2016. And THIS game was actually fair and played by the rules. 
Cheer up, #Eng. There’s always Brexit. 
England out, Brexit shambles and still the visit from the orange  blimp. It’s to much to take.  Need a gin  
BREXIT 
I blame #Brexit 
Oh god we’re going to have to talk about Brexit again now 
#Brexit England  
politicians in england talked about wanting a hard brexit so much england brexited right out of the world cup pic.twitter.com/BVxyxZVXVN 
THE REAL BREXIT  
#wk2018 Harde brexit. 
I’m sorry England, atleast you still have your Brexit!? #ENGCRO 
Wow I didn’t think I’d enjoy Brexit this much. 
Brexit metaphor averted.Brexit itself still on. 
First Brexit and now this 
Brexit did this. 
From the World Cup, (•_•) <)   )╯ /    \ \(•_•) (   (>  /    \  (•_•) <)   )>   /    \a Brexit. 
Oh well. At least we’ve got a visit from Trump and Brexit to look forward to. As I say.... I’m not crying  
No more distractions, back to the Brexit betrayal  
Now that’s a hard Brexit. 
#CroaziaInghilterra ... e Brexit fu! 
In the future, when we tell children there was a summer when it didn't rain at all and a genial man in a waistcoat nearly took us to the World Cup Final, they will think we are drunk. And we will be drunk because: Brexit.  #ENGCRO 
well, at least brexit is going well. 
Brexit beboooou!!! 
GOODBYE COLONIZERS BREXIT TF BACK HOME WITH YOUR FOOTBALL LMAOOOOOO#ENGCRO 
Ah well at least we have brexit. 
England went from "Brexit" to "Hou Jou Bek-sit" 
Brexit. #CROENG 
Brexit means semifinals. 
Celebrate England's Brexit from the World Cup for $19.99! 
That was a well executed brexit! 
Brexit 
Hard Brexit #CROENG 
Who said Brexit was difficult?  The football team shows how it's done 
Brexit. 
Brexit ! 
England voted leave. The world cup voted remain. Hard #brexit it is. #ItsNOTcomingHome 
Brexit. #CROENG  vs  
Conquer every drive with the bold performance of the All-New BMW #X5. 
This feels like #Brexit and US elections all over again. #ENGCRO 
Looks like England is about to Brexit the World Cup #ENGCRO 
Britain's stunning World Cup triumph, proving they were just justified in going it alone in #Brexit.Oh wait they were defeated by a European nation with a population of 4 million.#EnglandvsCroatia 
This is the Brexit y'all asked for 
At least we have Brexit to look forward to. 
FINANCIAL TIMES: May ditches hope of keeping City in tight tie up with EU after Brexit #tomorrowspaperstoday 
I see Brexit 
Jacob Rees-Mogg says we should ignore the CBI on Brexit: 'They have got everything wrong in their history' #indybrexitdebate 
Brexit and world cup exit. 
Brexit at the World Cup 
Was this a Brexit metaphor all along 
Fucking Brexit Fucking Trump Fucking Ref Fucking heat Fucking hell. 
We are a few minutes away from  getting flooded with Brexit jokes lads #WorldCup 
Brexit Through the Gift Shop. 
BREXIT! BREXIT!! EXIT! EXIT! EXIT!!!! 
[braces for the deluge of Brexit + World Cup jokes] 
It was on its way home and nearly made it but didn’t get across the channel due to brexit so was left in France  
Honestly the spirit of Brexit is strong here. 
The British public voted for two Tory Governments and Brexit and think they deserved it to come home?  
.@thatginamiller says the saddest part about Brexit is that we are leaving the stage where we should be leading. #indybrexitdebate - Follow live updates  
The only thing that's coming home are the chickens to roost, and Brexit induced recession, and ultimately rickets and shingles across the land #England #ENGCRO #WorldCup 
Both the Brexit vote and — less than six months later — the presidential election of Donald Trump were unprecedented acts of political, social, and economic self-harm, writes @mehdirhasan. 
Brexit. HARD Brexit. 
« Brexit »  
This is what you get for Brexit 
England will be back to brexit tomorrow. All that fake unity shit is over. 
can’t even win the world cup and we want to do a whole brexit 
Now you can Brexit this WorldCup #CROENG 
is this gonna be england's brexit from the world cup 
Hard Brexit. 
Nah, I’m ready for Brexit now 
Croatia making Brexit happen after all 
This means Brexit is canceled right? 
A Government gets elected on a Majority And then ignore the Majority when it comes to BREXIT 
Brexit part 2 
Brexit 
It's like Brexit all over again. 
Pretty clear that several of the England players deliberately missing chances as they're worried about the possibility of a World Cup win facilitating a hard Brexit. Pickford, bitterly opposed to even a customs union, keeping them in it. 
Brexit meddling? Rees-Mogg questions PM meeting with Merkel prior to crunch Chequers talks  
Donald Trump could voice support for hard Brexit during UK visit, piling pressure on May 
*Brexit Explained*  
Dissident republicans were taking pot shots at the police in Derry, now this from loyalists. It’s a very worrying situation in N Ireland right now (but of course I’m just saying that to scare monger over Brexit. Obvs)  
ICYMI: UK Foreign Secretary Boris Johnson quits over Prime Minister Theresa May's #Brexit plans  via @ReutersTV 
Theresa May's trade secretary has admitted that the customs scheme at the heart of her Brexit plan faces legal hurdles at the WTO  
Hey Arron. Your lawyer wrote to .@guyverhofstadt a month ago asking him to delete this tweet and issue a retraction.He hasn't done so.Why don't you sue him? If you don't people might think you really did collude with the Russians to deliver brexit, like he said.  
THIS BREXIT MATCH!!!!  BREXIT MEANS BREXIT   
Tory vice-chairs quit over PM's Brexit plan - the divisions over Brexit means that the people should have a say on the final Brexit deal! #PeoplesVote 
One Englishman fighting for Britain! Jacob Rees-Mogg and Brexit hardliners demand amendments to trade bill  
I haven’t seen England this stressed since 1am Brexit Result Night 
Just been told, under the radar of course that the Joint Emergency Service Interoperability Project has been told to prepare for massive civil unrest due to #Brexit.You could read that one of two ways. But I would imagine every thing going to shit quickly.#PeoplesVote 
This is like how I felt at about 3am on the night of the Brexit vote, or the Trump election, when the reality of what is happening started to hit. #ENGCRO 
“Getting (most of) the cabinet to agree a compromise has taken months & with the #Brexit clock ticking down, @theresa_may is desperate to push onStopping government getting its business through the Commons is the most potent threat the Brexiteers have” 
Overtime for an upcoming Brexit.How typical #CROENG 
Haven’t seen an English team crumble this quickly against European opposition since, well... last Friday at the Brexit talks.  #ENGCRO 
Brexit time 
A hard Brexit may mean Britain's GDP loses up to 7% annually over 15 years, former World Bank chief economist says  
Things more fun than watching the last 10 mins of this #CROENG game will be...* Being stabbed* Getting divorce papers* Getting your knob caught in a zip* #Brexit... generally* Waiting at an airport hungover 
“We're ready to take over Brexit talks right now, says Labour Chair Ian Lavery. He says his party is respected across Europe while Theresa May is a laughing stock”  
IF WE LAYVE THIS CAPPP EMPTIANDED , WE NEED A HARD BREXIT!!1!1 SORRY JUS MA OPINYUN OK! 
@MetroUK @KimSJ “I regularly come across people who say “I thought it was done and dusted” and I think the BBC is contributing to that and it worries me,’ he said. ‘The BBC saying “when” and not “if” makes Brexit sound like an unstoppable juggernaut.“  
If we have Brexit AND an England world cup win then the next Purge movie is gonna be about the UK 
Delingpole: Trump’s Brexit Rebellion Catches Fire in the UK   
Brexit CRISIS: Theresa May has DAYS to save Brexit and HERSELF as no confidence vote looms  
'It's an embarrassment!' Economist sums up Brexit talks with this BRILLIANT point  
It was desperation by the pro-EU "men in grey suits" who run the party to avoid an election campaign & install a puppet leader who, just like William Hague, was set up to fail. They'll do anything to stop #Brexit. May is out of her depth & deluding herself that she's in charge. 
Why have you told all your clients to leave before brexit then? Surely, you should be encouraging them all to come to this great land of unicorn milk & honey you keep describing? Judge a man by his actions, not his words & your actions indicate brexit will be a disaster. 
Hear! Hear! Add the prescience of @sarahkendzior, the research of @RVAwonk, & the passion of @leahmcelrath to this list. And don’t forget black women new who not to trust. #tRumpRussia #Brexit #GOPComplicit 
As Theresa May's grand plan for Brexit faces a new threat tonight - watch all of today's Brexit ups and downs in one minute.  
REES-MOGG leads House of Commons fight back for Brexit. 
You know even if England win the World Cup Brexit is still a stupid idea... 
Ex Tory MP Ann Widdecombe writes in the Daily Express saying there should be no doubt the PM’s proposed Brexit deal means we’re not leaving the EU, we’re remaining in all but name, accepting jurisdiction if ECJ & accepting EU trade rules, in without a say, no brave new world. 
That's because they had been told that Brexit deal would be "the easiest in history" and that we'd thrive and prosper outside the EU. Both statements are lies, but millions believed them. Hence their surprise. Tell me, are you against a #PeoplesVote? Are you scared of asking? 
Watch the Indy Brexit Debate live with Chuka Umunna, Jacob Rees-Mogg, Andrea Leadsom, Gina Miller, Dominic Grieve a…  
Paris may gain an extra 10,000 jobs from London after Brexit, business lobby group says  
BREXIT and the election of @realDonaldTrump are the result of FAILED “elites.” 
The #Commonwealth.No demands, just happy to deal with their friends, like a friend.Any #Brexit which limits our dealings with the Commonwealth is not Brexit & pointless.It's time to rejoin the world & treat our friends better, UK.  
If Maggie were around today, I think her response to @theresa_may’s #Brexit debacle would go a little like this...#MayMustGo #ChequersPlan #Chequers 
"The great irony of Brexit, then, is revealing that the United Kingdom already had the best model: EU membership, with a rule-maker’s influence and control." 
To clarify: England winning the World Cup is absolutely okay compared to Brexit and voting for the Tories. England winning the World Cup is like a tiny itch on your lower back compared to those two offensively irritatig choices. 
does it not bother you then that May was working behind the #brexit departments back with unelected advisors/civil servants & probably Merkel and had no intention of taking notice of her own elected ministers/MPs ?? If it doesnt you are not worth voting for either #sellout 
British politicians like Theresa May who are fighting against BREXIT, are actually fighting against Democracy, + the will of the people They need to be held accountable on Election Day  
#Tory rebels move to derail Theresa May's #Brexit plans with amendments to Customs Bill  
If we win the World Cup, could we exchange it for EU membership in a couple of years time, when we’ve realised what a disaster Brexit is? 
Whatever your views on Brexit, the UK simply does not have - and has never had - a Parliament that reflects its voters.Inside or outside the EU, as long as the UK uses First Past the Post it will be a country governed by the minority, against the express wishes of the majority.  
And Brexit.  
strongly suspect that the Brexit/pint throwing Venn diagram is a circle 
The state of affairs in No.10The Prime Minister blocking the PPS of the #Brexit team from continuing to work for @DominicRaab despite him wanting him to.What is @theresa_may’s problem? What is to hide? The original white paper perhaps? 
Both Brexit and Trump profited not only from the demonization of immigrants, but also from subtle anti-semitism and naked Islamophobia. Both have resulted in a “stark increase” in racism, intolerance, and hate crimes.  
tHe PLanEThE PLaiN#auspol #brexit #ausmedia#wwg1wga #walkaway@OddemocracyA#qanon #cbts 
Yes. It's finally happening.RT @PickardJE: Breaking: Darren Jones, Labour MP for Bristol North West, calls for a judge-led inquiry into the EU referendum following findings by Electoral Commission and Information Commissioner into Leave campaigners #PMQs #brexit 
Brexit:  
In no man's land with no way out: Theresa May's Brexit dilemma - Sky News  
The new Foreign Secretary, Jeremy Hunt, has been revealed as previously supporting a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal  
Brexit - LITERALLY making the UK a f**king sh*t place to live for everyone.Reminder: WE DON'T HAVE TO LEAVE THE EU. No other country is making us. No other country wants us to.Except Russia.Obvs.  
For those of you not watching this ace game, and who want to read my latest on how Brexit & Trump are 2 sides of the same chaotic, dysfunctional, dishonest coin, it just went online.For those of you focused on the football, I don’t blame you. Carry on... 
#QAnon #TheStorm #GreatAwakening #WWG1WGA #IBOR #PatriotsFight #OIGReport #Unredacted @POTUS (5) Also, I hear that POTUS may meet in Scotland with Nigel Farage, the man behind Brexit.  
AS FAR AS I CAN TELL everyone who loves Brexit hates Raheem Sterling. 
European negotiators are relieved that Mrs May seems finally to have acknowledged that Brexit implies trade-offs  
#QAnon #TheStorm #GreatAwakening #WWG1WGA #IBOR #PatriotsFight #OIGReport #Unredacted @POTUS (3) From Brussels, POTUS will procede to London, where globalist-Brexit traitor PM May is in deep internal trouble. POTUS is expected to boost popular support for the Brexit team.  
DELUSIONAL: Fox tells EU leaders they risk being kicked out by their own voters if they reject May's #Brexit plan  
Amid high-profile resignations protesting #Brexit this week, @theresa_may’s grip on power looked tenuous. But it’s not the first time. And she’s carried on before. @Reuters profiles the UK prime minister:  
A great briefing from @alexebarker on possible Brexit scenarios. First 4 all plausible to me, with my money on 3rd- FTA + customs union. Would prefer 4th or 5th (Chequers or EEA) but fear EEA impossible politically in UK.  @CER_EU 
If they win the world cup it will embolden the public consciousness with a false confidence towards a no deal Brexit and they'll all sit on Hadrians wall eating tins of stewed beef and shitting into cling film. 
Trump and Brexit have chaos in common — a symptom of political self-harm  by @mehdirhasan 
take note of the liars, who told everyone they would get a 2nd referendum now in bed with the Tories when is the NEC going to suspend the lot of these traitors who are hell bent on insulting labour, the leader and the membership...  
Some newspaper readers have accused Theresa May of treason over her Brexit plan, do you agree? @Nigel_Farage is live 
#LabourParty  Front bench confirm in the House of Commons... "The #Labour Party DO NOT want an exit from Brexit"Then please join us in our fight! 
Croatia. EU Member. Blue Passport. Take that #Brexit #FBPE 
Correct. The fact she went to Brussels to pick up the Brexit Plan from Angela Merkle just before the meeting at Checkers on Friday shows all of UK she is just a Brussels toady.  
Krishnan Guru-Murthy - How much trouble are we in if #brexit goes ahead next March? Ken Clarke - It could be a car crash... what we have to do is minimise the damage.. we have weakened ourselves politically & economically. #StopBrexit #FBPE #C4News 
This week’s cover: Revolution. The real Brexit drama is just beginning, says @JGForsyth 
At the time of writing, this thread from an account with 335k followers, was 2 days old with 33 retweets.No one believes in Tory Brexit any more, it's a national embarrassment.#PeoplesVote 
Away from #ENGCRO - Furious Tory MPs launch an official bid to block Theresa May's plan for Brexit  
Will the end of May come in July?  Boris Johnson's Brexit bombshell threatens to sink Theresa May#BrExit#BrExitShambles 
Your reminder for today: The referendum was advisory. Democracy did not stop on 23rd June. Protest is a part of democracy. The ballot paper was yes/no, it did not state leaving SM or CU You're welcome.  #FBPE #stopbrexit #VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw pic.twitter.com/nE2bmTDMK0 
Are you going to pay for all the additional transport costs Mr Redwood? It would cost peanuts to import from France, Ireland, Belgium, Portugal, Spain etc compared to the long haul costs of importing from 1000's of miles away. Who absorbs the costs? Ah yes, consumers do. #Brexit  
ANY LABOUR MP WHO CONTRIVES TO VOTE TO KEEP THIS MOST DESPOTIC TORY PARTY SINCE THATCHER IN POWER, WILL "NEVER!" BE FORGIVEN!! IF ANYONE HAS REGRETS ABOUT BREXIT, FORCE A GENERAL ELECTION AND SEE WHAT THE MANIFESTOS PROMISE!  
The Daily Express remains upbeat despite that post-#Brexit power shortage story, courtesy of @PrivateEyeNews 
Ironic how BBC downplaying the Facebook Brexit scandal because it doesn’t want to appear biased makes the organisation appear even more biased!  
Letters: "It is clear for anyone paying attention that Scotland is the last thing on the minds of the UK political parties. They are clueless on Brexit and totally indifferent to its impact on Scotland."  
An overwhelming defeat for the Libdems in their bid for a 2nd referendum.Let's hope this vote puts an end to this 2nd referendum nonsense by remainers. 
Sturgeon calls on the Spanish pm to give Catalonia a referendum ! Bet the Spanish pm will sit and listen to that stupid boot ! Infact she's harbouring a Criminal the Spanish want ! 
So we’re going to go through with Brexit because we’re too embarrassed to admit it was a terrible idea promoted by criminals? Really? 
Why is it that every person who sneers at anti Brexit people like myself for living in a 'middle class bubble' comes off as far more middle class than myself and many other Remainers have ever been? 
While the Brexiters squabble amongst themselves, Labour still talks utter nonsense about a jobs first Brexit.Think 100,000s jobs should leave the UK because of Brexit, then vote for a Brexit party.  
Thanks Billy - Freedom of Movement is a @UKLabour value. The rich will always have FOM cos they will buy it. We MUST oppose Brexit and claim FOM for all not just the 1%  
I am a Conservative member, activist and constituency party chairman and support this call for the party to respect the referendum result and act on the manifesto commitment to leave the EU.It appears we need a new leader to do that.  
TM hoping #Brexit fiasco diverted by World Cup & Trump visit. 1 has country saying “it’s coming home”, the other mostly “just go away” but Trump is right in saying country is in turmoil. Tories have destroyed UK's standing and any cred it thought it had as 'strong & stable' party 
How arrogant of nicola sturgeon to suggest that Spain grant Catalonia an independence referendum.  SNP has lost the diplomatic plot. 
BREXITEERS' REVOLT Theresa May faces Tory rebellion on Brexit as Jacob Rees-Mogg leads bid to formally block Chequers plan.    
This Tory-Labour Brexit coalition really does make tuition fees look very very minor indeed. 
Brexit CRISIS: Theresa May has DAYS to save Brexit and HERSELF as no confidence vote looms.   
Ministers blocked from working on Brexit plan by civil service.     
Richard has been living in a cave for the last 24 months. He must have, if he's convinced that "there has been no new information" since the referendum. Do we laugh or do we cry at such complete ignorance of facts?  
The UK Government is making plans for #nature after #Brexit. Take 1 minute to tell them to restore England's declining #wildlife. #WhyNatureMatters 
What is astonishing here coming from a #brextremist is she is now blaming the voters that she conned into voting for #brexit. Think about that. That is #brexism for you. It's a new level of shitness. #FBPE 
Illegitimate notification to #EU as #PM made decision with NO due diligence. It was based on the decision of the people which is tainted by #fraud and #crime, shrouded in #Russian collusion.Nothing is right about #brexit.  
If England actually win the World Cup, could we cancel Brexit? Asking for a friend. #ENGCRO 
I was interviewed by @BBCWorld recently about Brexit and chose to focus entirely on the issue of cheating and probable illegal behaviour by Vote Leave. Guess what? The beeb chose NOT to use the footage of the interview!  
Brexit - Taking the country back to emergency stockpiles of canned food. 
Boris Johnson’s Brexit was never a dream. It was pure fantasy | Martin Kettle  
Has anyone written about how many Labour MPs might support government on Brexit and all that malarkey? 
Overhead in a Scottish newsroom: "We can let them have their World Cup if they just stop this Brexit thing." 
BBC News gives a platform to any number of far-right con artists but avoids giving adequate time to the Cambridge Analytica / Facebook Brexit and electoral scams. It also calls CA a "data firm" rather than what it is - a far-right election scam machine & eroder of democracy 
John Cleese, who backed Leave in 2016, has announced he's leaving to the Caribbean to escape the "right-wing" government - lamenting the dreadful lies told about NHS funding. Brexit reality is satisfying nobody, time for a #peoplesvote on the deal. 
@Freedland“wider story...about not just suspicious but potentially illegal behaviour by pro-Brexit campaigners in the EU referendum–has struggled2break through in the part of the media with biggest reach,namely the national broadcasters&centrally, the BBC.“ 
At last: an actual Brexit dividend.  
LOOK "The #DWP just admitted a court case it lost will affect thousands of people"Quietly sneaked this out while all eyes were on #Brexit and #PMQs - and the MSM has missed it.Must-read and share widely >>> 
Brexit is evil.Its architects would have us believe this is all about us and our great country.It’s not. It’s a fraud; a plot for a select few to make a lot of money and avoid a lot of tax. And they want us cheering it on til it’s too late#PeoplesVote 
If they end up holding another referendum, there’ll have to be another one after that; if the Remoaners win the Brexiteers will want a decider cos. that’ll only be 1-1; if the Brexiteers win the Remoaners will want it to be the best of five! 
The biggest lie ever told by a British Government.#Brexit @theresa_may @Conservatives @DominicRaab 
The open admission from @patel4witham that Brexit is an act of self-harm that must be carried out because the country voted to self-harm  
I'm a young person in Newcastle and I want Brexit, u don't speak for me  
New Brexit stamps due out tomorrow :)via @OS_Mitchell 
NEW: more from @alexhern on ICO's report & the multiple investigations into the many, many potential dodgy data crimes (official term) in the referendum. This is only the interim report, remember. Investigations are extensive & ongoing.  
Mayors in North of England already taking initiative on ports as no deal Brexit looms. Calling on Welsh Government to prepare proactively as well. Free ports should be considered, including the designation of Broughton Airbus site, so it can continue to trade freely with Europe.  
All we have to do is stockpile corned beef and grow our own turnips. Brexit Sorted.  #DigForBrexitVictory 
People from across the province are telling us why they are fighting to keep our current voting system in this fall's referendum. SHARE this video if you will be joining us in protecting our democracy. SIGN UP to join the fight here:  #keepvotingsimple 
Putin (through Trump) is now trying to blow up or at least weaken NATO. Another in a long string (Brexit, Cal-Exit, Crimea, Catalonia, etc) of unions he's trying to break up to make Russia stronger. The West is in deep shit. 
BREXIT REBELLION: Jacob Rees-Mogg and Brexit hardliners demand amendments to trade bill  
There is no longer any argument that Brexit is a bad idea dreadfully implemented.The only questions now are are MPs acting in the national interest if they implement something that is:- undeliverable;- the result of electoral law breaches;- a goal of Russian policy.  
It seems I’m not thrilled about the new appointment, Dominic Raab, as Brexit Secretary... wanna know why?  
I still can't quite believe that, two years after the vote, we are still waiting for the UK government to actually DEFINE #Brexit and therefore what people voted for (Am I the only one who thinks it would have been better to have defined it before taking a vote on it?) 
The #PeoplesVoteMarch was amazing, with over 100,000 people demanding a vote on the final Brexit deal. But our biggest March yet is still to come! Keep the 20th October free in your diaries!  
Boris Johnson’s Brexit was never a dream. It was pure fantasy | Martin Kettle  
Unbelievable. What if the people realise that they were misled and lied to? That they were sold a pup by unscrupolous chancers? That Brexit is economic suicide? We still carry on? You call this democracy? What you're saying is shameful. Shame on you. 
Voters will not thank Tory MPs if they let Theresa May water Brexit down to a thin gruel. From our Head of Campaigns, @andrew_allison 
BREXITReferendum result was initially RECOGNISED by the UK Government as a decision to take back control of money, laws, borders & taxes. This meant LEAVING the single market & customs union. They are now retreating from this policy, which is contrary to our national interest.  
The tories just lie and lie. Before the referendum they said that the result of the referendum would be delivered. They stated in the leaflet that leaving the EU meant leaving the SM and CU. Liars and Quislings. 
Following up this from yesterday, can reveal that Charity commission is examining whether the IEA has breached charity rules on political independence. Latest @openDemocracy exclusive #Brexit  
Never accuse anyone of #treason, especially a public figure.@TheTelegraph , which is a newspaper, after all, knows how to put things in quotes to indicate that the question asked does not belong to them.This paper is off its chain.#BrexitNutters#TheresaMay#Brexit#Telegraph 
Here's my #ITVNowWhat interview with @Peston, talking about the role of trade unions, the changing world of work, unions in the age of precarious and agency work, Brexit and more. Working people, wherever they work, just want to be treated with respect. 
May has betrayed #Brexit Therefore #Brexiteers owe the Prime Minister no loyalty whatsoever.In fact they owe a duty to democracy and 17.4m people to reciprocate the Prime Minister's treachery and thwart her plans for #BRINO#MayMustGo 
Scrap Brexit - Because 'NOBODY VOTED TO BE POORER!  
Another example of what was not known in 2016 - and why the British people need to have the final say on any deal, with the option of an exit from Brexit.  
It is daily an affront to me that the man who expelled me for “bringing the party into disrepute” can play the wrecking ball against Labour. It is obscene that he can seek to wreck the possibility of implementing the referendum result with a Labour card and £100M in his pocket. 
#Brexit negotiations described with one word? Challenge accepted…  
There are two issues concerning Parliament. 1. Brexit. 2. Firing May. She has betrayed us all, but even Brexiteers are saying they just want the policy amended and not for her to go. Strange. Seems like a debating club where they all stay friends and don’t want to hurt each other 
In a democracy there is no final vote. It is a core democratic right to oppose any government policy no matter how it was arrived at and to seek to garner enough public & political support to overturn it. Where this right ends so does democracy.#PeoplesVote #StopBrexit #Brexit  
"James O'Brien Gets Schooled On Brexit By A Farmer From Devon"Listen all the way through ans realise the hard brexit is the deliberate destruction of the UK and all it stands for#VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw 
MUST-READ: Former @TheGreenParty leader @natalieben explains why a #peoplesvote (not a politicians vote) on the Brexit deal is the best way forward for the nation.  
Furious Tory MPs launch an official bid to block Theresa May's plan for Brexit 
I'll say one thing for the Lib Dems, in terms of their Brexit policy at least they're all singing from the same hymm sheet.None of this, one MP says this, another says that. The policy was decided as a ref on the deal with option to remain and they've stuck by that, even now. 
First @donnyc1975, now the farmer from Devon. @mrjamesob keeps finding nuggets n the see of nonsense that is #Brexit  
Tim Martin: EU is a protectionist system that imposes high tariffs on non-EU imports such as wine, rice, coffee, oranges, children's shoes & clothes & 12,000 other products!Leaving #EU allows UK to dismantle tariff walls & improve living standards#Brexit 
What?! Hang on, your promise was to "maintain and enhance environmental promises" as we #Brexit Michael. @friends_earth we're going to hold you to that, and this comment is very worrying 
Tory MP: "She could have had any Brexit deal she wanted with a majority of 17." 
BREXIT IS A CRIME.See the photos from last night's #AddressTheNation project with @illuminator99, where we projected statements about the state of the UK onto Parliament: 
Second referendum plan defeated by 299 - 13  : Watch the debate highlights here:  
I am very happy to pray in aid the support of the outgoing Brexit Secretary, and the incoming one, for a final say on the deal and the chance to #ExitfromBrexit 
Delingpole: Trump’s Brexit Rebellion Catches Fire in the UK   
Want to stand up to Brexit? Join the Lib Dems at our Autumn Conference in Brighton.Register today:  
Just in case you know anyone who’s blasé about no deal, show them this  Brexit will literally break Britain. Time for a #PeoplesVote to see how many Sun readers really fancy living off baked beans for six months... #StopBrexit #ReSisters 
MP demands judge-led inquiry into Brexit after launch of criminal investigations  And about feckin'time too!!!  
The future of the Conservative Party depends on the electorate perceiving that the UK leaves the EU. If Brexit does not equal Brexit in the minds of the public they will punish the Conservatives for ever 
This World Cup has changed me. Three weeks ago I associated any sort of national pride with Brexit, now I feel like if you cut me I’d bleed gravy 
Brexit CRISIS: Theresa May has DAYS to save Brexit and HERSELF as no confidence vote looms  
I agree with everything Owen Jones says here. And I’d also agree with what he would be saying if the word ‘Brexit’ is appropriately substituted for ‘Trump’ throughout.  
For a moment we forget Brexit, Trump and the rise of the right. Heroes quietly live alongside us - invisible, selfless, true. Thank you, doctors and divers for the reminder that humanity is capable of greatness when unshackled from politics, religion and greed. #ThaiCaveRescue 
Eurosceptics are tabling 4 amendments to the Cross Border Trade Bill, which is due to be debated in the Commons next week, in a bid to challenge 'Brino' - Brexit In Name Only  
Leavers are waking up to the fact that the Brexit fantasy is overThe great irony of Brexit, then, is revealing that the United Kingdom already had the best model: EU membership, with a rule-maker’s influence and control.#FBPE#PeoplesVote 
I have been told that I undersell this “treasure trove” of comprehensive #Brexit facts.Please could you RT and encourage others to access this “amazing” “unique” “incomparable” and ”very useful”  resource .Thanks!  
Our Government’s plans for a No Deal Brexit include putting mobile electricity generators brought back from Afghanistan onto barges in the Irish Sea, so that the lights can stay on in Northern Ireland.Welcome to Britain 2018.  
The only chance to prevent this #Brexit catastrophe becoming another Suez is, like in 1940, to change Prime Minister – for in doing so a lesson will be learned that the British people are not to be so betrayed for the worthless cause of party unity. 
“The British people have been duped by Brexit shysters” is now on the Hansard record.  And what is @jeremycorbyn doing about it? Fuck all. 
In the referendum, the Mail, Sun and Express ran lots of false stories.With a #PeoplesVote looking increasingly likely, it’s vital that press regulation is improved – both to discourage falsehoods, and to correct them prominently and fast. 
Having listened attentively to Liam Fox on the Chequers plan I can say with absolute certainty that it has a zero percent chance of being accepted by Brussels.#Brexit 
Something about Trump-Russia has suddenly spooked Brexit leaders into resigning:  
The fourth amendment looks technical (see relevant sections of the Bill) but would effectively prevent the UK from remaining part of the EU's VAT area after Brexit, signed by @cmackinlay @patel4witham @Jacob_Rees_Mogg @johnredwood @DKShrewsbury @MarcusFysh +1 other 
Here's Barry Humphries coming out as @RemainerNow:“I voted in favour of Brexit and I would reverse my vote now if I could.” Why? “Because I have changed my mind. There is a lot to be said for a European solidarity that includes Britain.”' 
What would you prefer to come home? #WorldCup #Brexit 
Good to see several Labour MPs calling for in investigation into a possibly illegal Brexit referendum. When will @jeremycorbyn @tom_watson and @Keir_Starmer endorse this investigation? 
We will also all be asked "What did you do to stop the destruction of our Economy that is #Brexit ?"What will you say Owen? #PeoplesVote 
Zapiro on Boris Johnson’s resignation over Brexit cabinet agreement - Political Cartoon Gallery in Putney  
.@SebGorka: There are many reasons Brexit occurred, but the largest is the immigration insanity and its effect on British culture and national security  
New @GreenerUK_ paper argues future EU-UK relationship must protect our environment after #Brexit, with a non-regression clause and commitments to co-operate  
Ministers Are Said Blocked From Working on Brexit Plan: ITV 
Here are five Brexit truths that belong in any Brexit discussion #PeoplesVote#FBPE 
If the Government wanted to protect low paid workers from having their wages undercut by immigrant workers it would be trumpeting this law, which it would implement today.  But Brexit is not about rights or freedoms; it's about dismantling worker protections to generate profit  
"Our #politicians are on the verge of being loathed" @Nigel_Farage on the depth of anger in the country over #TheresaMay's #fake #Brexit and the #politicalclass who are enabling her betrayal!   #MayMustGo @Conservatives #BBC #SKY 
Wow.Confirmation this is no longer about what’s best for our country.The attempt to close down debate -  coupled with the inevitable shock when people discover Brexit isn’t what they were sold - will do far more damage to our politics than anything else we do from here on in.  
*Ministers draw up secret plans to stockpile processed food in case of a ‘no deal’ Brexit* Wow - and here we were thinking that they're doing nothing at all to sort out the #BrexitShambles How safe does this make you feel...#GE2018Now 
Sin é. Niall Murphy @KRWLaw & others.We MUST all be loud in our relevant sectors in the north of Ireland.It is critical that we protect individual rights, investment, trade & jobs. We are not the Brits collateral! Irish Govt. need to not bow down in this respect either!#brexit  
Theresa May's Chequers dream is slowly dying, suffocated by its Brexit critics 
If the Labour front bench "respect the result" of a referendum that was purely advisory, why won't they listen to & respect the advice of the almost 50% of voters who voted Remain? #WeaselWords #PartyBeforeCountry 
Delighted to be @DExEUgov & grateful for the outstanding work of @DavidDavisMP and @SteveBakerHW – very much looking forward to getting on with the job of delivering #Brexit 
Please, please , please can we have President Trump do the Brexit negotiations for us ? He knows how to negotiate... not like our career MP’s and Civil Servants! 
Isn't it a shame we havn't got a Trump. Walks straight into NATO meeting lays into Merkel and Germany the man don't give a Toss. If they think they will offend him with a stupid balloon dream on tossers. Hope he chats to his mates Boris And Farage and lends some weight on Brexit. 
While Jeremy Corbyn and the shadow cabinet flatly refuse to prop up Theresa May and her farce of a #Brexit deal, the Blairite rump on the backbenches are only too happy to offer her their support. Not that AC Grayling has noticed. He's too busy slagging off Corbyn, as per usual.  
“What lessons could the England team teach this shambles of a government?”Shadow Foreign Secretary EmilyThornberry makes a football joke, after two Conservative cabinet members resigned this week. Tory MP David Lidington responded by emphasising the party’s Brexit game plan.  
This is such a perverted view! ‘Forget whether Brexit is good or bad (because it’s seriously rubbish) and back the politicians even if they are complete twats (as they are) because you voted for them a while ago (& you’re not allowed to change your mind!)  
There's a certain irony that the Labour MPs, activists and anti-Brexit campaigners like Carole Cadwalladr, who argue the referendum isn't valid because of Cambridge Analytica, are ignoring reports on Labour's use of data found to be illegally obtained. 
Exclusive: Ministers blocked from working on Government's Brexit plan by civil service as furious tussle between ministers and the negotiating team leads to nine different iterations of White Paper being produced | By @ITV @carldinnen 
So... and I mean this. Well done Brexit-voters. You did actually manage to reform the EU. You helped create a fairer EU that will likely be stronger as a result. 
The EU passed a law, in May, which means that from 2020, no EU country can let big businesses use Free Movement to get cheap labour from abroad to undercut wages.But don't worry... Brexit would take us out of that so the Tories can slash workers' rights and lower real income. 
Anyone still bleating "Respect the referendum result" is condoning cheating and breaking the law. Shameful. #PeoplesVote 
Can anyone confirm Mrs May has been given a week to drop her brexit plan or be forced into a vote of no confidence ? Another GE ?= crash out by “ mistake “ ( as mogg said ) .. what’s the point of running a business in this country anymore . They’ll stop at nothing to leave 
Brexit supporting Conservative @nigelmp puts it to the International Trade Secretary Liam Fox that there's been a "capitulation and a sell-out" by the Cabinet to the EU. #ChequersPlan 
#TheresaMay is #GUILTY of High #TREASON against the CROWN, #BRITAIN & its PEOPLE! She has betrayed the #UK and is collaborating with Foreign Powers namely GERMANY to overthrow a #Democratic Vote! She should be #prosecuted under the #TreasonAct1351 & #TreasonFelonyAct1848! #BREXIT  
Theresa May faces Tory rebellion on Brexit as Jacob Rees-Mogg leads bid to formally block Chequers plan  
it's looking increasingly as we feared; May will be challenged for leadership and lose to sodding jacob rees mogg, STEP UP the campaign people, the fight to stop Brexit will get worse before it gets better, no time for complacency, we all must do everything we can!! #StopBrexit 
I follow those I perceive to be patriots, no matter which country. Some day I would love to paint something about BREXIT.  
In 2015, Angela Merkel opened the borders to 'refugees' and massively boosted populist politics across Europe. In 2018, Theresa May tried to cancel Brexit and will boost populist politics in the UK. Two decisions that both leaders will deeply regret. 
I know this will get hit left and right by people who think it is a whacky view, but since October 2016 I've been pretty convinced that the result of the Brexit referendum increased the likelihood of the UK eventually joining the Euro.From nonexistent to low. But still. 
"Eurosceptics led by Jacob Rees-Mogg have tabled four amendments to the Trade Bill, which is due to be debated in the Commons next week, in a bid to challenge what they blast as 'Brino' - Brexit In Name Only."Not sure that's going to be enough.... 
For those of you who don't know @BrexitStewart, he's been a hero to the Brexit cause and was a fantastic MP. Doesn't deserve this kind of treatment from Number 10.  
You could just, call off Brexit and keep the benefits you ready enjoy? Just to state it again, no other country in the EU has the rebate and opt-outs like the UK has now. Its not only the best option, its also the absolutely best deal in the EU, period. 
Indeed.  I am being deliberately and maliciously misrepresented by the Infantile Skwawking Canaries.  They don’t like the fact that I oppose Brexit, I voted against triggering Article 50 and have consistently rebelled against the pro Brexit line of the current Labour leadership.  
I can't make up my mind which disappoints me most.1) The deceit & the con for 2 years, or2) The lack of backbone in Westminster to get #Brexit DONE.Either way, I'll never recover my belief that most MPs are working for the good of the UK, rather than themselves.#DrainTheSwamp 
Russia invades Georgia.NATO response: Russia invades Ukraine.NATO response:Russia crosses Estonia border, captures intel agent.NATO response:Russia intervenes in US, France elections; Brexit referendum.NATO response: Can’t just blame the Germans. 
1. Brexit White Paper contains plan for a 'joint institutional framework'- cabinet source says - Brexiteers not happy, some push even for more edits to document today - concern that additional detail of  paper sketches out even closer relationship with EU than Chequers implied 
excellent. Under the Venice Commision the referendum was illegal.  
EXCLUSIVE: 1,000 new members joined UKIP in June, another 2,000 in July already, post-Chequers surge.Brexiteers are clearly furious with Theresa May’s handling of Brexit.  
Yeah yeah we know  but honestly what did you do? a part from selling our country and our gracious people cheap to EU. I am one of the millions who  voted for Tories and Brexit to be betrayed by a useless and incompetent prime minister like you 
March against #Trump on Friday with @Another_Europe to say no to the government's botched #Brexit:  
This kind of arrogant, obnoxious, condescending and insulting attitude by unelected European bureaucrats like @eucopresident @donaldtusk, only helps to underscore @realDonaldTrump's distrust of #EU & Britain's decision to #Brexit.  
Another scorching bit of analysis by @jonathanchait on Brexit Trump Russia. And here's the thing - Putin announced the Alrosa and Rosneft privatisations at the same time in early 2016, just in time for the EU referendum and the Trump Campaign. Is this just a coincidence?  
sort out your government and brexit and then attempt to get people on your side through patriotism, thank u 
"The government is about to begin stockpiling processed food in case the country is plunged into chaos by a “no deal” #Brexit." But I'm sure we still aren't heading for a 'Mad Max' style post-apocalyptic dystopia...  
"The repeated lies by Banks, and the evidence of the business deal, raises the prospect that Russia used Banks as a pass-through to finance Brexit. And... supports the case for suspicion about Russian intervention in the American election that same year."  
Very worrying warning from a leading Brexit expert, that #Brexit could break up our @NHSengland. A future US/UK trade deal would include US pharmaceutical companies looking for access to our health service. 
A chat today with a local Tory activist lead to interesting findings The activist in Question supported remain and is now in his words depressed and fed up with the current UK Gov under May and terrified of Brexit. His solution still vote Tory! But will vote YES in indyref. 
On the basis that Brexit goes ahead, what do you believe is the best #Brexit plan? Chequers Brexit plan is the best option available, Hague tells Tories - BBC News  @theresa_may @WilliamJHague @Conservatives RETWEET & VOTE  #yourvoicematters 
.@mrjamesob gets schooled on Brexit by a farmer from Devon. This caller is remarkable.  
Theresa May Delays Brexit Negotiations Until Love Island Is Over  
Tony Blair, the man who LIED to people about evidence for the Iraq War is undemocratically calling on #Labour MPs to vote against Corbyn concerning #BrexitI demand Blair is thrown out of Labour Party! 
The usual brilliance from @fotoole:‘If a deal is to be done at all, last vestiges of fantasy Brexit will have to be stripped away & what will be left is a state that has negotiated its way from full partnership to the status of a rule-taking satellite of the EU.’#PeoplesVote 
Young people in Newcastle don't want BrexitRT if you agree with them  
How the hell do the Tory & Labour parties get away with ignoring this blatant attempt to subvert our Democratic processes & probably the Referendum result? And still back a flawed #Brexit already deeply suspect anyway!#PeoplesVote #FinalSayForAll #StopBrexit option #SuspendA50 
Incoming Austrian presidency of the EU Council of ministers says to EP @EPInstitutional committee that #Brexit is a lose-lose situation for both EU and UK - and that only way to have a win-win situation would be to #StopBrexit 
SUPPORT FOR BREXIT Jumps 14% Since 2016 Referendum as Trump Prepares Visit  via @gatewaypundit 36% want to leave the EU, up from 22% in 2015. Those wanting no change fell to 19%, down from 27%. GOODBYE TERESA MAY - good riddance to EU socialism/communism 
The fightback against Theresa May and her warped Brexit plan begins in parliament as @Jacob_Rees_Mogg, @patel4witham and other true Eurosceptics introduce amendments to stop Chequers. They're calling May's bluff! 
Lib Dem motion to secure a second referendum was defeated in the Commons by 299 votes to 13. 
Negative views about migrants falls sharply in Brexit Britain  
strikes me working with Russia to deliver brexit could be described as treason especially when we already an independant nation 
Interesting: Asked if the Chequers proposals will enable Britain to strike new free trade deals after Brexit, Liam Fox says it will “depend on the EU’s response”. 
Put bluntly: Labour backs Tory Brexit - as if the news could get any worse. @tom_watson knows that ANY Brexit will destroy jobs and put rights and freedoms at risk.The cynicism is astounding.  
If you voted for Theresa May in GE2017 and had known then what she had in store for us in her present Brexit proposal. Would you have voted for her?Retweet to your followers to give us a better idea of her popularity wain. 
The Vote Leave shysters cheated and broke the law, the only way they could get their way in the referendum.I do not respect a 'victory' 'won' by cheating and breaking the law.  
I believe the date the EU anti-tax avoidance laws come into force is the date Theresa May has chosen for us to leave the EU. That tells me all I need to know about Brexit. 
PARLIAMENT: @Jacob_Rees_Mogg and Brexiteer MPs have put in amendments to kill off May’s EU plan. “Unfortunately Chequers was a breakdown in trust. Brexit meant Brexit, but now it appears Brexit means remaining subject to European laws.” 
A striking asymmetry: For the UK #Brexit is essentially a NEGOTIATION (with no clarity on what it really wants)for the EU it is a PROCESS requiring the APPLICATION of ITS RULES. #FBPE #StopBrexit 
FORTY BILLION POUNDS FOR HALF A BREXIT is that a deal?  
Precisely that - what people often forget is PM had the election not to ram 'hard brexit' down people's throats, but so that she had the space to compromise that she now doesn't have  
I know I always bore on about it but biggest complication for PM is not Brexit but fact it only takes about 7 tories and a couple of their mates to block govt in Commons  
UK politicians/political journalists are letting the country down by continuing to ignore EFTA/EEA as a basis for #Brexit. It's been *two years* and Remainers and Leavers alike are still misunderstanding and misrepresenting EFTA as a way of leaving the EU. @LeaveHQ @EFTA4UK 1/4 
No @BrandonLewis this heap of garbage does not deliver #Brexit it delivers us #EU vassal status. If this was 1940, you’d be supporting Halifax not Churchill. 
Ex-foreign minister of Kosovo with a warning about the Telegraph's decision to run an article about Theresa May's supposed "treason" over Brexit.  
Tory MP Desmond Swayne on Theresa May's Brexit plan: "It is just madness, I cannot see how I could possibly vote for it"  
CONGRATULATIONS COMRADE ALFRED KETER! Will Ruto tame Nandi Hills MP Alfred Keter, the young brilliant legislator, backed by the Odingas Mois and Kenyattas ahead of the forthcoming coming referendum.... 
A hard Brexit may mean Britain's GDP loses up to 7% annually over 15 years, former World Bank chief economist says  
Why is the #BBC downplaying #Brexit scandal, data abuse & electoral fraud? Because it’s a Tory mouthpiece, run by people like @bbcnickrobinson @afneil and @sarahsands100..? 
Summary:1. Britain has gone to huge trouble to humiliate itself.2. Fortunately, Ireland is very different.3. After all, if an Irish EU referendum goes the wrong way, we simply re-run it until the correct result has been obtained.4. Talk about dignified!5. That's all, folks!  
Retweeted People's Vote UK (@peoplesvote_uk):REVEALED: Video shows the new Foreign Secretary, Jeremy Hunt, declaring his support for a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal, in 2016.Everybody needs to see this. Please RT:  
Croatia isn't a proper country and is shaped like one of Elton John's wigs from the mid 80s. Hard Brexit Harry Maguire with another header to wallop these 
Emily Thornberry attacks 'half-baked' Brexit plan at PMQs  
More should be being said about the vomit inducing sight of Labour MPs running to Theresa May's defence. The same people who have said Jeremy is propping up the Tories over Brexit are now boldly claiming they literally want to do that. And nothing gets done about it? 
From experience, we know the media shy away from complex stories, but this is so enormous, of such magnitude to have intergenerational impact on the whole of the UK, they should make it their priority to inform the nation. 
FARAGE: Huge anger with political establishment over Brexit betrayal.“Our politicians are on the verge of being loathed.” 
LISTEN | "Our politicians are on the verge of being loathed" @Nigel_Farage on the depth of anger in the country over Theresa May's fake Brexit and the political class who are enabling her betrayal.Read at Support us at  
The [British] government is about to start stockpiling processed food in case of ‘no deal’ Brexit  #Referendum2018 #DissolveTheUnion 
When it comes to #Brexit, @BBC seems to have abandoned any commitment to journalistic inquiry. It seems content to offer Football-like commentaries on monoevures inside the Tory Party without any concern for the national interest.   via @Freedland 
How stupid can May & her cronies be. If Sourby is happy with Mays plan then clearly this is all the proof we need to know that brexit is not going to happen. Mays plan has made a lot of remainers very happy. Gina Williams when learning of the plan was struck down by an orgasm !!! 
Very pleased to be able to welcome @RemainerNow into the family with their fantastic new website! Countless people who voted 'leave' in 2016 now believe Brexit won't deliver a positive future for our country - take a look and get involved here:   
Erdogan: “then I jailed hundreds of teachers, journalist, opposition members...”Trump: “then I do the referendum?”  
The Conservatives will be in lombo for years and years to come if the people do not get the Brexit they voted for, Leave Means Leave to all but politicians.  
YOU MUST WATCH THIS - Brilliant @darrenpjones calling out the 'Brexit shysters' whilst asking for a judge-led inquiry into the referendum BUT watch David 'advisory' Lidington mislead the house again by not answering that question then watch the Electoral Commission's position.  
What a shame he’s not doing Brexit for us. Unreal. These people protesting this guy are beyond logic. 
Voters will not thank Tory MPs if they let Theresa May water Brexit down to a thin gruel, writes @andrew_allison 
It goes to show: There’s no appeasing them.The hard Brexiters are offered a damaging hard Brexit, yet they’re still crying ‘betrayal’ that it is not an instant suicide.They’ll never be appeased. They are a dangerous, uncompromising minority. We must fight them & ditch Brexit.  
You can label people "hardline", "Remoaners" or whatever. But you can't escape fundamental choice of Brexit:- stay in European sphere; accept rules but have no say- leave European sphere and decimate living standardsI challenge anyone to argue either is "will of the people".  
1/2: The investigation into #CambridgeAnalytica is tugging at a loose thread that is connected to the very fabric of our society. This scandal isn't just about #Facebook, #Trump, #Brexit, #VoteLeave etc. It is about the way corporate power subverts our democracy to its own ends. pic.twitter.com/XcIBj5Dnmi 
Thank you .@darrenpjones- for standing up & asking for an inquiry into the illegalities of the Brexit scam. #CambridgeAnalytica #voteleavebrokethelaw #VoteLeaveCheated#PMQs 
#PMQsEmily Thornberry: "This week, the govt could have taken a decisive step towards a sensible deal to protect jobs and trade, but we have ended up with them proposing a Dog's Brexit!"John Bercow then shows his true Tory colours and cuts her up.  
Our brexit plan:-Slogans-More slogans-An empty sound bite-Vague wishful thinking-Unattainable aspiration-Meaningless waffle 
Why is the BBC downplaying the Facebook Brexit scandal? | Jonathan Freedland  
Farage right again...............   Farage SHAMES May for giving up on UK's trading dreams - 'Not the Brexit we voted for!'  
Brexit is such agreat idea the government is adopting emergency measures in anticipation    
We asked @gareth_snell #HowWillBrexitBenefitMe?His answer was as bafflingly strange and surreal as #Brexit itself - welcome to Britain 2018!#StopBrexitSaveBritain#SODEMaction 
Facebook, Brexit and the BBC. My take  
JD Wetherspoon boss Tim Martin has attacked Theresa May's #Brexit plan  
Your (actual) Brexit plan:Enforced obeisance to the world's worst people£15bn a year less for public servicesCorrupting our democracy by rewarding cheatsLegislation dictated to us by BrusselsFreeing the Hard Right to remove worker and environmental protections  
“[Brexit] will have an impact for the next 75 years... I do think people should have a say on the terms...”Do you still agree with yourself that we need a #PeoplesVote, @Jeremy_Hunt? 
‘@AnneMarieMorris: Chequers plan is a non-starter, doesn’t deliver Brexit.“It takes away the main benefit that we’re looking for in Brexit which was the economic benefit. The ability to negotiate our own free trade deals.” 
As government makes plans to stockpile food in case of no deal Brexit, Great British Bake Off considers new round involving roadkill and pot noodle.  
At a time when this country is being split apart by Brexit (egged on by hard Brexiteers and their 'traitors' language) its a relief to enjoy something that unites people in a bit of fun. Let's suspend that cynicism, even for a bit? It feels nice! 
How dare you have the gall to talk about Labour’s broken promises on #Brexit?  You have consistently lied to, deceived and betrayed the nation.  You have negotiated nothing, you have capitulated.  The electorate won’t forget - you should be ashamed of yourselves #MayMustGo 
7) Millions of people who seldom engage with politics made an exception to vote in that referendum. Now they’re watching @TheresaMay and her fellow career politicians render their vote worthless. Why should they bother voting for anything ever again? Why should any of us? 
6) As prime minister, #TheresaMay hasn’t got one thing right from the day she took office. She almost threw away a general election she had in the bag, destroying her own majority. She only scraped in because she promised to deliver #Brexit. Now she has reneged on that promise. 
4) They know that if #Brexit is thwarted, this country will be mired in bitter division, with battle lines permanently drawn. No democratic vote will ever be respected again. If our vote doesn’t count, then neither does yours. 
MARTIN: Let’s do Brexit properly and exit EU’s protectionist system. Put this legend in charge of the negotiation!  
Why is the BBC downplaying the Facebook Brexit scandal? | Jonathan Freedland  
This is what Brexit and Leave are forcing us to lose. St Martins, one of the five inhabited islands of the Isles Of Scilly 40 km off the U.K. mainland. Remote. I’m tweeting using the free WiFi in the Community Rooms part financed by the EU. pic.twitter.com/PKL99v35MQ 
"Boris Johnson is one of the worst foreign secretaries we ever had."　Labour's Emily Thornberry says her former counterpart, who resigned over Brexit, "spent all his time looking towards being the Prime Minister pic.twitter.com/KePvpaAozb - #EmilyThornberry #Labour #toriesout 
Our soft fruit industry needs a seasonal workers scheme now if we are to safeguard businesses and avoid fruit rotting in the field. We do not need to wait for Brexit to get a solution - the UK Government can, should and must take action as soon as possible.  
Waste appealing to May & europhile establishment not to betray Brexit for sake of party & democracy.Why'd they care if they destroy democracy & parliament by finally completing Britain being a vassal?Needn't win an election, they'll have finished Britain off despite Brexit!  
If Britain will "win" from Brexit, why did you advise FT readers to take their money out of Britain?  
"Fear of Corbyn" is the most ridiculous argument to support May's Brexit betrayal. If establishment can face down 17.4m Leave voters they can deal w/ Corbyn & McDonnell's adolescent politics w/o skipping a beat. 
The only way Theresa May can save her Brexit plan now is to let the British people vote for it - or to #Remain.This whole sorry mess illustrates that you can’t resolve Brexit in Westminster.So #SuspendA50 and call a #PeoplesVote. 
British democracy died with the Brexit referendum. To bring it back to life, there needs to be a full public inquiry into the illegal activities of the Leave campaign, offences/offenders identified and prosecuted. 
Paris predicts it will see an extra 10,000 direct jobs move from London to Paris after Brexit  
Neil & Kuenssberg condemning Thornberry for forensic questions on the detail of Brexit......and if she'd done all six questions as knockabout they'd equally have condemned her. #PMQs #bbcdp 
Brexit and protests cast shadow over Trump visit to Britain  
(2) Mr Stolliday's new job ? "Head of Strategic Communications" at the "People's Vote" campaign - this New Labour bureaucrat ,who hated grassroots members and democratic votes , is now running the "Second Referendum" campaign ? 
Given the many allegations around Cambridge Analytica,  Leave EU and Vote Leave, we should put Brexit on hold until we know what the hell is going on. You wouldn't drive a car if the garage owner is in the cells for welding two cars together  
Poor @Declanlee13 & his #FBPE gang- sold out by the #LibDems who were supposed to stop Brexit, but instead are calling for a "Government of National Unity" to get May's Brexit through. LibDems sell out for a whiff of power... who'd have thought? :0 
are we supposed to feel sorry for the tories?because we don't!they were warnedthey didn't listenthey should have done as they were toldto ignore the will of the people is to be a criminalTHE PEOPLE WANT BREXITTHEY WANT IT NOW OR THERE WILL BE MORE RESIGNATIONSTRDJ 
Darren Jones - The Electoral Commission has concluded that the leave campaign broke electoral law.. is now not the time to setup a judge lead enquiry into the #brexit referendum because if the British people have been duped by brexit shysters they deserve to know? #PMQS #FBPE 
If the British people were duped by an illegal Brexit referendum, they deserve to know about it. That's why I've called for a judge-led inquiry today. #PMQs #BrexitShambles 
There is so much anger and so many lies about #Brexit, but there is one thing that I am completely clear on, and that is that at the 2016 referendum Nobody Voted To Be Poorer...  
#NATOSummit @realDonaldTrumpYou need to be warned that @theresa_may is a liar.Two years ago she told Brits that #Brexit means we are LEAVING the EU.Now she says #Brexit means STAYING IN the EU.It is the biggest political betrayal in the history of the UK.#BrexitBetrayal 
All I'm hearing from tory MPs on Brexit now is that horrible phrase (the will of the people) no plan or strategy for when we crash out with no deal, they don't care, they have private wealth which will insulate the bastards from their own ideology, we deserve better #PMQS 
Treason?? Seriously @Telegraph, a trial is currently taking place about the attempted murder of an MP. Whatever you think about Brexit, this tweet is dangerous and irresponsible and you should delete it  
“Dog’s Brexit” suggests @EmilyThornberry  “Get behind us and support and work in the common interest, instead of carping from the sidelines”  @DLidington#pmqs  
*Be in no doubt Brexit is dying*  
Breaking: Darren Jones, Labour MP for Bristol North West, calls for a judge-led inquiry into the EU referendum following findings by Electoral Commission and Information Commissioner into Leave campaigners #PMQs #brexit 
Those who have welcomed Mrs May's #ChequersPlan:Anna Soubry Phillip HammondVince Cable Tom Watson Angela MerkelThose who are against it: Nigel FarageDavid DavisBoris Johnson Jacob Rees-MoggStill convinced that "Brexit means Brexit?" 
The Conservatives AND Labour are as bad as each other. Neither want Brexit, and both are more than happy to betray the Great British Public!  
This week, whether it’s UK government in turmoil over BREXIT or Trump destroying NATO - Russia’s Active Measures “Elections” campaign starting in 2015 has been wildly successful at breaking the 2 unions that oppose Putin (NATO & EU) 
Oh look, Simon Hoare MP, who voted Remain, whose constituency voted Leave, who stood on a manifesto promising to implement Brexit, but who now wants @andreajenkyns denied access to social media for wanting to hold Govt to it.#FirstClassSlimeball#PMQs 
Tomorrow's white paper will reveal the details of Theresa May's grotesque Soft Brexit plans. 
“Brexit means Brexit”“OK. What does that mean?”“We’re leaving the EU.”“Yes. We know. But how?”“We’ll leave.”“Right. But how? In detail please? NI border, Gibraltar, Euratom etc etc”“Brexit means Brexit”“No. Not brexit means brexit. Details.”“Brexit means…”Oh. 
Andrew Pierce concludes: 'The election cost May her majority. The row over an equally unelected Robbins and #Brexit could cost May her premiership.'   via @MailOnline 
Brexit should have been a serious warning to the increasingly interventionist European Union to change its ways and should have been negotiated swiftly from the position of strength that the UK had as the second largest net contributor to the EU.  Why did May sell out?    #fo2eu 
Labour's broken promises on Brexit:Their customs union plan would prevent us striking new trade deals around the world.They backed an amendment to the Withdrawal Bill that would mean free movement continuedThey won’t rule out re-running the referendum#PMQs 
Blimey....... @DLidington appeals to @EmilyThornberry to “get behind and support” PMs Brexit strategy.  Not exactly a vote of confidence in Govts ability to push thru PMs Chequers plan #PMQs 
Dear @donaldtusk,This is ignorant, insulting, ungracious and rude. It is also patently untrue. But thank you for your consistent condescension, belligerence and bullying. You are doing the #Brexit cause the world of good.  
Can we make a pact that nobody is allowed to say “Brexit means Brexit” without immediately producing a comprehensive, workable plan that outlines precisely how they’re going to deal with all problems? Thanks.  
Wetherspoons boss Tim Martin attacks PM's Brexit plan - Sky News  
Our Brexit plan:Leaving the EU on 29th March 2019.Taking back control of our borders.New trade deals around the world.No more sending vast sums of money each year to the EU.Supremacy of British courts restored.#PMQs 
Labour says it is ready to take over Brexit negotiations immediately - and would do a better job than the Tories because they have become a “laughing stock” across Europe.@IanLaveryMP @UKLabour 
Something about Trump-Russia has suddenly spooked Brexit leaders into resigning  
Andrew Bridgen MP - "Our activist base is very, very, unhappy, There’s a report out that 60-70% of our activists are very uncomfortable with the proposals put forward at Chequers." #Brexit  
#headline: "The more one learns of the compromises in TM's plans, the more attractive a hard Brexit becomes."Indeed. Just that most of us are struggling to understand why our PM would (apparently) compromise the UK in the first place. Unbecoming. Surreal. 
Theresa May returns to her seaside beat as DCI MARGE DIVIDEND in gritty ITV crime drama, BREXIT THROUGH THE FISH COP.  
Well said @afneil: "It's not a common rule book, it's the EU's rule book!" #PMQs #bbcdp #Brexit 
'Tory MP still in favour of Brexit but it needs to be tailored to suit the needs of her family's farm.' 
#PMQs Liddington says White Paper on Brexit will be put to the British People!!Bingo!! A #PeoplesVote 
There's more to this than meets the eye. Brexit will inevitably be a key issue at the next election and each candidate needs to be tested on the matter. Anyone got any thoughts on how we might make election promises legally binding? Given Theresa's behaviour?  
Labour’s @EmilyThornberry says Tory cabinet chaos resembles ‘Reservoir Dogs remade by the Chuckle Brothers’ #PMQs #Brexit 
Want to know more about our plan for Brexit? Watch thisthen visit  #PMQs 
Italian MP Guglielmo Picchi - "We must not have any type of punitive behaviour towards the UK. "Right to wrong their decision may be, it was taken by the British voters and must be respected. We will support their choice." #Brexit  
My cartoon Wednesday @TheTimes. Self-love (after Velazquez) #BorisJohnsonResigns #Brexit  
The only chance #TheresaMay  has of uniting the country. #Brexit  
Brexit is not a done deal – we have everything to fight for.Join @CarolineLucas and other inspiring speakers on the London leg of the #LeftAgainstBrexit tour tonight  
Senior aide to David Davis accuses Downing Street officials of pursuing a 'Hotel California Brexit' 
I can remember not so long ago tory MPs mocking people who said crashing out of the EU with no deal could lead to food shortages, they were routinely ridiculed, so what is the tory govt doing now? Well they're stockpiling food for a no deal #Brexit, HYPOCRITES #bbcdp #PMQS 
This is a stitch-up and a betrayal. Unless you ditch May, apologise to those who voted for you, and deliver a real Brexit, your party will be smashed to smithereens. Don't know if you understand, in your Westminster bubble, but people are very, very angry. 
Please show your support for this lovely Lady #MariaCaulfield @mariacaulfield #Tory #MP! One of the few who has bothered to put her country first, by resigning, as she can not support #TheresaMay's #Brexit #FudgeDeal! THANK YOU Maria 17,410,742 are with you! #BREXIT #UK #BBC #SKY 
The final pieces of the Great Brexit Smoke & Mirrors jigsaw are assembling rapidly...17.4m people have been played like a Stradivarius...  
I wish he was negotiating brexit for us!  
The #ChequersPlan completely changes the debate on joint governmental frameworks after #Brexit yet Scottish Secretary confirms he did not discuss with Scottish Govt beforehand - his shameful disregard for devolution continues. 
"I'm not joining in on all this childlike, crazy briefing against each other."Ken Clarke MP say the "personal insults" thrown around by politicians during the Brexit process are "a silly waste of time", in the latest Ways to Change the World podcast.  
John, the greatest dividend from Brexit is that it's exposing you, Bone, Mogg and the rest of the swivel-eyed loons as some of the most incompetent, at best, self-interested carpetbaggers, ever to have sat in the commons - quite an achievement considering the competition.  
Brexit reminds me of WW1 when soldiers would run towards machine guns (as per the picture) knowing they were going to die, even though their captains told them to. Yes we voted to leave, but do you honestly want to face disaster?! #EU #Brexit #BrexitChaos #PeoplesVote #WW1 
"It’s not a common rule book, it’s the EU’s rule book” @afneil suggests to @RobertBuckland talking post-Brexit deal #bbcdp 
John Cleese announces he is leaving Britain in protest of ‘awful’ Brexit vote 
Well if anyone had any doubts about labour before, Tom Watson dispelled them earlier.The labour party is supporting Theresa May on brexit.Jeremy can put his superman outfit away. nti brexit labour voters have been shafted.He's not your saviour. He's an enabler for big Theresa. 
The Brexit phoney war is over. There's only one hope for Theresa May now: the Labour Party. My take on the only way Brexit might now finally end and how the Tory party might finally split.  
very much at the Furious Dad Insisting We Are Going To Enjoy This Bloody Holiday phase of Brexit 
Telling that only 13 MPs backed Vince Cable’s call for a second referendum yesterday. A second referendum would be divisive - the public simply want politicians to get on with the job of delivering Brexit 
Bizarrely, this is absolutely true: there is no longer any argument about whether or not Brexit is a good idea, because it plainly, from every possible angle, is a terrible one. It's purely about this crackers, winner-trashes-all version of democracy.  
It’s been just two years since a British politician was murdered on the streets and MPs now face death threats for their views on Brexit. This is utterly irresponsible from the Telegraph.  
If Kirstene Hair really cared about soft fruit farms in Angus, she'd have voted Remain in the EU referendum, rather than abstaining because she couldn't make her mind up.  
Government Ministers are drawing up secret plans to stockpile processed food in case of a ‘no deal’ Brexit - No matter how you voted, no one wanted this! This shows just how bad a no deal #Brexit will be  
Remember tory MP Anne Marie Morris? You know the one that used the N word, she's just popped up on the #bbcdp to give us her thoughts on #Brexit, only a tory could go on this programme and not have these recent comments mentioned, shame on you again @BBC. 
“It does not, in my view, deliver Brexit” @AnneMarieMorris when @afneil asks about backing a deal based on Chequers agreement #bbcdp 
The usual dishonest argument for "no deal". Most of the arguments apply to any form of Brexit. Four of these countries already have or are negotiating FTAs with the EU, and if FTAs are so great, why not aim to have one with the EU, the UK's largest trading partner?  
Tory MP @ABridgen: Not delivering Brexit undermines our democracy.“Our activist base is very, very, unhappy.” 
Brexiters, before people voted:“There are no downsides, only considerable upsides.”“Stop Project Fear.”Brexiters, today:“Start stockpiling canned foods.”Brexit is built on lies and deception. #StopBrexit.   
Just a reminder that we must resist both @realDonaldTrump and #Brexit. I'll be at the #TrumpUKVisit protest in Birmingham on Friday - let's make this demo huge & show that we want co-operation & alignment with our EU friends, not this isolationist, malicious man. #StopTrump #FBR 
Stewart Jackson is an asset to Whitehall - and is a loss to Parliament. Rather than be a SPAD at DexEU he should be made a SPAD at Number 10. He has huge support amongst Remain & Brexit MPs. His skills need to be utilized 
Well worth reading the Sussex University report linked to: "No-one has warned the public that a Food Brexit carries real risks of disruption to sources, prices and quality"  
planning has begun for the Brexit feast  
Brexit is an ideology immune to facts & i think the most effective way forward is to promote the #RemainerNow movement; get Leave voters on tv and in the papers being interviewed explaining why they've changed their minds, present it as patriotic to stay, "we're saving Britain!" 
The doomsayers were proven spectacularly wrong.Brexit is working for the UK.We cannot let Theresa May sabotage what will bring sustained independence & prosperity.  
Ask yourself this:Do you really think that a Theresa May who has so cynically, calculatedly & deviously betrayed the public over an issue as momentous as Brexit would *not* equally insouciantly betray the public over anything else? Could you ever again believe a word she says?  
However many times we debate current state of Brexit, Chequers proposal, Barnier, ERG, Labour, WTO terms whatever, we come back to this: We need honesty from our leaders as soon as possible about the real choice the country faces now.The rest is guff.  
Our/my #Brexit red lines:We leave the #EUNo more payments of £billions for #EU market accessRegain control of our borders#UK courts regain supremacy, not #ECJWe can make free trade deals with other countries 
Christian Adams on the World Cup semi-final and Cabinet resignations over Brexit - Political Cartoon Gallery in Putney  
#Brexit won't give us more sovereignty. Our need for trade will mean we will increasingly become vassal states of some combination of the EU/USA/China. Free trade means overcoming Non-Tariff Barriers and so interference in domestic policy. EU membership does that democratically. 
The fundamental problem is that Brexiters never accepted the 1975 referendum - in which ‘remain’ got 67% - so they spent the following 40 years undermining the EU, spreading lies and misinformation about it in order to make people vote against their own best interests in 2016.  
Here's a single, simple fact the Brexiteers can't escape. They told us, unequivocally, that if we voted for Brexit there was no risk of No Deal. It would not happen. The EU wanted to sell us their cars. So actually, it's No Deal that would be an explicit betrayal of the voters. 
Britain has less than nine months to organize its place in the world outside the EU. @specialreports profiles the prime minister shaping #Brexit – a detail-oriented creature of habit:  
An interesting article about #OllyRobbins by Andrew Pierce.Allegedly Robbins acted as a spy against #DavidDavis reporting back every move to PM.Told EU not to listen to “political noise rather listen to him “Uses #CivilService machinery to frustrate #Brexit #sackhim 
#EUsupergirl hitting the Norwegian press  my only hope is that the rest of Europe is watching and realising what a monumental cock up we are making...#Brexit #Isitworthit  #StopBrexit  
LOL: Sir Vince Cable called for a ‘people’s vote’ second EU referendum...13 MPs were in favour, 299 against. The British people want politicians to focus on delivering independence!  
The USA, with Trumpism; the UK, with Brexit; and Australia, with the endless culture/energy wars - the Anglosphere appears to be in a competition to who can go completely insane first. 
It turns out the EU referendum was criminally corrupted.Time to revoke Article 50, investigate, and prosecute Putin’s little helpers.We need to cancel Brexit before it destroys the United Kingdom 
So the LibDems want to hold May’s hand while she negotiates the hardest Brexit she can currently manage. The same LibDems who sought electoral support by opposing Brexit altogether. Sad decline of a once-principled party. Now anybody’s for the right price. 
This is exactly why Leave voters are angry. Because, despite being vilified for 2 years as xenophobic geriatric half-wits, we know what we voted for. May's #ChequersPlan for #Brexit, even in the 3 page summary, clearly shows she wants us tied to the EU in perpetuity.  
What do we know about the new Brexit secretary?We know he is very close to the secretive think-tank IEA - which doesn't disclose where its money comes from. 
Dear anti-#FBPE Corbynistas, why don't you do something useful and start attacking the kleptocratic network that's trying to replace democracy with kleptocracy. Some names - Trump, Mercer, Murdoch, Putin, Koch, Matthew Elliott, Steve Baker, ERG, IEA, #Legatum #55TuftonSt#Brexit 
Brexiteers always frame FOM as a one way uncontrolled immigration ticket into the UK ignoring the right I've enjoyed as have a lot of my family to live in the EU & they were all unfairly disenfarnchised from voting in the  referendum albeit directly negatively impacted by Brexit  
Tory Leaver Andrew Bridgen challenged and corrected by @adamboultonSKY for lying about food standards. #Brexit #Trump #Toxic 
Terror of Brexit: Will any MP show leadership on immigration?  
We have all  got to put differences behind us.We  need just one #BrexitCoalition candidate in each seat.It is now the ONLY way we can save the Brexit we voted for.It would also put the fear of God into the #REMOANERS in the established parties17.4 million voters are powerful. 
Just when you think a place can’t get any better the Russians constantly outdoing there self brexit as fuck pic.twitter.com/K71q4P9b92 
United Kingdom: ''COURAGEOUS' - Jacob Rees-Mogg PRAISES Boris Johnson and David Davis against soft-Brexit' 
@mrjamesob look at this : un1197 .. vanilla flavouring - must be transported under ADR licence - class 3 flammable - anything from a gram to a Tonne .. comes in from Germany - the adr licence won’t be recognised post brexit : courtesy of my adr book in my van ( on way to Paris )  
A Tory cabinet in civil war or the British public - who do you trust on the final Brexit deal? Let's #SuspendA50 and have a #PeoplesVote@chesterforeu @Liverpool4EU @Mcr4EU @peoplesvote_uk 
I voted Leave to take back control of our laws and to look to the wider world. I don't want an EU-protectionist Brexit. I want a global Brexit.  
Jacob Rees-Mogg presiding over a Brexit No-Deal is the ULTIMATE disaster for IndependenceIf it occurs, i am 99.99% sure the Scottish Parliament will be abolished, removing the legal mechanism to hold a second referendumDirect rule and maintaining the Union are the objectives! 
Wetherspoon boss Tim Martin attacks PM's Brexit plan  
Aaaaaaaaaand that's another Brexit myth busted. It turns out referendums don't make people racist: who would have said? 
Pushing #Brexit through without a #PeoplesVote would:- legitimise and reward electoral crime and rule-breaking.- set a precedent for further electoral rule-breaking.- leave millions regarding #Brexit to have been fraudulently won through crime.#StopBrexit 
Can you imagine a UK that has been raised on BOGOF food offers reacting to food shortages  well? There'll be punch ups in supermarkets, with customers targeting other customers and staff. The stupidity of Black Friday magnified.All because of Brexit.  
Brexit clearly no longer means Brexit, no matter what spin is put on the Chequers Agreement:  #BrexitBetrayal 
The referendum was because David Cameron feared losing the election, losing voters to UKiP. He promised a referendum to bring them back to vote Tory. He never wanted #Brexit and fought against it. As much as some hate Blair, Cameron and May will go down in history as worse PMs. 
All kidding aside, the very best of luck to England in the meaningless World Cup semi-final tonight, what a lot of shite, modern football is a joke, Celtic were the FIRST WINNERS OF THE EUROPEAN CUP EVER fucking Brexit GET TAE FUCK also the gherkin is a fucking stupid building 
“...no longer an argument about whether Brexit was a good idea...” ARE YOU HAVING A FUCKING LAUGH? IF EVEN YOU CAN’T BACK THE THING YOU FUCKING INSISTED WE HAD TO DO, WHY THE FUCK ARE WE DOING IT?  
5 major threats Brexit presents to UK food supplies  
#nationalinterest requires a General Election and a Labour Govt. May's "say one thing, do another" deceit is evident in her appt. of Raab as Brexit Minister. He is as far-right as you can get in Tory Party without actually being UKIP, and ideologically far, far worse than Davies 
October 2016: “There will be no downside to Brexit, only a considerable upside.”July 2018: the govt is putting in place “sensible measures” to prevent food riots.April 2019: Rats are vermin, and a good source of protein. 
The Leave campaigns broke the law, used stolen data, used dark money, hid their true spending and promoted easy-to-prove lies. Imagine if the SNP did all that during the 2014 referendum in Scotland; the BBC would have Sarah Smith live from Holyrood on all UK news. Top story. 
#brexit v #worldcup. UK Cabinet: 23 members - 22 white; one non-white. England world cup squad: 23 members - 12 white, 11 non-white. Which 23 is doing better? Just asking. 
Concessions, Threats, No Confidence: Five Ways ‘Zombie May’ Bungled Brexit  
2016 - abstains in EU referendum because it’s “difficult”2017 - supports the end of free movement of people without giving a second’s thought to what it will do to employers in her constituency2018 - expects credit for finally waking up to her party’s disastrous policies.  
Martin Lewis is the highly respected money expert.Make sure he knows what you think about Brexit in this poll.Please Retweet.@MartinSLewis @Moneybox #MoneyBox @Suewilson91 @BrexitBin @spaceangel1964 @fish_in_a_hat @ChelsClive @Femi_Sorry 
BREXIT CHAOS: Supply of 100 UK medicines to be disrupted, warns EMA /#EU #Brexit #Science #PeoplesVote 
Wondering whether this England team will be immortalised as “The Brexit Babes” x 
It is clear the #EUref result was achieved by massive illegal data fraud & breaking the law in multiple ways by #VoteLeave & #LeaveEUHow long will it take before @BBCNews stops respecting fraud & illegal acts on our democracy?#VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw #VoteLeaveCheated #Brexit  
Labour's stance is, in effect, to legitimise and reward electoral crime for its own political gain. It is deeply depressing to see that Labour shows the same disinterest in protecting democracy as the Tories & the far-right.#StopBrexit #Brexit #PeoplesVote 
The amount of Labour MPs who have been grumbling about Labour's soft Brexit policy who are running to the defence of the Tories soft Brexit is frightening. 
John Cleese on Brexit, newspapers and why he's leaving the UK - BBC News...  via @YouTube 
Just to sum up. 1) The British govt intend to pursue Brexit even though the Leave campaign achieved it illegally. 2) The Labour Party intend to do the same. 3) Neither Tories nor Labour will allow the electorate to have a fair vote on #Brexit.  
This is the whole problem: Brexit was sold, and is still being sold, in entirely ABSTRACT terms: vision, ambition, courage etc. when it’s anything BUT abstract. It’s a practical, technical undertaking with PHYSICAL consequences.  
POLL: Do you have confidence in Theresa May to lead through the brexit negotiations based on the proposed Chequers Brexit agreement? R/t for wider sample. 
If you lose your job because of Brexit (and you probably will), DON'T PANIC!All you need to do is retrain as a merchant banker, M&A lawyer, or whatever else qualifies in the 21st century as a pirate. 
If you have to put disaster planning measures in place for a no deal #Brexit then maybe, just maybe, it means you think it’s going to be a disaster.... #StopBrexit #StopBrexitSaveBritain #PeoplesVote 
The Unite leadership knows the calamitous Tory Brexit will cost their members jobs, but instead of taking action, they have kicked the can down the road. Unfortunately there is not very much road left. Unite could have defended the interests of their members, but chose to dither. 
In 2015 the Tories won a majority.  In 2017, they lost it.  Opinions change in 2 years.   IT'S CALLED DEMOCRACY.  If the will of the people now is pro Brexit now then I'm June Whitfield.  
Reading the replies to this thread, I believe it’s clear that Mrs May has now lost support from most Tories, (myself included). Time for her to be replaced by a true Brexiteer & someone who will stand up to the EU & Brexit properly. My patience has run out.  
With under a year to go until #Brexit, this is a pivotal moment for the environment and the laws that help protect it. Your voice can make a difference – take action now:  #NatureLaws 
But this is wonderful - we can all sleep in the warm tube stations and sing it's a long way to Tipperary - at last Britain will be proud again. Ministers draw up plans to stockpile food in case of 'no deal' Brexit  
I’ve thought of a solution to the Brexit nightmare - negotiate to stay in the EU, but to be out of the single currency.. that means UK is a rule maker and not a ‘colony’.. it solves Irish border question..retains control of currency..and much more besides. I think I’ve cracked it 
This is true.But the 'majority of Brexit voters' have not read what the deal actually is!The White Paper is due out tomorrow and then it depends what the #EU will agree to.  We may well end up walking away.... 
This is nothing short of a stitch-up & people now realise that. Ask @DavidDavisMP whether he knew 80% of Brexit had been agreed a-la-Barnier! 
Her journalism has triggered multiple investigations, into data breaches and illegal spending by Brexit campaigns. She forced action from authorities and watchdogs, who on their own were unable or unwilling to defend our democracy and our rights. 
Grant oh Grant oh Grant - what a completely ridiculous statement. The majority of Brexit voters clearly understand that May's backroom boys & EU Commission have been secretly negotiating this deal. We're supposed to suck it up & be good fellows?! 
The craziest thing in this video, is when the "reasonable one" says that we will get £20 billion for the NHS after Brexit because Theresa May says so, and then when it's pointed out that the government's own impact assessments say there would be LESS money, it becomes #FakeNews. 
After a five-year trial, a member of a neo-Nazi gang has been found guilty of 10 racially-motivated murders.Far-right terrorism is a real, but massively under-reported, threat. #Brexit #StopBrexit #FBPE 
‘When you find yourself in a hole, just stop digging’.... unless you’re the Tory party, in which case you keep going and bury us all.V good from @dsmitheconomics on the impasse that is Brexit.   
Expecting more resignations today, as we’ve seen a few everyday since Sunday, however, the real chaos will unravel tomorrow when May publishes the government white paper on Brexit which is effectively the Chequers Agreement. Leadership challenge close now. #GE2018Now 
Essential reading from @katyballs: why ‘no deal’ is now the most likely it has been since the referendum vote  
Good to see action on @facebook data misuse. But just tip of iceberg on Cambridge analytica #referendum scandal. 
Theresa May has ordered the stockpiling of processed foods in the event of a no deal Brexit. A Keep calm and carry on British WW2 attitude, for something you did to yourself and can reverse or call a second referendum on.  
The fundamental problem is that Parliament has never truly accepted the referendum result.  
Write your MP, now. Please. 1 Facebook fined maximum for breach of data protection law2 Company linked to Cambridge Analytica faces criminal prosecution3 Referendum campaigns under investigation for breach of data protection law  
We can change PM and key Brexit strategies without a GE.  Unless this happens Tories lose millions of votes. She lied .. simples.  She’s also weak  with poor judgement. Change needed pronto.  
BEST. THREAT. EVER. “If you don’t give us a good #Brexit deal we’re going to eat nothing but tinned pilchards, spam and angel delight.” They must be quaking in their boots.  
Don't wish to be cynical BUT, the BBC gave airtime to Matthew Elliott to present a 500 page rebuttal that preceded the Electoral Commission Report into Vote Leave wrongdoing during the EU referendum - a report we're yet to see and Parliament's summer recess begins on 24th July.  
Hahahaha!The #FBPE mob have been well and truly had. “We’ll vote for the @LibDems as they’ll stop Brexit”, they squealed. The @LibDems: “we support a Government of National Unity so @theresa_may can get her Brexit through”. No betrayal like a Lib Dem betrayal. 
2016: "There will be no downsides to #Brexit, only a considerable upside."2018: "Stockpile canned food now." 
Bang-on-target by @TheBluetrot in today's @CityAM.No. 10 Downing Street is no place for a Brexit-Betrayer.A PM who enlists the help of Merkel & the #EU to negotiate against her own Cabinet & the British people is no longer worthy of the office.    
I think the point is that it was always a phony choice (pure Brexit was never really on the table and Remain wasn’t set in stone)and now it’s all about selling the hybrid Bremain Rexit to keep the Tories in power while enacting brutal austerity. #sorted 
2 years of the UK bending over backwards, sideways, upside down, inside out in an effort satisfy the EU in Brexit “negotiations”. On every occasion the EU’s response is “..no, not good enough”, “..insufficient progress”.  Suddenly, after Chequers, Barnier says that the deal is.. 
What's the only thing the government cares about right now? Brexit?What's the only the they'll be dealing with if Brexit happens? Brexit?Will they be fixing the NHS? NoWill they be helping you find decent low-cost housing? NoWill they be investing in Northern & rural jobs? No 
Sky Views: Will there be civil war if Brexit isn't delivered?  
Exclusive statement from DEFRA's new spokesman on Britain's post-Brexit trading future  
Arron Banks is implicated in criminal behaviour within the Leave campaign. Let us Stop Brexit while we can.  
The Brexit situation2016 UK votes to Leave the EU.2018 UK PM agrees to German plan to keep UK in the EU but call it Leave! 
Now we're talking!"U.K. Labour Party open to Brexit referendum if Theresa May's deal fails"#peoplesvote via @bpolitics 
Translation: Brexit is stupid but we have to do it because Brexit-in-some-unspecified-form-or-other won a referendum by an incredibly narrow margin several years ago after a dishonest fraudulent Leave campaign  
Because Corbyn wants a hard Brexit to be outside of EU laws when he constructs the socialist order.  
The options are: The #FlounceOutBrexit of @Jacob_Rees_Mogg (which he and his rich cronies would profit from)A hasty deal (which would satisfy almost nobody and leave us with no power)To realise Brexit was based on lies and remain in the EU (where we have a voice) 
They foresee a potential catastrophe, yet remain determined that #Brexit will happen, deal or no deal. Why is Brexit a more powerful principle than national survival?  
May’s Brexit 'deal' IS Surrender!Of course we need an EU trade deal.BUT trade deals are about tariffs NOT courts & laws.No doubt, May's proposed #Brexit deal means we are NOT Leaving EU.We are staying in all but name, accepting #EU laws & trade rules. 
I don’t want to put a dampener on this story but ....Processed food has flavourings - flavourings come in from Europe - they are also hazardous in their pure form - you need an ADR licence to transport them . The licence won’t be valid post brexit - we have a problem 
And The Sun is apparently reporting this morning that HM govt has ordered stockpiling (tinned food etc) in case of a no deal Brexit. In peacetime! What next, plans for rationing?!? I’m stunned at the extent the UK is prepared to happily fuck itself up (please excuse the language) 
Welsh Labour’s plan for a no-deal Brexit? “Run around in circles screaming” writes @LeanneWood  
It’s time for the Welsh Government to be ambitious about Brexit  
NEW POD: Longest-serving MP Ken Clarke (who's been in the House of Commons for more than double my life-span) is great on why politicians don't and should talk to the media, as well as all that Brexit stuff. Listen to @krishgm's latest interview here: 
At what point did it go from Brexit being the best thing for the country to it just needs to be delivered because the majority asked for it regardless of whether it’s a bad idea or not? 
Five things you need to know about Dominic Raab, the man Theresa May has chosen to lead her Tory Brexit. 
I used to laugh at the rather more excitable remainers who talked of stockpiling tin food for #brexit.It’s now official govt policy.  
I see we’re up to the “stockpile as much canned food as we possibly can” stage of planning for Brexit. This is all going so well. 
Excellent point by @jennirsl @NYtimes that cannot be overstated: Boris Johnson and the rest of the Brexiteer clowns do not have a plan for Brexit, and never did. So it’s not good enough for @UKLabour to keep parroting ‘we must respect the 2016 Referendum’.  
Dear outraged Brexit voters, you should take your anger out on those who sold you a lie (like Boris Johnson and Nigel Farage) not those of us who have consistently pointed our the problems a Brexit vote would bring.  Maybe even consider your own haste and lack of research 
Just to sum up. 1) Facebook broke the law. 2) Cambridge Analytica broke the law. 3) Vote Leave broke the law. 4) LeaveEU broke the law. 5) Brexit and Trump were both won through breaking the law. 6) Facebook let it all happen and covered it up.  
David Pope on Brexit - Political Cartoon Gallery in Putney  
The legacy media in the UK, led by the BBC, are seeking to smooth over the utter choas Theresa May has created by betraying Brexit. They are pretending she is now stronger and fully in control. In truth she is Chemical Ali in a skirt. #MaymustGo 
One week in 2017, new Brexit Minister Chris Heaton-Harris, tried to collate a list of all University lecturers who were talking about Brexit... in the next week he was on a list for being 'inappropriate with female researchers' and 'handsy in a taxi'!! #NastyParty #r4today 
Extraordinary - today's @peoplesvote_uk morning email briefing doesn't give any coverage to yesterday's 3-hour @HouseofCommons debate on @vincecable's motion demanding a, er, "People's Vote" (i.e. a second EU referendum). Could it be because only 13 MPs were willing to back it??? 
Also in the news today, you will find reality has caught up with us as regards the need to stock up tinned food as no deal Brexit looms ever larger.I’ve been reporting on this for over a year and produced this for everyone - something which the government should have done.  
The gov’t is stockpiling food to keep the food and drinks industry afloat in the event of a no-deal scenario. Read it again. Stockpiling food in case we run out. Still think #Brexit is a good idea? #peoplesvote please. 
‘So Robin, we pretend it’s Brexit, but it’s not Brexit, it’s not Remain, it’s all more hybrid than a binary choice, it’s a kind of Remexit, Remixit, Bremain, Rexit, but so long as the Tories stay in power something’s been achieved...have we got any Tory MPs to interview?’ 
Kavanagh writes: 'SO Theresa May did have a plan. It was to steer #Brexit up a well-known creek and leave us without a paddle. As for the voters — the 17.4million “thick and ignorant racists” who backed Brexit in 2016 — who cares about them?'  
So just to sum up, there is now complete cross-party consensus on two questions:1. Brexit will cause untold and possibly irreparable damage to the fabric of British society 2. We’re doing it anyway 
Meanwhile the papers have all splashed on Brexit wrangling. LIKE EVERY OTHER DAY. 
Can we just agree that anyone resigning over Brexit while we're busy with the football renders the referendum result null and void, thanks 
Before the brexit referendum"There'll be no downside to brexit...... Only a considerable upside"Today in the scum (Sun)Government to start stockpiling processed food in case of hard brexit.Spot the difference#VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw#StopBrexitSaveBritain 
now it's the mythical good brexit deal that is the new impossible strategy. it can't happen, it'll be a disaster - except, of course, if i were in charge, in which case everything would have went swimmingly. i understand we need to "get tough" and other bollocks. vote shaun 
How many times do we have to explain this... the referendum *was* advisory, that is what MPs set out *in law*.DC had no authority to say it was legally binding & the leaflet meant nothing *in law*. Might as well have said “govt will provide a lifetime supply of ice cream”. 1/2 
Well @theresa_may may have been able to hoodwink you Andrea but the public aren’t fooled.  This isn’t compromises - it’s capitulation.  It’s not #Brexit at all.  You & other politicians might not stand up against the betrayal but there are many who will #MayMustGo 
The crimes committed by Vote Leave, Leave EU, Facebook and Cambridge Analytica ARE WHY WE HAVE BREXIT.No amount of fines can make-up for a fraud of such a nature.Brexit was the result of corruption and is not the democratic vote that it is being defended as being.  
Mac on way out of Brexit - Political Cartoon Gallery in Putney  
To paraphrase, Dan, you’re saying that remaining in thrall to Brussels is marginally better than independence.  That’s not the Brexit that I’ve spent two decades working for.  
1. Over a year ago, the Information Commissioner's Office, led by Elizabeth Denham, began to explore the use and potential abuse of personal data during the Brexit campaign. 
this is what got us brexit obs. blaming everything on the EU & proclaiming how great everything would be if we left, safe in the knowledge that it would never, ever happen. except, y'know, oops 
My friend isn't happy with me, I lent him 52 quid but when he came to pay it back I asked for 100 quid. I said I was using #Brexit maths where you round up 52 to the nearest hundred.#PeoplesVote #ExitfromBrexit 
Patrick is right. I also think this. They will offer us May's faux Brexit (=Remain) or Remain. This will divide the Brexit side and give the win to Remain. And we remain embedded in the EUSSR. We need to stop this now. Topple May.  
Vote Leave and Leave,eu cheated and broke the law and the firms they used misused our data and broke the lawAt the same time, polling shows Brits think Brexit is a bad idea and definitely don’t want the Tories’ BrexitCase for a #PeoplesVote irrefutable 
Seems like the week to take this #Brexit cartoon for another walk  
Democracy is having the option to reverse democratic decisions when they turn out to be bad ideas, like you just admitted #brexit is.  
I think ground is being laid for a rigged 2nd referendum with the options being May’s vassal state or staying in. Outrage against democracy. 
I think we can now conclude at this point that those remaining in the May cabinet are without exception all prepared to sell out Brexit for the baubles of office and privilege. All little Euro-serfs. 
Dear EU27, we are so confident in our #Brexit negotiating position we have decided to stockpile processed food.Yours sincerely,Theresa May and HM Government  
The Tory Party, a gift that keeps on giving...inappropriate people ministerial roles...Chris Heaton-Harris has been made Brexit Minister. Last yr he sent an ominous note to all universities trying to ascertain which lecturers were talking about Brexit!#Dodgy #NastyParty #r4today 
Oh Michael, do us all a favour. Majority of Brexit voters aren’t buying this argument. It’s a stitch between May’s backroom boys & EU Commission. Enough of blindly supporting TM. Enough. 
John Cleese: I voted for Brexit, which will take away non-wealthy British people’s freedom of movement in 27 European countries.Also John Cleese: I’m a rich Brit and I’m going to use my wealth-based freedom of movement to move to Caribbean. 
Third day running that every letter in the @telegraph has been devoted to #Brexit. The Telegraph's letters editor Christopher Howse writes: "Not since the summer of the MPs' expenses scandal in 2008 has such an angry invasion force taken the Letters page by storm." ⁦  
Something about Trump-Russia has suddenly spooked the Brexit leaders into resigning -  
“Europe has decided to take responsibility for its own security,” says unelected EU Council President Tusk to @realDonaldTrump . Then pay for it, says Brexit Facts4EU team.  Read our #Brexit summary:  
I urge all Conservative Party members to telephone, email, write or visit your local Conservative MP and complain about Theresa May’s awful plan for Brexit. Do it TODAY.....your country needs YOU! 
We're two years into the Brexit process. Can someone, ANYONE, define what a 'good deal' would be? The government can't. Can you?(N.B. Any answers that leave UK businesses at a competitive disadvantage against EU businesses won't be accepted.)#WednesdayWisdom 
When there’s an investigation into multiple crimes (on both sides) of the referendum, I’d love to know why nobody’s saying it may make the whole thing invalid.  
Don’t worry. Corbyn wd never prop up Tories. Unfortunately many of your Blairite #FBPE mates inc Watson care more about bringing down Corbyn than they do about Brexit or anything else. 
Another Brexit first: Trump learns understatement: “president declares Britain "somewhat in turmoil" 
Brexit’s contribution to winning the World Cup: “As the manager, Gareth Southgate, said after his side beat Sweden in the quarterfinal: “None of us fancied going home” 
Good morning. I notice that brexiteers have lost the argument. They no longer claim that brexit will make the country better, they just say that they won the referendum and that we can't talk about it anymore. 
The government Remain coup was run by rebels, you seem to have got it arse about face, read the Conservative party election manifesto, Cameron's referendum letter to the nation, the Labour Party manifesto.You are not very good at this job are you?  
Almost half of UK workers worry Brexit will ruin their chances of finding a job abroad  
"The Goodbye Girl"#TheresaMay #BorisJohnson #Brexit #Britain #PrimeMinister #HardBrexit #SoftBrexit #DavidDavis #BorisJohnsonResigns 
In other words - as we suspected - the majority of the Commons who were strongly Remain, despite all the talk of 'respecting' the vote - have no intention of doing so and will in effect ignore the results of the referendum they called and seek to overturn it. Democracy? 
Last year in a self-pitying interview Nigel Farage claimed he was skint as ‘the price he paid for Brexit’. Now thanks to @anticorruption we find he’s earned up to E790k over the past four years on top of his E100k pa salary. Yet more proof this charlatan is totally untrustworthy 
No deal cd mean no brexit, delayed Brexit,a second referendum or a general election - William Hague @bbcr4today 
With the mess that the Government have created, & new facts that are emerging all the time, we know that #Brexit is not deliverable in the terms it was sold. The people deserve a #PeoplesVote on the Brexit deal. Join the campaign now! @peoplesvote_uk  
All of your friends are looking on at this with amazement, who could have thought Putins brexit would have tricked a country as large and rich as the UK- a sad self imposed decline, a lesson for the rest of us. 
I can't believe all the comments below claiming that democracy requires that we leave. That argument has been dead for so long. Democracy is an ongoing process not a one-off event. The cult of #Brexit has to be stopped before it destroys our country. #StopBrexit #PeopleVotes 
Just checking in to see how @TheSun's Brexit is going...  
This is key. AIQ - the data firm used by Vote Leave - confined to link to Cambridge Analytica, banned from processing UK voter data & huge question marks over legality of its work for four Brexit campaigns. It doesn’t get more critical than that.  
What the Government is now being forced to do goes far beyond anything decried as "Project Fear" during the Referendum campaign.  
He did, he said it, @UKLabour don't want the Tories to bring itself down. They will support the Tory #Brexit.Opposition Schmopposition.And yet still I hear and see comments re @LibDems 'student fees' like not opposing the Tories isn't the worst betrayal ever. 
PAUL MASON INVESTIGATESPM Tonight I investigate the shadowy FBPE groupFBPE We wanna stop BrexitPM What do they *really* want?FBPE To stop BrexitPM Why are they anti-Corbyn?FBPE BrexitPM Are they Tories?FBPE Jesus PaulPM So many unanswered questionsFBPE FFSPM Cui bono?  
This is much bigger than just @ForBritainParty & @UKIPWe need the 17.4m who voted for #Brexit to come together in one #BrexitCoalition.We need just one #Brexit candidate in each seat.We can then elect a #BrexitGovernment to deliver the Brexit we voted for.  
The excellent David Smith.  “Brexit is breaking hearts but the PM won’t call the whole thing off”  
The Vice-Chairman of the Scottish Police Federation @DvdHmltn thinks #Brexit voters are thick, racist muppets. Very professional. I’m sure that reassures the 38% of Scots who voted Leave. Maybe he should be more worried about #PoliceScotland’s plummeting clear up rate. 
.@MichaelPDeacon: Theresa May meets Angela Merkel... and treats us to another day of Brexit farce  
This is your Weds 11th of July reminder that both Leave campaigns  deliberately broke the law to win the Brexit referendum including possibly treasonThis means@BorisJohnson@michaelgove@Arron_banksBroke the law & should be in jail#VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw#VoteLeaveCheated 
Scenes from Germany as Angela Merkel writes the #Brexit white paper for Theresa May #MAYMUSTGO 
'Linking the Scottish question to the Brexit question could provide useful cover for the awkward truth that [@NicolaSturgeon] has nothing new to say.'  Indeed, with #GrowthCommission a resounding flop in terms of shifting polls, whole #indyref2 thing is decidedly stale. #MoveOn 
as our fragile democracies fight for their lives, @carolecadwalla asks the existential question of the hour: could @facebook have prevented #truxit (trump-brexit)  
A £500K fine for recklessly leaking personal data to Cambridge Analytica, which then used it to manipulate the referendum. They will be laughing in Silicon Valley. We need a regulator with teeth. 
Theresa May's Brexit fudge threatens a return to a hard border in Northern Ireland. This political fix simply isn't good enough.Time for change, #ForTheMany  Time for #JC4PM 
The only way May can save her #Brexit plan now is to give the British people a #PeoplesVote. The last few days has shown #Brexit won't be solved in Westminster. That's why we need a @peoplesvote_uk on the final deal   
John Cleese sadly proving once again that for many men of a certain vintage and type, Brexit was private self-pity writ in political form. #Brexit 
% of British people positive about migrants2018 - 47%2013 - 21%Estimate of number of Romanians in UK:2018: 411,0002013: 135,000I am not sure Romanians are the problem, Nigel. #WednesdayWisdom#Brexit 
The five scenarios for Brexit Britain -Chaos-Awful-Bad-So so-Divisive but OK via @financialtimes 
When a child cheats in a test, it’s not usual for teacher to say “not to worry, you got 99%! Well done!” & let them continue into top set where they will likely fail unless they cheat again...Brexit was based on cheating yet..“It’s the will of the people!”#CambridgeAnalytica 
I tend not to be tribalist about politics but I now truly believe only a UKIP surge can scare the political class into offering real Brexit. 
The EU strategy is to force a 2nd referendum if it loses the 1st one. That’s what propels the Remain lobby. They are the EU foot soldiers perched in Parliament. 
For the past two years Theresa May has plotted the betrayal of Brexit whilst parroting “Brexit means Brexit”. Her Remain coup is overt and must be repulsed. The Conservatives are now forced to remove the cuckoos in the nest. 
Even the fucking Tory supporting Sun is telling us that post-#Brexit, while the millionaire Tories dine on caviar, the rest of us will be fighting over tinned shit.Kick them out. We need a new Govt that actually gives a shit about British people. 
From @DanielJHannan: My view of May’s new Brexit plan. It’s just about better than No Deal. But now a line in the sand must be drawn.  
Given that Vote Leave broke electoral law, & Facebook have just been fined the maximum for involvement with Cambridge Analytica, & the Brexit Bad Boys have absolutely no idea what they are doing- should the referendum vote be annulled? Why? RT plse. 
Since Brexit began, it has been abundantly clear to any observer outside the U.K.’s nativist right-wing fever swamp that eventually, everyone was going to get hurt by it  
Official campaign Vote Leave spent £2.7m with AIQ; we don’t know what they got for their moneyNow Information Commissioner has blocks AIQ from using British citizens’ dataStrong action should be applauded but what about #Brexit vote? It can no longer be considered reliable 
‘Too late’ says @bbcnickrobinson about the Brexit referendum crimes. No, not too late. All part of the argument that the country should be allowed to think again @peoplesvote_uk on the final deal. @UKLabour and the police should be leading the charge on this. 
May has declare war on Brexit. It’s time it was reciprocated   
Two third majority for major reform is standard in most countries and most organizations.It is obvious that the UK should not have been submitted to a major overhaul of this nature on a whim and a near 50/50 result in a gerrymandered referendum that was interfered with.#FBPE 
You OK, @peoplesvote_uk? I see MPs voted on your call for another EU referendum yesterday on a motion that even used your own phrase and called it a “people’s vote”. It seems only 13 (thirteen) out of 650 MPs voted for it...  
Ministers draw up plans to stockpile food in case of 'no deal' Brexit. I hope the dinosaur #Brexit voters are happy to dig for victory in their flower beds. The younger generation don't own homes, let alone gardens to dig. What do they do? #Peoplesvote 
Looking forward to @uklabour weighing in hard on the latest revelations about illegality of Leave campaign in referendum. Tough on Brexit. Tough on the causes of Brexit. Surely? 
Imagine if England won the World Cup and Southgate said ‘Fuck Brexit’ in his victory speech. That’d be a pretty good day. 
Tories draw ‘battle lines’ over May’s Brexit planThe So called Chequers Plan, that Cabinet had No input to, needs rewriting, this time with no help from Merkel! 
Translation: We in politics and the media know better than you simple #Brexit voters. Are you trying to sound elitist @mrjamesob or does it just come naturally to you? 
Rebels in Theresa May's party consider a radical last-ditch Brexit move that could bring down her government  
Please people, start making your own arrangements in event of a no-deal #Brexit. Here's a good guide to help you get started by @J_amesp  #FBPE 
John Cleese supported Brexit.  
It’s in @UKLabour’s power to call a halt to this chaos. An opposition shouldn’t enable this national slide. Reassess mounting evidence of disaster. If the team who wanted Brexit can’t actually bring Brexit...Call now for a #peoplesvote @jeremycorbyn @Keir_Starmer @unitetheunion 
Brexit Blame Train: It’s the judges, the opposition, Remainers, Mark Carney, the civil service, the EU, business, Ireland, the PM, Cabinet...Look in the mirror. You had 40 years to draw up a detailed plan. Look around. We are in chaos. How can Brexit be worth any of this? 
The leaders of Britain's biggest business groups have met new Brexit Secretary Dominic Raab, telling him that time is running out for a deal to be agreed with the European Union  
On NATO spending and the Brexit mess I was interviewed by @questCNN yesterday evening. 
'Britain is in this mess principally because the Brexiteers - led largely by Mr. Johnson - sold the country a series of lies in the lead up to the June 2016 referendum on leaving the European Union.' #BorisJohnson 
Faecebook fined for data breaches‘Few people have awareness of how they can be micro-targeted, persuaded or nudged in a democratic campaign, in an election or referendum’ says information commissioner#Brexit mandate undermined; time for a #PeoplesVote 
January is important.Korean peace. UK Brexit chaos. China economic debacle. Pakis will be running amok. All to happen by January. Let's see. 
The Conservative Party need to wake up to the loss of people who will vote for them in the next General Election. Wipe Out comes from not giving voters what they voted for, Brexit.  
Tip:Don't try to convince "no deal" #Brexit fanatics. They're inexplicably angry at the EU and you for backing it.Remember, they're an extreme minority. Most voters simply don't care. It's them you need to reach.And that's why Brexiters try to shout you down.#PeoplesVote 
BREXIT REALITY-If prod costs go up & profits go down post Brexit companies whose main export market is EU arent going to hang around they'll relocate to EU to lower their production costs & increase their profits, if anyone thinks they wont then they are not living in real world. 
I probably can’t do half the things many of you can...But after spending a career in Intelligence, I KNOW this business!I’d bet my retirement the Russian/Brexit scheme was hatched by Brennan and Brit’s Hannigan in desperation.  This reeks of such tactics routinely used!  
“It is petrifying that the deliberate deceptions & wild ego of one man can so mislead a nation” So too is it petrifying that even after realising being so misled, many are still prepared to swallow the deliberate deceptions from Boris Johnson.#Brexit 
Labour’s deputy leader literally just went on TV to save Theresa May’s governmentBy @wrightismight #TheresaMay #Brexit 
Good morning all. I wonder how many principled @Conservatives MPs are going to resign today or send a letter to @Graham__Brady motioning a vote of no confidence in @theresa_may today?#MayOut #MayResign #BrexitBetrayal #Brexit #MayMustGo 
Theresa May's cabinet: the new Brexit power bases she must unite  
Oh dear god. So politicians are openly admitting that #Brexit is indeed a pile of . And will damage the U.K But we can’t change our minds. Any of us. This is your daily reminder WE DO NOT HAVE TO DO THIS. Brexit is not above scrutiny or the law #StopBrexitSaveDemocracy 
This is terrifying. Both in the UK and US the people/orgs investigating the criminal activities of the Trump Campaign / #Brexit ref are doing it slowly by the book. Meanwhile these guys are dismantling the safeguards in our society 
Two years after the Brexit vote, the UK wakes up to this today: Facebook broke the law and faces maximum fine for Cambridge Analytica scandal, UK watchdog says 
Leavers who say they aren’t bothered about losing their jobs because of Brexit fall into the following categories:Pensioners. Filthy Rich.Disaster Capitalists.ERGPersonality Disorders.Nobody, who has regular bills & a family, wants to lose their job, including Leavers. 
Prince Harry and Meghan Markle breezed intosunkissed Ireland this afternoon, purposefully honoring a European country with their first royal tour as a married couple amid ongoing Brexit drama  
Whether it's a tory- or labour #Brexit doesn't much matter. What matters is: It was achieved through BREAKING THE LAW People may have committed TREASON Every single scenario leaves the UK worse off It's no longer the will of the people  Young people do not want it 
Most trade wars happen by accident; there is not really a precedent for the uncharted waters we are entering.  Uncertainty is the only known, which stifles decisions and undermines growth. Brexit vote a cautionary tale; U.K. suffering prior to decisions. 
But of course, the wafer thin win in the advisory referendum which was suddenly taken as a binding decision for massive constitutional change still stands #FBPE 
Something about Trump-Russia has suddenly spooked the Brexit leaders into resigning:  
We've all  got to put differences behind usWe need just one #BrexitCoalition candidate in each seatIt is now the ONLY way we can save the Brexit we voted for.It would also put the fear of God into the #REMOANERS in the established parties17.4 million angry voters are powerful 
I wish and hope that when @POTUS visits the UK in the coming days he insists on doing a 'presser' with PM May on live 6pm national news and then proceeds to 'Red-Pill' the British public about independence, democracy, patriotism, globalism and Brexit  
Theresa May's bad hair week. @smh @theage @UKMoments #BrexitShambles #Brexit  
We've all  got to put differences behind usWe need just one #BrexitCoalition candidate in each seatIt is now the ONLY way we can save the Brexit we voted for.It would also put the fear of God into the #REMOANERS in the established parties17.4 million angry voters are powerful 
Theresa May is implementing a Brexit for the Benefit of elites and big business and ignoring a democratic referendum.Is that not fascism? 
Rt Hon @theresa_may MPPrime MinisterI am writing to inform you of my decision to resign from my position as a Citizen of the UK. Since 2010 your party has been suffocating democracy and has totally mishandled the complexities of Brexit to say the least. Yours@Lyno45 
"Arron Banks’  campaign team met with Russian embassy officials as many as 11 times in the run-up to the EU referendum and in the two months beyond, documents seen by the Observer suggest – seven more times than Banks has admitted." 
Why is .@UKLabour turning a blind eye to foreign interference in & multiple criminal acts surrounding the #Brexit ref? Is it safe to rely on the narrow majority won in a #TaintedRef as "the will of the people", esp. if it leads to huge constitutional change that leaves us poorer? 
Brexit: the key to prosperity -  greater UK participation in UNECE is not an arcane, theoretical concept. It could be the key to our post-Brexit prosperity. And the chance to turn the EU into a rule-taker is not one we could let pass by...  #Brexinfo. 
Thank you for welcoming our @POTUS. America loves him. He is helping us take our Country back. I pray that God would give you such a leader.  Stand strong; work to change your leadership.   #Brexit must happen. 
Yet another #SHOCKER.And what a "coincidence" that Mercer-backed #CambridgeAnalytica (data firm for BOTH #Brexit & @realDonaldTrump that Steve Bannon helped run) scraped the #Facebook data for MILLIONS of Americans & Britons and allowed #Russia to access it.#TrumpRussia 
Underfunding to blame for child protection 'crisis', says report.     Good for Tim Loughton,  this review was overdue  and does complement the Newton Europe  report but will they influence a govt with Brexit obsession?   
Democracy?...Mmmm...that would be giving ALL the People a #FinalSay via a #PeoplesVote to Confirm if the still want a #Brexit Deal/No Deal or now to#Reject #Revoke #Remain #ReformIs that not correct? 
Globalists in the UK will not allow Brexit to happen.Globalists in the US tried not to allow Trump to happen.President Trump is singlehandedly waging War against Globalists that have secretly ruled the World in the shadows for decades.Donald J Trump was chosen for this War. 
The BBC appear to have missed out the fact that Vote Leave and BeLeave have committed electoral fraud and illegal co-ordination with intent to subvert the referendum result....easily missed. -  
Buckle Up7RUpop star behind infamous TT meet continues to taunt investigatorsTrump’s tariffs are having a disastrous effect on the Dairy Industry. U.S. Is Set to Become World's Top Oil Producer, Gov’t SaysIn Reprieve for PM May, Pro-EU Brexit Rebels Signal Retreat pic.twitter.com/X193oLCnA9 
Analysis: Meet Britain’s new "Brexit secretary," a man Theresa May once accused of fueling "gender warfare"  
SUPPORT FOR BREXIT Jumps 14% Since 2016 Referendum as Trump Prepares Visit  via @gatewaypundit 
We have suffered appalling dishonesty from May over brexit and we are suffering the same over many things concerning Islam. Its time the government admitted the agreements they have signed such as the Barcelona agreement and many others (regarding migrants) 
Is he looking for that non existent indy2 referendum? 
Now even more Britons want to leave the EU - an increase of nearly 15% since the Brexit referendum, survey claims  via @MailOnline 
Trump will intervene in the Brexit debate when he arrives here backing a bold Brexit followed by a series of international free trade treaties. Remainers can hardly complain. They invited Obama over to tell us to vote for them and to threaten to put us at the back of the queue. 
She’s ‘delighted’. This absolute numpty has sold out fruit growers and helping destroy families’ living standards by supporting Tory Stupid Brexit  
No doubt the Duchess of Sussex thought she was having a discreet private discussion when commenting on the Irish referendum result. What she didn't realise she was talking to someone who in a New York minute would stick a private comment up on twitter along with a picture. 
Yep. The ICO investigation into the referendum is still ongoing but there's a round-up of where we are so far...& we are looking at multiple illegalities, multiple data crimes, multiple pieces of evidence of illegal co-ordination..  
I cannot back Brexit plan as it stands, Nicola Sturgeon says  
The Sun tells its readers yeah "no deal" means possible food shortages. Brexit is Brilliant. 
Priceless!Brexit proven to be shit idea but because- we had *advisory* referendum- which “won” (scraped through) with just 51.9% of votes- for campaign full of LIES which BROKE THE LAWwe still have to plough ahead with disaster because democracy ended on 23/6/18!#StopBrexit 
"FB confirmed Vote Leave and BeLeave used the same data set to identify audiences and select targeting criteria for ads. However, BeLeave did not then go on to run any ads, albeit their electoral return indicates that they committed expenditure to this." 
Something about Trump-Russia has suddenly spooked the Brexit leaders into resigning  
Actor will move to the Caribbean after saying he is disappointed in Brexit and the British press  
Its a good bye from me as well, I'm a life long Tory, but this is no longer the "Conservative" party. Sick of Labour Lite with Theresa DisMay. SHE MUST GO ! WE DEMAND A REAL BREXIT AND A TRULY CONSERVATIVE LEADER !  
Excellent “what’s going on with Brexit and all these resignations in the UK government?” thread:  
Meghan Markle may have broken Royal protocol AGAIN after Irish politician tweets Duchess was 'pleased' with abortion referendum  
Halfwit MP admits Brexit is a terrible idea and will ruin Britain but suggests it must go ahead anyway so as not to hurt the feelings of people who were conned. Paraphrasing only a minimal amount :/  
Wah ha haha hahaState of this 80's throwback farmer's daughter that neglected to vote in the EU referendum cos it was too difficult to make a decisionNow screeching for Sajid to get her daddy some cheap workers  
If there is no Brexit, then democracy in the UK is dead.And if democracy is dead, then maybe we should try other methods - strikes, civil disobedience, culture wars, counter-economics, emotional appeals, etc.After all, they’ve worked well for the Left. 
In Brexit Britain, Scots are starting to believe that independence is worth the risks  
We now live in a weird world where the Tories are prepared to sacrifice all the major businesses and Labour are prepared to sacrifice hundreds of thousands of jobs at the altar of Brexit. It feels like the entire country got drunk and joined a cult. 
Another teensy weensy problem for "brexit" is that the Electoral Commission has now shown that the 2016 leave vote is tainted with crime, and could be argued to be criminally procured. This has huge consequences in our democracy 
Daniel Hannan: Globalists Within U.K. Parliament Have Never Accepted Brexit…  
There is only ONE Brexit.In 2016, 52% voted for several different types of Brexit.Some people wanted Single Market access. Some wanted Free Trade. Some wanted No Deal.Now there's only one left on the table. Is this the one you want? #PeoplesVoteMarch 
So this is what the UK has to look forward to!!!Thankfully Scotland has an escape route...INDEPENDENCE!!!FACTS over FEARSTime for a change!!!#SCOTLANDCAN#DevolveTheUnion#YouYesYet#indyref2#Referendum#Independence 
If England win tomorrow then the country goes on a binge until Sunday. If England win on Sunday then the country is fucked, not just brexit fucked but seriously totally fucked and I can’t wait. People will leave their jobs, families, but the memes will live on. 
THERESA’S MAYDAY: British Government Implodes As Top Officials Resign Over ‘Weak’ Brexit Plan  
She has a mandate to deliver a clear Brexit. She promised it.She has reneged on it. Personally. Not collectively. She has disconnected voters from government. We need to re-establish that connection. Who works for whom. If we don't we're serfs forever more.  
Yes, thanks to you, you shameless propaganda rag.YOU directed your readers to vote to Leave against their best interests.Lot’s see how you spin it if Brexit goes ahead.#StopBrexit 
So the tories are stockpiling processed food in preparation for a no deal #Brexit, so this is the scenario of no deal is better than a bad deal, the tories should be fucking hounded out of office if they contemplate putting us through this pain, #StopBrexitSaveBritain, #ToriesOut 
@theresa_may's political judgement is abysmal, e.g. her appalling 2017GE campaign.I joined the Tory Party to fight the 1979GE campaign. I have been a Conservative activist since. If #Brexit is betrayed, my whole family & me (20 adults) will never vote Conservative again! 
.@theresa_may is making a huge mistake for both her and Britain in moving away from a #USTradeDeal in favour of an #EU that wishes to see #Brexit fail.Terrible timing for #TrumpUKVisit 
#DominicRaab wants to take the UK out of the EU for extreme neo-liberal agenda. He also wants to abolish the human rights act. Trouble ahead. #Brexit  
Multiple crimes and massive fines coming out of @ICOnews  investigation into EU referendum. #Brexit referendum result now fatally flawed. Calls for a properly regulated #PeoplesVote now irresistible 
Britain’s Brexit impotence is the legacy of Theresa May’s timidity, duplicity and vacillation  via @Telegraph 
It's nearly 4 years since the Scottish Indy ref. The better together lot, have been shown up for the liars they are. We've had a PM who does oral with a pig & tax avoidance, now resigned. We've had May, the DUP & mibbees Brexit, mibbees not. What an advert for this rancid Union. 
Why Theresa May is trying to achieve a soft Brexit that's hardly Brexit at all  
Hey Brexit fan @PiersMorgan how come the New York Times can see what a national disaster Brexit is going to be but you can't?   
Remain friends, the tide is clearly turning much more noticeably than at any time since the 2016 ref. Please, never stop fighting to stop Brexit. We need to get rid of Corbyn and Tory infighting will do the rest. #brexit is dying. 
Brexit is Britain’s direst hour. Never have so few done so much harm to so many in our history. 
The reason that people don’t agree what Brexit is is that no one was asked. The only way to achieve on therefore requires a deal to be put forwards to the people, then they can decide if they want it. 
Bizarre or moreover sad that it has taken Brexit for me as MEP to become better known to my 8.5 million London constituents. I guess I must be thankful for small mercies, as better late than never lol  
The British party system has become irredeemably dysfunctional. Most Labour MPs are really centrists and many Tory MPs too. It cannot hold. Change must come. It’s political science folks. #Brexit #Corbyn 
“One of the most depressing things about this country was the standard of debate about Brexit. It was awful” - Comedian John Cleese on the 2016 referendum campaign.@JohnCleese | @maitlis | #newsnight 
John Cleese I love your work and I'm sorry to see you go. But seriously  - you voted Brexit, you backed Brexit you then go on about the current right wing direction of Britain, how everything has gone to pot and then add that you're off to live in a tax haven.  #newsnight 
Labour leadership’s forked tongue: ‘We must support Tory Brexit’ (official: Deputy Leader says so.) ‘We haven’t ruled out 2nd referendum’ (official: Deputy Leader says so). BTW: Leader says nothing (official: unless it’s about bus services or something). - Shambolic. 
Eh? It doesn't matter if Brexit was a dreadful idea - what matters is we follow through with that dreadful idea?? Never mind it was corrupt to begin with. Desperate attempt to rouse Brexiters with multiple mentions of 'democracy'. Patel all kinds of wrong. Again.  
John Cleese backed #Brexit. Now he tells #newsnight he is leaving the country since he's 'disappointed' in Britain. Another #brexiteer buffoon......and he's emigrating to a tax haven 
Dear @patel4witham, Brexit means Brexit, snow means snow, and meaningless drivel means meaningless drivel. Can you please explain how these tautologous definitions are supposed to enlighten us? #Brexit #StopBrexit #PeoplesVote 
Just putting aside the obvious Kremlin assets in the #Brexit referendumThere are now MULTIPLE crimes around the referendum  involving electoral law and dataprotection being investigated by various agencies. That was not a free and fair election.  
“There will be no downside to Brexit, only a considerable upside.” David Davis, October 2016 
John Cleese who backed Brexit tells Newsnight that he plans to leave Britain because of right wing government and the biased press. Before going on to cite an EU report....#newsnight 
BOOM! Tomorrow's FT: ICO fines Facebook maximum £500k over Cambridge Analytica data breaches. Finds that data was passed to 3rd parties and "accessed from countries including Russia”.#Brexit #BrexitRussia #CambridgeAnalytica 
We do indeed. Brexit is undeliverable. It always was. It always will be. A bit like voting to abolish gravity or to live forever without breathing. 
It's ridiculous and feeds the idea that only the "winning" side of a binary vote deserves a fair hearing on matters which are NOTHING to do with the referendum (since, everyone agrees, we are leaving the EU) but concern instead the future direction of the country, post-Brexit. 
“We don’t really feel like a real Brexit is being delivered … And everyone's just said, let’s not do it today" - the Chair of a Conservative Association tells us why her members decided not to go campaigning #newsnight 
Doesn’t feel like it. TBH I don’t want to “win”, and let Leave voters feel betrayed by no Brexit etc. I’d prefer it if someone explained to them why Brexit *they* voted for will never happen. To understand the EU and how things work. 
Thanks France for potentially saving us from the most dismal, witless England v Brussels Brexit headlines imaginable 
No they are laughing at 17.4 Million British Voters for being Gullible, believing her mantra “Brexit means Brexit”!  
In what cosy world must you live in where you consider the biggest issue of the day to be Brexit? Brexit doesn’t affect my rent, doesn’t affect my commute, doesn’t educate my children nor does it provide healthcare to my family.Austerity does. #EndAusterity #VoteLabour 
Toby Young on SkyNews paper review just made an excellent point. "There's no Parliamentary majority for - (i) a hard #Brexit(ii) a soft #Brexit, or(iii) anything in between."So I think we're going to crash out without a deal."Bring it on, I say! 
Why is the @BBCNewsnight host referring to everyone who disagrees with May's Brexit Fudge as "hard-Brexiteers"?#BBCbias 
As a lone crusader @carolecadwalla has prompted at least six investigations by the @ICOnews and @ElectoralCommUK with dozens of articles, around 80,000 words and exposing Facebook, Cambridge Analytica and illegality in the #Brexit Campaign 
Wow what a awful appointment by @jeremycorbyn and @UKLabour whilst we are on the subject let’s just remind you what @NazShahBfd said about rapes and abused girls in #Rotherham utter disgrace.Oh by the way @theresa_may #MayOut #MayResign #BrexitBetrayal #Brexit #MayMustGo 
The USA is our greatest ally & the President takes a very favourable view towards the UK. Why an earth would we stick with a plan that would harm our prospects of securing a post-Brexit trade deal with them & other countries across the world....  
.@DominicRaab, don't show @theresa_may or @OllyRobbins this old tweet. It will look like you don't agree with the #ChequersPlan#MAYMUSTGO #BREXIT  
Richard Littlejohn truly gets it’s and how ⁦@theresa_may⁩ will be remembered in history as the Prime Minister who lied to to the public and deliberately destroyed #Brexit  
Theresa May will block no deal Brexit. She will either deliver vassal state Brexit or no Brexit at all if she stays as PM. She has got to go 
NEW - I understand Cabinet ministers were shown the draft Brexit White Paper at 6PM today and told to make their views known to Number 10 by 10AM tomorrow morning 
Can’t help but feel a number of politicians said they wanted Brexit when what they actually wanted was attention 
Wednesday's Times"Tories draw 'battle lines' over May's Brexit plan" #tomorrowspaperstoday#bbcpapers(via @AllieHBNews) 
Tory MP @RossThomson_MP if May doesn't change the Brexit plan:"We are, to be quite frank with you, screwed going forward to a general election.”  
I've plenty more to say about the Government's handling of #Brexit but all in good time..... 
After preliminary, insincere professions of respect for the democratic verdict, the Entitled Ones embarked on a campaign to reverse Brexit:  #BrexitBetrayal 
From Maria Caulfield’s resignation letter. Says Irish backstop is preventing a hard Brexit. Ben Bradley says the same. Once again- how. did. it. take. seven. months. to. work. this. out.  
This is a phoney war. Brexit has to be stopped when the Electoral Commission reports Vote Leave crimanally rigged the EU ref. No second go, the Leave campaign has to be disqualified.   
UK’s data watchdog fines Facebook, launches criminal prosecution of parent company of Cambridge Analytica & expands investigation of #Brexit’s main funder Arron Banks. Progress. #BrexitShambles #PeoplesVote 
THANK YOU UK  FIGHT BACK AND WE WILL JOIN YOU — I’m incredulous that the US GOVT refuses to protect its own citizens from Russia #TrumpRussia #MAGA #Brexit #Facebook #CambridgeAnalytica #PutinsBitch #NATOThese ASSHOLES are trying to restructure the world order 
As @theresa_may screws up #Brexit, @jeremycorbyn appoints Naz Shah to his Front Bench as Equalities Minister.Somebody, somewhere is taking the pi$$ out of us all. #MAYMUSTGO 
I wonder if Theresa May and her team are reading the @Telegraph's letters page, completely devoted to Brexit for the past two days. The tone is overwhelmingly negative. These are her grassroots. And they are furious. @LettersDesk. 
May clearly had no intention of Brexit meaning Brexit. She is an utter liar and traitor to this country.   
Yes.. "Serious and Organised Crime" seems a good description for it!The Referendum was fundamentally flawed, and time is running out as the two main parties are ignoring this completely. 
The intellectual dishonesty of the Brexit Taliban is now in full swing. Former PM of Sweden, @carlbildt, spells out brutal truths about the state of Brexit Britain, unleashed by the fundamentalists - in @wapo. The world is watching. #PeoplesVote 
Thersa May "And then I told them Brexit meant Brexit, and they believed me"  
It's the reverse of the truth. Rally behind Theresa May and Tory voters will leak to UKIP letting Corbyn in. The only way to keep Corbyn out is to sack May and get a proper Brexit.  
So, the cat is officially out of the bag. Tomorrow’s ICO’s report on FT front page. Maximum possible fine for Facebook. Criminal enforcement against Cambridge Analytica. Huge investigation ongoing into MULTIPLE crimes potentially committed in referendum. The ICO is bringing it..  
I wish there was a referendum on the f***ing BBC 
I think we can agree that #brexit is not a good idea. So let's turn to the promises made. How many of the vote leave promises will be kept? Or will the right wing ERG disaster capitalists cherry pick only the promises that suit their agenda. 
Boris Johnson sold Brexit voters a package of fantasies and falsehoods and now Britain is paying the price.  
This is getting bigger than Brexit. The current divisions between Europe & the UK leave us all exposed if Trump and Putin decide to demolish the post war world order next week.Time to realize who our friends are & to stand together in defence of tolerance, human rights & peace. 
1 Facebook fined maximum for breach of data protection law2 Company linked to Cambridge Analytica faces criminal prosecution3 Referendum campaigns under investigation for breach of data protection law  
BREAKING....Huge £500,000 fine for Facebook following ICO report....both side of EU referendum under investigation...Banks under massive investigation.  
.@theresa_may sidelined the #Brexit team. @OllyRobbins and her imposed their own #ChequersPlan onto the Government.There is a new petition asking Conservative MPs to act & install a PM able to deliver the #Brexit we voted for. Please sign it. #MAYMUSTGO 
Two old pals on a Brexit paper - I won’t name them - told me something rather heartening at Portcullis House today. ‘Your lot is winning.’ 
"Maria Caulfield and Ben Bradley warned the PM her plan would not capitalise on the opportunities of Brexit". I just wish these clueless fools would sit down with an economist to learn the stupidity of this statement  
With the British government on the brink of collapse over #Brexit TV news channels make #ThailandCaveRescue the top #news item. This is beyond surreal. People running mainstream media in Britain are obviously taking orders from Berlin and Brussels. 
Trump says: "The UK is in somewhat turmoil""Boris Johnson is a friend of mine. And I maybe will speak to him when I get over there" [No similar sentiment for May]  Boris said: “Imagine Trump doing #Brexit. Actually you might get somewhere."  
THIS IS IMPORTANT Matthew Parris is completely right. BREXIT IS A FAITH BASED THING. NO. It is political ideology. It can be questioned it must be questioned and it can be scrutinised and it can be stopped. The U.K. has not and never will become a cult  
Six cabinet resignations, a govt in total disarray, Brexit negotiations going nowhere, an NHS in crisis, the list of catastrophes is almost endless....& yet, she's still beating Corbyn.WAKE THE FUCK UP @UKLabour#PeoplesVote@LBC #newsnight #r4today @Keir_Starmer #bbcdp 
This Brexit means, amongst other things:Planes stop flyingMedical scans stopCar, aviation and many other industries leaveFood shortages50 mile queues at DoverUK expats have to return home£50 billion debt on top of existing debtThis is what the public voted for and want?  
I know the focus is on Brexit right now but how on earth can @theresa_may @10DowningStreet @Jeremy_Hunt @USAmbUK @RoyalFamily be rolling out the red carpet for @realDonaldTrump when he is currently in charge of a system which does this?!? #notinmyname 
The Conservatives increase arms exports to rogue regimes by a third since Brexit vote."Theresa May priotises arms sales to tyrants at the expense of Human Rights."#newsnight #bbcdp 
What’s the matter with the Tories?  May ran the most calamitous election campaign in history.  She was too scared (and too useless) to debate the worst Labour leader in history.  Her conduct of Brexit has been nothing short of disastrous.  She has to go.   
From Stewart Jackson, 1 hr ago...It’s all part of the plan. Robbins et al blocked the publication of the White Paper from at least March because 1) they’d lose policy control and 2) Ipso facto it’s contents might not be the Hotel California Brexit they delivered at Chequers 
The fact that Ruth Davidson had her say, her switch of opinion on the Brexit shambles, yet when in situ, was not challenged by BBC Scotland nor STV on the ongoing dirty money election scandal investigations is the height of hypocrisy & proof if needed in their complicit cover up 
“Strong” means admitting mistakes and having guts to change your mind, NOT trying to LOOK strong by marching towards a cliff2 years on, it’s chaos; and we haven’t even left (which is when the REALLY bad stuff starts)Don’t Brexit; fix it: #ExtendA50#ExitFromBrexit PETITION 
Even on its own terms this doesn't make sense. The promise that "Brexit means Brexit" was made by a party that promptly lost it's majority.  
It’s clear attitudes were changing a little before the referendum but since has been remarkable. Clear that British people aren’t anti-immigrant but in favour of controlling who comes and who doesn’t.  
I've lost count of how many fascist trolls I've blocked today. Meanwhile Corbyn's leading sycophantic toadies have launched a coordinated attack on #FBPE rather than fight the fascists or the Tories or Trump.#Brexit #FBPE 
Yes, he looks like a nasty piece of work but enough already with the “Tory Brexit” BS, like there’s different kinds of Brexit; like “Labour Brexit” will be all smiling workers and folk dancing.Brexit’s gonna hurt the people you claim to represent and you don’t care.Why is that?  
Former Lib Dem leader Tim Farron has claimed he "spent more time filling in his World Cup chart" than David Davis did with EU Brexit negotiators  
New report on the impact of Brexit on EU integration, with chapters on the internal market, social policy, foreign and defence policy, the Eurozone and (from me) justice and home affairs.  
Farage recently uploaded an image captioned: “Depressed over Brexit. Went fishing.” TV star Ben Fogle- a UN Patron of the Wilderness- pointed out it was an endangered Tope shark and called him a twat.  
Customer in Brussels last week : “ how are we going to get our stuff collected and delivered in the same day after brexit “ .. I said I don’t have a clue !! .. they are being briefed on the crisis that’s looming ( I’ll be there again Thursday as well as Paris ) 
We are sick of #Brexit. Can't believe those who voted for it still want it. Stop this utter nonsense and admit it was a very bad idea. Scrap it and carry on in the richest trading block on Earth. @theresa_may 
Dominic Rabb's views and why we should be worriedHis views;• Feminist are "bigots"• British workers are "idlers"• Under 21s should be exempt from min wage• Human rights act should be scrapped• #Foodbank users have "cashflow problems"#Brexit 
I don't want England to win the World Cup because I guaran-fucking-tee some bananas UKIP councillor will be on BBC One the next day saying it's a sign that Jesus loves Brexit or some shit 
May's pain with no gain crisis leaves Brexit snookered. My Brexit Blog post analysing the latest Brexit events:  
It speaks volumes that this is who @Theresa_May has chosen to lead her Tory Brexit.  
James Porter (a farmer constituent of Kirstene's) in today's Courier, lest Kirstene inadvertantly give the impression May and her Brexit fanatics  are trying to help  
Tory Vice Chairs Quit in Protest at PM’s Brexit Deal  
Theresa May the deceiver, May tricked #Brexit voters that she was all in for #Brexit , at the weekend May capitulated and showed her true colours, May should resign.  
Last tweet gettin some severe attention fae the 1-2-Brexit crew, the amount a union jacks in ma mentions is makin me feel like am in Tommy Robinson’s single bedroom 
I think some of those millions are alarmed at how unlike the Brexit they were promised this shambolic embarrassment of a Brexit has turned out to be 
Nigel Farage is returning to take over @UKIP leadership, the British people have been betrayed by @10DowningStreet and he's back to see #Brexit through  
REVEALED: Civil servants plan UK to FUND EU army post Brexit in secret plot caught on tape 
No. Government job, it's only job, is the protection and growth of the country.Brexit fails both these. 
Two people nobody has ever heard of quit roles nobody even knew existed today in protest at Theresa May's Brexit plan  
Final shout-out:"This Just Got A Lot Bigger Than Brexit."My article today at @TheConWom, on how Theresa May’s desperate & deceitful plans for her Remain-By-Any-Other-Name non-Brexit are in effect a head-on existential challenge to our democracy itself. 
The real choice:Full Brexit and a closer relationship with our US cousins - the foremost superpower. OrMay Soft Brexit and a subservient relationship with the EU; by extension dragged in to a trade war with the USA. Choose wisely Theresa May.  
A reminder that Conservative MP, Kirstene Hair didn’t vote in the EU referendum because it was ‘very difficult’  
FFS @UKLabour Do *SOMETHING*. You are faced with the most shambolic government in history. A Government so unpopular, it actually hates itself. And the best you can do is THIRD PLACE in a TWO HORSE RACE. All you have to do to win this is *TURN UP* & OPPOSE BREXIT.  
Theresa May promises 'smooth and orderly' Brexit – video  
There is no calculated ambiguity there. No "long game". Labour want Brexit, and they are prepared to prop up the Tories to get it.If you don't want Brexit, you can't vote for Labour.#FBPE #WATON #StopBrexit4/4 
We saw you outside a big red bus saying there would be £350m more for the NHS and not long after we saw you call for big cuts to public spending after Brexit.Save us from your faux calls for democracy, the people were systematically lied to.#PeoplesVote 
#Brexit #poll RT for large sample 
One of the greatest Brexit threads ever, now reproduced in all its glory.  
Theresa May warned Brexit strategy 'risks putting Jeremy Corbyn in Number 10'  
Trump’s trip:Tell NATO to pay up or else. Tell them you’ll be seeing Putin next. Maybe he’d make a better ally.Tell that London mayor to kiss your ass. Tell May it’s time to Brexit. Let her know there will be new tariffs.Give Putin a big hug. To trigger the libs. 
It’s like a terrorist threatening to kill the hostages one by one, except they’re their own hostages. In keeping with the whole “do what I say or I’ll shoot my own foot off” approach to Brexit generally  
UK must understand that "holding referendum can never be a crime," says @TxellBonet , wife of imprisoned @jcuixart   . 
Brexit day would be one of "mourning" if it happens, Vince Cable claimed, as he warned no deal would lead to "anarchy" for UK trade  
Brexit was never going to be easy & with hindsight could have been handled differently. BUT the time for leadership change passed last autumn & we can't have a 3mth contest now - alongside EU negotiations up to Oct summit. So let's knuckle down, back the plan & get the job done! 
The ultimate Brexit banter final of Brussels v London is dead. Tragic. 
The EEA is our best way out of the EU. #Brexit  
The DC Council spending the last moments of the legislative session vacillating between throwing people who play trumpet in public into dungeons or whether to overthrow a minimum wage referendum just about sums it up 
If only all my rebuttal work met with such a swift response. Now sort out the Brexit coverage.  
You've given up arguing that Brexit is a good idea, and now argue it should go ahead anyway.Hmm. 
Remember when the brexit brothers said France aren’t good ? 
At least we’ve been spared the narrative of the Brussels vs London “Brexit” final. 
Theresa May “Brexit means a global Britain, a Britain who will be able to negotiate trade deals with the rest of the world. Hi Theresa, does your Brexit white paper allow Britain to negotiate a trade deal with America? Theresa “No” 
Well my neighbour said he voted No back in 2014 but ever since it’s come out that we were lied to and worse how Scots MPs are treated in @UKParliament his vote will now be a Yes in next referendum  
Well said @patel4witham - this is now bigger than just Brexit, it is about whether the voters can place any trust in political leaders.  
Bit rich coming from a Tory especially one who didn't vote in Brexit referendum because you didn't understand it. 
RT I was asked to comment the Government meltdown:"UK Cabinet Has No Confidence in Theresa May" - Make room for  Corbyn & the Government in waiting not these Tory "'jellyfish masquerading as a Cabinet"  #JC4PM #PMQs#Brexit #BrexitShambles #GE2018Now 
I love how NUS only thinks demos are inaccessible for disabled students when they are about free education.When they are about a second referendum on Brexit suddenly they are fine.It's almost like disabled students are being tokenised for political gains or something. 
Iain Dale Asks Newsnight: ‘Why Do I Get Introduced as a Brexit Supporter?’  
Sickening, absolutely fuming that my brexit vote meant NOTHING. Democracy is dead and we'll still be tied to the Eu wanna be superstate. Depressing..#BrexitShambles #BrexitBetrayal @Conservatives << Self serving cretins..!! 
#TheresaMay blocks a journalist from asking #AngelaMerkel what she thinks of #May's warped #Brexit TURD plan. Insecure, weak, and full of contempt for #British people who question her agenda. Resign!  #MayMustGo #MayMustGoNow @Conservatives #BBC #SKY @LBC 
Those MPs who have resigned have referred to letters from you. It's vital that your MP hears your view to act against the May & Merkel #Brexit plan.Take a moment to contact your MP. Their details can be easily found in the link below:#MAYMUSTGO 
Opinion: Moment of truth for Brexit: The Tories have to decide if they’ll accept May’s 'soft' EU exit  
Brexit i Polexit  
OK, it's Melanie Phillips, and it fails the most basic test of logic: but an indication of where the 'will of the people' narrative may lead us as Brexit falls apart.  
This is no longer an argument about whether Brexit was a good idea but is about democracy & standing by the democratic decision made by the people. The public want to know that their political leaders will stay true to the promise made to them that Brexit means Brexit.  
87% of Guido Readers Oppose May’s Brexit Deal  
I could be wrong but im gonna take a chance and say 17.4 million who voted Brexit, are not going to be happy Theresa May’s highest ranking cabinet ministers all voted remain. #maymustgo 
Five things you need to know about Dominic Raab, the man Theresa May has chosen to lead her Tory Brexit. 
Tory Vice Chairs Quit in Protest at PM’s Chequers Brexit plan   
Funniest thing I've seen all day. The tories have reached peak implosion. RT this madness!#Brexit #BrexitShambles #GE2018Now 
SNUBBED: Tory MP @HenrySmithUK turns down invite to watch England game at 10 Downing Street. “As the Prime Minister isn’t bringing Brexit home I’m concerned attending would be a bad omen for football coming home...I’ll pass.” 
Lib Dem’s - Should the Government fall apart we would be open to working as part of a Government of unity in the National InterestLabour - We don’t want the Govt to fall, we want to help them get a dealCorbynites - Lib Dem’s want to prop up the Tory Brexit#fbpe #notacult 
Steve Bell on the cabinet's current position on Brexit – cartoon  
Attracting the brightest & best? Brexodus more like it.A survey conducted of over 2,000 people has found that 62% of creative workers from the EU could leave the UK after Brexit. 
#BrexitThe accidental coupThe plan without a planThe misappropriation of democracyThe desperate imaginings of fantasistsThe doctrinal belief build on quicksandBought by the rich for the rich from the poor 
Three British ministers resigned over PM Theresa May's "soft Brexit" plan. So now what?  
Merkel says May's new Brexit proposal is a "solid step forward"  
I’ve never been a believer in conspiracy theories but we are living in one now courtesy of @theresa_may  lies and treachery over Brexit. Obvious this was always the plan. 
Whilst the row over brexit is going on don't take your eyes off of Sajid Javid who apparently is having the police instructed in Soros approved hate crime. 
This  from @jennirsl is superb! The headline is perfect and I could have pulled out almost every paragraph as being exactly how I see it.Anyone still clinging to brexit should be asked to read this. Maybe they will see the truth & become #remainernow 
Amazing display from the the RAF over London today #RAF100 #RAF100Flypast #Brexit #StopBrexitNow 
#BREXIT = the biggest waste of time, resources and energy this country has ever seen. Best to #StopBrexit immediately and stop pissing away our country's future before even more damage is done. 
GOOD NEWS!  JRM confirms that the law is in place - if nothing else happens, we will leave EU with no deal, bring it on!   @BorisJohnson #boris johnson #borisjohnson #Brexit  
Labour leadership: No you’re not ‘standing up for British workers.’ You’re selling us down the river by openly supporting the Tories & Brexit. You are a drivelling excuse for an Opposition, lying about protecting jobs even as they drain away before our eyes because of Brexit.  
It’s all part of the plan. Robbins et al blocked the publication of the White Paper from at least March because 1) they’d lose policy control and 2) Ipso facto it’s contents might not be the Hotel California Brexit they delivered at Chequers  
Five things you need to know about Dominic Raab, the man Theresa May has chosen to lead her Tory Brexit. 
Merkel might as well sing 'Lean on me' to May. Theresa would then duly oblige.Nothing more sickening than seeing our servile Prime Minister pleading and begging Merkel on bended knee to save her and her plot for a fake #Brexit 
Prime Minister - RemainChancellor - RemainHome Secretary - RemainForeign Secretary - RemainEducation Secretary - RemainHealth Secretary - RemainBusiness Secretary - RemainHow does this Cabinet represent UK? Is it any surprise Brexiteers are sceptical? #MayMustGo #Brexit 
Theresa May promises 'orderly' Brexit as two more Tories quit  
Theresa May has been hit by more resignations over her Brexit plan.Ben Bradley and Maria Caulfield stepped down as vice chairs of the Conservative Party, one calling the plan as "the worst of all worlds". Catch up on the Brexit latest here: 
A totally fair criticism. We warned from the beginning that the absence of a plan would be the greatest vulnerability but the arrogant Brexit blob in London thought they knew better.  
CENTRISTS : CORBYN IS WRONG ON BREXIT, HE SUPPORTS THE GOVERNMENT LINE.(after a day of tory resignations)CENTRISTS : WE MUST STAND ALONGSIDE THE GOVERNMENT ON BREXIT TO ENSURE IT DOESN'T COLLAPSE. WE DON'T WANT A GENERAL ELECTION.#MandatoryReselection#JC4PM 
People please stand up against the liars bring about Brexit we’ve been lied to for the past 40+ years now is the time to stop this deceit. How did “common market” back in 70’s turn into this EU dictatorship. Back door deceit and lies lies lies for the past 40+ years.GET US OUT  
Theresa May: "You can only deliver Brexit, if you believe in Brexit."Theresa May: Campaigned for RemainTheresa May: Put together the Chequers plan, which would make the UK a rule-taker.Theresa May: Doesn't believe, and shows she cannot deliver.Theresa May: Needs to go  
Just when you think the Brexit negotiations can’t get any more dire, in walks the sexist, poverty, workers rights and human rights denier Dominic Raab  
People of Britain who voted Tory on their promise of delivering #brexit you have been clearly lied to . My question to you is what are you going to do about it ? 
At this point If Gareth Southgate would just gently point out that Brexit is a silly idea that’s bad for the waistcoat industry, it’d be cancelled overnight 
Apparently Sadiq Khan was so offended with this street art he got it removed... He hates seeing it on social media... you know what to do!!!#Brexit #BrexitBetrayal #TheresaMay #FreeTommy #TrumpBaby #Trumpballoon #SadiqKhan #London #Commons #C4News #GeneralElection #chrisgreen 
I don’t believe Brexit was ever meant to ‘work’.It is just another example of one of Moscow’s “blunt weapons” used to bludgeon parts of the Western alliance.We now know there are many connected players/coordinated angles to Russia’s attack on the West. 
In the two years since the Leave campaign unexpectedly won, nobody has been able to come up with a Brexit plan that can satisfy everyone. Why? Because fulfilling the false promises peddled by Boris Johnson is impossible.  
On my bus home tonight two Gen Z girls with amazing contouring and nail varnish had a huge passionate discussion about the resignations, Brexit, the Trump protest and @OwenJones84 Cannot WAIT until these wonderful people can vote. 
Do you realise @guyverhofstadt @MichelBarnier that the basis for brexit rests on a vote which broke electoral law. It is not democratic. We are screaming in a very British way for #peoplesvote and our politicians ignore us. We are being dragged out of EU against our will 
'May's days are OVER' Brexiteer demands new PM as soft Brexit deal makes Cabinet CRUMBLE  
'She turned red lines into WHITE FLAGS' Rees-Mogg TEARS APART May's soft Brexit plan  
Er actually that is @ediramaal - sort it out @bbcpolitics I mean I know Brexit is making us more insular but we ought to know one Balkan leader from another  
Of course Merkel approved May’s #Brexit plan. Merkel co-authored it and it protects German industry for more than it helps the UK. 
Football has been coming home to swell the bottom line for pubs, shops and even one record company as England's unexpected run to the semi-finals delivers a timely boost for Britain's Brexit-bound economy #WorldCup #ENG 
Time for Labour and Conservatives to split, and for Blue Labour and Red Tories to merge with the Lib Dems.A strong, centrist, pro Europe party will be able to face down the unholy ERG-UKIP-Socialist Worker Brexit alliance that is poisoning British politics#peoplesvote 
‘Our aim is not to undermine democracy, but to use the democratic process to achieve the change we seek, which is a reversal of #Brexit.’ RT @Jon_Danzig’s latest commentary today. Link:  #ExitBrexit #PeoplesVote 
Brextremists are blaming Remainers for the mess. Nonsense! The problem is that lies do not fit reality! The #Brexit lies are breaking on the rocks of reality, or to put it another way it is becoming ever clearer that brexshit cannot be polished.#StopBrexit #FBPE pic.twitter.com/bTRFOhwNbh 
Been attacked by Corbynites saying "we need to get the Tories out - *then* we can stop #Brexit Of course what was absolutely obvious is Corbyn has no interest in getting the Tories out.So now what @UKLabour ? 
Politics of Mafia May - I’d have had to machine-gun my way out!Ex Brexit Secretary David Davis remarked:“Chequers was an ambush.I would have had to machine-gun my way out!If I had resigned, I would have called a Daimler & done it in style.”#Brexit #EU 
Incredibly, the Lib Dems are putting forth a motion calling for a 'govt of unity' - they want another coalition with the Tories! To deliver Brexit! That they apparently oppose! Have they learned absolutely nothing??!! They truly are the most deceitful, lying bastards going. pic.twitter.com/x4o13uELDK 
Michael Gove poses with  Theresa May to show his loyal support for her #brexit plan  
Yes because a gerrymandered ref won on dark money ( yes I’m taking about your DUP mates ) , propaganda , lies & electoral fraud is so Democratic in post Brexit / Trump world isn’t it ? #VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw 
what is the point of Brexit ? Because you see I know many people who enjoy being able to freely work back and forward across Europe - its important in so many careers and I worked in science where we were completely cross EU - now give me something positive about Brexit - please! 
Matthew Parris - The problem with the Tory hardline #Brexiteers.. the crazies.. #Brexit is not a political belief it's a faith-based thing & you see something go funny in their eyes when you talk about Europe.. you can't argue with these people & they're bringing the country down  
Felt a bit icky watching Cable sucking up to May, and congratulating her for being in favour of a SM and CU,just with a different name.FFS that has been in Labours' Brexit Manifesto since Day 1,but that was a "bad" idea. Sycophantic double standards  
I've just joined UKIP.If you believe in Brexit, you should too. 
Ominous words. Support for the Tories nosediving after May's Chequers debacle. If the leadership does not change the haemorrhage will only continue. Conservative Party, is this the beginning of the end?#MayMustGo#Brexit  
Here’s a Labour’s shadow minister, Jenny Chapman standing up in the house today and saying, clear as a bell“We don’t want an exit from Brexit”,  Lib Dem’s Tom Brake having tabled a motion for an exit from Brexit and #PeoplesVote.  
It's only taken 9 months since groups like ours voraciously pointed out that transitions & back stops could only lead to a negation of Brexit to name only.Sadly too many chose to kick the can to defer hard facts to protect party & career which has led the nation to a dark hole.  
Rich's friend has wanted brexit for years but having seen brexit unfold he now is concerned and is becoming a #remainernowThere are many leave voters starting to feel this way and it's vital those wanting to #StopBrexit allow these people to find their voices. 
Brexit turmoil is a wake-up call that’ll put off other countries from leaving the European Union, German minister says  
Why is @theresa_may still allowed to showboat and continue to lie about Brexit now saying how happy Merkel is with the outcome I bet she fucking is! Because we have no Brexit somebody needs to oust May she's killing our Brexit the lying Globalist Toad! 
Dave Brown on Brexit troubles for Theresa May and the 100th anniversary of the RAF - Political Cartoon Gallery in Putney  
Mrs May re Chequers: to deliver a smooth & orderly #Brexit that ' 'protects jobs, protects livelihoods & also meets our commitment for no hard Border between RoI & N.I'ME: So we'll have to #Remain in the EU then...that's a relief. 
This is extremely illustrative #Brexit #BorisWatch #TheresaMay 
Of all the bollocks surrounding Brexit the promise to "deliver the Brexit people voted for" is the annual Buster Gonad memorial prize winner. 
Lib Dem Commons bid for second Brexit referendum has been defeated - Those in favour:Ayes 13Noes 299  
Merkel's already given the 'common response' of the EU 2 a document which never went anywhere near the department established 2 handle Brexit. She saw & commented on the UK's Brexit document before our own elected government had even seen it. It's called treason in my book. You?  
“A Trump trade deal would spell the end for the NHS”Cue Jeremy Hunt sitting down with Trump to discuss US-UK trade deals in his new role as Foreign Secretary....#NHS70 #Brexit 
BREXIT: Mail readers seem to live in an alternate universe where Nigel Farage is renegade hero and not a the clown prince of a ghost party.  
Gammonish, lecture 1:Will of the people = tentative interpretation of a majority vote in an advisory referendumElites = anyone who cannot see any benefits of BrexitUncontrolled immigration = reciprocal Freedom of MovementTake control of our Borders = deny entry to Muslims 
Delingpole: Trump Backs Boris Johnson’s Brexit Rebellion   
Some people are starting to call May's #Chequers proposal, "Soft Brexit".It is nothing of the kind.May wants to leave the single market for services, which account for 80% of our economy. #Brexit in any form will hit hardest those with least. We must oppose it outright. 
Dear all,Please join us on Friday afternoonat the #MarchAgainstTrump #TrumpBaby #TrumpUKVisit protest march in London to say loud & clear - you are NOT welcome in UK & HANDS OFF OUR NHS! #NHS70 #GeneralElection #GE2018Now #Brexit  
Your reminder for today: The referendum was advisory. Democracy did not stop on 23rd June. Protest is a part of democracy. The ballot paper was yes/no, it did not state leaving SM or CU You're welcome.  #FBPE #stopbrexit #VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw pic.twitter.com/qMCWHQ4Jh0 
"Boris had been in danger of looking like one of politics’s nearly men. Suddenly, he is looking principled, even heroic – the figurehead of the Brexit resistance."  
The report is also expected to cover AIQ and their use of British voters' data during the referendum. Vote Leave used AIQ as a way to overspend during the referendum campaign. Should be good! #VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw 
The British people were massively misinformed on the major issues in the #Brexit referendum. Many had been thoroughly duped by the lies pumped out by the tax-dodging #Brexit billionaire press, lies reinforced by cynical and dishonest Brexit politicians.#StopBrexit #PeoplesVote 
'My chances of being PM are about as good as the chances of my being reincarnated as an olive': Boris Johnson’s 11 most florid phrases as he resigns over Brexit plan 
Part of my interview on Sky News about why #TheresaMay’s   #ChequersPlan is not a soft #Brexit but a chaotic, costly and unworkable fudge :  
This is straight up disaster capitalism from the think tank behind the Brexit minister:  
Our politicians are offering us the choice between a brutal hard #Brexit, and a slightly less damaging bodged-up #Brexit in order to save their careers. Our political system is wholly broken, and requires reform from top to bottom.#StopBrexit #PeoplesVote 
Despite the resignation of two cabinet members, @WJames_Reuters explains there may be a silver lining to May's #Brexit crisis  
Tory MP attacks Number 10 for ‘STITCHING UP’ the country with May's Brexit plan  
There you have it folks, #Labour Deputy Leader saying it's Labour's job to back May, prop up Govt & #Brexit. Labour policy is now officially to be Red Tories. Let that sink in.Never again will I put up with a Corbynista telling me #FBPE is a cult & #LibDems are Yellow Tories. 
I’m from Peterborough. Peterborough posted a huge Leave vote, yet Captain Brexit Stewart Jackson still lost his seat. Why? Because he’s an awful, hard-line dickhead and the constituents didn’t want him. Even my parents’ dyed-in-the-wool Tory mates thought he was an embarrassment.  
Please would you explain @BorisJohnson how a mob of hard-right entitled multimillionaire brats throwing toys from their prams and blackmailing the prime minister to push for a deranged hard Brexit (that has NO MANDATE) is an expression of democratic sovereignty? 
Who says #BorisJohnson did nothing in the national interest? Since he resigned, we've had £500+ in donations!Please keep sharing and donating. Now is the time for us to redouble our efforts. #Labour can stop #Brexit and then unseat Boris!   
#Brexit was always based on lies & so undeliverable. Tory ministers who peddled fantasy now exposed as self-serving frauds. It needs to be stopped before any more harm to the UK is done. We need Corbyn to share this view and quickly. Time for having cake and eating must now end 
If you don't like swearing don't read.May was on the TV again saying #Brexit is the will of the British people. No it fucking isn't. It was the will of some of the people and none of them had a fucking clue what it would entail until now.Is that fucking clear @theresa_may 
Alexa, negotiate Brexit x 
Carole is entirely right.Whilst a lacklustre / incompetent approach to holding the Government to account on Brexit on the basis of it being seen as expedient to hold the party together.There is no excuse whatsoever for ignoring a crime.#fbpe 
The thing about the “Leave voters won’t forgive a soft Brexit” take is that Leave voters, like Remainers, will take their political cues from what politicians on “their” side say about it. 
The Tories resigning over #Brexit are quitting because the government is unwilling to inflict enough harm on the British people through a brutal hard #Brexit. These MPs are betraying their duty to the nation. #BrexitBetraysBritain#StopBrexit #FBPE 
At European American Chamber of Commerce @MichelBarnier said “we will not change who we are as the EU because the UK is leaving ... Open markets for financial services are an asset to the EU and will remain so in the future” #Brexit 
An American wrote this Twitter thread on Brexit and it's eye-opening  
True. Not normally affable @GavinBarwell’s style I would have thought. Dominic Raab was gracious & generous in asking me to stay on but he was overruled. I admit I stood shoulder to shoulder with DD to deliver Brexit & that annoyed the Europe Unit who are now running the show.  
A Brexit tour de force here from Paul Joseph Watson. This is very effective political messaging and he is in UKIP now.  
So here we have it. A Labour deputy leader actually says that Labour wants the Tories to remain in power and deliver Brexit. Regardless of austerity, Windrush or all the damage of Brexit, Labour will support the Tories and Theresa May all the way.#PeoplesVote 
I'm thinking through the matter of @RuthDavidsonMSP's reappearance on TV news today (BBC & STV). Two pieces to camera - one outside Holyrood, one inside. Both allow her to sound off about #brexit, neither asks her about #DarkMoney and offensive Tory councillors.What's going on? 
This is how the whole sorry Brexit tragedy started. Bored as The Daily Telegraph's Brussels correspondent, he spun entertainingly and luridly written but largely fictional tales of how Britain was suffering from incompetent and overweening European bureaucracy. 
⁦@RossThomson_MP⁩   Why don’t you show your support for David Davis and Boris Johnson By resigning as MP for Aberdeen South and let your constituents show how much they approve of you and your stance re #brexitHave you got the gut to!   
Alan Morrison has been running his business in Bishopbriggs for 12 years. Last week he told us why the European Single Market & Customs Union is important to his work.  #Brexit #ProtectingWhatMatters 
Michael St George: This has just got a lot bigger than #Brexit - Our Prime Minister is 'prepared to destroy her own party, even democracy itself, to perpetuate Britain’s subservience to the anti-democratic supranational EU.'  via @theconwom 
@STVNews I note that @RuthDavidsonMSP popped up on camera in the Scottish Parliament bumping her gums about #brexit, but you asked her nothing. Nothing!Why didn't you ask her about #DarkMoney and the conduct of her councillors? Explain yourselves. 
Brexit now fully what I expected it to be: not a clean cut, but a long, fraught, always incomplete process. UK will formally leave soon, but after that it will keep leaving. And that will of course be a thorn in the EU’s side - which in a way has fallen into a trap 
'Boris Johnson, a politician whose ambition and superficial charm far outstrip his ability, judgment or principles, is destabilizing the British government and threatening the country’s future.' 
Theresa May's betrayal of Brexit has exposed the deep rot in British politics: the mainstream parties no longer represent the people. They cannot deliver what we voted for, says Brendan O'Neill. 
Germany's Merkel welcomes May's Brexit proposals  
Today, under the cloak of concerns about Brexit, the Lib Dems brought a motion in Parliament calling for “a government of national unity”.Never forget what the Lib Dems did to our communities last time they got into bed with the Tories.Now they want to do it again.  
Bigger than #BrexitNow clear we have a political class determined NOT to enact instruction given to it by British electorate & PM prepared to destroy her own party, even democracy, to perpetuate Britain’s subservience to anti-democratic supranational #EU 
 TRANSCRIPT: Speech by @MichelBarnier @EACCNY just now - “One thing is clear: we will not change who we are as the European Union because the #UK is leaving. The EU is and will remain the most open market in the world”  #Brexit @EUintheUS 
Spot on from Simon - how can Liam Fox, Penny Mordaunt & Dominic Raab remain in this pathetic attempt to thwart the British people of their democratic #Brexit  
There is a certain pleasure in the so far 100% correlation between ‘resigning from some govt role because Hard Brexit’ and being a complete shit in general.  ‘That one? Opposed abortion’, ‘That one? Sterilisation for the poor’, ‘That one? Boris Johnson’, and so forth. 
The intellectual dishonesty of the Brexit Taliban is now in full view, writes @carlbildt  
WATCH | Theresa May blocks a journalist from asking Angela Merkel what she thinks of May's warped Brexit plan. Insecure, weak, and full of contempt for people who question her agenda. Resign!Support us at  
The more one sees of Theresa May's new anti-Brexit junta, the more it resembles a coup d'etat against the British people. Those Brexiteers who remain in it are giving it a shred of respectability that it does not deserve. 
What Brexiteers like Baker claimed was scaremongering by us Remainers turns out to be seermongering as most of not all of my predictions on the difficulty and damage of Brexit are turning out 100% true!  
For pities sake man, stop talking utter bollocks. Corbyn wants Brexit, yet the majority of Labour Party Members and supporters do not. He is causing the problem.When it comes to Brexit, voting Tory or Labour is like choosing between differently coloured glitter covered turds.1 
Predictably positive statement from Barnier. EU will be looking to shore up support for May as she faces attacks from hard Brexit right. But sting in the tail is mention of indivisibility of four freedoms  
WATCH: Home Sec admits to me today that best deal for our safety + security is current levels of cooperation with EU. So why did his Minister vote against @NickTorfaenMP amendment on police and justice cooperation this morning? Incoherence. #Brexit @peoplesvote_uk @Open_Britain 
Tory Party vice-chairman Maria Caulfield resigned over the Chequers #Brexit deal She revealed: “Since the announcement on Friday my constituents, whether they voted leave or remain, have contacted me in large numbers to say they do not support the deal." 
at the end of the day Boris obviously wasn’t going to crack on with Brexit when he wasn’t feeling a connection and Theresa is gravitating towards Brexit so that’s clearly where it’s loyalties lie 
#Brexiteer Bridgen:  “The Prime Minister has promised on repeated occasions that 'Brexit means #Brexit'. But it now appears those promises are all a pretence and a charade intended to dupe the electorate, which is an insult to their intelligence." 
Theresa May’s Chequers Agreement will make Britain a vassal state of the EU. It doesn’t take a genius to realise that this isn’t Brexit it’s BRINO.The People’s Army must assemble again! Visit  and let’s get on with the job and get out now! 
The more screwed up Brexit becomes, the more likely Independence is to happen in Scotland #Scotref 
Come on Quitlings!   Tell me that you all knew this when you voted to leave the EU.  Some of the views of the new Brexit Secretary ⁦@DominicRaab⁩ 
Another Tory MP, Conservative vice chair Ben Bradley, has adopted the rapidly escalating collective position that no Government is better then a bad Government and quits over Brexit  
Lord Heseltine on Sky says UK won't be on the top table of Europe post Brexit. Reality checkUK is on the World top table.We are one of the big 5 on the UN security Council table. UK are on top table of NATO.UK shares a table with 53 Commonwealth Countries.The Lord is wrong. 
May's plan is not #Brexit - But as Boris wrote, "What is even more disturbing is that this is our opening bid." 
OMG!!! Boris has Quit!!! The Brexit Dream is Dying!!!!  
Remember:  What Sharia May did to Brexit will happen to our own MAGA movement if we're not careful and re-elect RINOs within the GOP. Always vote for MAGA candidates, not RINOs or NeoCons. Do your homework and spread the message! 
Are you happy with Theresa May’s Brexit strategy? 
When the only people supporting your Brexit plan are Remainers, at what point do you wake up and accept that there is something radically wrong with your Brexit proposal??!!  
Amazing how a nation that colonized almost the entire world is now being marginalised #Brexit 
More headaches for Theresa May as two more Tories quit their roles over the Chequers Brexit agreement.  
5 key points you should know about our plan for Brexit   
Under Labour’s Brexit plan things will BE WORSE for poor people. Don’t you understand Brexit at all? 
It's really not. I did a survey. Labour would smash through the polls if they would just take a stance to check Brexit by supporting a confirmation referendum #PeoplesVote 71% of almost 4000 FBPE voters would support Labour if they tried to #StopBrexit 
Govt politicians won't admit it because it doesn't fit their narrative, but there has been a dramatic shift to British public attitudes, in FAVOUR of immigration since Brexit and Windrush. A thread:  
Just on BBC world news talking about Brexit. It should be clear to the EU now that May has given all she feasibly can if they don't want to risk Corbyn and his complete destruction of state aid rules and market interventions. Or a full break under Boris. 
.@JennyChapman admits Labour don't oppose Brexit. Despite over 70% of their members wanting to stay in the EU. While Labour are happy to go along with the Tories hand in hand, the Lib Dems want to give YOU the chance to #ExitfromBrexit. Add your name: 
For Brexit deal, UK and EU weigh benefits, costs, risks for their capitalists. Effects on UK, EU workers are just “collateral damage.” Brexit always a capitalists’ game with the people as pawns. 
By the way, here's her stance on Ireland's referendum. Remind me again Graham how you're fighting for women's rights by signal boosting this lot?  
Odious Blairite Stephen Kinnock just paid tribute to Theresa May and commended her Brexit deal, in an excruciating interview on LBC Several Blairites have defended Theresa May today - yet they regularly attack their own leader, Jeremy Corbyn, in the Murdoch gutter press... 
Will the end of May come in July? Boris' Brexit bombshell threatens to sink Theresa (Op-Ed by @NeilClark66)  
Detected a bit of confusion so hope this will helpNo Deal = no withdrawal agreement so we crash out in March 2019 and have only WTO and no transition period.Hard Brexit is a trade deal after transition that leaves us outside both the single market, customs union and ECJ 
Bruges Group emails its supporters: "Theresa May has decided to pursue a policy of Brexit in name only (BRINO). This arrangement will be worse than our current membership of the EU". 
Andrew Bridgen, the first Tory MP to publicly confirm he's submitted a letter of no confidence in the Prime Minister, tells LBC there are "more than 60" MPs who could "potentially" consider a change in leader to avert Theresa May's Chequers Brexit policy. 
Maggie would have delivered Brexit we all voted for, proud to be British she would never betray the electorate after giving them a vote, she’d have told Barnier where to go, in fact seem to recall her doing just that. 
Southgate: "England World Cup win could heal Brexit wounds"Huh....how you feeling about that #Scotland #NorthernIreland #Wales #Remainers ? You ready to get over the EU, SM, CU, GFA for a trophy thats doesn't even have a feckin functioning cabinet to go home to?#indyref2 
There’s a sniff of revolution in the air.  You can’t betray democracy without consequences.  The @Conservatives need to be extremely careful & would be wise to get rid of May ASAP & deliver #Brexit properly.  Ignore the electorate at your peril.  #MayMustGo #BrexitBetrayal 
We cannot let this happen. This is what is at stake now, the very survival of the oldest political party.Peoples concerns need addressing, policies need adjusting and Brexit needs delivering.As Nike would say, just do it.  
It is disgraceful that Ben Bradley had no action taken against him by @BrandonLewis for covering up and defending the #Islamophobia of a Tory Councillor & is now only going because of Brexit. Action is still needed.  
Tory Vice Chairs quit and attack May's Brexit plan 
Farage to Return as UKIP Leader Unless Brexit ‘Back on Track’ by March ’19   
Tory vice chairman Ben Bradley’s resignation letter.In short, “let’s throw Northern Ireland under the bus to get the hard Brexit we want”.  
A call for a second referendum on the UK's membership of the European Union has been overwhelmingly rejected by the Commons, reports @PaulRowleyBBC 
LBC: Maria Caulfield and Ben Bradley resign as vice-chairs of Conservatives over the Chequers Brexit agreement  
The truth about Dominic Raab, appointed by Theresa May to be in charge of the Tory Brexit  
Perhaps instead of one resignation a day, the ERG should release one paragraph of their Brexit plan a day.  They do have one, don't they?  
When stopping Corbyn is your game-plan, it's easy to move seamlessly from, 'hey, why are you supporting Tory Brexit' to 'hey, why aren't you supporting Tory Brexit' 
Two more big resignations - Ben Bradley and Maria Caulfield out as Tory vice chairs - in another blow for Theresa the Appeaser. Bradley didn't even vote for Brexit and is opposed to this complete farce!Support us at  
Democracy doesn’t end on 1 dayIt’s a continuous processBrexit was funded by the billionaire eliteThe victims will be the poorYou can’t silence me#StopBrexitSaveDemocracy #StopBrexit full stop 
The paranoid delusions of Corbyn supporters are incredible. I've never voted tory in my life and never will. But equally I will never again vote for Labour until it stops supporting something that will make poor people poorer and cost workers their jobs. Time to stop brexit. 
Things Ben Bradley won’t resign over:Making defamatory claims about the leader of the Opposition.Saying that unemployed people should have vasectomies.Things he will resign over:The PM trying to vaguely mitigate the disaster of Brexit.Classy!  
Steve Baker claiming Leave voters were clearly informed *by the Remain campaign* Brexit wouldn’t be easy is breathtaking. They rubbished EVERYTHING Remain said as Project Fear & said Brexit would be easy & make us rich. 
Brexit is affecting the UK economy: a decrease in output of approximately £500 million per week.  
Or this, by small business owner Natalie Milton: . One of the many lies told about Brexit is that it's only large multinationals which are hurt by it and opposed to it. Actually multinationals can more easily absorb costs and/or relocate (taking jobs/taxes)  
If England win the world cup you have no right to take any pride in it whatsoever. You have sold out the majority of English people who overwhelmingly voted for full Brexit in the biggest mandate since the 1st elections held in 1695. 323 years of English democracy down the drain 
Voted @Conservatives as thought you'd deliver Brexit, lose the likes of me, you're in trouble; lose your core vote, activists & campaigners, and you're f*cked. May's turned the party into the Lib Dems, next GE, you'll join them in opposition & have seat numbers to match. 
The price of your mortgage is affected by interest rates. A country's interest rates are affected by its international credit rating. Since the Brexit ref, our international credit rating has been downgraded.#StopBrexit  
Michel Barnier says 80% of Brexit deal is agreed  So Olly Robbins and Teresa May have sold us down the river.  
Rubbish. I accepted Referendum result,  just like I would have expected Leave voters to have respected outcome if it had gone the other way. Trying to get best deal is very different to no deal or trying to overturn Referendum result.  
BREAKING: 2 Tory party vice-chairs quitting over PM May's Brexit strategy - government official  
Whoah. The prime minister survived losing her Brexit secretary and foreign secretary, but now she’s lost that guy who said the unemployed should have vasectomies. Can she come back from this? 
It's hilarious that people believe the #fbpe people have some master plan to thwart Labour. The vast majority of us are ordinary people who in the past have supported a wide range if parties but are now united in trying to stop a Brexit that is destroying our country. 
Tory Vice Chairs Quit in Protest at PM's Brexit Deal  
Cristiano Ronaldo has quit his role as a Parliamentary Private Secretary to move to Juventus and fight for Brexit, I think 
The idea that fighting Brexit is some secret anti Corbyn society just shows how bonkers they are now.I will fight Brexit every step of the way.I have never voted Tory in my lifeI will never vote Labour while this mob are in charge It’s not a secret ... 
"If Brexit Day ever happens, it will be a day of mourning."Lib Dem leader Sir Vince Cable says polls show 70 per cent of people believe the government is mishandling the Brexit negotiations.  
Remember also that Alex Salmond tabled an amendment for a quadruple lock to the EU Referendum Bill, meaning a leave win would have been dependent on all four nations voting for it. The amendment was rejected because "the referendum is advisory.” 
Ben Bradley has also quit as Tory Vice Chair. He's the charmer who once described working English people as a "vast sea of unemployed wasters" who should have vasectomies in order to stop them having several children. A proper man of the people our Ben.#BenBradley #Brexit 
READ: @mariacaulfield's resignation letter to Theresa May over her Chequers plan - "I cannot support the direction of travel in the Brexit negotiations which, in my view, do not fully embrace the opportunities that Brexit can provide"  
Labour "centrists" in 2015/16: Corbyn is the wrong leader because Labour needs to be in government.Labour "centrists" 2017: Corbyn is the wrong leader because Labour needs to stop Brexit.Labour "centrists" 2018: Support Tory Brexit to keep Corbyn from becoming Prime Minister.  
'Britain faces a dramatic choice for generations to come' - A stark warning in the latest @TheNewEuropean ft @mikegalsworthy @HealthierIn. There is no 'Brexit dividend' for the #NHS, only debt.  #NHS70 
WATCH: @ChukaUmunna slams George Eustice on #BBCDP for trying to blame everyone else apart from the Gov for this botched Brexit proposal. Please RT:  
Are we heading off a Brexit cliff "Thelma and Louise" style? @laylamoran thinks we might be, and calls for an extension of Article 50.It's not too late. We can #ExitfromBrexit. But we need your help. Add your name today:  
(Scot Tory MP really is as glaiket as it gets.) When asking his local buisness community about Brexit, he says they're not bothered, "businesses are resilient, we adapt, whatever the challenge may be...". So independence won't be a problem then either! Brilliant, thanks John.  
5 things you ought to know about Dominic Raab, the man Theresa May has chosen to lead her Tory Brexit.  
A pair of Tory vice chairs quit, saying @theresa_may’s Chequers Brexit plan is the route-map for @jeremycorbyn to become PM 
Tory vice chairs quit over Brexit  
A year & a half ago, this article kicked off an ICO investigation into use of data in the referendum & the biggest data investigation EVER. Interim report out tomorrow. All I’m saying is    
Maria Caulfield and Ben Bradley have resigned as vice chairs of the Conservative party due to their opposition of the Prime Minister Theresa May's Brexit policy agreed at Chequers last week 
Conservative party vice chairs Maria Caulfield and Ben Bradley quit over Theresa May's Chequers Brexit plan  
It’s not over yet. Claims of more Brexit resignations imminent - Maria Caulfield and Ben Bradley to quit as Tory party vice chairs. 
The big winners from May's reshuffle? Looks like the hard right, NHS-hating IEA (Institute of Economic Affairs).... with strong links to both the new Brexit Secretary and the new Health Secretary...  
Tory vice chairman Ben Bradley has quit over Brexit.  
BREAKING @bbclaurak: Maria Caulfield and Ben Bradley, two of the Tory party’s vice chairs are quitting their posts in protest at the Chequers compromise plan.Bradley was a Remainer. Caulfield a Leaver. They both warn they would lose their seats unless the Tories deliver Brexit. 
Sorry to read this and not the least bit surprised. The “news” is focused relentlessly now on clicks/views (brexit, trump, Thai kids) and 100s of important stories go untold 
Want to apologize to anyone who was offended by my last post. Nigel Farage needed a tv studio, i was asked and he used mine (to talk Brexit) and he was a perfect gentleman to me and my family and that was the essence of my post. 
Meet Dominic Raab, the man Theresa May has chosen to lead her Tory Brexit#marr #pmqs #bbcqt 
“There has been a Remainer coup. Remainers now occupy all the highest political offices in the land. It is hard to remember a time when the ruling class has been so spectacularly out of touch with public opinion.”Brendan O’Neill on the anti-Brexit elite. 
Ok - there is a leaver who is short of factual evidence for a “ no deal “ brexit - I am awaiting a response to a series of questions I asked him ...... inwont hold my breath !  
The chief of one of America's biggest banks has warned that Brexit could be 'tough for the British people' and its impact could affect global economic growth  
We never lost sovereignty. Otherwise we wouldn't have been able to hold a referendum.  
It’s now clear the Brexit negotiation process has descended into farce. Our generation will be affected the most by a bad deal, that’s why we deserve a say. Join the march   
The new Brexit Secretary has long been nurtured and supported by one of Britain’s most controversial neoliberal thinktanks. Latest from @AdamRamsay & @PeterKGeoghegan. 
How can even 14% think this useless plan does anything but betray Britain and Brexit  
@theresa_may has betrayed the British people and the Brexit vote. We need someone with guts and vision to lead this country. Not a gutless appeaser who cares more about what the EU than what Britain needs. 
What's needed now is a #BrexitCoalition to ensure there's just one Brexit candidate in each seat at next election.The 17.4m can then elect a majority of MPs who'll deliver the Brexit we voted for.What a novel idea, politicians respecting a democratic vote!Let's make it happen.  
"I could live with these terms... just. The worry is that they will be further watered down” says Conservative MEP @DanielJHannan on the Prime Minister’s strategy for life outside the EU.#bbcwato #Brexit  
Absolutely appalled that not once does @theresa_may ever say she regrets loss of freedoms and rights of the poorest if we stay in the EU!  Death of democracy.  Is this worth a mention? NOT ACCORDING TO THE PM.  @borisjohnson #borisjohnson #boris johnson #Brexit  
Still waiting for Nadine's fully-costed Brexit plan.Ah, that's right, she doesn't have one.  
EU negotiator Michel Barnier says 80% of Brexit deal is agreed  
Austerity makes people fat.University makes people dumb.Brexit makes us stay in the EU.Voting keeps things the same.The absolute State of us. 
Boris Johnson used to say a Norway-style Brexit would be “essential and deliverable”. Boris said of the EU: “if we did not have [it], we would invent something like it.”  
How did this gem - #Boris backing the Single Market and a reformed EU in 2103 - fail to materialise in the Referendum campaign? Remain really let ppl down.  
Check out these paintings of Boris , May  and farage  , painted by David Bannister of 'Artists For Brexit' ... the stuff of nightmares  
The Ladybird book of colluding with foreign powers part of the understanding #brexit series  
Are Brexiters going to pay the mortgages of the millions of people whose livelihoods Brexit endangers? 
Jobs First Brexit its JOB LOSSES BREXIT!!  @UKLabour when are you going to change your Brexit stance, people are losing jobs now! If you opposed Brexit alot voters would support you. If you don't lose them & be associated with supporting a damaging Brexit.  
Boris Johnson says staying in the single market would be “ludicrous” and turn Britain into a “colony”. Here’s what he said before the referendum:  
#Brexit is a monumental act of self harm. My thoughts on how it happened.  
As the Brexit crisis deepens, UKIP announces new and previously unknown special advisor ‘Nigelos Ferragio’.  
Watch: Shambles #Brexit negotiations have led to 9 resignations across 3 key #Brexit departments since talks began. We need a #PeoplesVote on the final deal 
To hold a referendum in Serbia on the future of the Serbian province of Kosovo and Metohija is tantamount to Serbia holding a referendum on its very identity. Such a scenario would be national suicide for Serbia. The Serbian identity is incontrovertible. #KosovojeSrbija 
@KateHoeyMP is an affront to democracy: the vast majority of her constituents voted against Brexit but she disregards them in the arrogant belief that her own unintelligent views are more important than those she is supposed to represent. 
The IEA is ubiquitous in UK media. The think tank doesn’t say who funds it but we do know it has some good friends in government- especially our new Brexit minister Dominic Raab.  
Five things you need to know about Dominic Raab, the man Theresa May has chosen to lead her Tory Brexit.  
Brexit was supposed to be about taking back control, not being governed by the back door, says @andreajenkyns 
JPMorgan issues bleak warning on #brexit damage - it could be “tough for the British people” and hurt everyone  via @FT 
.@LaylaMoran: "former Leave voters are changing their views in swathes, confronted with the reality of a post-Brexit Britain." 
Labour's 2017 manifesto was little different from the Tory one in distributional impact (& much less progressive than Lib Dem one). The party has been pathetically weak on Brexit. And now the JLC deems it "institutionally antisemitic". What exactly is the point of the party?  
Finally we see @theresa_may  hand.She never had any intention of delivering #Brexit. Is that what she went to see Merkel for - to tell her and Europe that the UK was 100% in their hands. How impotent ordinary people must feel in this so called democracy. Shame on you Theresa May  
The cheek of ministers trying to blame everyone but themselves for their chaotic handling of Brexit is to behold!  
Isn’t that a little silly?If you are so concerned about democracy (quite apart from the fact the referendum was corrupt & “won” on lies!) wouldn’t you want to put the final deal to a vote?  You could call it a #PeoplesVote ? Brexit isn’t popular anymore.#StopBrexit 
You are a public servant. People voted for you ONCE ...they may well not do so again. I certainly wouldn't. And the referendum was advisory. Check it out. 
why is it that when Davis & Johnson resigned from a brexit party with no plan & a totally undeliverable project that still nobody has the balls yet to say look the will of the people isnt possible without major damage and if we progress we will be guilty of gross negligence. 
My latest on ⁦@RT_com⁩ #Brexit #Shambles #BorisJohnsonResigns #DavidDavis #Corbyn #Labour #Russia #Salisbury #Amesbury #Novichok #DogEnds 
Some idiots in bulldozers started digging up the street, and they severed the power line and burst the water main, and now they've just given up and walked away, no wait that’s Brexit. 
WATCH: @wesstreeting is right to say that this botched Brexit proposal from Chequers will affect generations for generations. It's time for a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal. Please RT:  
#Barcelona court to investigate the #Spanish police, suspected of documentary falsification in summons before #1Oct referendum.Interrogations in July 2017 of top officials in the #Generalitat may have been made without a court order. 
Where have all the #FBPE brigade gone .. the silence is deafening .. proving their crusade all along was nothing to do with Brexit but to keep @jeremycorbyn out of no10 #JC4PM 
Irish prime minister welcomes UK Brexit statement  
Negativity about immigration falls sharply in Brexit Britain: so where did originally come from? Clue: “Rhetoric about #immigration spiralled during the referendum campaign”. So again it’s politics that fuels #migration crisis, rather than responding to it 
Sorry, Emily, but Labour's Brexit position is no more "Adult" than May's. You don't want "the" Customs Union but "a" Customs Union (without common external tariffs!), and you want a Single Market trade deal with the same benefits as now but without Freedom of Movement!+=  
The government has set aside £17m to plan for a no-deal Brexit, slightly more than Southampton have just paid for Basel midfielder Mohamed Elyounoussi  
Liam, you know our potential. Why haven’t you resigned? With Trump about to arrive it would send a very loud message to Remainer May. You’re close to the US, stand with the president that backs Brexit and a FTA #MayMustGo 
In an age of tattoos, tongue piercings and tensions over Brexit, a soft-spoken man in a dark blue waistcoat and striped tie is uniting England amid dreams of victory in soccer's World Cup. @DanicaKirka 
The new #brexit minister is none other than Chris Heaton-Harris, 'McCarthyite' MP who wrote to universities demanding a list of tutors' names, as revealed here.    
Imagine the UK was an African country…Headline: Botched BrexitLead: The regime of the once mighty oppressive small archipelago kingdom hellbent on isolationism is on the brink of collapse 
It is, admittedly, inferior to the option of Remaining. But still far superior to the catastrophic, xenophobic, know-nothing, ball-scratching hard Brexit that people too lazy to think still hanker for. 
Brexit: Great speech by @timfarron in the House of Commons, unfortunately it was interrupted by inane, tribal comments by Labour MPs doing the work of the Tory Brexiters. 
Tories lied to us when they took us into the EEC (EU) in 1973.Tories are now lying to us about #Brexit.Tories are not taking us OUT.Tories are ensuring we remain IN for ever more.Tories will never recover from this #BrexitBetrayalTory MPs need to be very worried. 
Brexit is Dying:  via @YouTube 
There’s not just open warfare in the Conservative party.It now appears that members of the hard #brexit group “ERG” are turning on each other....  
Boris Johnson has launched a scathing attack on Theresa May's Brexit strategy, saying the "dream is dying, suffocated by needless self-doubt"  
With Tommy's arrest and the Brexit Betrayal the people have had enough!Read now: #Brexit #BrexitBetrayal #TheresaMay #FreeTommy #TrumpBaby #Trumpballoon #SadiqKhan #London #Commons #C4News #GeneralElection #chrisgreen #charitytuesday #TuesdayThoughts 
Tim Farron says he has spent more time filling in his World Cup wallchart this year than David Davis has spent on negotiating Brexit 
Tusk has many times said he accepts the result of the referendum, he is not under any obligation to like Brexit and is allowed to hope that the UK changes its mind 
It really is remarkable how many Labour supporters think Jeremy has a planned strategy . They genuinely think he's going to come swooping in, wearing  his knickers over his tights to save them from brexit. Whit?? 
As long as the Pathetic #LIAR & #FRAUDSTER @theresa_may Remains in the Office of #PM, #Britain will #Remain within the #EU! The EU #TURD polisher needs to GO! #MayMustGo #MayMustGoNow @Conservatives #BBC #SKY @LBC #LBC @ConHome @CCHQPress #ConservativeParty #TheresaMay #BREXIT  
Boris Johnson "not dealing in reality over Brexit", says Irish opposition leader Micheál Martin  
WATCH: 9 resignations across 3 key #Brexit departments since #Brexit talks began. We need a #PeoplesVote on the final deal to take back control 
.@JennyChapman says "the Chequers proposals are dead in the water", mocks the idea of a second referendum, and says "we don't want an exit from #Brexit". She says this as Labour Brexit minister. As a Labour member, voter and activist my views are not being represented. Whose are? 
QUOTE OF THE DAY“When we deliver a successful Brexit ... history will judge that David Davis was one of the great architects” - Jeremy Hunt Here is one of his earlier works. Stunning, imaginative effective, anbitious, enticing, practical and futuristic.  
Brexit happened for the exact same reason but folk are still doing everything they can to deflect and obfuscate the issue. Either you belong to the reality based community and can accept basic facts or you’re an agent of the cult of White supremacy. Choose already. 
May reasserts her authority after Brexit resignations  
A hard Brexit is now baked in and the UK faces an economic catastrophe, but there is still a silver lining. The Brits have faced a disorderly world before and they can do it again.  
And given Dr Bastani is calling @JulieOwenMoylan a Tory for suggesting May’s Brexit could well be softer than Corbyn’s, I think we know what the WhatsApp group’s instructions were today 
Any option that includes leaving the EU means that we are worse off than we are now. The inability of Brexit supporters to produce any usable alternative in 2 years since the referendum is the fault of you and your fellow ideological extremists. You had no plan it’s your fault.  
It's a rapidly-changing world for television viewing - which makes last night's figures even more gratifying. @BBCOne @BBCNews @BBCNewsPR #brexit #BBCNewsTen 
Yup!They’re the same personWhere these lovely curls#BenedictCumberbatch in Brexit and Sherlock  
Barely a day goes by where someone in the BBC isn’t cry-wanking in a Spitfire.And it’s this very culture - presented as neutral but constantly reinforcing of right wing empire nostalgia that leads to Brexit idiocy. #spitfirewanking 
We must not settle for an EU agreement that is at such odds with what people voted for, says former Brexit minister @SteveBakerHW 
At the election last year 84% of us voted for parties that promised to deliver #BrexitWe are now told there is not a majority in Parliament to deliver Brexit.They lied to us.At next election we need to vote in a Brexit majority that will deliver the Brexit we voted for. 
The Tory party are selling the British public down the road again She has to go now before its to late!!!!They have sold our industry off Brexit was to save our money for the NHS now they want to raise income tax and fuel duty for it !!!They are stalling all the time  
As govt opts in to more and more of EU, including on security coop they have previously rejected, the truth of softer Brexit, slower Brexit cannot be lost: the promise of the Leave campaign is not on offer so the people deserve a chance to cut their losses. 
Labour leadership line, avoiding a position/keeping options open/enjoying Tory discomfort, has allowed Brexit debate to be a Tory debate. Disaster for country. There is more to Britain and Europe that Rees Mogg v Hammond. 
Of course the May govt has made an unutterable, dangerous mess of Brexit.  Appeasement of the Trotskyite-never-satisfied-obsessed-with-betrayal-Right has led to damaging red lines & the desperate triggering of article 50.  And the economic decline & intl damage is being baked in. 
I know it's hard to believe, but there will be a time in October when it's not 50 million degrees outside and we can go on a #PeoplesVote march without worrying about melting into a puddle on the floor. (Also tell our shaky govt that we younguns deserve a final say on Brexit)  
The sooner the better for me. Bring honesty and integrity back into politics with #JRM4PM & watch him get UK out of #brexit in record time.  
So as well as selling out Brexit, the Tories are going to drop the immigration promise they have never even tried to fulfill. What more could they possible do to alienate their core vote? Still, at least Guardian readers will like it. Clearly they will rush to the Tory flag!  
(I don’t think Barnier himself sees this as a threat, but as he’d probably say in his own words a ‘logical consequence’ of Brexit. Others probably won’t interpret it that way though...) 
#UK to remain fully committed to Western Balkans prosperity and security after Brexit, PM confirms as host of #WBSummitLondon and announces a package of measures to help #BiH and the Western Balkans prosper:  @10DowningStreet 
Brexit has been managed by Tory Remainers but most importantly UK civil servant  Remainers working alongside EU civil servant Remainers 
Exclusive - @theresa_may to take over @England manager role tomorrow. She will agree to #Croatia request to drop #Kane and #Pickford, give them a 2 goal start and promise them effective #freemovement in our half of the pitch throughout the game! #MayMustGo #BBC #SKY #LBC #BREXIT  
You can bet your britches that Mary Poppins is a feminist, advocate, and supporter of all people and would not support trump or Brexit.  So go fly your kite somewhere else. Thx 
Private Eye: Brexit is beyond parody  
Tired of Theresa May being insane, Boris Johnson calls it quits, threatening the continuation of her ability to govern. #BorisJohnson #UKIP #Brexit #Chequers #Politics #UK 
Gove was on television at lunchtime saying he is all behind the prime minister and that he regrets that Davis and Boris have resigned. Backstabbing again. He must be reckoning on Remainer votes to become PM. Or will he resign in a day or two? Brexit remains interesting. 
In summary, Steve Baker’s Brexit ethics:We spent as much as we needed to despite spending limits (Feb 2016 e-mail) and lied as much as we needed to in order to win.May and Corbyn.  “We’ll give it to the cheats then”.Parliamentary ethics 2016-2018  
How the biased BBC uses code words to smear Brexit supporters:  #BrexitBetrayal 
"A government of national unity"Corbyn's Labour can't & won't do that. Cable knows it. So this reads like a plea for Tories to go into coalition with the LibDems, who will help them achieve a soft Brexit.Aahh. Gotta love LibDem principles & the gullible folk who believe them.  
Brexit street stalls are being held throughout the Totnes constituency because Sarah Wollaston MP is not upholding the Referendum mandate.  
"Boris Johnson is one of the worst foreign secretaries we ever had."　Labour's Emily Thornberry says her former counterpart, who resigned over Brexit, "spent all his time looking towards being the Prime Minister".  
Chuka doesn't want a "People's Vote" on the final Brexit deal.He wants a 2nd referendum, and solely because his side lost the 2016 one, when they were hubristically confident they'd win it.And anyone with half a brain knows it.#ChukaCharlatan 
Think those fantastic cave divers and resilient kids should rescue us all from a deranged Brexit and the likes of David Davis and @BorisJohnson can go and live in a cave #ThaiCaveResue 
Most hypocrtical/treacherous part of sudden support for May by #LibDems & #Blairites is that her #Chequers Brexit plan is far 'harder' #Brexit than anything Extreme Centrists have criticised #Corbyn & #Starmer for. So, ignore #LibDems & NO re-selection for May-backing Labour MPs. 
Super thread for anyone in the US who is confused by Brexit, why it had political backing despire being a terrible idea, and the turmoil the UK is in now (and will be for years) as a result.  
Trump calls Boris Johnson a "friend," says he may try to meet with him when in UK.CAN TRUMP SAVE BREXIT?  
Government and the Cabinet cannot agree on a way forward. That's because #Brexit, in the terms it was sold, is undeliverable. The last few days has shown #Brexit won't be solved in Westminster. That's why we need a #PeoplesVote on the final deal   
During the Opposition Day debate, @thomasbrake highlights that the two biggest Brexit backers in May's Government have recently walked due to lack of faith in the PM's plan. 
Open letter to @BBCNewsnight why are those invited to discuss Brexit mostly white? You do have politicians of colour but rarely, if ever, commentators of colour. Yes would like to be asked. Yes have a lot to say. Yes have a British passport. 
GP: I'm sorry, but I was wrong when I said you had a cold. It's pneumonia.Brexiter: That's okay. Just treat me for the cold. New information shouldn't influence your actions.GP: But ...pneumonia ...Brexiter: TREAT THE COLD! #Brexit 
Introducing the new Brexit minister and zero-hour contract enthusiast, Dominic Raab(it) The EU has achieved great things for British workers, don't let politicians like Dom decide your rights.#Chequers #BrexitShambles #StopBrexit 
Dear #gikii oids past and future, the deadline for abstracts is IRRESISTABLY EXTENDED TO 23 JULY!! Drag yourself away from football/Brexit/watching the thermometer and SUBMIT! Details at  . Be there or you mean nothing to me, ah Vienna.. pls RT @grrlsrock 
Benedict Cumberbatch has literally gone full pelt with the hair cut for the Brexit role. I respect and stan one committed mofo.  
There's one thing you have to say about these Bullingdon Club boys: they are very good at walking away from a mess they have created. #BorisJohnson #DavidCameron #Brexit 
I see BBC Rep Scotland managed to find Ruth Davidson & allowed her to make an unquestioned statement to camera about the recent Tory Brexit resignations. Presenter introduced her with "Ruth Davidson said the PM is doing the country's will & those who don't back her should quit"  
And to think O'Leary claims Brexit is the biggest risk to passenger disruption  
QUALITY: @IainDale calls out anti-Brexit bias on BBC Newsnight. When’s the last time you saw a 3 person panel with 2 Leavers and 1 Remainer?  
Fresh Brexit referendum will be necessary if MPs cannot agree plan for leaving EU, suggests Tom Watson  
In the Dáil Leo Varadkar had just indicated that he is willing to negotiate the backstop as different from that agreed in Dec. At the time he said it was a cast iron guarantee. #brexit 
Theresa May's Chequers plan is "the biggest loss of British sovereignty since Britain's accession to the EU in 1973" - Sir Ivan Rogers, UK ex-ambassador to EU, and very stauch remainer.Why are self-professed Brexiteer MPs with May on this one?#Brexit  
Britain's May reasserts her authority after Brexit resignations  
While Tory civil war rages, we in Labour should not look on with glee. 70% of our constituencies and 5 million of our voters supported Brexit- a proper Brexit. Most people now want us to get on with delivering it. We need to be ready to deliver a clean Brexit if the Tories fail. 
Benedict’s been bald-spotted filming the Brexit thing  
You have INSULTED the British peopleAll we have asked from PM is that she sticks to what she has promised.Now it appears those promises are all a pretence & a charade intended to dupe the electrorate, which is an insult to their intelligence.#Brexit #EU 
.@BorisJohnson bows out blaming the EU for unsafe blind spot trucks in his resignation letter – but EU has just proposed new truck safety rules! #Brexit just means the UK cuts itself out of EU law-making #BorisJohnsonWatch the video below and demand #safertrucksnow 
If you read one article today, make it this one. Masterly summary of the past 2/12 years of brexit and bojo.  
Statement by Barry Legg - Chairman of the Bruges Group #Brexit #Bino #Europe #BrexitBetrayal Write to your Conservative MP today if you have one 
Taoiseach Leo Varadkar said EU should be flexible on red lines in response to the the Brexit deal worked out in Chequers  #Brexit  
I will say it again:If Brexit had any benefits, it would have been possible by now to create a plan that Parliament and the EU would support. Because the benefits would have outweighed the sacrifices.The continued impasse of Brexit proves that it has no redeeming features. 
How to gerrymander a Brexit ref  
Leavers. This is what being a gracious winner looks like. Maybe if you'd taken this approach after the referendum maybe remainers could have been reconciled and this acrimony avoided.But you stuck the boot in and now there can be no compromise.  
Pretty astonishing turnaround in Britons' attitudes towards immigration. Seems Britons have become far more relaxed since the Brexit vote (despite nothing having changed) 
Conspicuously lacking from Johnson’s resignation letter was any convincing, or even merely plausible, alternative to the Brexit strategy that May presented, which goes well beyond the Norway model, and there is absolutely no guarantee that EU will agree to 
May has survived the resignation of high-profile #Brexit heavyweights. Could this be a blessing in disguise? @WJames_Reuters reports from Westminster:  
.@Peston using classic propaganda tactics calling those MPs who want to carry out the #Brexit we voted for "Rebels" and those who want May's soft Remain effectively loyal. Thus creating bad v good scenario.  
No messing around here from @IainDale. We need more people who are prepared to do this to anti-Brexit bias on the BBC.  
Regardless of whatever civil war is at play within the Tory party, the Irish Government must hold strong on protecting Ireland's interests in Brexit.We don't need rhetoric, we need absolute legal assurances that citizens' rights in the North will be protected @MaryLouMcDonald 
Resign please. Join the fight to save democracy and this Country. It wasn’t a complicated decision for us in the referendum. In or Out. Not shades of political interpretation. We can recognise betrayal. 
You are utterly deluded if you think there are still 17.4m people in this country who want #Brexit. This is yet another lie in a long, long litany of Brexit lies. At some point you people are just going to have to start dealing with reality. 
And of course that’s what people who understood the challenges of Brexit have been saying for years.52% of the population duped for a fantasy that doesn’t exist. I fear to think what this does for trust in politics in this country.  
Great Brexit analysis as always, with many telling points, including that if the EU were offering the UK what the UK is asking for itself, the response would surely be to call it a humiliation and demand full EU membership.  
Farage to Return as UKIP Leader Unless Brexit ‘Back on Track’ by March ’19   
.@JamesCleverly reminding us that if we don’t get a #Brexit deal it will be really bad news for the EU, not us, because they won't get their divorce payments  
Yes - the Brexit Dream is dying. It was a very silly dream. Based on no information, no plans, and a vague jingoistic slogan. Time to quit.  
Sobering meeting with @unibirmingham team assessing regional impact of Brexit.- Leave-voting areas more likely to be exposed- trade share with EU had been increasing in these areas- many totally dependant on EU market- far worse threat to GDP than 2008 crash- 2.5m jobs risk  
JPMorgan issues bleak warning on Brexit damage  
2nd shout-out:"This Just Got A Lot Bigger Than Brexit."My article today at @TheConWom, on how Theresa May’s desperate & deceitful plans for her Remain-By-Any-Other-Name non-Brexit are in effect a head-on existential challenge to our democracy itself. 
What version of Brexit do you support? Please RT. 
This Brexit mess has created a situation where the only people defending the Sovereignty of the United Kingdom are a handful of REMAINERS! 
The #British people want this #TURD... GONE, but she is still in Office acting like a #Squatter, if she doesn't go, we need to evict her! #BrexitFightBack #MayMustGo! @Conservatives #BBC #SKY @LBC #LBC @ConHome @CCHQPress #ConservativeParty #TORY #TheresaMay @theresa_may #BREXIT  
"Was your Labour Government wrong to consent to the EU Withdrawal Bill and help enable the chaos currently engulfing Westminster?" @LeanneWood takes @fmwales to task over Labour complicity in a hard #Brexit. #FMQs 
We need a @UKLabour Government, @CarolineFlintMP! Labour’s Brexit position clear & right.If you ignore the party position to vote with @theresa_may and the @CONservatives then you should have the whip withdrawn and be deselected.If it’s ‘no deal’ we must have a GE. 
The EU need to insist the UK accepts full free movement. Brexit voters don't realise that us elites need cleaners and gardeners and we don't want lazy, unmotivated Brits demanding silly hourly rates. We need keen & competent EU folk willing to work for minimum wage or a bit less. 
Labour can do none of that stuff they wantto do without stopping #brexit - the country will be broke & 4 million people will have no job at all.Reducing tax revenue.So reducing welfare for all.#stopbrexit 
During the 2016 referendum campaign, the then Prime Minister David Cameron stated 28 times that leaving the EU would mean leaving the Single Market.We knew what we were voting for - a clean break from the EU with no half measures. Gov must deliver or risk political wilderness.  
Think Brexit is falling apart? ... So do @TessMillsy and @Femi_Sorry#PeoplesVoteMarch 
After spending the last 2 years howling at @jeremycorbyn for supposedly supporting Theresa May's hard-right anti-democratic Brexit power grab, principle-vacuum Labour right-wingers like Caroline Flint are now signing Theresa May's praises and backing her to the hilt!  
Blairites find the idea of a socialist Labour government under Jeremy Corbyn so repulsive, they'd rather prop up Theresa May as she pushes through a terrible #Brexit deal. Meanwhile, millions suffer as a consequence of Tory austerity. These people are truly devoid of principles.  
It’s just extraordinary Austerity as the rich get richer a collapsed NHS child poverty homelessness epidemic sold off public services wages going backwards a housing crisis Grenfell Windrush and yes Brexit all Tory gifts and the FPBE crew want you to back the Tories?!? OMFG!!!  
Breaking News:The nationwide search for Brexit continued today without success, if you’ve seen Brexit please report your sighting to the authorities. The Pan European search is backed by 28 heads of state, the last Brexit sighting was at Chequers but has since gone missing. 
Excellent piece in @NewYorker too on the fundamentals not changed. Brexit is the problem  
Watch: Evan Davis taken to task over Brexit bias  
OMG .... everything I do for this guy and he goes and splits an infinitive! He’s right though. Sign up for the @peoplesvote_uk and subscribe to @TheNewEuropean Good on Brexit and much else besides  
Meanwhile, 7 U.S. senators spent the 4th of July holiday in Moscow discussing the easing of sanctions, willing to ignore Russia’s actions over the last few years, including openly interfering and influencing the 2016 U.S. elections and the UK Brexit referendum.  
And it hasn't even solved the divisions in their party!  Brexit is a total disaster on every front. David Cameron you really were the most appalling British PM in the history of the job and the ministers you left behind are still looking out for themselves and not their country. 
God, what a shit-shower of a government the Conservatives have consistently been. The unnecessary EU referendum was forced upon us because of their internal divisions and now will leave Britain cut adrift from our trading partners, politically weaker and diplomatically isolated. 
this argument is totally counter-intuitive.A proper Brexit and a fresh, popular leader are the ONLY way to win the next election.Clinging on to May and/or 'BRINO' = "ohhhh Jeremy Corbyn"  
Why do these Brexit extremists use the rhetoric of war?  The only people looking for a fight are....  the Brexit extremists!I stand with Europe and all my EU28 friends and allies.  You might call me a traitor, but your patriotism leads nowhere but impoverished obscurity.  
Corbyn's just become a Tory wolf in a sheepskin. I have lost all faith in the man. If you are anti brexit no one represents you. What an outrage and a tragedy. 
May's Brexit negotiation summed up by Boris Johnson:It is as though we are sending our vanguard into battle with the white flags fluttering above them.I would add:It's almost as if you are trying to engineer such a bad deal that the people will demand Brexit be cancelled.  
Not over Brexit it isn't. And Brexit is the most massive and damaging thing our country has faced since the last war. Only to find both main parties pretending they have a way of making it happen like they want but unable to tell anyone about it. Pathetic. 
Under which Brexit policy would you vote Labour? Please share to reach a wider audience. 
"We said what was needed to win the referendum. We did not bother to do what was needed to make it work."  
Letter of #noconfidence in #TheresaMay #PM submitted by #Tory #backbencher #AndrewBridgen - first publicly confirmed Letter to the #1922! Andrew Bridgen THANK YOU for supporting the 17,410,742 who voted for #BREXIT! #BBC #SKY @LBC #LBC #ConservativeParty @andreajenkyns #TORY #UK 
Dirty tricks at the Mail? Was Paul Dacre ousted over Brexit?   
Daniel Hannan on Brexit on @BBCRadio4 just now: “It’s a bit like when the Irish Free State left the UK in 1921”. No, Daniel it’s really not like that. 
Britain turns against Theresa May on Brexit in wake of Chequers agreement, Sky Data poll finds  
Boris Johnson might be back. He was key in the Brexit movement, and EU cabal blocked his Prime Minister chance in favor of cabal slave May. No confidence vote for May plus #theStorm, Brits could finally see Boris come back as PM to get Brexit done once and for all. 
Boris Johnson is gone. But stand by for a Tory grassroots rebellion on Brexit | Gaby Hinsliff  
For the love and sake of the country resign, and let someone who believes in the UK deliver Brexit. nobody believes a word that comes out of your mouth Theresa May. your game is up. do the right thing for once in your life and step down now. #MayMustGo #TeamTory 
Indeed.  I get attacked for voting  with moderate Remain Tories to stop a hard Brexit.  And then I get told to F O and join the Tories...  
Total Capitulation: Theresa May Proposes Sub-Norway Brexit Deal — Concedes on Goods, Rules, EU Court and More!  Should she RESIGN?                #fo2eu 
Brexit shambles in a nutshell•“Because Mr. Johnson and Mr. Gove were confident that the Leave campaign was hopeless, they were free to make ridiculous claims... This casual dishonesty has had devastating consequences.”  
Brexit is a manmade disaster and BoJo is one of its architects. A devastating indictment of the discredited former foreign secretary.   
The Tory party’s Brexit betrayal is suicidal  
On this date in 1846, President James K. Polk signed the legislation authorizing the retrocession of the Virginia portion of the District back to Virginia, pending the results of a referendum on the topic  
Boris Johnson's resignation letter said he stepped down because he felt that the Brexit "dream is dying, suffocated by needless self-doubt." @ShelaghFogarty asks: Is he right? 
LIVE. Nevenfunctionerende babyboomers geven raadgevend referendum definitieve doodschop  
I’ve just recorded an interview with Russia’s Rossiya1 channel on the UK government’s #Brexit crisis and the ramifications of Boris Johnson’s resignation. It’ll be shown on the main news show at 7pm this evening Moscow time. I’ll post a link when available. 
 Theresa May seeks unity amid chaos over #Brexit plans 
I've never hated both sides of a political debate more than the two sides of brexit. On one side you have the ultra remainers who will do anything to try subvert democracy and on the other side you have staunch brexiteers who are unwilling to compromise, at all. It's pathetic. 
The real story is not about which wing of the Conservative Party will win the Brexit it craves. It is about what Brexit, in any of its forms, means for the UK. We've surely had enough of the "who's in? who's out?" variety of political reporting. 
I wonder are Conservatives, blind or just plain daft?...Backing a plan that clearly is nothing even close to Brexit and in doing so haemorrhaging public support...Why can't they see it? May needs to go to rescue the Conservatives from an epic political wilderness.  
Roll up roll up for the latest Brexit update from @WalesGovernance next Wednesday, 18th July. Free event. Everybody is welcome. Join us do! @Cardiffuninews @CardiffLaw @CardiffPolitics 
May searching for unity amid turmoil over #Brexit strategy  
Tory mess makes #Brexit reversal more likely. Time to support a #PeoplesVote to get us out of this chaos. 
Melanie Phillips: Betrayed Brexit voters will give up on politics  
Strange that Theresa May appointed Dominic RaabTo be Brexit Minister.It’s a well known fact in political circles that he dislikes Her immensely.Mind you Ollie Bobbins is the real power behind Brexit now. 
Very proud that last night Devonport Branch Labour Party supported a motion calling for @UKLabour to support a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal.After some intense but comradely debate the motion passed with members across the party's political spectrum voting in support!  
Christian Adams on Boris Johnson’s resignation over Brexit deal agreed at Chequers - Political Cartoon Gallery in Putney  
So here we go again. The great disease of Brexit is repeating oneself over and over and over. A successful, economically secure Brexit is one done via the EEA, or by creating our own comprehensive framework for trade and cooperation between UK-EU via a new Association Agreement 
Nobody - NOBODY - still banging the drum for Corbyn’s headlong march to Hard Brexit now that even most of the government can see it for the national suicide attempt it is, gets to call ANYONE ELSE a “Shy Tory” or a “Tory Enabler”.As a great man once said, “That’s you, that is.” 
A reminder that we did not vote for Brexit because of Boris or his bus. By Mick Hume. 
Still pretending it’s possible to get a better deal than we have...failing to spell out that all forms of Brexit will hurt the economy and jobs. 
Conscription for the world wars identified how unhealthy the UK was, and that led to the NHS.So many people being duped by miscreants like @BorisJohnson and @Nigel_Farage with fictitious claims about Brexit has revealed just how many adults lack knowledge of law & politics 
We need a little bit more compromise from the Remain side, said @KateHoeyMP on @SkyNews, like from those pushing for the ridiculous idea of a second referendum  
Guy - the politicians you are now "negotiating" with have NO mandate to take the UK out of the EU , since the Electoral Commission has found that the 2016 UK EU Referendum leave vote was procured by electoral crimes by both leave campaigns. How will the EU/EC respond to this ? 
CENTRISTS: We must do everything we can to stop Theresa May and Brexit!ALSO CENTRISTS: We’ll do everything we can to prop up Theresa May and Brexit!  
The intellectual dishonesty of the Brexit Taliban is now in full view, I argue in @washingtonpost. 
A huge part of UKIP's campaigning during the referendum indicated leaving would significantly impact the number of migrants arriving. Political broadcasts showed sketchy foreigners in NHS waiting rooms. It's been xenophobic from Day 1.Are you sure you're in the right party?  
Joss, I’m a Remainer and I know that most #FBPE meant well. Your movement was hijacked and used by some very bad people (as is #peoplesvote) those people are now backing May’s “No Deal” Brexit. So sorry. 
The crisis around #Brexit is only going to get bigger so our response needs to match it. Join us on October 20 to march for a #PeoplesVote:  #PeoplesVoteMarch 
President Trump calls Boris Johnson, who resigned yesterday in protest of Theresa May's Brexit plan, a friend. He said he may speak to him when he's in the U.K. 
Actually it was the deal May, a remainer, has made that has fucked this up.Brexit does not mean that immigration just suddenly magically stops Mike. Stop trying to weaponize xenophobic into making people afraid of supporting Brexit. 
17,410,742 of us, the largest vote in British history voted to LEAVE. Now we must walk away from the undemocratic EU. The Anti-British Lib-Lab-Con alliance are trying to sink the Brexit 'ship' but they won't get away with it!#Brexit #MayMustGo #BrexitBetrayal #immigration #BNP 
Britain got used to imperial decline post WWI, then economic & political decline post WWII.With the rebirth of London, importance of services, EU membership - the UK turned back the tide on its historical descent.#Brexit will see the return of the politics of declinism again. 
So Tom Watson is admitting that the Labour Party wants to prop up May’s shambolic Government to enable #Brexit So it’s now clear: vote Corbyn’s Labour and get the Tories.#OppositionInNameOnly 
Can one of my British friends explain why the UK doesn’t suspend Brexit negotiations in light of PROVEN corruption & Russian interference leading up to the *non-binding* referendum? At this point, continuing w/ Brexit in any form MAKES NO SENSE!#NoBrexit 
It was a pleasure meeting the German Europe Minister @MiRo_SPD today to discuss important issues for young people in the #Brexit negotiations.We need #citizensrights guarantees for @The3Million in primary legislation now so we can end over 2 years of unfair #uncertainty. 
Privately educated, ex-stock broker, Nigel ‘Man of the people’ Farage said Brexit left him "skint." The truth is he earns hundreds of thousands per year. He’s lucky he can fall back on his 2nd job and EU pension, while the poorest pay for his Brexit mess. 
The end of democracy. The end of the political classes is coming. May's new cabinet is stuffed with Remainers from top to bottom: the prime minister, chancellor, home secretary, foreign secretary, justice secretary, defence secretary, and business secretary all opposed Brexit. pic.twitter.com/ZnW6y9DlBG 
Brexit was supposed to be about taking back control, not being governed by the back door, writes @andreajenkyns 
Brexit happened mainly because of UK resistance to Eastern European migration.Dominic Raab, now UK Brexit Secretary in charge of negotiating the exit, is a son of a Czech immigrant who came to Britain in 1938 as a refugee.At the end, we really steal your jobs. @edwardlucas 
It was a referendum, not an election. 96% of Scotland's UK representatives requested that nations should all have to agree before Brexit was carried. 96%!! The Tories who had 1 MP and overruled. So it's a UK vote because England decided it would be. 
It's about time the media educated the general public about what 'No Deal ' means and it's potential catastrophic consequences. Perhaps then we might have fewer people coming out with imbecilic pronouncements on Twitter. #brexit 
I don’t buy the Corbyn line on #Brexit. If there was a public vote against something he fundamentally believed in (take your pick) he would ‘respect’ the vote but campaign tirelessly to change public opinion. That he doesn’t do this with Brexit is revealing. 
Donald Tusk’s suggestion that we should halt Brexit following yesterday’s resignations shows a clear lack of respect for the wishes of the British people. Brussels has a history of overturning referendums it doesn’t like. It won’t happen this time.  
.@theresa_may told Cabinet today that preparation for a no deal Brexit is to be “stepped up”..@jeremycorbyn & @Keir_Starmer must table a motion, before recess, of us having a General Election if “negotiations” end with ‘no deal’. @UKLabour must NOT back TM. #GE2018now 
"Referendums should be fair &effective. The rules should enable a level playing field between competing alternatives. Those rules should also empower voters to find the information they want from sources they trust, so that voters feel confident in the decisions they reach." 
I will PROBABLY be PUT in CHARGE of BREXIT SOON. The ONLY REASONABLE COURSE of ACTION at THIS STAGE is to BLOW UP the ISLE and make it LOOK like an ACCIDENT. 
If as it now looks that we can’t get out of the EU and the Referendum vote meant nothing, surely that also invalidates our entry in 73 too, as that vote is now suspect, because the people of that time certainly couldn’t have thought that they were voting for this? 
This is coming up more and more:“I'm an #NHS doctor who voted for #Brexit and now I deeply regret my decision”. 
This is the maddening truth isn't it? Nobody can admit that it can't work. You can't honour the referendum AND avoid a hard Irish border AND preserve the economy AND not be a rule-taker.  
The U.K. opposition Labour Party is open to a Brexit referendum if Theresa May's deal fails  
I cannot back Brexit plan as it stands, Nicola Sturgeon says  
Over-promise. Win. Under-deliver. Resign. The 4 stages of #Brexit hold a lesson for populists everywhere. My @bopinion latest. 
For betraying 17.4 million Brexit voters.Sh*t has not hit the fan yet.CALM BEFORE THE STORM.#TreasonMay @theresa_may 
NEW: Report show that depending on the type of #Brexit, Welsh sheep farming stands to lose between £1,500 and £9,500.Farmers were promised they wouldn't be worse off because of #Brexit.Demand a #PeoplesVote on the final #Brexit deal.// @Farmers4EU 
From a leading #QC interpreting the phrase, ‘the #commonrulebook.’ Every  person who voted to #leave should read this and understand its meaning - the #Chequers TURD proposal is to #remain in the #EU and we will be in a far worse position, than we are now! #MayMustGo #Brexit #UK 
2/ If this CNN report is true:Then the confirmation hearing becomes, among other things, a referendum on Trump's various crimes, especially those pertaining to Russia. 
The majority of people in this country voted for Britain to take back control & they will feel betrayed if Gov. negotiates a soft Brexit.  
WATCH: @ChukaUmunna explains why we need a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal, and no exclude the public from the Brexit process. Please RT:  
BREXIT: Corbyn: *Workers and businesses deserves better than this.*Yes they do, Jeremy. They deserve to Remain in the EU. And so does the service industry, which generates wealth for the UK, and for the NHS.And by the way, Britain deserves better than Corbyn. 
May's pain with no gain crisis leaves Brexit snookered. My analysis of the latest Brexit events, just up:  
A great irony of Monday's resignation chaos is May now has the most united Cabinet since David Cameron's in 2015 before the EU referendum campaign.  
US warns Britain post-Brexit trade deal is 'totally up in the air' in wake of Chequers compromise  
Brexit is like the mother of all Rubik’s cubes that gets handed around the cabinet table but nobody can do it. So we hand it over to the EU who can’t do it either. So we hand it back to the people and say sorry, it’s too difficult for us. You have a go. Or shall we just give up? 
The Brexit bedtime story you'll tell your grandchildren:How a third of the country was tricked by a bus. 
5 things for Tuesday:- Supreme Court- Thailand cave rescue- Separated families- Brexit- Plastic straws 
Look - Brexit is like PPI - some people may well have ticked the box voluntarily but it's becoming perfectly fucking evident that we've been mis-sold. #BrexitChaos 
"The intellectual dishonesty of the Brexit Taliban is now in full view" Wow in the >The Washington Post  
Independence will protect Scotland's NHS funding from Brexit dangers  
Home Secretary Sajid Javid in clearest hint yet that net migration target is going- says "not going to get into numbers" when asked about post-Brexit plan. Yvette Cooper asks' "Don't you just want to get rid of it" Sajid takes a sip of water, smiles and says: "Next question." 
Better still a brand new party that welcomes pro European, business and progressives from across the current party spectrum. So many of us ’48%’ feel politically homeless right now. Party representation would be game changing and get us out of this sorry #Brexit mess. 
Why is Corbyn backing the Tories on Brexit!? Why is Corbyn backing the Tories on Brexit!? Why is Corbyn backing the Tories on Brex- The principled thing to do in a time of national crisis is to back the Tories on Brexit.  
Love this by @IainDale. Like so many others, the BBC still can't quite get its head round the fact that Brexit is a majority position, rather than the preserve of a few freaks 
The EU bank your proposals and then ask for more, we can't negotiate like that. We need a robust proposition that sticks to the referendum result, says @patel4witham 
"On that basis, we should be very honest and upfront and say we are not going to be delivering the Brexit that we had in our manifesto that we were elected on last year" @patel4witham #bbcdp 
Is Brexit going well or badly?Some Bloke: 'I think it's going well'#bbcdp : 'Really? Why's that?'SB: 'Because I don't want to us leave'Says it all really. 
Brexit, Islam, ritual slaughter, FGM, Child rape. . . . . Yep we sure have a lot going for us. Oh and don´t forget the loss of freedom of speech. 
Excellent analysis from Rachel Sylvester:- Brexit fantasies now meeting reality- Brexiters only have themselves to blame- There is no parliamentary arithmetic for any way through/ out of this mess- Only solution is to put the question on how to proceed back to the voters  
When the government lost the referendum I think what happened was they immediately formed a group of MP's who were  to pretend to be brexiteers and oppose the EU. This would make it look as if there was a fight going on while May quietly got on and shafted us. 
Corbyn and Leadsom united in opposition to Freedom of Movement. Collectivist ideologies of right and left devaluing individual liberty.#StopBrexit #FBPE #Brexit  
It’s a fake Brexit, ie Remain.  
May ‘STITCH UP’Steve Baker: 'This particular #Brexit will NOT allow us proper control of what goes on in UK - the point David Davis made.I don’t think it's too indiscreet to point out what has happened here is we have all been blindsided by this policy.' 
We need great statesmanship, not childish briefings from @Number10press, so  we can leave the #EU not just well but brilliantly - so says departing #Brexit minister #SteveBaker!  #MayMustGo # #BBC #SKY @LBC #LBC @ConHome @CCHQPress #TheresaMay #TeamTory 
Sajid Javid in @CommonsHomeAffs: in case of no deal Brexit EU citizens will be allowed to stay but with less #citizensrights.Also aware that not all EU citizens will apply for Settled Status - Home Office to use 'common sense' to deal with that situation. That would be a first. 
 ICYMI: @StephenGethins on Theresa May's Cabinet resignations - "It looks like the wheels have well and truly come off the #Brexit bus"  pic.twitter.com/n0Tmn0nHtX 
.@patel4witham - “I’m not convinced this deal makes us the free trade, global buccaneering country we want” #Brexit #Chequers #bbcdp 
MPs' backing for Theresa May's Brexit plan is 'highly questionable', says Nicola Sturgeon  
Ok, ball's in your court Dank. Explain to us, from your considered position, how Brexit isn't a total and utter shitshow.  
It's akin to something I've suggested for a while. They don't want power. Not now. They don't want to be the ones holding Brexit when the music stops next year. No one does. Why oppose something if it means you may end up having to actually deal with it. 
Ex-Boris Johnson aide Guto Harri….“No one genuinely believes he was sincere about [supporting] Brexit….it was a bad miscalculation” #bbcdp 
.@StephenGethins: We're in this situation because Brexiteers were grossly irresponsible going into the EU referendum campaign with no plans. Two years on they still can't tell us what Brexit means, and we're now having to clear up the mess that Boris Johnson and others created.  
“He ran a disgusting referendum campaign, was an atrocious joke of a Foreign Secretary and resigns leaving a trail of chaos and an unholy mess he played a huge part in creating"  
Where we’re at... Tory Remainers trying to convince Labour Remainers to vote for the deal and defeat their Hard Brexiteer Tory colleagues, but Labour Remainers demanding a softer Brexit still  
Theresa May's so blind to the anger towards her approach to Brexit that it wouldn't have surprised me if she'd appointed Anna Hag-Witch Soubry as Brexit Secretary. 
May's #Brexit negotiator and foreign secretary resign, shattering claims of unity around her plans on leaving the EU  via @ ReutersTV 
.@StephenGethins: The decisions made on Brexit will have a serious impact on our universities, our food and drink industry, jobs, the economy, and opportunities for young people. We mustn't lose sight of that in the chaos and confusion surrounding the UK government's negotiations  
This morning photographers in Downing Street were shocked to see Theresa May had acquired a clump of Boris Johnson's hair and pinned it to her hat as a trophy. #bbcnews #bbcdp #Brexit  
MPs' backing for Brexit plan 'highly questionable' - Sturgeon - BBC News  
SNP Foreign Affairs spokesperson @StephenGethins tells @SkyNews the Tory government's own economic analysis shows that every Brexit option will cost the UK jobs. Short of staying in the EU, by far the least worst option is to stay in the single market and customs union #Brexit  
Turks saw the faults in their parliamentary system and changed it to Presidential through a national referendum. Now #RTE sworn in as first powerful President of Turkey. Pakistan need to learn this from Turks & get rid of this parliamentary filth we have. 
In my re-election speech I called for a march, led by students and young people, to call for a People's Vote on the Final Brexit deal! The chaos this weekend proves why this is needed more than ever!So save the date! 20th October for a #PeoplesVote March to take back control! 
After two years slagging off @jeremycorbyn over #Brexit, the likes of @acgrayling, @JolyonMaugham, @Tony_Robinson and @eddiemarsan must now face up to the fact it's Labour's centrist MPs who want to help Theresa May facilitate Brexit, not the Labour left. How embarrassing. #bbcdp 
I know it is not for an American to say but nevertheless I believe the #Brexit decision was the most harmful vote taken in this century by the U.K. and was no doubt influenced by Russian interference. It is being used by partisan politics when this issue should transcend politics 
'The Europeans do not believe there is a viable negotiating partner in Britain' - I try to update the Kiwis on WTF is going on with Brexit  
Speaking at meeting with young people, German Europe Minister @MiRo_SPD says that "the door always remains open for the UK" - good to see. If British people want to change their mind on #Brexit, they can. #PeoplesVote provides this option. @peoplesvote_uk 
Brexit was supposed to be about taking back control, not being governed by the back door:  #BrexitBetrayal 
I’m filming the post-Brexit ‘Thick of It’ you’ve all been asking for.  
Maybe Guy, that’s because #Brexit wasn’t just about migration and was about so much more? Like you sticking your nose in our politics, for one.  
With almost 6,000 voting, 92% were in favour of Scotland holding a referendum due to Brexit cluster-mess  
Well done, Theresa. You have done as much to harm the UK as Blair. No mean feat. #EnoughIsEnough of you and your #BrexitLies. As I suspected when you were made PM, you had no intention of leaving. Resign and let more honourable democrats lead us out of the EU darkness. #Brexit 
JESS PHILLIPS TOM WATSON  STEPHEN KINNOCK ALL ATTENDED MAYS PARTY AND SAID THEY WOULD VOTE FOR HER BREXIT  LABOUR SHOULD DUMP THEM NOW WITHOUT HESITATION 
Join us and the people shaping Brexit – The #indybrexitdebate, Wednesday evening on Twitter, YouTube and Facebook 
Where the Brexit negotiations are headed: "Pretty soon, Brexit would be in practice if not in pure legal form indistinguishable from EU membership but without the representation or influence."  
#Brexit: "The cause of the problem seems to lie entirely with the political establishment of the country, all too ready to sacrifice the well-being of its citizens, if not the very existence of the state they are entrusted with, on the altar of short-term political convenience." 
MUST-READ: Post-Brexit trade deal with Trump's America could lead to the break-up of the NHS according to a leading expert. This is deeply concerning for patients across the country. Please share 
Complaining that Brexiters who left government now have less influence on government is truly Peak Brexit. 
YouGov Brexit tracker - LAB votersRight to leave 23%Wrong to leave 70% 
1) "Brexit means Brexit" = A lie.2) "We are leaving the SM & CU" = A lie, they are merely cloning them.3) "No deal is better than a bad deal" = A lie.4) "We are leaving the EU" = A lie.4) "Strong & Stable" = A joke. Must be.Honesty is a thing of the past in UK Conservatism. 
The desperate contortions those who supported Brexit will squeeze themselves into to exclude themselves from blame is quite extraordinary. 
I floated the #Brexit Coalition idea ever since the #BrexitBetrayalIdea is picking up momentum.It is the only credible way to get the #Brexit  we voted for.If the the 17.4m Brexit voters can unite behind one candidate in each seat, it will scare the traitor parties witless.  
BREXIT SHOCK: Those wanting EU exit RISES nearly 15 percent since referendum - new poll  
When leavers say 'get behind Brexit',  Can someone please tell me on what planet I would back giving up my rights to freely move, live, work and retire anywhere within my own continent, making myself and country financially/politically worse off and screwing over EU born friends? 
The intellectual dishonesty of the Brexit Taliban is now in full view. The view of former Swedish PM Carl Bildt.#Brexit #StopBrexit 
READ: The Chequers proposals cross Theresa May’s red lines, fail Labour’s six tests, & are a million miles away from the kind of Brexit people thought they were getting – whether they voted Leave or Remain in 2016. @f_grovewhite writes for City AM:  
Minor counter-argument: the govt is pursuing Brexit.  
May's new cabinet is stuffed with Remainers from top to bottom: the prime minister, chancellor, home secretary, foreign secretary, justice secretary, defence secretary, and business secretary all opposed Brexit. They won't deliver it!Support us at  
Confirms what many of us on the continent knew, that Brexit aside,  Britain is one of the most tolerant & welcoming countries in Europe. If only more British politicians were willing to explain the positive effects of migration instead of leaving it to those exploiting fears.  
It’s quite shocking that when the EU is at its weakest Britain would go for a soft Brexit. Britain would have importat allies in the EU, including the V4 and now Italy. The EU is not in a position to be demanding anything anymore, Britain is. 
“If Brexit doesn’t happen, in full, and the wishes of 17.4million voters are softened or sold out, people will start looking for other ways to make their voices heard.”Brendan O’Neill on the Brexit betrayal  
When @BorisJohnson declared for Leave in Referendum I was so grateful I gave a little prayer under Norwich Cathedral & drank a pint in a 13th century pub to celebrate. I think he has done exactly the right thing once again. He gets the actual effect of such trade deals. Thank you 
My question to the Prime Minister in @HouseofCommons yesterday. Her proposed #Brexit deal does nothing for services which make up most of the British economy. It will reduce market access & add complexity - as @techUK have said. Why is the PM ignoring important industries? 
Will be on @BBCNews just after 11 pointing out that the ‘Chequers Deal’ is dead. PM doesn’t have a majority for it and there’s no reason why we’d vote for a Hard Brexit for services. 
Rejoice! A sovereign Brexit could well be back on track says one of the most inciteful writers of today: Ambrose Evans-Pritchard of @Telegraph 
George Soros has given $32bn to his Open Society Foundations to promote open and tolerant democracies. No wonder Putin and his venal little fascist tools like Farage and Arron Banks hate him!#StopBrexit #Brexit #FBPE 
The Brexiters of ERG believed they had pressurised @theresa_may to delay Brexit white paper. They are wrong. She told cabinet it will be published Thursday 
We must get the Brexit we voted for. #FudgeOffMay#ForTheNation 
Your BRINO will see the total demise of the Conservative party. I gave you the benefit of the doubt when others around me said you didn’t really want Brexit. They were right. I was wrong. You must go. 
The EU cannot and will not accept May‘s #Brexit plan. The Single Market has rules which its members obey like the 4 freedoms. These cannot be cherrypicked to suit the whims of individual countries. If that were to be allowed all those participating would demand bespoke deals too 
Just last week my Labour MP told me irritably to ‘get behind Brexit’. He also seems to think it won’t affect his mission to help austerity. It’s like he’s possessed. Pitiable really. 
Risks? The uk is not only a risk, it has rapidly become a liability. Scotland has one choice and one chance INDEPENDENCE and ppl know it.  In Brexit Britain, Scots are starting to believe that independence is worth the risks  
Within that 'other' is concealed a 2 point rise up to 5% for #UKIP in less than a week. #ForTheNation You too can make a difference by joing us and the fight for Brexit.  
We need to unite behind just ONE Brexit coalition.Otherwise the vote is split and the REMOANERS win.  
"Constituents time and time again tell me how politicians never listen to their concerns, that we are out of touch with their feelings. They are usually right. The referendum result showed that we need to do less talking and more listening to the people." 
BREXIT SHOCK: Those wanting EU exit RISES nearly 15 percent since referendum - new poll  
WATCH: @Will_DryOFOC, co-founder of @OFOCBrexit, on why he doesn't back this Gov't to get a good deal & why we need a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal. Please RT:  
Amid the UK navel gazing over Brexit is this story of extraordinary courage across the world. Supported by 50 divers from overseas they are now attempting to complete the second to last scene of this movie-like saga. We all hope for a happy end. #inspired 
Er...your MPs owe allegiance to their constituents not Mr & Mrs Murrell. And Scottish independence would damage Scotland's economy worse than #Brexit. So stop talking nonsense.  
Brexit turmoil is a wake-up call that’ll put off other countries from leaving the European Union, German minister says  
Whats more damaging?Independence making choices for ourselves and being IN the EUDependence on Tories and being out of the EUIt doesnt take a rocket scientist to work it out.Surely the past 8 years of Tories and 2 of Brexit can illustrate the point?  
Remember folks, Brexit is never the fault of those who campaigned for it, never the fault of those who advocated it for 40 years.  No, it is the fault of those who warned it would be painful, tricky and harmful, it is clearly them who are at fault.  
New #Brexit secretary #DominicRaab , another #Brexiteer neoliberal, has a track record of wanting to slash #workersrights protected by EU: 
This is precisely the sort of journalism that the BBC should be capable of but  under Tony Hall it has become a shadow of its former self.  The intellectual dishonesty of the Brexit Taliban is now in full view  
Boris Johnson just became the 4th UK minister to quit over Brexit  
#MandatoryReselectionNowWhen our own MPs openly offer to aid and assist the Tory government, they need to go.Hell. even the #FBPE crowd are quiet on their Corbyn bashing today because they've now realised their anti-Brexit icons are getting into bed with the government! 
Wm Hague says (DT) “Realists believe that Brexit must be delivered whatever the necessary compromises”.  But not if the compromises mean no Brexit.  And the compromises were not necessary in the first place. 
Cornish pasty-makers Crantock Bakery set to close with the loss of 109 jobs. Higher cost of raw materials blamed following Brexit vote but priority now is to help workers. 
Why won't Labour say: 'Vote Leave cheated, it broke the laws for the fair conduct of the Referendum set down by Parliament, and the result is not safe'? 
There have been lots of claims by Brexit-supporting opponents of the Chequers position that it doesn't reflect what Leave voters voted for (1/7) 
Does it involve turning yourself in to the police for *conspiring to manipulate currency markets with your fake announcements on referendum night? *allegedly  
What we are seeing is an effort from the civil service, liberal media and politicians,BBC pushing the narrative that having lost her Brexit Secretary and Foreign Secretary Theresa May’s position is “stronger than ever”. What a farce of a broadcaster - the digital home of Remain. pic.twitter.com/HxKa2jAVRM 
As a Remainer of course you think Theresa May’s fake Brexit is a “great deal”.  
This sums up the BBC perfectly.  One small example of everyday BBC bias.  It's relentless.  Well called out, @IainDale . And good on @LeaveEUOfficial for posting this.Distinctive daily #Brexit research and news:  
Sky news All out Politics should be renamed The Chuka Umunna Show.He’s given free reign to appear every day.Then it’s Dominic Grieve. Both allowed to speakTheir mind.If they ever interview a Brexit Leaver no doubtThey will be interrupted constantly by BunterBoulton. 
The Tory government has led down a lot of people with singular focus on Brexit. And Labour offers absolutely no alternative with a man in the front seat who marches with terrorists. Never had so many conversations with folks who feel politically homeless. 
'Best solution would have been for Ireland to leave once the UK decided to' - the arrogance of the brexiteers is phenomenal #TodaySOR #brexit @MiriamOCal 
Face them down Theresa.  There isn’t a deal which will please either hardline Leavers or Remainers both for different reasons want no deal. We need a good, workable deal for a smooth #brexit 
PM @Theresa_May hosted Austrian Chancellor @sebastiankurz at Downing Street, where they discussed Austria’s presidency of the EU, Brexit negotiations, migration and the NATO summit.  
This should be the top story in every U.K. news piece, and yet all we hear about are machinations within the Tory party over exactly how catastrophic #Brexit gets to be.  
Matthew Parris is clear. Delivering Brexit's is being executed by Tory party "crazies" who ignore evidence in favour of "belief".It has become an act of religious faith.@mrjamesob @lbc #PeoplesVote 
WATCH | "Why do I get called 'Brexit supporting', but you don't describe these two as Remain? It's always one against two, isn't it?" @IainDale calls out @EvanHD on yet more BBC bias! Support us at  
Here's what Unite thinks about Dominic Raab. He is a particularly heartless and nasty piece of work who wants to take our rights away, which he'll be able to do if we brexit.  
Some Cons say "oh well the fear of Corbyn" will turn them out. I'm not convinced. For these voters Brexit & immigration control are existential, value-led issues. The level of disillusionment after a "soft sell-out" deal will be profound. 
Remember all the Tory attacks of what if Labour were in Govt negotiating Brexit:£10s of billions paid to EUNo arrangement on servicesBeing a rule taker not a rule makerLack of clarity on people movementCoalition of ChaosThat's exactly the Tory Chequers deal right now. 
For ages the more fanatical sections of FBPE have wrongly tried to paint a picture of Labour-Tory collusion on Brexit.The reality is that their Lib Dems are seeking to "establish a government of national unity" in order to create a new Tory-Lib Dem Coalition.Total Hypocrites.  
Irrespective of your view of Brexit, we’re now seeing the full glory of the great Oxbridge minds in action. The old techie colleges produced finer  brains. 
Yesterday, I spoke in the chamber to outline my belief that the Chequers agreement will not deliver the Brexit for which the people voted in 2016. The Government must stand up to Michel Barnier and ensure they fight for an ambitious and fair deal that works for Britain.  
By late last night Mays brexit plan had been explained by most of the experts when it was quite obvious that May had spent hours once again lying to the people. This is not a plan to leave, its a plan to keep the EU foot on our neck. Kick her out before its too late ! 
How the world sees #Brexit Britain Part 265“The intellectual dishonesty of the #Brexit Taliban is now in full view, of the world”We are a jokeThe lies have crashed in to reality but still they lieIt’s all about them, not Britain, money, not Brits  
None of the 'ministers' who have resigned were fit to be ministers anyway. With Brexit sucking the life out of UK politics, not much other work is being done. These people have been paid a lot of money for twiddling their thumbs and undermining their own government 
Nope. What we want is a General Election and we want every single Labour MP campaigning 100% for that. Anything else risks a post Brexit Tory Gov. The worst of ALL Brexits. What don't you get about that?  
There are still politicians & commentators out there claiming 80% of us voted for #Brexit supporting parties in the last GE. If another GE comes & you don't want a Tory Brexit then don't vote Tory, if you don't want a @UKLabour Brexit then don't 'tactically' vote for them either. 
5. Russian information warfare/hybrid warfare theory is based on a simple concept: use a small amount of non-military resources to weaken your enemy from within. Whether Brexit or Trump happened *because* of Russian information warfare efforts, Putin got his result in both cases. 
4. Trump lashing out at the NATO, the EU, and global organizations like the WTO is made worse by the ongoing disarray with Brexit, which looks likely to weaken Europe/the UK and divert a lot of resources within Europe to internal problems, which necessarily empowers Russia more. 
We're recruiting a Futures policy and researcher post in collaboration with Public Health Wales @PublicHealthW A full time post, that focuses on futures work and Brexit (from a public health perspective). Deadline - 19th July 2018. 
Thanks @BBC_TopGear taking a look on the possible Brexit consequences for the British car industry. 
So it is now a Raab C Brexit! Congratulations to the person who coined the phrase, not I. 
Dominic Raab replaces David Davis as #Brexit secretary  
This announcement slipped under the radar. Tory Chris Heaton-Harris, the new Under Secretary for Brexit was the charmer behind the McCarthyite letter to all Unis in 2017 demanding details of all staff lecturing on Brexit.  #GE2018Now 
Boris Johnson quits in protest over Theresa May's Brexit plan  
Carl Bildt, former Swedish PM: “Tragic to see how the UK is lost in post-referendum chaos. This used to be a nation providing leadership to the world - now it can’t provide leadership to itself.” 
When you take away all the heroic elements of Brexit, all the epic thrills ..what you are left with..a country that has gone to enormous trouble to humiliate itself. Brexit has reached the point where the best possible outcome is the worst of both worlds,   
So clear now post Chequers that Brexit is all about protecting money launderers, off shore tax avoiders, immoral speculators in human misery, because those are “services” that need sovereign protection from EU regulation. 
The Brexit you voted for is either undeliverable or objectively undesirable. Everybody in politics & the media knows this now (bar a few helpless loonbuckets) but none of them can say it out loud. 
How to commit suicide - 1. Put a remainer as PM 2. Hold a GE when you don’t need to; 3. Cut cut & cut 4. Undermine your Brexit team with a 120page secret paper; 5. Try & do a Brexit that isn’t Brexit! The @Conservatives are at a crossroads; Get @Jacob_Rees_Mogg in or crash & burn 
The EU had cancelled the results of three referendums on its future in Europe when the vote went against it. It has now effectively cancelled a fourth one in Britain. The communist in Brussels won't take no for an answer. #Brexit 
UK deserves/needs a #GeneralElection far more than a new #Brexit referendum or any other #Blairite diversion. On top of Brexit, #Britain is being privatised & mis-governed into penury (except for the super-rich) by a bunch of incompetent, ideologically-driven far right #Tories. 
Remarkable isn't it? Supposedly upstanding, decent, honest people want the 'referendum result respected' but aren't equally willing to respect the referendum as a whole. All this turning a blind eye to law breaking and criminality, could their stance be little more than a device?  
WATCH: From last night's Newsnight panel, in which I object to the way I am introduced. Boohoo you may say, but I am fed up with this sort of tacit bias. I get described as 'Brexit supporting' while the others are made out to be independent. 
Jacob Rees-Mogg: "What is the point of the Brexit department if all the decisions are taken by backroom boys in Downing Street?" Watch again ▼@JuliaHB1 | @Jacob_Rees_Mogg | @MoggMentum 
Creative metaphors seem to be the only market that Brexit seems to be affecting positively 
Note: the switch started *before* the referendum  
Let’s summarise this ‘news’ shall we:Nigel Farage, MEP who rarely turned up to EU parliament, is talking to a US news channel, about a betrayal of English voters on a referendum that was heavily influenced by offshore money - interviewing from an offshore tax haven. 
Jacob Rees-Mogg: Tory party will split if Theresa May uses Labour votes to deliver soft Brexit 
May's government is thrown into turmoil after eurosceptic ministers quit over her #Brexit plans  via @ReutersTV 
Theresa May is openly working for the EU. To go and agree the #Brexit plan with Merkel in Berlin before submitting it to her cabinet as an ultimatum is treachery of the highest order. In a civilised country she would be impeached by now. 
Economy soft, according to latest figures, despite Brexit (sorry - joke in poor taste)  
"The independence movement needs to stop talking about the best time for an independence referendum, and start talking about the dire necessity for one." | A string of aubergine emojis « Wee Ginger Dug  #DissolveTheUnion #Referendum2018 
Labour MPs who have been screaming about Corbyn "enabling brexit" are in talks with the Tories about, erm, enabling brexit! Let that sink in. It was never about stopping brexit, it was always about stopping Corbyn. 
Honestly, Brexit is a convenient way to get half of us to blame the other half for the state of the country. When, really, the issue is a decade of woeful policy decisions.  
89% of British people support a tax-funded NHS, free at the point of treatment. Why do free marketeers trumpet the will of the people in Brexit, yet try to stealth privatise the NHS which goes against the wishes of a huge majority? 
Already one of the biggest Brexit prizes - global trade deals such as a quick and useful UK-US trade deal - have been thrown into doubt over remaining half in EU customs union & with regulatory alignment. Expect Trump to comment  
One of the reasons that many in Britain have been repeatedly shocked by political change -Ukip, Corbyn, Brexit- is because they've not been paying sufficient attention to public opinion & voters 
Easy in the middle of Tory Brexit meltdown to overlook fact that Labour have no policy on Brexit either. Scotland has alternatives. 
"This Just Got A Lot Bigger Than Brexit."My new article just up at @TheConWom, on how Theresa May’s desperate & deceitful plans for her Remain-By-Any-Other-Name non-Brexit are in effect a head-on existential challenge to our democracy itself. 
New data from ORB and from @NatCen British Social Attitudes surveys confirming what other sources have been showing for a while - British more positive about immigration since Brexit:  
Please don’t confuse ethnicity (Anglo-Saxon) with citizenship (British). London’s mayor (with his faults) is British too,just as you’re Australian. The UK remains a European nation whether we Brexit or not, because we can leave the EU but can never leave Europe cc @RichardDawkins 
The Independent Commission on Referendums @ICReferendums, calls for wholesale reform of the referendum process. We welcome this detailed report and share the view that electoral law must be modernised. #ReferendumReform 
It’s not even democracy. Local authorities are running out of money. And when that happens it will affect the real stuff: bins, street lights, social workers, housing. Brexit is a massive distraction from the fact that austerity is properly coming home to roost.  
If you’re unhappy about #Brexit for the love of sanity & our country sign this! You never know, it just might include an option to #Remain We mustn’t give up hope.   #PeoplesVote 
We are slowly waking up to the fact that the Brexit promised in the referendum is not one that can be delivered in real life  #Brexit #DavisResigns #BorisResigns 
READ: #Brexit Must Mean Full Control of our #Borders or Tories Face Losing the Next Election. My article in ⁦@BrexitCentral⁩: 
BREAKING: Chief Mouser @10DowningStreet 'Larry the Cat' resigns, in another blow for @theresa_may's government. In a statement this morning, Larry said 'If I am to mouse for Britain, let it be a free & independent Britain, not tied to a failing market.'#brexit #MayMustGo #RT 
Former Brexit Minister, @SteveBakerHW: We must not settle for an EU agreement that is at such odds with what people voted for 
May’s claim that her Brexit plan delivers on Tory manifesto commitments to take back control of money, laws and borders is a self-evident falsehood. Does she take us for fools? Or has she lost touch with reality? 
#BorisJohnson was actually trying to kill brexit. That’s why his colleagues kicked him out. 
A feral pest with its head trapped in a poo-smeared jar - gosh I’ve missed my regular dose of @fotoole on Brexit!  
That Labour voters are still falling for hard Brexit disguised as a jobs first frictionless unicorn friendly Brexit is the sad thing.  
You're also on the winning side of the Brexit referendum. What is it about these people? 
That’s not why Brexit is a fail. Brexit is a fail because it’s pointless. The UK is a Saudi colony. You have British government officials leasing London buildings from Saudi businessmen. Then you have a Pakistani Mayor. You’re no longer a European nation anyway.  
I could not stay on as a Brexit minister when I knew we could have free trade and not EU control - former Brexit Minister @SteveBakerHW  
Even MORE Britons want to leave EU - an increase of nearly 15% since Brexit referendum, survey claims  
-Vote Remain or face punishment budgets & go to the back of queue.-Back Cons or get Corbyn.-Back BRINO or resign & no Brexit.When did Gov't forget that the British don't like being threatened? 
9) Brexit voters were betrayed - by their own leaders.  They were promised something that could never happen,because the only other options would never have gained a majority.We're all paying the price of that betrayalEnd/ 
I have grumbles about this deal too, but the Brexit quitters don’t have an alternative, writes @RuthDavidsonMSP  
Betraying BritainMay has ignored the Referendum, her own manifesto & British electorate.We elect our representatives to follow through on their word, manifestos & pledges.May has broken this & does not deserve to lead British Govt any longer#Brexit #EU 
David Davis is is a principled man but standing by these principles has seen his power and influence gradually eroded by Theresa May and her pro-EU Brexit advisor, Olly Robbins. His principled resignation is typical of the man I know, says @dspencer47 
Given that it has taken two years for the government to formulate some sort of #Brexit plan, how can anyone claim they knew what they were voting for? The government didn't even know until Friday night. 
Such a good and important thread. The rewriting of history by Brexiters (yes, you Boris) who repeatedly promised we'd get both a Soft Brexit free trade deal and Hard Brexit levels of 'sovereignty' is, in a competitive field, one of the most shameful aspect of this whole shambles.  
Make your mark in the beauty industry and in the world. Buy a  shirt and help girls become strong, smart and bold. Proceeds benefit Girls, Inc. 
Having subverted Brexit to protect their own rigged markets, one may be able to find some amusement in seeing the corporate shills squeal when a Corbyn government results. 
We saw the likes of Clegg, Soubry, Clarke, etc... scuttling off to have their meetings with the EU, undermining the UK, what we didn’t realise was REMAINER IN CHIEF @theresa_may was also having secret little meetings with her EU Master Merkel to undermine Brexit.  MAY OUT ! 
Boris Johnson resigns and tells May she is 'suffocating' the 'Brexit dream' | Tory MPs fight to stop May's Chequers plan | Dominic Raab replaces David Davis | Public turns against May on Brexit | US Ambassador warns UK-US trade deal 'totally up in the air'  
And did anyone challenge her on this fallacy? Did anyone say “ it was a U.K. referendum not a Scottish one” I’m guessing not - am I the only Scottish Remain voter who is incandescent with rage that my vote is being abused & hijacked to support her narrative  
When will @BorisJohnson and fellow #Brexit ultras understand - or admit - that if we are heading for vassal state or colony status (their words) it is 100% their own doing?  #rhetoricalquestion 
Indeed, as a normally mild-mannered Tory myself, I am seething & although I've renewed my membership in order to be able to vote in next leadership election, in the next GE I shall vote for anyone who promises a clean Brexit, even if that happens to be Farage.@LukeGrahamMP 
We need Brexiteers, who support Tories or Lab, to come together with #Brexit parties in one Grand Umbrella Brexit Coalition to ensure that there's just one Brexit candidate on every ballot paper.If the 17.4m vote for the Brexit Candidate we would then have a Brexit Government.  
I had a drink last night with a journalist on a Brexit newspaper I've known for years. I told him he lost all credibility in my eyes when he knowingly published his first lie about Brexit. It didn't make it alright that a lot of other people were also telling lies at the time.  
A plea to @UKLabour @jeremycorbyn @Keir_Starmer: Please stop your dangerous flirtation with #Brexit. It represents the most illiberal, pernicious threat to the values we hold dear. History and the voters will judge you harshly if you continue to support it. 
Opinion: Brexit is reaching its grim moment of truth — and the Brexiteers know it  
#RAF100A good time to remember the 145 brave Polish fighter pilots who served in the RAF during the Battle of Britain. Some of their descendants are being treated disgracefully in the Toxic Brexit UK off today. 
Just thought that if Brexit did go away, the net result may well be that many of us will feel _profoundly_ more European. Previously , I could never have told you what that meant, but now? Ja! Oui! Si!One thing to change the law, quite another to change people's hearts. 
EEA membership is the solution to Brexit that keeps us in the single market and solves the Irish border question.Hard Brexiters don’t want that, because it involves freedom of movement. They are ignoring the best interests of the country for their own selfish ideological dogma. 
Melanie Phillips seems to think people who voted for Brexit and feel betrayed will not engage in politics again.To which I say "Hallefuckinglugah!" 
Just about to go on Victoria Derbyshire to debate Brexit, the fallout from yesterday's resignations and the need for a #PeoplesVote on the final Brexit deal - with the option to remain in the EU. From 9 - 10am on BBC News Channel! 
'The independence movement needs to stop talking about the best time for an independence referendum, and start talking about the dire necessity for one. The British government isn’t going to get us out of this mess, we need to get out of it ourselves.'  
Evolution of Tory policy: BREXIT REXITREMITREMINREMAINWe are at stage 4 now so they've nearly reached their preferred destination. 
The ‘dream’ isn’t dying; Boris’ fantasy version has come up against Brexit reality. PM rightly listening to the evidence on the impact of a walk-away, hard Brexit  
Theresa may misjudged the public mood at the last general election and got it disastrously wrong. She has not learned, she is making the same mistake with Brexit. 
Your comments encapsulate what’s wrong - the arrogance of the remainers who rather than accepting the outcome of the referendum have, in effect, sided with the EU rather than apply themselves to implementing the decision. 
Daily I hear from people who feel dismayed that the establishment is attempting to overrule the will of the British people and implement their own ‘soft Brexit’. My article in @Telegraph 
.@theresa_may If you want to keep your core voters, you need to say something very reassuring.You didnt say 'Brexit means a Norway type of half in half out Brexit'You said 'Brexit means Brexit' 
Paul Mason calls for #Labour to explicitly support a second #referendum and to show “No more tolerance of the handful of #Lexit-voting MPs” 
Following a meeting last night a group of anti-brexit ladies & gents in South Buckinghamshire have formally formed (we had done some events before) a new group “PeoplesVote South Bucks” who are campaigning for a #peoplesvote with option to #StopBrexit. Please spread the word. 
"Instead of the Star Trek vision of boldly going where no imperial nostalgic society had gone before, this Brexit would not have enough thrust to get the UK out of the gravitational pull of the European Union"  
How can these be Tory ‘rebels’,the country voted to leave the EU,to Brexit. We are not doing so.That makes Theresa May the Rebel.Get your wording right Peston. 
Classic remoaner:Hates the UKHas no clue how the EU actually worksHas a notion the 'great unwashed' spoiled his Eurodream.Can't tell you what that isObsessed with 'Victorians' & 'Imperialism' - when no-one else isHas 2nd home in France. Thinks it's under threat from Brexit 
Timely: "I wrote Article 50 – and I know this government can reverse Brexit if it wants to":  
What is needed now is a Grand #Brexit Coalition to ensure there's just one Brexit candidate in each constituency at next election.We can then elect a majority of MPs who will actually deliver the Brexit we voted for.What a novel idea, politicians respecting a democratic vote !! 
Blaming Remainers for the Brexit debacle is like blaming fire alarms for fires. 
'People of Britain!It is essential that we have a 'Common Rule Book' where EU makes our Laws even after we BrexitIf not, BMW would not sell us their cars. Nor France their wines and cheeses.As a nation of cringers, we must do what we are told by Brussels'Go figure  
“Dont Brexit, change Britain”, Lord Adonis tells B4E event.  
‘When you take away all the heroic elements of #Brexit, all the epic thrills of throwing off the oppressor and beginning a new history, what you are left with is just this – a country that has gone to enormous trouble to humiliate itself.’ Coruscating from @fotoole 
Boris Johnson and David Davis's resignations blow apart a fragile truce in the U.K. government over its Brexit plan  
I've no idea who you are, but I'd rather jump into a river of piss and molten dogshit than 'Get Behind Brexit'.You bean-faced fucklord.  
Just 22% of Brits now trust Theresa May to get the best possible #Brexit deal. This botched Brexit isn't what anyone voted for, that's why we need a #PeoplesVote. Please RT!  
Good god Radio 4 - jammed between two interviews on the polical chaos of Brexit is a feature on why the sound of a Spitfire engine is one of the most reassuring sounds. And Gordon Bank’s plans to travel to World Cup Final. Nostalgia fest ‘go away nasty world’ 
Fascinating polling - Britons are now much more positive about immigration than before the Brexit referendum  
Corbyn - no second referendum Gardiner - no second referendum Watson - no second referendum Starmer - open to the possibility of a second referendumConflicting messages from a party that’s putting achieving Brexit before the economy, jobs, before democracy itself#Brexit  
With Davis' resignation highlighting the clear divide in the cabinet over Brexit, now is the perfect time to get involved with grassroots campaigning to help make a #PeoplesVote happen! Join us here: 
I’m gonna keep this simple... #Brexit #Government #Politics #PartyInfighting #BackStabbingWHAT.A.SHAMBLES And then we wonder why so many people are genuinely disengaged with politics in this country... 
The intellectual dishonesty of the Brexit Taliban is now in full view - The Washington Post  
Mr Bean Appointed As New UK Brexit Secretary “Bean’s hilarious mannerisms and cunning ability to get himself in the most outrageously stupid scenarios will stand by him well as UK Brexit Secretary”. 
When Theresa May refers to "The British People" she means the half who voted for Brexit - without knowing what it really means. Half means half. That's why "The Will of the Halfwits" is clearly not a Strong and Stable "brand" to dangle in front of "decent ordinary people". 
The Chequers plan is...Good for Britain: 14%Bad for Britain: 33%[Not sure]: 53%--The Chequers compromise...Respects the referendum result: 27%Does not respect the result: 29%[Not sure]: 44%via @YouGov, 08 - 09 Jul 
Humphrys is basically repeating everything that Johnson and Davis said, as a method of interviewing Tory MP David Gauke. How about looking at reality and the facts of Brexit, John, instead of parroting the unicorn believers?Time to put John out to pasture. #r4today 
Admit they are wrong!? Come on now. You know if the mentality is 'Brexit is failing due to the lack of power of belief of non-believers', then you are dealing with extremists. They will never buckle. 
I really don’t believe in a second Brexit referendum. We should stick by the result of the original 1975 one. 
Sad but true if you want true comment from journalists about Brexit Britain we need to rely on our friends in Ireland. A great read and sadly so true.Scotland we need to get out !  
John Humphreys argues the UK has spent the last 40 years battling EU directives and rules we didn't want.  Most people didn't care until 2-3 months prior to referendum #rewritinghistory #brexiteer #badjournalism 
John Humphrys just now to David Gauke, "What we're doing is kowtowing to Brussels", now @BBCr4today day after day we are hearing your lead presenter endorsing a hard tory Brexit, tory Ministers get treated like long lost mates, it's a fucking joke, fuck #r4today #StopBrexit 
John Humphrys sounding utterly demented on @BBCr4today when he talks about the idea of any more Brexit concessions. 
As my true views on #Brexit are, in all honesty, indistinguishable from Boris’s, I’d like to invite him to cross the floor and become Shadow Minister for Jewsplaining, where the case load has become overwhelming. 
Interesting how James O'Brien was forced off the BBC for not being 'neutral' on Brexit, yet the likes of Humphreys and Neil are free to continue despite their obvious proclivities on the subject... 
Boris Quits!!! Brexit Dying!!Theresa May sold out her own team!!! Brexit means Brexit what an absolute scandal what a Liar how can anyone trust ‘Turd Way Teereza’ Tories should be finished!!!  
Graeme Bandeira on David Davis and Boris Johnson’s resignation over Brexit deal agreed at Chequers - Political Cartoon Gallery in Putney  
As Westminster squabbles and rows about #Brexit, basic services around the country collapse.  #StopBrexit - they can't manage it and in the meantime, the rest of the country burns to ashes 
A second referendum is not a betrayal of the British people, what is a betrayal is the continuation of the farcical #Brexit brought about by lies snd misinformation that is clearly adverse to the interests of ordinary people. 
BBC pushing the narrative that having lost her Brexit Secretary and Foreign Secretary Theresa May’s position is “stronger than ever”. What a farce of a broadcaster - the digital home of Remain. 
Spoken version of Boris's resignation letter."We are heading for a semi-#Brexit.We have put up the white flag.We are going to be a colony of the EU.Yet further concessions to the EU are likely."This #BrexitBetrayal cannot be allowed to stand. 
Give us our damn Brexit, May. Go tell Tusk et al to jump. A No Deal will be just fine. Or walk. Meanwhile, Brexiteers, hold your nerve. We won. Our Brexit will come. #brexit #csm 
What level of gutlessness is this?@BorisJohnson has even turned down an interview with John Humphrys on the BBC Radio 4 Brexit Dream Show. 
“He ran a disgusting referendum campaign, was an atrocious joke of a Foreign Secretary and resigns leaving a trail of chaos and an unholy mess he played a huge part in creating" - @ChukaUmunna  #BorisJohnsonResigns 
Over 100 business leaders – inc founders of Innocent Drinks, Pret, Waterstones, Zoopla, Domino’s, Jack Wills – wrote an open letter to MPs dismissing May’s #Brexit proposals. Business needs to be heard to protect jobs & the economy.  
Brexiteer warns Leave supporters are ‘incandescent with rage’ at Theresa May’s #Brexit plan “This is not a trade deal, this is the UK maintaining its membership of the single market because we become a rule-taker in perpetuity." 
RT if you want @theresa_may to resign so a real Conservative can take charge of the @Conservatives party! #Brexit  
Eurosceptics' strategy is not to topple May but her Brexit policy. With the help of Labour, that might well succeed. Probability of hard Brexit rising fast. -  
“The one man who maybe could capture the imagination of the public because of his absolute sincerity and honesty is Jacob Rees-Mogg,” said Farage.He certainly would  #Brexit Support us at  
There’s no pretence now that the only difference between a soft Brexit and a hard Brexit is the scale of the economic and social devastation 
Theresa May has refused to give us a second referendum because "The people have spoken". Listen Theresa, WE ARE SPEAKING RIGHT NOW! That referendum means sod all now, things are different and we want to stay! Accept it! #StopBrexit #RemainerNow #PeoplesVote #Brexit 
Are you actually complaining that Brexiters have left cabinet so now they have no influence in cabinet?How very Brexit of you. 
The #Brexit dream is dying. That is all it ever was, a dream. It has taken the country sleepwalking through a nightmare over the last two years. Time now to wake up, two of the Breximonsters are now back under the bed, already forgotten, the rest will be there soon. 
Believe that #Brexit is not going to deliver for the UK? Want to take back control from the politicians? Then sign the petition & please share with others: #TuesdayThoughts 
A must read - a forensic dissection of the #Brexit tragedy but one we could still avoid...Fintan O’Toole: Britain has gone to huge trouble to humiliate itself  
."This is the prospect now before the UK:a Brexit NOT worth the time or effort,and not accommodating the demands of Brexit supporters in the media & politics.The alternatives are no Brexit, a delayed Brexit or no deal.". via @FT by @davidallengreen 
This by ⁦@davidallengreen⁩ sums up exactly where we are with Brexit after Chequers/ yesterday’s drama  
"Once they enter the workplace, the British are among the worst idlers in the world. (…) Too many people in Britain prefer a lie-in to hard work.” - our new Brexit Secretary, Dominic Raab, ladies and gentleman 
This is not the #Brexit that 60% of Crewe and Nantwich electors voted for.It's an outrage that all the other political parties in Crewe & Nantwich have decided to betray themThe other parties think they know better than the votersThat is very dangerous in a so-called democracy 
Theresa May: "My #Brexit proposal unites us all."Leave: May must goRemain: May must go#Maymustgo 
Brexiteers described as the "Brexit Taliban" in the Washington Post.   
Just listened to good interview on radio 5 with Dutch MEP in summary:1. Some sort of proposal is welcome but staggering it took 2 years.2. Clear so many of those that voted to Brexit could not have appreciated complexity and ramifications of Brexit.3. Proposal unworkable. 
Did you vote leave on the proviso that companies leaving it the UK in the event of #Brexit was just #projectfearWell now electronics giant Philips has joined companies in aerospace & car & financial sectors in confirming this.Feel misled? Be #remainernow 
On 23/6/16, in the biggest democratic vote this country has ever seen, we voted to LEAVE the EU.On 6/7/18, in the biggest ever act of treachery in UK history, the Tory Cabinet voted to stay IN the EU.All the other parties in Parliament want to stop Brexit,so they're no better 
How is Theresa May still in office after the resignations of Boris Johnson and David Davis over her Brexit plan? Julia talks to Eurosceptic MP Sir Bill Cash. Watch again ▼ @JuliaHB1 |  
This is your Tuesday 10th of July reminder that both Leave campaigns deliberately broke the law to win the Brexit referendum including possibly treasonthis means@BorisJohnson@michaelgove@Arron_banksBroke the law & should be in jail#VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw #VoteLeaveCheated 
It's going to be a very sobering moment when Brexiteers finally exhaust their list of scapegoats only for Brexit to still be irredeemably terrible.  
Lord Adonis - Theresa May's Chequers agreement is a betrayal of the national interest... the agreement says absolutely nothing about services. The Chequers agreement isn't remotely negotiable in the EU as it has a fatal weakness... cherry picking. #FBPE #brexit @Andrew_Adonis 
We are now at the point of no return with Brexit. Now any so called Scot who would rather be dragged over a cliff edge by the Tories, to continue to call yourselves BRITISH!! Please feel free to move to England to do so and leave Scotland in the safe hands of ACTUAL SCOTS!! 
Yes, that's right, the country faces the threat of a Tory Brexit or a @UKLabour Brexit, either way a fantasy #Brexit brought to you by a divided party within a party, both of which are STILL failing to question a result obtained by breaking the law.#PeoplesVote#BrexitShambles 
Labour must vote against Mays Brexit plan. Corbyn needs to three-line whip, and then remove the whip if anyone votes to prop up May. This is the moment to take the obstructionists on with no apologies. Otherwise, we are compromised as a political force. 
U.K. Foreign Secretary Boris Johnson has resigned over Brexit  
Example 1: Scottish independence and Brexit are comparable. No they aren't. Scottish independence would mean Scotland - which is not independent - becoming independent, Brexit means the UK - which is independent - leaving the EU. 
Brexit fantasies are running up against reality - my column for @thetimes 
With the mess that the Government have created, & new facts that are emerging all the time, we know that #Brexit is not deliverable in the terms it was sold. The people deserve a #PeoplesVote on the Brexit deal. Join the campaign now! @peoplesvote_uk  
It was always going to come down to these two simple questions: How many people can admit to themselves that the Brexit they voted for was always unachievable? And how quickly can they do it? 
UK's Theresa May attempts to salvage Brexit strategy amid attacks from all sides  
And they insist on saying “soft Brexit” when they mean “NOT BREXIT AT ALL”.  
What do you think? Should we enter into a strategic alliance with other pro-Brexit entities? Watch the video and vote! >>>  #Brexit #DirectDemocracy #BrexitShambles 
Fellow Conservatives, do not threaten us with Jeremy Corbyn to make us accept your dreadful #Brexit sell out.You are misjudging this again if you do.It will not wash. 
BETRAYED LEAVE VOTERS will quit politics if they don't get #Brexit says The Times.  #May most despised woman in the UK.  @borisjohnson #boris johnson #borisjohnson 
Is it because of his unprecedented ability to make playing non-descript teams seem like a personal triumph for all dull English middle-managers and/or Brexit-loving flag-wankers who wouldn't know excellence if it shat in their gaping mouths? #WorldCup #EnglandvCroatia #England 
The only way May can save her #Brexit plan now is to give the British people a #PeoplesVote. This whole sorry mess today simply illustrates that she will not be able to resolve Brexit in Westminster.  
When you look at the mess UK politics is in, its worth remembering that the British public had complete disinterest in the EU right up until shortly before the referendum. We did not need to have euref, interest only increased when parts of the press cranked up its propaganda.  
Before Boris Johnson swans off into a Cameron sunset, or starts advertising himself to take over as PM, I would like to see him give evidence in a public inquiry re/ his role in Vote Leave.Because Vote Leave broke the Law.Brexit was based on lies.#GE2018Now #GeneralElection 
"When you take away all the heroic elements of Brexit, all the epic thrills of throwing off the oppressor and beginning a new history, what you are left with is just this – a country that has gone to enormous trouble to humiliate itself"  @IrishTimesOpEd 
“But there are dreams that cannot beAnd there are storms we cannot weather.I had a dream my life would be,So different from this hell I'm living,So different now from what it seemed,Now life has killed the dreamI dreamed.” #brexit #miserable 
to elaborate on this point it's obvious that Both Sides are determining if a justice is "good" or "bad" according to partisanship but my point was that only one side has democratic legitimacy according to the national referendum we hold on Who Should Be In Charge every four years 
James O'Brien's stinging analysis of Boris Johnson's role in Brexit: "Boris Johnson decided on the Leave side because he thought it would advance his career. There is no integrity, there is no honesty, no reason." 
A reminder that the new junior minister in the #Brexit ministry, Chris Heaton-Harris, is the one who shockingly wrote to all universities demanding the names of all those who teach European Studies 
‘Brexit has so far been conducted through a glass darkly. It has been seen through glorious fantasies of imperial revival and layers of self-pity about imaginary oppression’  
I knew we were missing an influential Brexit voice from recent discussions. The basic incompetence of such a key Government adviser has I think been a major contributor to where we find ourselves in the Brexit process - and should be discussed more.  
Apprehensive about dealing with Corbyn? Bollocks @afneil. The EU have hinted the very opposite. Corbyn & his team wouldn't have made a pigs ear of Brexit like these Tory clowns..  
.@BBCPanorama I am intrigued about the editorial decision to focus on Trump’s disgusting sexual behaviour rather than the law-breaking and possible Russian influence during the #Brexit campaign. Are you preparing a programme on this vital national issue?#Brexitgate 
Hands up who's losing faith   Resignations yesterday have thrown the Brexit negotiations into chaos! Whatever happens next, it's clear our generation must have their voices heard in the final deal. #BrexitShambles #TheresaMay 
#FBPE - I wish you'd listened to us when we said this was all about keeping an anti-austerity government out of office.  It isn't too late. Drop the hashtag. Unite against Tory Brexit and do everything we can to get them out of government. It's the only hope we have.  
Vote Leave broke the Law.Why isn’t Brexit being stopped? #GE2018Now #TheresaMay 
Something which I still can’t understand about Johnson/Davis: their Brexit dream died in December when the govt agreed to the Irish backstop. How did it take them seven months to work that out?  
This whole sorry mess simply illustrates that you will not be able to resolve Brexit in Westminster - the only way Theresa May can save her Brexit plan now is to let the British people vote on it #PeoplesVote ⁦@peoplesvote_uk⁩ 
Wow. Anguilla has a more detailed Brexit plan than the UK.  
Or better still: the #Brexit nightmare may soon be over!  
"Pre Brexit twitter" was a wonderful place. Everyone was unfailingly polite. There were bobbies on bicycles instead of block buttons and bans and we all used to meet at the village hall for bun sales and knitting competitions. 
I'm left wing, have voted Labour all my life. But if they continue to support a corrupt Ref result that broke laws, and Brexit which damages our economy, jobs, and hurts our NHS, causes more austerity. I would vote Lib Dem, because I don't want Brexit at all. 
Brexit quitters have only themselves to blame. ⁦@RSylvesterTimes⁩ is an excellent political columnist 
The left hate Theresa May, the right despise her. Remainers and leavers hate her brexit policy. She's got no chance of winning a general election, and she'll take scores of Tory MPs down with her. They know the risk. They know the score. Don't complain when you lose your seats. 
Your morning briefing: May’s new-look cabinet meets amid Brexit unrest, Thai cave rescue continues, Trump nominates new Supreme Court judge  
So, we are supposed to feel sorry for the Brexiteers.NEVER will I have sympathy for those who have such a sense of entitlement & treat those they are meant to serve with such contempt. NEVER will I cease efforts to hold them to account.NEVER will I give in to bullies. #Brexit 
The Conservatives won the 2015 General Election because we promised a referendum We won the 2017 General Election because we promised to honour its result We mustn’t arrogantly believe the electorate will forgive us for the proposed deception in May’s #BRINO plan  
More Britons want to the leave the EU, yet Theresa May is desperate to betray Brexit, because she is an internationalist who campaigned for Remain.  
The last two years make a lot of sense if you start from the assumption that neither Trump nor Johnson expected to win and therefore had no plan beyond the election/referendum 
To be fair, May did promise that Brexit would create new job opportunities. Shame it's only junior Tory ministers who have benefitted so far.  
Opinion | The intellectual dishonesty of the Brexit Taliban is now in full view  
Boris Johnson and David Davis were right to resign. But cabinet resignations aren't enough. The public's democratic demand for Brexit is being sidelined by the Westminster circus. We need to find a way to take back control, writes @Tom_Slater_ 
Great to know the new Brexit Minister finds British people “amongst the worst idlers in the world”. Pretty rich coming from someone that does very little for a £140,000 a year.  
The biggest problem for DExEU was they never had their own cat and this affected both their popularity and their PR #DExEU #brexit 
If @Conservatives don’t deliver the Brexit we voted for, then it’s a Corbyn government, as no one will trust them ever again. Yet the (mostly Remain) party bigwigs seem either too thick to see this, or they just don’t give a damn.  
They said it would be easy. They said it would be free. Turns out Brexit is difficult and costly. So the Brexiteers are quitting.  
.@Nigel_Farage: "Prime Minister Theresa May, who incidentally was a remain voter in the referendum, presented a plan...nothing less, Martha, than a total betrayal of what people had voted for in that referendum and a general election." #TheStory  
If there really was a plan that could deliver the type of Brexit that was promised during the referendum campaign then someone would have come up with it by now. There is no plan and being in denial will not change that. Brexit was always based on bluster and magical thinking. 
Do you want a General Election, a 2nd referendum or both?Please retweet to increase the sample size.#Brexit #BrexitChaos #Brexiteers #BrexitShambles #ForeignSecretary #BREAKING #BorisJohnsonResigns #ToryShambles #ToriesOut #r4today #OurNHS70 #3lions#StrongAndStable -Joke! 
Why would the Blairites not want a General Election?They’ve spent months attacking @JeremyCorbyn over Brexit, now we’ve a chance to take charge of it.They really are the pits. They don’t care about Brexit. What matters more to them is stopping Jeremy becoming PM.Disgrace. 
OMG!!! Boris has Quit!!! Brexit Dream is Dying!!!!  
Every now and again free people must stand up and fight for what they believe in. I feel we owe it to future generations and those hero's that fought and died for our freedom b4 us, to stand up and fight against those that want to deny democracy. #Brexit #BrexitBetrayal 
If Brexit was a PhD student it would have been kicked out long ago for falsifying data, lying about its qualifications, and accepting unauthorised funding.  
#TelegraphView: After the resignations of Boris Johnson and David Davis, Theresa May should rethink her Brexit plan 
Brexiteers never had a plan, haven’t produced a plan in 2 years & know there is no decent plan out there which anywhere near delivers their fantastical #Brexit. We cannot stand by and allow the U.K. to slide further into the abyss. @jeremycorbyn @The_TUC @unitetheunion @GMB 
We need great statesmanship, not childish briefings from Number 10, so we can leave the EU not just well but brilliantly - so says departing Brexit minister @SteveBakerHW 
You have clearly not been listening. Corbyn's position on Brexit is exactly the same as May's.  
The exit from Brexit remains open:  
So, if the Brexit Dividend doesn't quite deliver the massive upturn in our nation's fortunes that we are all so eagerly anticipating, each town and region could simply organise a four day televised bike race every single week of the year. 
Massive news day: Brexit mayhem, World Cup mania, Thai cave rescue endgame. Tune into @GMB for all the latest. 
"Has any country ever gone into international treaty negotiations hoping to emerge with a status greatly inferior to the one they already have?" Fintan O'Toole  lays bare the madness of Brexit.  
Please Keir wake up and smell the #Brexit. It stinks. Crimes were committed, every scenario sees the UK worse off. The younger generation will never forgive you if you don't take a stand now.#VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw #BrexitMeansTreason 
The disgraceful bullying of @BBC to give credence to the fact-free reporting of fantasist @PeterJukes, a troll, and his writing partner continues as @Guardian delete and correct entire premise of its latest “Wrongshell” on #Brexit - that @Arron_banks lied about # of meetings 
Johnson released this photo of himself as he signs his resignation letter. He hopes it looks statesmanlike, it doesn’t, it reeks of the self-interested, opportunism that characterised his whole lamentable career. Brexit allows such people to flourish.  
imagine going up to mary fuckin poppins at disneyland and asking her if she supports brexit what do you even do in this situation how do you improv your way out of this  
‘Brexit is no longer a matter of opinion. Of course, some people believe it a good idea: others, including me, think it a disaster. But that’s not now the point. It simply is not deliverable’  
Theresa May has moved to shore up her grip on power after Boris Johnson resigned and savaged her handling of Brexit  
Brexit is dead. No surprise. Imagine Remain took a marginal win as a mandate to bin the pound, adopt the Euro, federalise, and make the Union Jack royal blue and yellow.Leave had their chance. They failed.  
Why oh why can’t we be good at sport and politics at the same time? Reminds me of being at Uni when I couldn’t be thin and clever at the same time as both took such effort ! Life eh? See you at 6am @GMB talking #brexit #BoJo #WhatHappensNext 
Theresa May looks likely to survive any attempt to oust her over the government’s Brexit strategy, for now  
We all know what a bunch of duplicitous self-serving hypocrites politicians are so why should they worry if they simply decide to ignore the 2016 referendum result and abandon #Brexit ? They'll only upset a minority and that's what happens all of the time. 
The "Brexit Bashing Corporation" (aka the BBC) coverage of Boris & Davies resignations is underpinned by thinly veiled delight. Brexiteers are now completely excluded from their coverage. Voice is only given to smug Remainers, Brexiteers are silenced. BBC - "We Bash Brexit!" 
Is it about student loans? For me it’s the fact we voted for them and they jumped straight into bed with the Tories who are still there. Another election would give us the same result I feel.Vote Lib Dem get ToryVote Labour get BrexitVote Green get nowhereVote Tory......Hell? 
The Guardian says PM has faced down Brexit rebels “for now”, reporting May’s warning that divided cabinets lose elections. May warned hard-line Brexiters to fall into line or risk handing power to Jeremy Corbyn.- Nothing about doing what's right for the country.As you were. 
Terrific chat with James Max on a watered down BREXIT, outlook for M&S, Mothercare's ills & Sorrell's success. Could have 'shot the breeze for hours!' James is a terrific conversationalist - Never had the chance to discuss the possibility of Fox trumping Comcast's bid for Sky! 
The Liberal Democrats have tabled an opposition day debate to give the people the final say on the Brexit deal. 
Brexit is NOT dying. There is still NO Remain option. Why? Coz Corbyn is still jerking off to a 1970s wet dream. We're jostling about in a burning corridor without a fire escape. We're wresting in zero gravity. We need help. And the party of social justice has abandoned us.#FBPE 
"Theresa May was fighting for her political life last night after Boris Johnson accused her of killing Brexit."He's right too. She's done nothing but dance with the devil since vote re Brexit.And she's a real Muslim / illegals loving PM. Dangerous!  
Why should the dominant sentiment in the Kashmir Valley, Chenab, Pir Panchal, (Bhaderwah, Doda, Kishtwar, Rajouri, Poonch), Kargil, Pakistan-administered Kashmir, Gilgit-Baltistan be held hostage to the overstated sentiment in two-and-a-half districts of Jammu? Referendum? (2/2) 
In fact, it entrenches divisions - with Gove, Raab, Leadsom & Cleverly in a sort of Govt Brexit camp  (pragmatists) and Johnson, Davis, Baker, Jenkyns in an anti-Govt Brexit camp (fantasists). Tory Brexiters now openly split and bunkering in.  
This is easily the greatest referendum result in Canadian history and I've long wondered why it hasn't become the subject for a Heritage Minute  
Theresa May never fully believed in Brexit. She put her personal ambitions ahead of policy and democratic vote outcome. It’s time to replace her with someone that will enact Article 50.  
Britain's foreign secretary and two other ministers quit amid a deepening crisis over Brexit that threatens to topple PM Theresa May.  
Political crisis in UK after PM Theresa May faces mass rebellion over Brexit deal, several ministers resign via @JantaKaReporter 
Boris Johnson, the face of Brexit, resigned as U.K. foreign secretary, pushing Theresa May deeper into crisis   
This is the heart of Brexit. Whatever they say about principles. This is what it’s always been about  
Theresa May is apparently shamed by Donald Trump’s visit, yet entirely unashamed that she has just orchestrated the betrayal of 17 million people over Brexit.We appear to have a lunatic running the country. 
Theresa May's Brexit plan keeps such close ties to the EU that it prompted 2 top cabinet members to quit. Here's what you need to know   
May is like a stupid schoolgirl still.  She took the Brexit package for her best pal Merkel to look at BEFORE she showed it to anyone else.BARNIER also got a look at before any other MPs or Brits.May is still a REMAINIAC and she always will be.  
A woman has been mudered, likely by leftover nerve agent from a Kremlin assassination attempt on UK soil, but response from UK government, mired in #Brexit shambles, so far zero. #Brexit proving huge success for the Kremlin.  
Yep, as the saying goes 'fail to plan, plan to fail'. Brexit is a classic example of this now. #brexit 
May’s Brexit involves ‘biggest loss of UK sovereignty’ since 1973  
Time for Midlands Tories to decide if they will back the #Brexit their electorate overwhelmingly voted for or prop up @theresa_may and her Brexit betrayal . 
The Queen not stopping Brexit is like the Electoral College not stopping Trump — the strongest possible evidence that these ridiculous institutions serve no purpose. 
LATEST UPDATE:-Trump nominates Brett Kavanaugh to #SCOTUS-May defends Brexit plans amid resignations-More boys rescued in #ThailandCaveRescue Watch these stories and more on  
Vote Leave broke electoral law during the EU referendum so voiding the result. They don't get another referendum, they get disqualified.  
Excellent explainer re PM Theresa May’s ‘“Brexit Deal”#Brexit 
It’s really surreal that literally no reporter has ever challenged Republican leaders on the fact that in the election they explicitly framed as a referendum on the Supreme Court 53% of Americans voted for candidates who supported a constitutional right to abortion 
I’m glad brexit is going to shit and people resigning because it was a stupid idea in the first place. 
Tim Draper, a tech billionaire and the main proponent of the plan to divide the state, reported a payment to Gunster Strategies (Brexit)  for less than $6.5k in November related to a successful effort to land measure on ballot. H/t @pinche_pi 
Above all else, this is the lens with which we need to view Brexit. Not a national policy goal but a personal vanity advancement project  
Turns out everyone cared more about keeping Corbyn from winning an election than they did about whatever opportunistic Brexit position they've been holding for the past 18 months. I may never recover from this truly shocking turn of events. 
Theresa May to meet new-look cabinet amid Brexit turmoil  
Now posted LIVE STREAM broadcast today, Monday, July 9, at 5:00 pm ET on my YouTube channel  SETH RICH MURDERS IDENTIFIED? Giuliani increases pressure to END MUELLER investigation, Hillary Clinton, BREXIT - SUBSCRIBE RETWEET @POTUS 
Brexit Analysis: In football terms, the UK is two own goals down with just minutes left in the second half. But, unlike in football, if the UK can’t get its act together, the other team is going to lose as well.  
I mean, they also did just vote for exactly that in another referendum, and have a number of shadow congressmen demanding recognition 
After bills  I'm left with £6.89 to buy a fortnights food.I've asked the Department for Work and Pensions #DWP, for help for food but they said; "it's not a reason we'd help"What is a reason then? Funeral expenses?#Brexit #GE2018now #indyref2 
I'm not angry. I'm sad.I used to do angry, but it gets you nowhere.Supported through thick/thin & felt I battled hard for #Brexit.We'll get it, but it's a mealy-mouthed version we'll get.We are owned, live with it.Freedom is a pipe dream.Politicians are self-serving liars. 
MondayMadness5Tim Draper the man behind Cal3 (split CA into 3 states) has 10 year involvement w/ the RU  gov’t &  oligarchs. Billionaire Tim Draper A hired a Brexit strategist to help divide California. No!Steve Bannon called 'piece of trash' by heckler at bookstore pic.twitter.com/a6s9npo2NE 
#ScotusPick@realDonaldTrump is an illegitimate president and drinks hooker piss#Trump #MAGA2020 #TrumpRussia #TrumpResign #Brexit #MOG #SaveSCOTUS #SCOTUS 
Brexit: goodbye to the oaf - the situation is not as bad as Johnson paints it. And had he not objected to the Efta/EEA option, we would be much better off. We thus lose someone unfit to make any useful contribution to the Brexit process...  #Brexinfo. 
Conspicuously lacking from Boris Johnson’s resignation letter as Foreign Secretary was any convincing alternative to the Brexit strategy that Prime Minister Theresa May has presented.  
Sometimes you have to give the people you love a kick up the arse to do whats best for their own good.All corbynistas, if you really supported Corybn you would be on his back to oppose brexit, his pro brexit stance is whats keeping him out of power.. against the worst gov ever! 
My latest: With time running out to make a deal, Britain faces the reality of its Brexit folly 
 Perfectly logical for Davies as Brexit Minister to resign 1st & Johnson as Foreign Secretary 2nd: a drip-drip of resignations gives each the day's headlines to themselves = no more than good media management! PM's fake Brexit is an affront to democracy! 
Theresa May rocked by Brexit resignations of Boris Johnson, David Davis  pic.twitter.com/VwjzB0TCi8 
David, judging by this tweet and you replies to people below it, you have no concept whatsoever of how democracy actually works or even any idea of what Brexit means.All of this and you being Vice Chair of the police federation is actually frightening. 
Universal Credit and it's effect on my mental health - Part 1An in-depth look on how #UniversalCredit has destroyed my #mentalhealthAnxiety attacks, thoughts self harm of self harm & a #DWP assesor telling me it's "all in my head."#GE2018now #Brexit 
You're right. I should have said she has pretended she was going to implementHer opposition to BREXIT was of course why they put her there—like the establishment GOP here who pretend to oppose open borders  
Ask yourself. Who else feels this way about NATO. Who wants to divide the EU with Brexit. Who wants to flip Turkey from NATO. It's Putin, Trump's BFF. The reshaping has already happened. The fight is to change it back. 
Friends, you should follow our British friend @LeighMGPM  --tough time over there in #england and she is a patriot and also supportive of @realDonaldTrump visit. We know he is in good hands with people like her!  #BrexitShambles #brexit #mega #maga #trump #TrumpTrain 
Our #StopBrexit voices need to be louder than ever before.Donald Tusk's sad words "Unfortunately, the idea of Brexit hasn't left together with David Davis" hit the nail on the head. There is no democratic majority for the Brexit that's in May's head.MPs pull the plug, please!  
#quote"The direction the negotiations had been taking..suggested that we wd not really leave the EU..had hoped at tonight's meeting that..my fears were unfounded but, instead, they have been confirmed."Resignations on principle cd well help ensure that Brexit *does* mean Brexit.  
Hard Brexit 'means people fleeing UK', Jeremy Hunt note says  
"When Ian Blackford petulantly led the SNP MP's in a walkout from the Commons the other week, he kick-started a process which had only one aim. The destabilising of the WM Government at a crucial point in the Brexit process. Ruth Davidson explains..."  
If, knowing now what we do about May brexit plan, she is not brought down the Tory party deserve to be shredded. In keeping her in office the Tories are once again doing things for themselves and not the people. FFS wakeup morons, Britain is in danger. 
Brexit is already paying off for New Zealand. You couldn't buy this publicity for the tuatara.  
I didn’t vote for a deal I voted to leave the European Union #Brexit @theresa_may @10DowningStreet 
'Time to back our PM' Jeremy Hunt hails May's Brexit deal after being named Foreign Sec. Oh what an entirely predictable sycophant !  
Trying to simply push Brexit through as May, Corbyn, and other anti-EU idiots have done was doomed to failure. The geopolitical and geoeconomic status quo is an incredibly precious asset. To mess with it, without a huge consensus, shows a contempt for the electorate as a whole. 
there's a lot of people seemingly celebrating the end of Brexit  we're not out of the woods yet by a LONG way! if there's a tory leadership challenge, it's highly likely we will end up with a hard Brexiter as PM; now is NOT the time to get complacent! now is the time to FIGHT!! 
Letters: Britain’s Brexit impotence is the legacy of Theresa May’s timidity, duplicity and vacillation  
"Patriots Vote for Brexit, The Left Flies a Balloon" 7/9/18  
Boris Johnson Speaks Out About ‘Semi-Brexit’ After Calling It Quits As UK Foreign Secretary  
UK Government On Verge Of Collapse Days Before Trump's VisitUK Foreign Secretary Boris Johnson is the latest cabinet minister to resign over Brexit negotiations, placing Prime Minister Theresa May’s grip on power in doubt just days before Trump’s visit.   
#5things- Brexit blues- Trump confident Kim will denuclearize- Turkish president names his son-in-law as economy czar - Elon Musk heads to Shanghai- Stocks gain, emerging markets rebound 
.@Nigel_Farage: "Prime Minister Theresa May, who incidentally was a remain voter in the referendum, presented a plan...nothing less, Martha, than a total betrayal of what people had voted for in that referendum and a general election." #TheStory  
With the May-hem government in meltdown and Comrade Brexit hiding in the wings, we need a #PeoplesVote now more than ever. Add your name and retweet to get as many names as possible. Time to let a more informed people have our say. 
Make room! He’s there to create an independent #Kurdistan, referendum round two   
A dramatic brexit  
U.K. government in crisis amid Brexit resignations  
Here's one reaction from Germany to the chaos in Theresa May's government over Brexit  
aye mate haha people who like brexit should get tae fuck shudnae they ha, bet their maws widnae something or other christ typing in that spastic accent gets exhausting  
We were going to have a regular #WorldCup episode but Brexit advocate Union Jack called in to talk about his feelings on the England squad and them reaching their first semi final since 1990. #ItsComingHomeDon’t forget to like, subscribe and comment. 
Brexit will also affect me physically as freedom of movement around Europe is curtailed, visas etc and British musicians are likely to be considered too much of a bother to hire. 
Agree. @michaelgove is a HUGE disappointment! Can't believe his treachery to real Brexit! But then, he does have form!  
We have to pray for our friends over in @england. What a mess...Such a great country going through so much turmoil. #BREXIT #MEGA #MAGA #TRUMP 
Friend at Westminster has just emailed me, believes that the Tory party brexiteers might have the 48 signatures required to trigger vote of no confidence against may. #Brexit 
If I more time I would totally be doing editorial “oh no” comics for a UK newspaper, Brexit and everything around it is an avalanche of “oh no” moments 
Who needs enemies, when you have Smeeth, @jessphillips @wesstreeting , et al @JWoodcockMP (when he is not sexually harassing), and that twat @IanAustinMP actively cheer-leading and giving succor to the TORIES.   They are a fucking disgrace, and should be de-selected #Brexit  
home of brexit because of @oldbob1944. will always respect him for his time in the forces (which he doesn’t like to talk about. home of granite brexit football. harry maguire country. wonderful. 9.5/10  
Smart column: Brexit turned out to be harder than they thought – so the Brexiteers are quitting.  
The Brexit dream is dying. Someone put it out of its misery and #StopBrexit 
Oh, and the official ‘Brexit’ campaign group broke the law to help win, as did the unofficial right-wing ‘LeaveEU’ group - something gov doesn’t seem interested in as vote was 2 years ago 
Yes!!! This  #BrexitShambles #Brexit #BORIS We are not at war with the rest of Europe they’re our friends, partners, lovers, husbands, wives, colleagues. 
I don’t think I’ve ever been so depressed to be British.  An unnecessary referendum sold on lies, and 2 years later the winning side can’t get its act together to deliver a coherent plan.  But it was a terrible idea in the first place and no one ever had a plan. Exit Brexit 
What is so ludicrous about the whole Tory management of Brexit is their fixation in wanting to compromise with remainers at every turn. If remain had won the referendum, would the Tories have compromised with leavers to have a half Brexit? We know the answer. Certainly not. 
Shambolic Boris, We knew thee too well. Good riddance. Johnson resigns in major Brexit blow to UK PM Theresa May - CNN  
GCSE History 2030Dissect the main reasons that led to the quick demise of the DUP and other factors that led to a United Ireland in 2025?Be sure to mention;-RHI scandal-Líofa grant cuts-Refusal of an Irish Language Act-Brexit32 Marks #ÁdhMór 
Didn't you guys have a vote on Brexit and it won? Shouldn't the elected leaders respect the will of the British people? 
Great to hear a strong Labour Voice on today's Brexit shenanigans!@hilarybennmp @UKLabour @tom_watson 
The New Brit advisers on Brexit  
#JeremyHunt appointed as new British foreign secretary after #BorisJohnson quits over #Brexit  
Brexiteers must take the initiative to save our Brexit.1.Organise a Brexit day of action in major Cities up & down the Country. 2.Brexit Parties to unite in a grand alliance.3.Brexiteers to boycott voting for liblabcon4.Brexiteers to network & follow each other on Twitter. 
so, Tory MP - how is Brexit going?"really well. we now have a united position -"but surely several Ministers have just resigned?"we will have cake & we will eat it"but EU ruled that out 2 years ago?"isn't the football team doing well? & did you know the RAF is 100 yrs old?" 
Negativity about immigration falls away sharply in Brexit Britain  
“I fought for 25 years to win that referendum and I cannot stand aside and see a bunch of gutless, spineless, useless, career politicians throw it away.” - @Nigel_Farage 
71% of people disapprove of how Brexit is going, a record number. Amazing that 29% approve of this shambles. #StopBrexit. 
In the midst of the fall of #Brexit, the chaos of the Tories and the lack of an opposition front bench when the country most needs it, #FBPE continues to gain strength because it is organic, grassroots, transparent and cross party. Ordinary people doing extraordinary things  
We go live to Nigel and UKIP riding to the rescue of Brexit....  
IAIN DUNCAN SMITH: Brexit proposal a betrayal of 17.5 million voters  via @MailOnline 
Is there a single independence supporter out there, now, that doesn’t agree we should be pushing for a referendum before the end of 2019 at the very latest ? 
even if brexit meant the immediate devastation of the UK economy & the dying off of its population through mass starvation, a significant portion of the population would say we should still do it. twice, actually. with two fingers up to brussels the whole time 
it’s hard to read this and not conclude that he’s only just starting to grasp all of the arguments for why Brexit is such a fucking stupid idea  
British politicians like Theresa May who are fighting against BREXIT, are actually fighting against Democracy, + the will of the people They need to be held accountable on Election Day  
I can think of nothing more likely to unite the Tories and revive UKIP than Corbyn suddenly declaring he wants to stop Brexit. The Tories created this monster. Only they can kill it - or be themselves destroyed by it. 
The British people voted for Brexit But if we had The European people voted against Brexit It would not be accepted in the UK ...So why should Scotland be expected to stay with the craziness of England & Wales. They are diff countries and we need to get moving to Independence 
Excellent news - anything we can do to hasten the rapid demise of "brexit" - given that the 2016 leave vote which created it was shown by the Electoral Commission to have been criminally procured 
Rees-Mogg might look like an amiable cartoon character toff, in reality he's an extremely dangerous, self-serving, racist zealot with an eye for the top job, he's also going to make a shedload of momey on the back of #Brexit  
Watched .@BBCNewsnight  tonight for first time in 8 years and won't  be watching again Wall to wall coverage of Tories. Once upon a time it would be balanced with spokespeople  of different PartiesSame in The Referendum -painted as something to be commented on only by Tories 
brexit 
#BREXIT is not a valid word. Apparently.  
Remainers calling those who voted #brexit "extremists"/"hardline brexiteers" is incredibly insulting to millions of people. YOU voted remain, YOU lost. Do not attempt to take OUR clothes & claim to know what WE voted for & what's best for us 
Surely the final nail in her coffin must be that Theresa May mentioned a Brexit Dividend in her speech again today?The whole nation collectively winced 
Tyneside Irish Brexit Meeting: We hope to welcome you to an evening of informative discussions and informed debate. Join Paul Brannen, Labour MEP for the NE, alongside a panel of experts for Q&A, chaired by Bill Corcoran.Followed by music from the Tyneside Irish Cultural Society  
Biggest problem with politicians is they refuse to re-evaluate decisions they make despite new information that shows those decisions to be wrong or detrimental. If only someone would be honest with the population and admit that Brexit is going to be a total disaster and stop it. 
The way things are going anyone of us could be a Brexit secretary by next week. I might buy a tie and throw away all my folders and pens just in case 
As #Brexit pulls British Government apart, @duponline find time for a bit of Irish language bashing ......"There will not be an Irish language Act, and the quicker people catch on the better."Jim Shannon, DUP 9/7/18 
"The obverse of Southgate is Boris Johnson, a noisy charlatan who never bothered with the hard work of preparing for Brexit" @CJFDillow as insightful as ever 
The Brexit People Voted For  
'The only way Theresa May can save her Brexit plan now is to let the British people vote on it'  
I could not stay on as a Brexit minister when I knew we could have free trade and not EU control  via @Telegraph 
The FT View: Despite it all, Theresa May still needs to push towards a softer Brexit  
Rik Mayalls’ Tory incarnation Alan B’stard is alive and well and is now the Brexit Secretary!!  
26 states have initiative & referendum.PA has a constitution that promises right to alter & reform our government, but most cosponsored reform in this session was never given a vote.We're asking @GovernorTomWolf to insist @PAlegis come back & vote. 
#bbcnewsnightPanel of 3 agrees on the following:There is no Parliamentary majority for ANY Brexit outcome.The logical consequence is that it has to either go to another GE, that might not change the arithmetics, or obviously the one thing that can settle it: a People's Vote. 
There is nothing more imperative than a Labour government for everybody in the UK regardless of party affiliations 8 years Of brutal ideological austerity reversal of rights & dignity Brexit division hostilities. Fight for each other we are stronger by our collective endeavours 
Walking out of the government won’t make Brexit go away, but as an optimist by nature, I hope that it creates some unity needed to find a parliamentary majority for an agreement that works. #brexit #BrexitShambles 
For example you are more likely to be enthusiastic about Brexit if you’re a bit of a tit.  
It shows just how much Brexit has divided us when one of the sides still seem to care far more about the result standing - than they do about addressing any of the corruption and law breaking that have been proved to be responsible for buying it.  
Classic and brilliant Matthew Parris on the #brexit “crazies” - “you see something go funny in their eyes” #Newsnight 
The entire @CommonsCMS inquiry has been hoodwinked into chasing after an absolute nothingburger on overspend and bollocks, when what MI6 say threw Brexit were false accounts from Russia like the ones I reported on in October 2016 
he has a very fair point - there is no shortage of brexit supporting commentators, and no excuse for such unrepresentative panels. 
The irony is, even after all of today’s shenanigans, Brexit is still the same dog’s breakfast as it’s been for the last two years! #PlusCaChange 
All this Brexit stuff reminded me......there is another way forward: forget Article 50......Article 1BT is the future  sweet dreams tweeters   
Last time I checked the current Prime Minister of the UK was a woman. And three of her female ministers have already resigned over matters other than the mess that is England's Brexit. 
Think about how little movement has been made on Brexit, then look at the video and detail Theresa May produced the day after the Chequers meeting.They haven’t been working on Brexit at all, they were working on Plan ‘B’ all the time. 
Well done @IainDale for pointing out the  usual anti-Brexit bias on @BBCNewsnight It is yet another instance of the establishment's war on the majority of the British public who want to take back control from the EU. 
“The British people can’t agree on Brexit.” Nope, just the Tory party and English MPs. If Scotland had the home rule and federalism promised in 2014, the nation would remain in the EU as rUK leaves. Scotland is a colony and vassal state in the UK. #Newsnight 
Quite rightly @IainDale bristles at being introduced as “Brexit Supporting” when his two fellow talking head pundits get no such pre-fix. #Newsnight 
As reality bites on Brexit and government descends into chaos, the onus is on @jeremycorbyn finally to get off the fence and oppose a crazy exit from EU. With Britain’s future in balance, it would be unforgivable for Labour to stand feebly by 
#BorisJohnson letter not first time Brexiteers insulted true history of colonialism. At Chalke Valley, Gove spoke of imperial domination & self determination. Not in the context of acnkowleding Britain’s past, obv. But claiming this for #Brexit. I wasn’t having then, either.  
sassy @IainDale on newsnight is the best"why do I always get called brexit supporting when you don't describe these two as remain supporting""it's always two against one isn't it"-did the PM survive today?"clearly, she's still in office isn't she?" 
Someone who doesn't realise that if Scotland had been independent then the EU would have 29 members in Single Market & Customs Union not 27 and Brexit never would have happened - also thinks the EU and UK are much same entity...  Clueless   
The Guardian front page, Tuesday 10 July 2018: May loses Johnson but faces down Brexit rebels – for now  
You voted for Brexit to remove the rights of my daughter and her generation? And you’re proud of that? Crystal ball or not, what kind of person would want their children to have fewer advantages and opportunities in life than they’ve enjoyed. 
The result of the biggest referendum in British history is being ignored.Virtually all of our national institutions are owned by foreigners.Our capital city has been occupied by foreign criminal gangs.Our people are being replaced without our consent.This is 'democracy'. 
I think - I hope - #Brexit will destroy the careers of a whole generation of UK politicians. May, Johnson, Gove, Mogg, Corbyn, Gardiner, Thornbury, Starmer. You name them. They are ignorantly and maliciously taking an axe to our society. They should not be forgiven. 
#Brexit turmoil leaves UK in political chaos days before Trump visit.  
2 years 3weeks in and Vice President of the European Parliament Mairead McGuinness @MaireadMcGMEP laments that the UK has given them no proposal to vote on!!! That underlines the incompetent disasterous crazy bonkers UK approach to #Brexit . Imagine zero zilch nada 
Politicians come and go but unelected EU Eurocrats remain because you can't boot them out at the ballot box...Britain has had enough. Go Brexit!  
Threatening us #Brexit supporters with a Corbyn govt doesn't cut it anymore btw.When Brexit is screwed up, the electorate WILL punish those who let them down & the Corbyn govt that results is not the fault of voters. 
Brexit won't die if the people take control & stop voting liblabcon & vote for a genuine Brexit Party. All the Brexit parties need to meet as soon as possible & agree a common strategy for every Ward & Constituency. I would like to see them unite to see Brexit through together. 
Thinking that hard Brexit is worth the risk of handing the keys of Downing Street to a Marxist third worldist is so ludicrous I think it's probable that it will happen.  
"Had Brexit lost, Johnson would today occupy a comfortable position in British politics. ...Unfortunately for him, his side won the referendum—and his reputation has been in free-fall ever since." This @DavidFrum piece explains all:  
3,300 years ago Pharaoh Akhenaten ditched Egypt’s old gods, launched a new religion, built a new city, made new art, and renamed his son from Tutankhamun to Tutankhaten. People hated it. When he died, they abandoned everything for the old ways. I wonder if this is Brexit’s fate? 
Over 12 months there have been no fewer than 35 opinion polls carried out, with about 60,000 participants. How many of these have shown a lead for #leave?That's right. Two. Out of 35.No longer the "will of the people"#PeoplesVote#NoConfidence#Brexit#BrexitShambles 
TBH this shouldn't be a surpriseIt's a simple fact, many Leavers "prioritised" immigration etc for as long as they believed there were no downsides to those priorities#Brexit was never about money...until the money started drying upThe Gov knows this, hence no hard brexit  
#Brexiteers who remain in the Cabinet have put their careers before the country and before #Brexit That includes Fox, Leadsom, Braverman, Raab and Cleverly. RT if you agree. 
Dear God. I am horrified and beyond anger. There is a profound sense of disbelief that .@theresa_may could BETRAY the British people and Referendum so comprehensively. Even our ability to prevent cruelty to animals. I am disgusted. .@BorisJohnson .@Jacob_Rees_Mogg .@andreajenkyns pic.twitter.com/tCAAfFAQRZ 
The Tories are irreconcilable over Brexit and will spend the rest of the negotiating time warring amongst themselves. This is one of the biggest political debacles ever!They need to go.#GE2018Now 
Former foreign minister Johnson warns Britain will end up like colony to the EU after Brexit  
The EU has one set of negotiating guidelines, one united front, clear objectives and a solid team of honest actors.Meanwhile the UK has a head banger as Brexit secretary and the ERG as the disruptive force.Parliament won’t support a no deal.Suits me. #FBPE #newsnight 
Rejoicing Brexit means "ending free movement"But @andrealeadsom you're also stopping millions of young Brits from living, working in so many wonderful countries. I did it. Made my life so much richer. Galling to be so proud you're taking this away from people  #bbcnewsnight 
issue I have with her latest. Cc @gchq.1. “Sound and fury signifying nothing” = rage at UK processes, rule of law, “system failure” = tosh2. Cadwalla suggests every ground to attack Brexit on but the true one, attacks every suspect but the real one - the Russian state 1/2 
Now it's abundantly clear that only a PM, whatever his/her party, who has the integrity, strength of character and leadership to unequivocally put a stop to Brexit could possibly survive and incidentally earn the respect and gratitude of a sizeable majority of the nation. 
The nature of this Brexit Dream is that Boris Johnson and his enablers wet the bed and now some grown up has to clean it up  
Now that Brexit is a dead man walking, who will be the 1st MP (or maybe even Farage) to openly campaign for an independent England in or out of the EU? It's the logical conclusion and is essentially the root of Brexit.  #newsnight 
I like Andrea, but she knows as well as I do that the Brexit Secretary has bugger all sway over the Brexit process, which is controlled by CS in Number 10.  
Define ‘rebel’. From where I’m sitting, you do not understand the word. Surely, if you are a brexiter and you won the referendum, you would be a defender... the ‘rebellion’ is everyone who is against the result and it’s exact implementation. Like a bit of spin? 
If it wasn't my children's futures at stake, I'd be enjoying the thrilling drama of #BrexitShambles as our government, constitution and economy slowly implodes. Unfortunately it is, so I'm not. #StopBrexit #PeoplesVote #Brexit 
The Brexit dream! Inject it into my veins.  
The Brexit nightmare is dying thanks to the work of so many good people - excellent news......keep making the Brexidiots face reality and own up to all the lies they told  
I see Emily Thornberry on the news trying to give people the impression that Labour could negotiate a 'good' #brexit.There is no such thing, where are the grown-ups in politics at the moment? What was promised can't be delivered.#StopBrexit #FBPE #PeoplesVote 
New UK foreign minister Jeremy Hunt voted remain but now says he’d have voted for Brexit. So he’s watched last 2 years and thought ‘yes, I was wrong. This is much better than status quo’. Yep 
Welcome @foreignoffice - our new boss @Jeremy_Hunt arrived at 9pm tonight: “Time to back our PM to get a great Brexit - it’s now or never...”  
The events of today should have happened BEFORE the EU referendum.There should have been a very clear definition of #Brexit and a detailed plan for its implementation before it was offered as a choice to the electorate.This almighty mess warrants a #PeoplesVote.     #Newsnight 
Tuesday's Times: "#Brexit dream dying, says Johnson on day of chaos" (via @AllieHBNews) #bbcpapers #tomorrowspaperstoday 
Tuesday's independent: "24 hours of #Brexit mayhem" (via @AllieHBNews) #bbcpapers #tomorrowspaperstoday 
There’s only one man for the job; we need a pro #Brexit PM and that has to be @Jacob_Rees_Mogg #MoggMentum 
So Ruth Davidson refuses to speak to the press over Dark Money, Brexit etc for two weeks but somehow secures top billing for a statement from where she is hiding from behind the couchAre the press working for the Tories or what? 
Mac on the EU reacting to Brexit plan - Political Cartoon Gallery in Putney  
Feeling overwhelmed with all the news? Want to understand - and challenge - Brexit and Trump in real time? Follow *outstanding* US journalist and ex-student of authoritarianism, @sarahkendzior, listen to her new podcast with @andreachalupa and get involved! 
The hatred and vitriol directed at Boris by the left only serves to underline what a loss he is to the government. The reason the left hate him is because they fear him. He won the London Mayor election twice against the odds and the referendum.   
After Brexit will Love Island be on one of the Orkney Islands...  
"The circus in Westminster is just a symptom of the great unresolved paradox of the referendum result: that the people have taken a historic, radical decision, against the wishes of the political class, that is now left to the political class to implement"  
Number of Scottish Conservative MPs: 13. Number of times they’ve voted against the Government on Brexit: 0.  Government majority: 12. Number of “Ruth Davidson’s” Scottish Conservative MPs complicit in this shambles: 13.  #lobbyfodderforahardbrexit 
In Westminster:There’s little will (regrettably - there really should be more) to stop Brexit.There’s no support for the Chequers proposal.There’s no majority for No Deal.So what happens now?  
The only nastiness I see in the Brexit debate nowadays comes from charlatans like @RichardDawkins. Once a famed skeptic, Dawkins exhibits the intransigence and rabid pro-EU zealotry of a religious extremist. 
The 'common rulebook' May promises Britain will follow has existed since the founding Treaty of Rome 1957.It's called Acquis Communautaire, or, 'membership of the EU political union'Without this rulebook there's no EU. With it, we haven't left the EU, We've had no #Brexit.  
Just a few weeks ago Jeremy Hunt was pledging his undying allegiance to the NHS and would not move. Admirable, but FAKE. What a mess. The British people voted for Brexit? No. Far from all. But what a mess. Waste of time, money and national prestige. Oh, and here comes Trump.... 
Actually Brexiters DID have a proper clue, but Remainers were so desperate to cling on to any vestige of being in the EU that they refused to countenance a proper Brexiter Brexit.  Instead they continued to believe their own Project Fear propaganda. 
Sammy Wilson says the DUP are unhappy with many aspects of May's Brexit plan: “From the details we’ve seen there probably will be a bill to pay to the EU. The strongest ‘lever’ the UK had was the budgetary contribution and that was given away on day one" 
Dear BBCYou’re lying again.Boris said ‘Brexit could be about opportunity and hope’ and that under May ‘that dream is dying’.Remainiac @bbclaurak intentionally misquoted, claiming that he’d said ‘THE BREXIT DREAM IS DYING’.Wrong!  
2025"Why did UK leave EU with a Brexit in name only, and then try to re-join EU on less advantageous terms?""Well, it is because Leavers had nothing other than slogans when it mattered.""That is why we have this Association Agreement which is virtual EU membership?""Yep." 
Today’s other big winner? @ShippersUnbound who is hard at work on the third volume (of six) of his Chronicles of Brexit. 
Robert Shrimsley: With the exit of both UK foreign secretary Boris Johnson and Britain's chief Brexit negotiator, Theresa May now doesn't have a choice but to fight for her Brexit plan.  
I'm struggling to see any positives in May keeping her position. For the sake of Brexit, democracy, the Conservative Party's reputation & disillusioned voters & members, it's time for May to resign. #MayMustGo pic.twitter.com/uygVJZHVCz 
Utterly bizarre that brexiteers seem to think the Tory meltdown (underplayed by the BBC of course) is evidence of the importance of Brexit. 
Tuesday’s INDEPENDENT Digital: “24 hours of Brexit Mayhem” #bbcpapers #tomorrowspaperstoday 
Let’s talk about Decriminalizing #Marijuana in NZ. Medical/Recreational, Dispensary/HomeGrown. Whaddaya reckon?thepumphouse Aug 5, 7pm.  NZ referendum 2020.  
Tuesday's Guardian: "May loses Johnson but faces down #Brexit rebels - for now" (via @AllieHBNews) #bbcpapers #tomorrowspaperstoday 
All your FBPE Labour heroes have shafted you - same as your Tory "Rebels". They would rather support a Tory Hard Brexit than see Corbyn in power. 
Tuesday's Express: "#Brexit dream is dying" (via @AllieHBNews) #bbcpapers #tomorrowspaperstoday 
Even in his resignation letter Boris Johnson can’t tell the whole truth on the EU.  He claims the EU stopped the UK legislating to improve lorry safety.  What he fails to mention is that the UK Govt was one of the Govts that sought to block the legislation #Brexit # fbpe 
Johnson: “Britain headed for the status of colony”. Buddy, whether a colony of Trump’s America or of the EU that was always going to be the case once you initiated the national self-destruct button aka Brexit.   
Boris Johnson resigns as UK foreign secretary, exploding Brexit crisis  
Labour poised to vote down Brexit deal  
'No such thing as hard Brexit, JUST BREXIT' Tory MP delivers BRILLIANT solution to talks  
Brexit department was cut off from policy decision making REVEALS former Brexit minister  
The Tories are not only coming up against each other, but up against reality. Those who misled the public during the referendum are absconding as the facts force their arguments to fall apart. This #BrexitShambles cannot continue.@Plaid_Cymru 
'I was absolutely FURIOUS' Former Brexit minister LETS RIP at No 10 for 'childish' tactics  
70% of #Conservative voters in last election wanted the #Brexit that was promised over & over again. To now change that in this dreadful #ChequersPlan is electoral madness. MP's & members who support this are signing up to a certain Corbyn gov next time. Do not do it! 
Tuesday’s GUARDIAN: “May loses Johnson but faces down Brexit rebels - for now” #bbcpapers #tomorrowspaperstoday 
Taxi for Theresa May! She had her chance.#Brexit   
After resigning as Brexit minister @SteveBakerHW says that, with exit day so close, Brexiteers need to offer constructive solutions - rather than get into a three month leadership contest. 
1/ A few edits from last week's EU External Affairs Sub-Committee (Brexit : Customs Arrangements). 'I think we can't emphasise enough, that leaving the EU without a deal is one of the most ridiculous ideas I've ever heard.' @SamuelMarcLowe 
if there was ever a perfect time for the Labour leadership to oppose hard Brexit and/or back a People’s Vote then it’s now... 
“If the Conservatives forsake their election pledge to deliver a clean #Brexit, they don’t only risk losing future elections, but may for decades struggle to shake off the image of betraying the largest democratic vote in British history” @LowTaxChloe 
Brexiters complaining that they don't get to keep jobs after quitting them tells you EVERYTHING you need to know about Brexit  
Backing @theresa_may  means agreeing to do everything Merkel says. Shame on you. On the plus side it'll stop you causing more harm to the NHS. #Brexit #BrexitBetrayal #BrexitMeansBrexit 
A bunch of shits who pushed their party into a bollocks of a referendum that split the country almost right down the middle, and who are now acting like they have a mandate to disregard the 48% of us who didn’t want this. It’s not just depressing: it’s frightening. 
May has spent a whole day lying to the nation. Her brexit plan is an outrage as are those weeds to sucked up to her to support it. Effectively this will means that we have no real say in anything which matters and worse, will have no voice. She must go or we will sink. 
Boris Johnson was instrumental in bringing about the disastrous Brexit- for UK as well as Europe. Now he leaves to others to take care of the consequences. All to show that Brexit has become a poisoned chalice to be passed around. There is need for a face-saving time machine. 
Its true. Soros money flooding in to anti-brexit "organizations" even after they lost, not one word from May etc about this.Other Countries ban Soros, our crooked parliaments take his money to fight against the people  
Nerves shattered by the ongoing Brexit debacle? Yeah, same here. Fortunately I was just sent this picture of a board on the wall of a pub in Gwent, and now I feel marginally better.  
The Brexit dream is dying, says Boris. But that is the point. It was never more than a dream. It can’t be done without irreversible national self-harm 
There is no Brexit deal never has been 17.4 mil Brexiteers are not fooled anymore #TreasonMay 
Ladies and Gentlemen - I give you Jeremy Hunt - Foreign Secretary. The cream of British 'diplomacy' in late capitalism. #Brexit #BellEnd 
Another plus point of #Brexit . Theresa May says Tory dissent could send Jeremy Corbyn into No 10. #CorbynsComingHome 
The problem all along with #Brexit negotiations has been that #Brexiteer @DavidDavisMP was never in charge. Chief remoaner @OllyRobbins was. That’s why we are where we are. 
We have been betrayed - as a nation we are being pushed to our limits, I will never accept this disgusting Brexit betrayal. Who the hell do these lying politicians think they are? Democracy is dead, new extreme measures  are needed. 
Your new Brexit bros. F  F  S .Time for a #PeoplesVote before a hard Brexit is signed, sealed and delivered.#FFS#PeoplesVote 
Tuesday's Telegraph: "'The #Brexit dream is dying'" (via @AllieHBNews) #bbcpapers #tomorrowspaperstoday 
Tuesday's FT: "May clings to power after Davis and Johnson quit in #Brexit spat" (via @AllieHBNews) #bbcpapers #tomorrowspaperstoday 
What Johnson meant to say:’The Brexit dream is dying, because it always had to die, as it was only ever an extension of my ego & stupidity.’ 
I have actually brought the Withdrawal Agreement (and #EUCO #Brexit guidelines) on holiday with me...  
Huge honour to be appointed Foreign Secretary at this critical moment in our country’s history. Time to back our PM to get a great Brexit deal - it's now or never... 
If he does half as good a job with Brexit as he did the NHS, I can guarantee we’ll all be dead by Friday  
Remainer PM calls in/out ref - doesn't allow civil service to plan for #Brexit. Resigns after referendum, to be replaced by remainer PM. New remainer PM makes a balls up of negotiations, under immense pressure from remainers in HoC/HoL..but yeah, Brexiters didn't plan  
American translation: Brexit means they quit.  
Tonight at a German Chamber of Commerce event in London, our CEO T. Enders said: “The Chequers statement appears to show that HM Government are going in the right direction.We are not shy to request that Brussels & our other home countries are similarly pragmatic & fair” #Brexit  
Killing the Brexit dream ? We’re living the Brexit nightmare 
Dear MPs of Britain. Stop it..  just stop it now. FFS cant you see what a f****g joke the UK is now. Grow some balls and stop brexit NOW before you cause a Bastille Day through your staggering incompetence and cowardice..  we will support those that do... 
Even after today’s breathless distractions, it is important to remember this “Chequers Compromise” won’t actually work, but it is open to the UK to change its mind and reverse brexit. I’d welcome this, Scotland and NI already voted to remain.  
My heart sinks when I think of how the misplaced 'false equivalence' of the BBC has had a leading role in supporting this whole Brexit disaster. 
Brexit is a handy actual timeline for anyone who ever wondered how a Scottish no vote would play out.  
May looks like she's going to cling on. Corbyn loks like he's going to hang on - to his absurd Brexit stance. What a country. The world can't believe that Britain could be so stupid. 
Was this her real strategy? Am I giving her too much Machiavellian credit? Probably. But a Tory Brexit house divided could help her hugely. And given where she is, a soft Brexit coalition that splits both Labour MPs & Tory Brexiteers is her only choice. 6/6 
I feel May thinks we all will accept her EU brexit plan, how wrong can a PM be? 
The battle against Brexit was & is ours to lose. We have an unassailable case, economically and geopolitically. We make it time & time again in the bubble of twitter. We have an occasional march or petition. If you stop the man on the street, he's unlikely to know we exist. 
% of Brits who Don’t trust May to run Brexit negotiations 64% Trust 22% Unsure 14%  Sky Data 
Some crazy stuff happening back in the UK during this World Cup. Harry Maguire clearly needs to be given a seat the cabinet table and I’m pretty sure Southgate could sort out this Brexit business. 
The Tories need to consider the Larry David approach to Brexit. They need  to show up at work tomorrow and pretend it never happened. I think we'd all be willing to go along with it. 
Bizarre! #Brexit is the *actual* timeline of how the No vote is playing out!!  
Prediction (made last week but now more confident):1) May’s Brexit position softens further 2) She leaves vote to last possible moment3) She takes remainer rump with her and forces Lab to choose soft deal or crashing out. She becomes Tory Ramsay MacDonald4) Tory MPs split. 
If Brexit is betrayed as it looks like will happen then the next major political campaign should be...MAKE GUNS LEGAL AGAIN!!!Democracy won’t be ignored if we have guns! 
These two are pathetic. Boris is upset that Davis grabbed the Brexit limelight, and now Davis is upset that Boris stole the show after his earlier media coup. Grow up!  
It occurs to me that we may not be viewing Theresa May’s ‘Chequers Brexit’ crisis in quite the right way. And we may, just may, be underestimating her.  So here’s a short ruminatory thread, just to see what you all think. 1/6 
Saying it like it is @WelshConserv MP @Simonhartmp apparently calling #Brexit a “s**t show” and that no-one “gives a f**k” - about one of the many resignations today! This day gets more and more surreal. @peoplesvote_uk @WalesForEurope 
Rees-Mogg: The Remainers in the Cabinet "wanted to go back on the clear promises of the Conservative party and particularly the Prime Minister herself to make sure #Brexit means Brexit  
The Prime Minister has appointed someone to be Brexit Secretary who believes in weakening workers' rights.Dominic Raab is a direct threat to UK workers.SHARE the facts ↓↓  
I voted for #Brexit because I want Britain out of a corrupt political system not because I dont want us to be in Europe. The agenda of the EU is destruction of countries and financial dominance to an elite group of non elect people#BorisJohnson 
Brexit will be found in a hospital corridor on a trolley having already been dead for days.  
Brexit means Brexit. 
Boris & DD have left the government in crisis.We've never had a better chance of convincing the @UKLabour leadership to fight to #Remain. But we need your help to make it happen.Let's not waste this crisis. Please help us to stand against #Brexit. 
Getting ready for LIVE STREAM broadcast today, Monday, July 9, at 5:00 (In 10 MINUTES) pm ET on my YouTube channel   SETH RICH MURDERS IDENTIFIED? Giuliani increases pressure to END MUELLER investigation, Hillary Clinton, BREXIT - SUBSCRIBE RETWEET @POTUS 
At some point, the commitment to Brexit should be scrapped. The Brits were trolled into voting for the destruction of their own country along with a weakening of European unity and power.#StopBrexit #PeoplesVotePetition 
UK voted to Leave, not a half-arsed fudge placing us in limbo to placate Remainers. Extricate the UK properly. If Remainers don't like it, they can hardly blame the Gov't for implementing the instruction from the referendum, as originally promised. 
Farage: "I fought for 25 years to win that referendum and I cannot stand aside and see a bunch of gutless, spineless, useless, career politicians throw it away."  
I see the biased BBC has been using the loaded term "hardliners" to describe MPs who want the government to respect the referendum result and deliver a genuine Brexit. #BrexitBetrayal 
Why is Brexit so hard? Watch this one car cross the Irish border 4 times in 10 minutes, all driving the same direction on the same road.   
Nigel Farage says he may RETURN as Ukip leader over BrexitNeeds to come back Now, not March!  
Jacob Rees-Mogg: Tory party will split if Theresa May uses Labour votes to deliver soft Brexit 
“I fought for 25 years to win that referendum and I cannot stand aside and see a bunch of gutless, spineless, useless, career politicians throw it away.” - @Nigel_Farage 
No, Brexiteers trusted a Remain voting Prime Minister who promised to deliver on the Brexit vote. Brexiteers didn’t blow it, Theresa May did.  
Even with MARTIN HOWE QC describing her Brexit package as a 'black-hole' for the UK Theresa May will not resign.She seems to need a mighty shove.  So if you would like to help Mrs May on her way, please re-tweet this and let's see if we cant help ...  
Despite today’s welcome resignations the Tories are still pursuing a damaging Brexit that would harm jobs, wages and public services. The only democratic way forward is a #PeoplesVote on the Tory Brexit deal. Only Labour is in a position to lead. #StopToryBrexit 
In light of the recent resignations, Theresa May has sent a crack team of negotiators to Europe to seal the Brexit deal. #BrexitChaos 
And as @carolecadwalla pointed out, Arron Banks had the @RussianEmbassy Ambassador to the UK on speed dial at that point. Brexit was an internal UK referendum. Foreign funds ILLEGAL @thespybrief@LouiseMensch@TheRickWilson@ericgarland@counterchekist 
I could not stay on as a Brexit minister when I knew we could have free trade and not EU control, writes @SteveBakerHW 
Progress/LabFirst: The problem with Corbynistas is that they aren't interested in being in govt., they just want ideological puretyCorbynistas: Call a GE now!  We'll win!Prog/LabFirst: We would rather support Theresa May's Brexit as we don't want a left wing government. FFS. 
The admission by NHS boss confirms the ever-increasing probability of no deal Brexit. It is undeniable that leaving the EU without a deal would devastate health services. The public need a final say on the deal and an opportunity to #ExitfromBrexit. 
What would satisfy Tory (or any other) Eurosceptics? The govt delivering what Leavers voted for, ie. Brexit.What do they want? Brexit.Really, what is so complicated or unreasonable about that?  
Today's Brexit metaphor - Brexiters complain that two Brexiters resigned from cabinet and no longer have a say in cabinet. 
I can see why @BorisJohnson was so angry about May’s soft Brexit, it was the opposite of what Brexiters campaigned for......  
PM doesn't want the UK leave the #EU, neither does the Chancellor of the Exchequer, nor the Foreign Secretary.  Ah well, #Brexit should go off without a hitch.  Hang on............... 
Brexit is the biggest budget Rorschach test in human history. 
Brexit.Is.Never.Going.To. Work. GOODNIGHT. 
Where are your heroes now, #FBPE ? The Tory rebels didn't rebel, now the Labour "People's Vote" people want to shore up Theresa May's Brexit.  What an absolute shower.  I told you months ago, you will never stop Brexit while May's PM. You won't listen. Your bad.  
I see we’ve reached the stage of the coup where MPs no one’s heard of are handed Cabinet jobs, forcing lobby journos to frantically Google their names. Given this government has no agenda other than Brexit they could probably get away with faking doing their jobs 
So what happened with that Brexit thing? 
Well we tried putting your lot in charge but for some reason everybody who supported brexit turned out to be utterly incompetent and spineless. Crazy that  
From "Why I joined UKIP" video."UKIP is the only major party in this country that supports the democratic mandate of the British people when it comes to Brexit. A mandate that has been torn up and incinerated by our spineless Tory government."Proven right within a week. 
A born fool, but Nazanin Zaghari-Ratcliffe and her family aren't laughing. 
BOOM! DUP ‘unhappy’ with aspects of May’s Chequers Brexit Betrayal!  cc @DVATW 
The funny thing about Johnson’s letter is that it indirectly makes the case against Brexit - exposing the impossibilism of its demands  
Visualization of the brexit vote and the current state of brexit  
We discussed the ongoing #Brexit negotiations including the recent proposals from #Chequers. We agreed on the need for a timely conclusion of the negotiations. We also discussed the digital agenda and possible areas of enhanced cooperation. 2/2 @theresa_may 
Great engagement with @sinnfeinireland @MaryLouMcDonald @moneillsf today discussing the current political stalemate, Brexit, skills, infrastructure, city deals & North - South Interconnector#CriticalEngagement pic.twitter.com/xrGoSAXzJZ 
Is it too early for the ‘Carry on Brexit movie ? Would be a right laugh. Cheer everyone up once the anti climax of winning the World Cup wears off, cumberbatch a shoe in to play Rees-Mog. Sidse Babett Knudsen to play May? Barry Humphries to play murdoch? 
This anti-democrat broke key promises he'd made. He was ignominiously booted out by the electorate. Tory top team shouldn't forget, don't botch Brexit, Britons are watching you.#Brexit  
Busy day meeting @retail_ni @CBI_NI @IoDNI Dialogue on Brexit, building a vibrant economy, skills base and decent society @moneillsf 
Morten Morland on David Davis and Boris Johnson’s resignation over Brexit deal agreed at Chequers - Political Cartoon Gallery in Putney  
I'd like to know too Oct 2015, that month & date again, Bad boys of Brexit in Bermuda organizing money for the following year, 2016. In a tax haven. What's wrong with this picture?@thespybrief@LouiseMensch@counterchekist@ericgarland@MelissaJPeltier@xtrixcyclex 
Bailing out a sinking ship with a thimble isn't going to help Mrs May.Do the decent thing and go, for the sake of our Country and #BrexitYou’ve sold us out on Brexit You’ve destroyed trust in our party You’ve got to resign #ChequersPlan #Brexit #MAYMUSTGO 
British citizen killed on UK soil by a foreign power that we know waged a psy-ops military campaign to influence a referendum, and we’re too busy trying to make that referendum result look legit to deal with it. 
Tomorrow's front page: It's absolute May-hem as the UK Govt descends into total chaos over Brexit as top Brexiteers resign. Indyref2 is now our only hope ...   
'With Vote Leave under investigation and Davis and Johnson’s resignations, it’s time Corbyn backed a second referendum'  
Still think Universal Credit is an even bigger government fuckup than Brexit. Imagine how bad that is. 
NEW: Ex-health minister Jeremy Hunt appointed Britain's new foreign secretary after Boris Johnson quits amid continued Brexit turmoil.  
A sovereign Brexit is suddenly possible again, writes Ambrose Evans-Pritchard 
And yet another Tory Minister goes:  I & many others predicted #Brexit would destroy the union. It looks like we were right! 
"Immigration that is a legacy of colonialism" benefits European finalists, said @JulesBoykoff  on @TheTakeaway." "The England team should be read as a direct rebuke of the insular sentiments that animate Brexit."  
Well, just look what the utterly dishonest, totally vile and morally bankrupt SNP have tried to sneak out today amidst the Brexit chaos!!  INEOS Fracking Licence EXTENDED!!!!!!  So much for fracking being banned in Scotland then.   
The government of the British Prime Minister Theresa May is reeling today followig the resignation of two top leaders of the Brexit movement. We have the latest from London tonight on #SpecialReport. #SRin60 
Prediction:- England win the World Cup- Gareth Southgate becomes Labour leader.- Labour win the general election with a landslide.- Brexit gets stopped.- We look back on the last 2 years as a collective hysteria following the death of Bowie, and laugh at the idiots we were. 
1. Just another day in Westminster then - a new Health Secretary, a New Culture Sec, a new Foreign Sec, a new Brexit Sec, a new Attorney General, and more than 80 tory rebels gathering to plot how to shift the PM's position or else (or what?) 
Theresa May's decision to replace Boris Johnson with loyalist Jeremy Hunt means all four great offices of state are being run by ministers who backed Remain during the EU referendum 
Jeremy Hunt is the UK’s new Foreign Secretary, replacing Boris Johnson who resigned over plans to keep a close trading relationship with the EU post-Brexit.  
The speed at which this #reshuffle is happening, and the switching of senior people, shows that #BorisJohnsonResigns has been priced in by @10DowningStreet for some time. #brexit @LBC 
Jeremy Hunt, our ambitious new foreign secretary, is the only senior politician — & perhaps the only person in the country — to have concluded that this whole Brexit business has been going so swimmingly since June 23 3016 that he’s shifted from Remain to Leave 
Well, at least Jeremy Hunt has some experience for his new role. He was once culture secretary & the arts was all foreign to him. #Brexit #JeremyHunt 
The #EU has made their position clear. No four freedoms? No deal! What the Tories are doing is offering a deal to the EU they know they won't accept so the only choice is a hard #brexit and the tories can do what they've always done- make the EU out to be the boogie man. #scotref 
.@Jeremy_Hunt has been appointed as the new foreign secretary after @BorisJohnson quit the role over the governments #Brexit plans- Get more on the latest on the government twists and turns here:  
Bolton West MP Chris Green, one of the few Tory MPs left in Greater Manchester, quits govt over Brexit. He was PPS to Chris Grayling - and given the massive transport problems in his constituency with Northern of late, it’s a job I doubt he leaves with a heavy heart. 
Not a single Remainer in Cabinet has resigned over Theresa's May's Chequers statement Again that confirms the Prime Minister really wants #Brexit in name only. 
End this national farce – Labour must oppose Brexit ⁦⁦@Andrew_Adonis⁩ 
So where are we towards the end of a long day? There’s no majority in the Commons for any kind of Brexit, but neither main party will push for Remain. 2nd Ref and General Election more possible, but still not probable. May odds on to still be PM in 2019. 
The Tories are in meltdown over Brexit. Labour supports Brexit too. Labour wouldn't last a week before Brexit desroyed them. When will you idiots wake the f*ck up!?#StopBrexit #SuspendA50 
So Jeremy Hunt, who told me only days ago it was his mission to make NHS fit for 21st century has taken foreign secretary job — which, as long as foreign policy in general and Brexit in particular are run out of 10 Downing Street is hardly as important. 
Nige too busy being patriotic on the radio right now, anyone else have any ideas? What offshore Brexit donors were they soliciting £ from in Bermuda in 2015?? What role is Farage playing in Banks’ offshore finance deals today?  
Theresa May's proposals lead directly to a “Black Hole” Brexit where the UK is stuck permanently as a vassal state in the EU’s legal and regulatory tar-pit:  #BrexitBetrayal 
I continue to be impressed with the magic by which people, without an unhindered referendum or even a free informal consultation on Catalans' opinions about their own future, profess to have miraculous knowledge of what those positions are and their proportions in the population!  
. @theresa_may pretence she supported #Brexit is most cynical fraud ever imposed on a free nation!  PM lacks all morality! @BorisJohnson 
In a referendum on Italy’s euro membership, 74% of respondents would vote to stay, only 23% to leave (@SkyTG24) 
Spent all day working with people I respect and admire, pacing the room and making pronouncements. Just noticed a massive rip in the seat of my trousers. #brexit 
"Why isn’t there greater outrage about Russia’s involvement in Brexit?" "Prime Minister "Boris Johnson" 
The Tory Party is in disarray amid resignations and a plot to bring down Theresa May over her Brexit policy.Boris Johnson quit hours after David Davis walked out over the Prime Minister’s plan.Watch our analysis of everything that happened today: 
I agree with this. What is desperately needed now is honesty about the choices we face. I’ve made the point often enough about Brexiters’ failure to be honest: but remainers also need to be honest about the political problems we face if Brexit doesn’t happen.  
Jeremy Hunt replaces Boris Johnson after Foreign Secretary resigns warning Theresa May under her the Brexit ‘dream is dying’ Who is the new health secretary then?  
Donald Tusk blasts Boris Johnson and David Davis over resignations."Mr Tusk warned their resignations could leave the government facing problems adding these problems could be so great that Brexit could be stopped altogether".EU door is still open.  
Finally, Brexit Britain can be whatever we the people want it to be. We vote our govts in and out and our voice will dictate policy - from immigration to animal welfare. My hope is the HoL has had its day too - Brexit being the catalyst for that. 
Hunt as Foreign Secretary will do to Brexit what he’s done to the NHS 
Listening to Emily Thornberry on @Channel4News this evening you can't help but wonder if she didn't pick up a script of the Tory Brexit. There wasn't anything to get your hopes up if you don't want Brexit. @UKLabour can stand down, we might as well keep the Tories. 
Tory Eurosceptics agreed they must force the PM to ditch her Brexit plans within a fortnight. One MP declared at the ERG meeting tonight: "This has got to be killed and it's got to be killed before recess." 
I'm going to double down on this. May has a fresher Cabinet, she's got rid of Johnson, she has established that the Tory right don't have the balls or numbers to bring her down, and she finally has something to say on Brexit. Best day she's had since the wheat fields. 
So for all those @UKIP People voted for the Tories based on 'only the Tories can deliver #Brexit' how's that working out for you. 
Anyone has the right to disagree with the Government, but to do so to deliberately create a bad deal for the country, as a cynical ploy to help create the conditions for another referendum, is dishonest and frankly treacherous.  @Anna_Soubry is an obnoxious and duplicitous MP.. 
Jeremy Hunt named as new UK foreign secretary after Boris Johnson quits over Brexit, Downing Street says  
OK, now I am saying this as a joke, but still...Maybe Brexit did just save the NHS... #JeremyHunt 
.@realDonaldTrump gave Theresa May a chance to do the right thing by her people. He treated her with respect even though he knew she was a globalist, hoping to help her break free. America was prepared to economically support the UK for BREXITBad Move May 
Nigel Farage: "We will not get a clean, democratic Brexit under Theresa May and she must go." Who in the government should deliver Brexit for Britain? Watch again ▼@THEJamesWhale | @virtualash | @Nigel_Farage | @LeaveEUOfficial | @WestmonsterUK |  
Personally I am 100% committed to Brexit. It’s what we voted for, it’s happening. We have to live through it. And if we do our best to make it work, then no one can complain when it fails. As it obviously will. If only there was some way to stop it. 
Lawyers for Britain MARTIN HOWE QC has called Theresa Mays Brexit package:"These proposals therefore lead directly to a worst-of-all-worlds “Black  Hole” Brexit --  the UK is stuck permanently as a vassal state in the  EU’s legal and regulatory tar-pit"  
It's time to put the boot in, Brexit Cabinet Ministers and Ministers. Don't give the evil witch a chance to regroup - force a Vote of No Confidance NOW!  via @Telegraph 
Waiting for confirmation that Liam Fox will be joining the spin-off cast of Carry On Brexit 4 
Brexit isn't dead. But it's mortally wounded. There's a way out of this and I don't think it's as impossible as people think. It's a matter of tiptoeing over the scattered corpses of the Brexit army and Labour coming out for Remain. 
Once a month I help read proofs @Telegraph I have just completed tomorrow's letters page which is entirely given over to #Brexit Spoiler alert - it seems the readers and Associations are very angry with May and Gove. 
If another EU referendum took place tomorrow, which way would you vote? #wrightstuff 
Tory Eurosceptics agreed they must force the PM to ditch her Brexit plans within a fortnight. One MP declared at the ERG meeting tonight: "This has got to be killed and it's got to be killed before recess." 
Leader comment: Brexit dream isn’t dying, it’s dead.I've got my handful of soil ready to throw on the coffin.  
Brexit is a poisoned chalice. Only Corbyn is daft enough to want to be next in line for it. 
Whatever form Brexit took, the brexiteers were always going to cry betrayal. They never had a plan hence they will just blame everyone else for the mess they created. Even if the hard brexiteers get their no deal Brexit they'll still complain its the wrong sort of no deal Brexit! 
I am an immigrant to the UK, proudly British and proudly anti-Brexit. I seek the best for this tiny island nation. @BorisJohnson seeks the best for himself. May we never have such a self-centered buffoon as our nation's leader. #maythedoorhityouonwayout 
I’m truly disillusioned with all our politicians. #Brexit is an opportunity that could bring out the best of #Britain. Unfortunately, our politicians have made a laughing stock out of our great nation. Westminster needs clearing out and cleaning up - with a brand new broom. 
There comes a time when you have to realise that the nation no longer wants you, and do the decent thing, leave. Better depart in dignity that hang on hopelessly?#MayMustGo#Brexit  
Nigel Farage Promises Return As UKIP Leader If May's "Brexit Betrayal Isn't Reversed"  
Boris Johnson says “dream” of Brexit is dying. It’s actually the “nightmare” of Brexit that is dying. We can stop this madness. #peoplesvote 
Farage says he is ready to stand again as Ukip leader to fight May’s Brexit plan  
I’ve lost count. How many have sat on the Brexit toilet, shat themselves and run off without flushing? 
So Boris Johnson campaigns for Brexit then when it turns out its one of the stupidest ideas in history, he bails. Guy should be in jail. 
Dear friends in the #UK. Do you realise that the future & dreams of your entire young generation (maybe your kids or grandchildren) is just destroyed by some hands full of egomaniacal gamblers without any plan (see ) supported by the +75 generation? #Brexit  
I've spent much of today in meetings and briefings on the Chequers Brexit proposals and I'm afraid I still have very serious concerns about the proposals.  I now await the White Paper in the coming days to go through the detail. 
Theresa May Bio:• Campaigned for Remain, but without conviction• Became Tory leader and PM without contest• Reduced Tories to a minority govt without compunction• Is breaking her own Brexit promises without conscience.Time to take a(nother) walk?#MayMustGo#Brexit  
Really enjoyed today. Since Brexit is a farce anyway, and the only good that can come of it is that Britain is stripped of its ridiculously over-inflated sense of its place in the world, days like today are both good and fun. I just want EVEN more slapstick please 
Brexit would be politically fraught and economically risky with competent leaders and without the vote tarnished by foreign meddling.Instead, the United Kingdom has Theresa May and a LeaveEU campaign that looks like it was receiving help directly from Moscow. 
Apologies - unfortunately @theresa_may & her @Conservatives party are making us the laughing stock of the world. We assure you we will continue our fight against this devastating #Brexit. #PeoplesVote #FinalSay 
This is spot on. 18 months ago May claimed the Tories were the party of ‘ordinary working class people’. Today she appointed a Brexit Secretary who says British workers are ‘among the worst idlers in the world’  
Nigel Farage to challenge UKIP Leadership in March 2019 if Brexit doesn’t happen  
I’m a very reasonable man. I’ve been waiting for 2 years now to hear a coherent, logical argument about how Brexit will benefit the country - I’ve heard nothing but sloganizing, personal posturing, arrogance and irresponsible speculation - sad! #BrexitChaos 
I have eatenthe collective responsibilitythat was inthe Cabinetand whichyou were probablysavingfor BrexitForgive meit was deliciousSo sweetand so fragile 
#UKIP vanished because people temporarily gave their vote to the conservatives to try and make sure we got what we voted for with #Brexit. We have been betrayed by traitors and enemies of democracy. 
In his scathing resignation letter, Johnson accusing the Prime Minister of ruining the advantages Brexit could bring, and squashing any hope of an open economy.He wrote: “Brexit should be about opportunity and hope!”                            #fo2eu 
A busy day discussing the #Chequers deal in all its aspects. I remain unconvinced that this delivers the Brexit our country and my constituents voted for. We need to think again. 
All in under 24 hours....David Davis, Brexit Secretary, has resigned.Steve Baker, Brexit Minister, has resigned.Chris Green, Transport Ministry PPS, has resigned.Boris Johnson, Foreign Secretary, has resigned.Conor Burns, Boris Johnson's PPS, has resigned.#MayMustGo 
Give it a rest, Julia. Even Thatcher thought referendums were "the device of dictators & demagogues." She'd have given the #Brexit Ref short shrift if she knew about the gerrymandered franchise, lawbreaking and foreign interference. Stop pretending it was democracy's finest hour! 
Looking forward to seeing Johnson, Davis, Baker and the other self-consumed malcontents on the front page of the Daily Mail tomorrow. Betrayed their Party Leader, pulled the rug from under the EU negotiators and most pleasing of all highlighted Brexit as a shitfest.#StopBrexit pic.twitter.com/CyL9UsXpCv 
I do hope every f**ker who voted for Brexit is enjoying themselves. 
Brexit victims so far:David CameronGeorge OsborneNigel FarageDavid DavisBoris Johnson#Karma 
Suella, there is not and cannot be a “successful #Brexit”  . It is utterly impossible , like pigs flying or Tories being comradely.  The only question remaining is the degree of damage this ill begotten , backward looking, fantasy mired adventurism will cause unless stopped.  
What is Brexit? They can’t answer, because ‘Leave’ was always an indefinite answer to a stupidly binary question  
Resignations of the key #brexit ministers do not happen because of PM May’s plan would be bad.They happen because a Brexit they advocated was unattainable from the beginning.Promises of the brexiteers were an illusion and a huge scam to the British people.Only Putin wins. 
And another Brexit idiot you've never heard of resigns!#BrexitShambles 
No-deal Brexit increasingly looks likely as time runs out for negotiating sensible Canada-style free trade agreement. Not optimal but certainly feasible.  
U.K. opposition leader Jeremy Corbyn is set to meet the EU’s chief  Brexit negotiator Michel Barnier next week to “outline” the Labour  Party’s position on the Brexit talks. 
Boris Johnson's contention that Brexit is dying thanks to "needless self-doubt" is hilarity of the highest order. Instead, Brexit has been hampered mainly by the absence of a credible plan. This was ruthlessly exposed today. 
No second referendum. But how about we just ask everyone if they are sure? 
Meet Gove, the Tories' Knifer-in-chief.He knifed fellow Vote-Leave lead Boris Johnson who was set stand for Tory leadership to take charge to deliver #Brexit.And now, Gove is on board with Remainer May's cynical ploy to deliver a half-baked Brexit.Knifing 17 million Brits?  
Boris Johnson's resignation leaves the government "up Brexit creek without a paddle" says @asabenn 
."So, essentially, Boris’s dream–which he & others successfully sold to the nation–has collided with reality & been crushedJohnson was clearly still in denial, but if the Brexit dream is dying, if the choices are so bad, why are we still going ahead?". 
U.S. Ambassador Warns Trade Deal with UK ‘Totally up in the Air’ After May’s Brexit Compromise   
Brexit in its purest form could only have been expedited successfully if the audacity that created it had been maintained. But it is to Theresa May that the Tory party turned. Where we are now is ultimately a product of her personality and limited imaginative range 
Boris Johnson goes Bareback with Nigel farage in BROKE #BREXIT MOUNTING pic.twitter.com/hqdmJLFuIz 
Whatever happens next: the Chequers deal is dead in the water. Unravelling as we speak. Just as #Corbyn predicted on Sunday - to ribaldry from the experts in the punditry #Brexit 
Big differences. England didn’t break the law. They had a plan and delivered it. It didn’t cost 40billion quid. And its execution bore some resemblance to what the team promised in advance. Nice try but instead try to find a workable Brexit. Like, you know, a P L A N  
In just 11 words Jeremy Corbyn summed up the government's catastrophic Brexit strategy.By @timothyjwoods7 
Peak Brexit passive aggressive.  
These Weak willed shameless politicians quitting their jobs and wailing about “the wrong kind of Brexit”Bullshit. You know it’s failing You know it’s fantasy You know it’s undeliverable You’d throw the whole country under a bus if you thought it would further your ambition 
.@Nigel_Farage says he will consider returning as leader of Ukip if Brexit is not back on track by March 2019, and warns Tory Remainers with a small majority: “I will make damn sure you all lose your seats”  
Pleased that the accomplished  @DominicRaab is at the helm @DExEUgov, supported by the brilliant @chhcalling. Looking forward to working together to support the government & deliver a successful Brexit. 
What the establishment have done to brexit is what they tried to do to the Trump victory. Trump's base told them to get bent.  
Sadly Sajid should have backed Brexit. What was Osborne’s offer?  
It’s thanks to Labour failing to oppose - & offering only more Brexit during the election - that we’re in this mess.  
The new Conservative Brexit Supremo on Food Banks. #Tories #Brexit  
Brexit is harder than they thought. So the Brexiteers are quitting  
No, we aren't questioning #BrExit. We are questioning why Theresa May isn't delivering #BrExit.Try getting out of London. London is not the UK.  
I'm stunned by the brass neck of folk like JRM, he lies & lies & lies even though #Brexit is taking the country down in true aristocratic way. His type, like #Johnson never suffer, only us cannon fodder. 
We do care. A lot of us.Now, if you were to resign we would be saying similar.Ladies and Gents, meet Simon, who voted remain. See his sheer contempt for those of you who voted for #Brexit.   
Emily Thornberry on C4 News...decidedly ‘confused’ over Labour’s position on Brexit - as are we all! Every politician talked about ‘the will of the people’. The disconnect between the political class and the electorate is now an enormous chasm! @jonsnowC4 
Her Government, and Brexit, are in meltdown. So why does Theresa May seem so calm? By @MichaelPDeacon 
Excited to kick off this year's @greatyorkshow as usual with a warm welcome from @BBCYork at 7.00am tomorrow morning when our President @Minette_Batters will be talking Brexit and business confidence  
You really are all fleeing a sinking ship aren’t you.What happened to this AMAZING Brexit that was going to be SO easy?! YOU LOT fooled people into voting for this disaster - NOW YOU’RE ALL RUNNING AWAY! Utterly shameful! BIN BREXIT NOW! #StopBrexit !!! 
I am still out of words. These guys have told lies. They have gambled with the lives of millions of people. They have created a mess.Yet when you read their resignation letters, it sounds as if they are the victims.  #Brexit 
Brexit turmoil leaves UK in political chaos days before Trump visit  via @JordanSchachtel 
Support the call for the European Union to support Scotlands independent membership of the EU if independent before the end of #Brexit negotiations. #Scotref #Indyref2 #ClaimofRight #EU  
Sometimes I worry that I’ve become to prehistoric landscapes what AC Grayling is to Brexit. Ah well! 
EXCLUSIVE: Latest Brexit statement  
May today said in Parliament that her Chequers plan was an evolution of the position she set out in her Lancaster House speech. No it isn't. It is a repainting of her red lines faint pink and a complete betrayal of #Brexit 
Formula One could be killed off by barmy EU legislation that would make racing cars ‘subject to rules of the road’  #Brexit 
“Brussels apprehensive about dealing with Corbyn”. Why do you tell so many lies, though, @afneil? I know you love @theresa_may but your rubbish is not going to help her; she’s done for. Brexit has ruined the @CONservatives & they are so utterly divided.Wonderful. 
The most Democratic city in the entire country and the city council and Mayor are about to overturn a voter-passed referendum to raise wages for tipped workers. The problem isn't just Trump.  
Okay, I’ve had a lot of people asking me about what’s going on in the UK with the Brexit, so I will endeavor to explain. Today, Arch-Chancellor Grundle (OBE) resigned after a weekend of arguing with the Deputy Secretary of Racism, Gremelda Sludge. 
It's in the bag guys... Don't doubt it - #Brexit is HISTORY But our campaign should never have been to #StopBrexit... The #Tory government will do that for us - our campaign must be to promote the #EU and its values and there is a huge amount of work to do! #WeAreEurope 
.@theresa_may must now be given time to re-assess her position on a #Brexit deal, if she does not budge a leadership election must follow.#BorisJohnson#DavidDavis 
UK Foreign Secretary Boris Johnson quits over Prime Minister Theresa May's #Brexit plans  
Hurrah! We agree with every word of this from David Lammy. Honesty, conviction and passion in holding the Government to account.It took 2 years to Brexit write down and 2 days for it to be ripped up.#PeoplesVote 
The similarities between Brexit/Russia and Trump/Russia are astounding. I believe these similarities will continue to pile up in the upcoming weeks and months. 
Euroskeptic British ministers quit in blow to May's Brexit plan  
Cunts sayin 16year olds are too young/uninformed tae vote, while Brexit an Tory voter Margaret, 71, has just put her shoes in the oven an her dinner in the fuckin cupboard 
VM data poll finds that 100% of Brexiteers would trust Trump to head Brexit negotiations.  
Russia privatized two major state-owned companies in 2016, for the first time in years. One was Alrosa (diamonds), one was Rosneft (oil). Arron Banks (Brexit) business partner participated in Alrosa sale @ major discount. Carter Page (Trump) allegedly offered Rosneft brokerage. 
Gina Miller Lays Into Dishonest MPs As She Calls For Second Referendum On Brexit - LBC  
Has there ever been a more Brexit midfield pairing than Jack Wilshere and Mark Noble? They’ll be drinking carling at HT while singing Rule Britannia... 
The drama continues yet another Tory resigns Transport Minister Chris Green Chris Green resigns immediately after the 1922 saying his fears that her Brexit won't really be Brexit, were confirmed. What a shambles this UK gov is 
1/ The problem with Brexit was that the question was premised on a lie. It's like asking "Do you want a Unicorn?" If you say no, you're a heartless sod with no imagination. But if you say yes we'll then be prepared to find out that THERE IS NO SUCH THING AS A FUCKING UNICORN. 
Britain’s new Brexit plan is savaged—by its own Brexit secretary  
I’d love to know which EU regulation is stopping the UK from protecting female cyclists - what an odd thing to put in a resignation letter #Brexit  
In fairness to Johnson, this has been the nonsense behind the entire game of Brexit: people imagining we are at war with the EU, instead of them being our allies. #StopBrexitforPeace 
When history comes to be written the brutal facts will be Theresa May is a Liar, she lied to her own team, Brexit means Brexit was one big fat lie, she should have just told the truth Capital is more important than the hatred we sold you for votes for power  
Here are some of the most loyal and hard-working Brexiteers, who came together last night to celebrate democracy and Brexit for AFB's and @LondonLeavers #bigbrexitparty!From left to right: @KunleOlulode, @M_E_Lightfoot, @GiselaStuart' @Lugey6, @HughRBennett and @LowTaxChloe 
Does anyone else think of this when they see/hear the word BREXIT pic.twitter.com/on43kCwwOb 
Boris's resignation letter sums up months of Brexiteer frustration with the way the Government's handling of Brexit has become little more than a frantic attempt to repackage the status quo, rather than embracing the opportunity for real change  
Theresa May's reverse Midas touch has seen her fail at almost everything she has attempted in British politics. Why on Earth are so-called Brexit Cabinet ministers sticking by her as she betrays the nation?  
Boris Johnson Resigns in Disgust Over Prime Minister May's Insufferable Brexit Failure and Acquiescence To EU Globalism.PM May has been a ttal disaster as she doesn't listen to will of the people.BREXIT should already have been completed. 
British People: BrexitAmerican People: The Wall"Elites" on both sides of the Atlantic wont do what their citizens voted for b/c they think they "know better".Forgotten Men & Women in America have Donald Trump. Who will be the voice for the forgotten British Men & Women? 
A fallen government is the natural consequence of betraying the will of the people.  #BrexitBetrayal #Brexit #TheresaMay 
This guy has the best chant ever!!!  BYE BYE #BorisJohnson!! BYE BYE #DavidDavis!! BYE BYE #theresamay!! BYE BYE #Brexit!! And good riddance! #BollockstoBrexit #StopBrexit @No10Vigil  
 Another one bites the dust  He actually used the phrase "Brexit means Brexit" in his resignation letter  At this rate the cats will be running the country by the end of the week.  
If ever you needed more evidence that @OllyRobbins is the issue at the heart of the Brexit process... Remember @theresa_may backed him over ministers she appointed! 
Mogg tells the private meeting of fellow Brexiteers: "I will vote AGAINST the Brexit deal on a Monday and vote FOR confidence [in the PM] on the Tuesday" 
can someone explain to me what's going on with brexit 
Whereas Mr Davis painted an idyllic vision of Brexit, Mr Raab has been upfront about the fact that the process may be difficult  
Boris Johnson has done the right thing... finally. But Brexit won’t be saved by cabinet resignations alone. With or without Boris, the people's voice is still being ignored -- two years after it came booming back into public life, writes @Tom_Slater_ 
In Bermuda with @Nigel_Farage saying he will come back as UKIP leader if Brexit not back on track , Tories in marginally seats watch out! Lightening storm hit studio shortly afterwards - omens...  
Most people (64% of Britons) now agree with Boris that Theresa May is not trusted to secure a good #Brexit deal.@SteveBakerHW The Tories stick with her at their long term peril 
End this national farce – Labour must oppose #Brexit | Andrew Adonis  
If you’re quoting Churchill in the context of Brexit, I believe this is more appropriate  
 I mean, handing a sizeable donation to Better Together who then follow it up with Brexit leaving everyone else to clean up the mess!! I mean, Im not the only seeing this right? This is real?#indyref2 
10 minutes til me, @AaronBastani and @michaeljswalker go live on #TskySour on @novaramedia’s YouTube to talk Brexit, BoJo, and Theresa May’s chances of survival. Tune in!  
Former foreign secretary Boris Johnson said in his resignation letter the #Brexit "dream is dying"  
No more comment from Davidson & Mundell in their BBC Bunker? Notice you haven't asked/tweeted them with questions your licence payers want answered...on Dark Money, Orange Order, Racist Councillors, Hard Brexit. #RuthDavidson #DarkMoney #Tories #Racism @BBCScotlandNews #BBCRuth pic.twitter.com/HWlqPXxpcX 
BlackRock expands in Paris with new hires ahead of Brexit, source says  
Ana Gomes on #c4news telling it like it is, calling for a referendum on the Brexit deal, absolutely caustic in her takedown of the Brexiteer Buffoons. If only we had politicians like that here! 
I see the paid remainer trolls are out in full force now calling for an end to #brexitDREAM ON 
Actual footage of brexit ...  
Meet Dominic Raab: the new Brexit boss  
Rule One of Brexit club is that nothing is ever the fault of the Brexiteers. It's the fault of May or Soros, Remoaners, Barnier, Project Fear, the mysterious Establishment, the BBC, Hillary Clinton, the weather, foreigners, Muslims, socialists, liberals but never them. Never. 
Interesting KRG pm @PMBarzani was also at @RT_Erdogan inauguration —his 1st official visit to Turkey since Sept 25 referendum —but TR media ignored this  
the_referendum_respecter has logged on  
#c4news Stop saying the people voted for it, 30 000 000 people didnt. It was 52-48 and that was as a result of electoral fraud.  And that was the 2nd referendum, bring on the 3rd. 
If it looks like a duck, and walks like a duck and quacks like a duck, it’s time for the country to unite around it and entrust it with the vital next stage of Brexit negotiations. 
F_CK THE SMUG EU BUREAUCRATS CALLING FOR A SECOND REFERENDUM. We will not have it. We do not want their meddling. They have pushed their luck, bullied us, bled our national resources. We will not tolerate their imperial ambition anymore. #Liberty #FreeBriton #BrexitMeansBrexit 
BREAKING: Chris Green MP has resigned as Parliamentary Private Secretary. "The directions (Brexit) negotiations had been taking have suggested we would not really leave the EU," he said in a letter to Theresa May.  
This is what happens when you have men in government who've been raised from birth to believe it's someone else's job to clean up after them. They throw tantrums when they finally make a mess no-one can fix. #Brexit 
Speaking in Belfast today Sinn Féin President @MaryLouMcDonald has said Sinn Féin will not pick up the tab for the Tory civil war on Brexit  
U.K. foreign secretary Boris Johnson has resigned over Brexit  
NEW: Jacob Rees-Mogg: Tory party will split if Theresa May uses Labour votes to deliver soft Brexit 
Dear God. I am horrified and beyond anger. There is a profound sense of disbelief that .@theresa_may could BETRAY the British people and Referendum so comprehensively. Even our ability to prevent cruelty to animals. I am disgusted. .@BorisJohnson .@Jacob_Rees_Mogg .@andreajenkyns 
Mabye I'm being naive, but you'd have thought David Davis would have known the direction that Brexit was heading in, being Brexit Secretary and all that. 
We LOVE YOU British Patriots  #brexit 
We appear to have a situation where Labour have a coherent strategy that enables a number of eventualities on Brexit. But rather than be given space to pursue them while the Tories are disintegrating, Progress want to play ‘oust Jeremy Corbyn’ games. This won’t end well for them. 
The Brexit nightmare is dying and one by one those who lied for it are running for the hills.#PeoplesVote 
FRIEND: why are you sadME: brexitFRIEND: damn didn’t know u cared abt england like thatME (thinkin abt my wife brenda, who left me): what’s an england 
He says. He wanted Brexit from Brexit. Nothing less, nothing more.Brexit must mean Brexit.The fact that he doesn't know what Brexit is, is neither here nor there. Whatever it is, that's what he wants.Because he's a toddler. 
The last thing the Tories need is a 15% UKIP in the polls under Farage.  We won’t stop until we get a proper, clean Brexit.  
History will look back on the Britain in 2018 and wonder why on Earth it wrecked itself to keep a distinctly moronic nonentity called Peter Bone happy. #Brexit 
Where's your fully-costed Brexit plan, Chris?One that will solve the Irish-Border issue, prevent Dover becoming a lorry park, replace the 100,000 jobs already lost due to Brexit, AND return the value of the £ to it's pre-referendum levels against the Euro.Shut the fuck up.  
Did anyone ask @theresa_may if she actually wanted #BrExit to happen before they put her in charge? She really had one job and she has yet to deliver. She clearly doesn't want it to even happen. 
You know, #Brexit came about simply to settle an old Bullingdon Club schoolyard rivalry between Boris and Dave, and both have now run screaming from the consequences #BorisJohnson 
What was "unabiguous" about the Referendum result? In fact, Leave won a narrow victory based at least in part on promises on the NHS that turned out to be lies. Now it appears that #VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw Even Kenya has re-run unsafe results like these. #brexitcrooks 
Frankly you have been a disaster as a foreign secretary, you have embarrassed our nation and diminished the office.That you have run away from the problem typifies the attitude of the Brexit supporters, you started this insanity now you’ve left it for the grown ups to sort out  
Boris Johnson resigns as UK foreign secretary, exploding Brexit crisis  
This is the new Brexit minister. The BBC don’t seem to think hard-right @DominicRaab calling feminists “obnoxious bigots” is worth mentioning, but I do, and that’s why he blocked me. 
Chris Green resigns immediately after the 1922 saying his fears that  her Brexit won't really be Brexit, were confirmed.  
It's not hard #UK. JUST LEAVE!! #WalkAway. The people voted. @theresa_may is clearly not capable of executing a full separation from the #EU. #Brexit must happen... now! 
For once, I agree with Johnson."The (Brexit) dream is dying." (quote from his resignation letter)Yes indeed, it is dying, & rightly so.Brexit was a fantasy sold to the British on a false promise.The only solution is to bury this evil homunculus as quickly as possible. 
A list of David Davis’ and Boris Johnson’s achievements in two years as Brexit Secretary and Foreign Secretary:1)2)3)4)5)6)7)8)9)10)11)12)13)14)15)16)17)18)19)20) Made everyone's summer holiday more expensive by quitting in early July, causing sterling to dip. 
That Kevin Maguire is a hateful bloody man. He stands by Labour through thick and thin. Takes great pleasure in seeing the country go downhill, never mind about Leave or Remain this man is a sick bastard. He would have a Chimp in charge rather than see a successful Brexit Sick. 
Well Done Chris... WE VOTED FOR HARD BREXIT.... 
